Gramsci, Language, and Translation
葛兰西、语言和翻译

Acknowledgments 致谢语
Edited collections are by definition collective projects, as are translations. Fortunately and appropriately, so too is Gramscian scholarship. It is the wide community of Gramscian scholars, in Italy and throughout the world, who made this volume possible. Most immediately, of course, we thank the fifteen contributors not only for allowing us to include their work, but also because that work has inspired both of our own scholarship. Making the issues and debates over Gramsci, language and translation available to a wider audience will hopefully reciprocate the generosity and commitment of this community of intellectuals working with Gramsci,Äös ideas and writings. We would specifically like to thank Joseph Buttigieg for his kind advice and encouragement and for his own efforts in translating Gramsci,Äös prison writings, which are essential to the broader project. Bob Jessop and Daniel Moshenberg also provided valuable suggestions. We would like to thank the Instituto Italiano for Philosophical Studies in Naples and its president, Gerardo Marotta, for their support. Silvio Pons and Fondazione Instituto Gramsci kindly provided images for the cover. Peter Ives would like to acknowledge the support of Adele Perry, Nell Perry and Theo Perry, who always provide the perspective on the smaller and richest moments of life. Rocco Lacorte would like to thank his mother, Sara Lacorte, for her support, and his father, Carmelo Lacorte, whose memory, energy and vitality also live on through this work. And thank you also to Joseph Parry and Lexington Press for their patience, enthusiasm and understanding of the particular requirements, delays and obstacles of such a project.
致谢语  编著性质的合集以及翻译作品，其本质上都是集体项目。幸运且恰当的是，葛兰西研究亦是如此。正是遍布意大利及全球的葛兰西学者群体，使得本书得以出版。当然，最直接的感谢，要献给十五位贡献者，不仅因为他们允许我们收录他们的研究成果，更因为这些成果激发了我们自身的学术研究。将葛兰西、语言和翻译相关的议题与辩论呈现给更广泛的读者群体，希望能够回馈这个致力于葛兰西思想和著作的知识分子群体所展现出的慷慨和奉献精神。我们特地感谢约瑟夫·布蒂吉格，感谢他提供的宝贵建议和鼓励，以及他为翻译葛兰西的狱中著作所付出的努力，这些著作对于更广泛的项目至关重要。鲍勃·杰索普和丹尼尔·莫申贝格也提供了宝贵的建议。我们还要感谢那不勒斯意大利哲学研究所及其总裁杰拉尔多·马罗塔，感谢他们的支持。西尔维奥·蓬斯和葛兰西基金会研究所提供了封面图片。 彼得·艾夫斯感谢阿德莱德·佩里、内尔·佩里和西奥·佩里，他们总是能提供对人生细微而丰富的时刻的视角。罗科·拉科尔特感谢他的母亲萨拉·拉科尔特给予的支持，以及他的父亲卡梅洛·拉科尔特，他的记忆、活力和生命力也通过这项工作得以延续。还要感谢约瑟夫·帕里和莱克星顿出版社对该项目特殊要求、延误和障碍的耐心、热情和理解。

Introduction
Translating Gramsci on Language, Translation and Politics
Peter Ives and Rocco Lacorte
导论  翻译葛兰西的语言、翻译与政治  彼得·艾夫斯和罗科·拉科尔特

There is a fascinating silence concerning Antonio Gramsci’s writings on language and translation despite his wide ranging and profound influence, particularly in fields and debates in which language features prominently such as poststructuralism and cultural studies. For example, Stuart Hall, Ernesto Laclau, Chantal Mouffe and Gayatri Spivak all draw on Gramsci in different and significant ways and have also been influenced by linguistically informed poststructuralism. Yet neither they, nor the important work that has followed in their paths, ever address Gramsci’s own writings on language. It is as if the linguistic roots of poststructuralism, through structualism, block out or obscure Gramsci’s studies in linguistics at the University of Turin, his lifelong interest in the “standardization” of the Italian language, and his extensive discussions and practices of language and translation throughout his famous Prison Notebooks. This is symptomatic of a more general reluctance within scholarship on Gramsci’s political and cultural theory to fully integrate his approach to language and translation. From neo-Gramscian international political economy to social history, literary studies and political theory, Gramsci’s wide influence remains constrained due to the neglect of many of his specific arguments especially concerning language and translation. This volume is, in part, an attempt to remedy this both through the act of translation but also by presenting a collection of diverse essays addressing this reluctance to recognize the significance and centrality of Gramsci’s writings on language and translation to his entire social, political and cultural theory. After discussing the background and the organization of this volume, we will introduce several themes and examples to illustrate the potential significance of Gramsci’s writings on language and translation for an array of debates across many fields and disciplines.
尽管安东尼奥·葛兰西对语言和翻译的著述影响广泛而深刻，尤其是在语言占据突出地位的领域和辩论中，如后结构主义和文化研究，却存在着令人费解的沉默。例如，斯图亚特·霍尔、恩内斯托·拉克兰、尚塔尔·莫菲和甘伽特丽·斯皮瓦克都以不同的重要方式借鉴了葛兰西，并且也受到了语言学视角的后结构主义的影响。然而，他们，以及在他们之后的重要著作，从未触及葛兰西本人关于语言的著述。仿佛后结构主义的语言根源，通过结构主义，遮蔽或模糊了葛兰西在都灵大学的语言研究、他终身对意大利语“标准化”的关注，以及他在著名的《狱中札记》中广泛的语言和翻译讨论与实践。这反映了葛兰西政治和文化理论研究中更普遍的抵触情绪，即未能充分整合他对语言和翻译的视角。 从新格拉姆斯基国际政治经济学到社会史、文学研究和政治理论，葛兰西的影响力虽然广泛，但由于许多特定论点，特别是关于语言和翻译的论点被忽视，其影响力仍然受到限制。本书部分旨在通过翻译行为，以及呈现一系列涵盖不同视角的文章来弥补这一不足，这些文章探讨了人们不愿承认葛兰西的语言和翻译著作与其整个社会、政治和文化理论之间的重要性和核心地位。在讨论本书的背景和组织结构之后，我们将介绍几个主题和案例，以说明葛兰西的语言和翻译著作对诸多领域和学科的各种辩论的潜在意义。

In 1979, Franco Lo Piparo’s Lingua, Intellettuali e Egemonia in Gramsci [Language, Intellectuals and Hegemony in Gramsci] added the first, thorough, book-length analysis to the small but significant Italian literature concerning Gramsci and language making it incontrovertible that his linguistic studies were central to his well known conception of hegemony and his entire approach to political analysis.1 While Lo Piparo’s book became the work cited on Gramsci and language, no part of it has ever been translated. Moreover, outside the Italian literature, there has been very little engagement with Lo Piparo’s specific and rather polemical assertion. Lo Piparo went well beyond just revealing how Gramsci’s key ideas were foreshadowed by the linguistic milieu he encountered through his linguistics professor, Matteo Bartoli, at the University of Turin, who was engaged in debates with the neo-grammarian school from which Ferdinand de Saussure and structuralism emerged. In an article in 1987, translated for the first time in this volume (chapter 1), Lo Piparo summarized his polemical thesis, “The primitive matrix of [Gramsci’s] philosophy should not be searched for in Marx or in Lenin or in any other Marxist, but in the science of language.”2
1979 年，弗朗哥·洛皮帕罗的《葛兰西的语言、知识分子与霸权》（Lingua, Intellettuali e Egemonia in Gramsci）对关于葛兰西和语言的少量但重要的意大利文献进行了第一篇全面、篇幅较长的分析，无可辩驳地证明了他的语言研究是其著名的霸权概念以及整个政治分析方法的核心。1  尽管洛皮帕罗的著作成为关于葛兰西和语言的引文来源，但其任何部分从未被翻译过。此外，在意大利文学领域之外，人们对洛皮帕罗的具体且相当有争议的主张几乎没有进行过深入探讨。洛皮帕罗不仅揭示了葛兰西的关键思想是如何受到他在都灵大学语言学教授马特奥·巴尔托利的影响而预示的，而且还深入探讨了巴尔托利与新语法学派（该学派孕育了费迪南·德·索绪尔和结构主义）的辩论。 1987 年一篇论文（本卷第一章首次翻译），洛·皮帕罗总结了他的争议性论点：“[葛兰西]哲学的原始根基不应该在马克思、列宁或任何其他马克思主义者中寻找，而应该在语言学中寻找。”2

By pitting Gramsci’s linguistics against, and in exclusion of, Marxist influences, Lo Piparo raises many fundamental questions concerning the role of language in social and political theory that are at the center of pivotal debates about cultural studies, poststructuralism, post-Marxism, discourse analysis and also a whole range of fields in which Gramsci’s influential concept of “hegemony” is often utilized. These include multiculturalism, identity politics, feminism, cultural studies, critical education studies and, perhaps most important, postcolonialism. But it is only recently within Italian and German scholarship that the adequate basis for such implications has been provided. This book aims at bringing such research to the wider, English-reading audience, including specialists but also those with more pragmatic and empirical interests in Gramsci’s ideas. Part I of this book begins with this 1987 article in which Lo Piparo summarizes the most polemical aspect of his earlier book-length study. We are pleased to be able to include an explanatory note at the beginning written by Lo Piparo and published here for the first time. The rest of part I contains various responses to Lo Piparo, all of which focus on the importance of seeing language as central to Gramsci’s entire legacy. Part II contains five chapters dealing with how Gramsci writes about translation and develops it as a key concept clearly connected with his focus on language. Part III includes five chapters that elucidate various implications and methodological considerations stemming from the thesis that language and translation are central motifs of Gramsci’s writings.
通过将葛兰西的语言学与马克思主义的影响对立，并排除马克思主义的影响，洛·皮帕罗提出了许多关于语言在社会和政治理论中的作用的基本问题，这些问题是文化研究、后结构主义、后马克思主义、话语分析以及葛兰西具有影响力的“霸权”概念经常被运用的各种领域的核心争论。这些领域包括多元文化主义、身份政治、女权主义、文化研究、批判教育研究，以及也许最重要的，后殖民主义。但是，直到最近，意大利和德国的学术界才为这些含义提供了充分的基础。本书旨在将此类研究带给更广泛的英语读者，包括专家以及对葛兰西思想怀有更多实用和经验兴趣的人。本书第一部分以洛·皮帕罗 1987 年的文章开始，他在该文中总结了他早期著作中最具争议的部分。我们很高兴能够在书的开头附上洛·皮帕罗撰写并首次发表的说明性注释。 第一部分余下内容包含对洛·皮帕罗的各种回应，所有回应都集中于将语言视为葛兰西全部遗产核心之重要性。第二部分包含五章，论述葛兰西如何论述翻译，并将其作为与他对语言的关注密切相关的关键概念加以发展。第三部分包含五章，阐明将语言和翻译视为葛兰西著作核心主题的各种含义和方法论考虑。

Most Italian Gramsci scholars regarded Lo Piparo’s book primarily as a major contribution to a line of scholarship that had emphasized the importance of Gramsci’s concern with language. This theme reaches back at least to Luigi Ambrosoli’s brief article from 1960, “Nuovi contributi agli ‘Scritti giovanili5 di Gramsci” [“New Contributions to the ‘Early Writings5 of Gramsci”],3 and earlier一for example, Pier Paolo Pasolini's 1953 article,4 and others discussed by Tullio De Mauro (see chapter 14 of this volume). Lo Piparo's more ardent contentions about Gramsci's “nonMarxist roots” were taken up by scholars such as Rosiello, De Mauro, Gensini and Passaponti.5 Chapters 2, 3 and 4 all represent such critiques, challenging Lo Piparo's framing of Gramsci's linguistics against his other influences while welcoming his accomplishment placing Gramsci’s considerations of language at the center of his thought. Rosiello directly challenges Lo Piparo's argument that Gramsci derived the “theoretical instruments” to link his concerns with the politics of language with larger questions of culture and society from his studies in linguistics. Rosiello argues that Gramsci looked to the theoretical approach of Marxism’s historical materialist method in order to correct for the inadequacies in the linguistics he was studying. De Mauro (chapter 3) notes that in order to understand Gramsci’s varied approaches to “linguistic facts” we should see the many experiences of his life as activities of translation, a concept that Gramsci himself developed as the chapters in part II demonstrate. Maurizio Lichtner (chapter 10), while citing Lo Piparo favorably, proceeds immediately to challenge his general position, concluding that Gramsci’s “Marxism seems to fully coincide with the historicist view of language.”6
大多数意大利葛兰西学者主要将洛皮帕罗的著作视为对强调葛兰西语言关切重要性的学术脉络的一大贡献。这一主题至少可以追溯到路易吉·安布罗索利 1960 年的短文“葛兰西‘青年著作’的新贡献”以及更早的文章，例如皮耶罗·帕索里尼 1953 年的文章，以及图利奥·德毛罗在本书第 14 章中讨论的其他文章。洛皮帕罗关于葛兰西“非马克思主义根源”的更激烈的论点，受到了罗西耶罗、德毛罗、根西尼和帕萨蓬蒂等学者的回应。第 2、3 和 4 章都代表了此类批判，挑战洛皮帕罗将葛兰西的语言学思想与其他影响因素割裂开来，同时认可了他将葛兰西的语言思考置于其思想核心地位的成就。罗西耶罗直接挑战了洛皮帕罗的论点，即葛兰西从语言学研究中获得将语言政治与文化和社会更大问题联系起来的“理论工具”。 罗西耶罗认为，葛兰西为了弥补其语言研究的不足，转向了马克思主义历史唯物主义方法的理论视角。德毛罗（第 3 章）指出，为了理解葛兰西对“语言事实”的各种方法，我们应该将他的诸多生活经历视为翻译活动，这一概念正是葛兰西自己在第二部分各章节中阐述的。马尔齐奥·利希特纳（第 10 章），虽然引用了洛·皮帕罗的观点，但随即对其总体立场提出了挑战，认为葛兰西的“马克思主义似乎完全与历史主义的语言观相符”。六

While there has been some notable scholarship in English engaging with Lo Piparo’s general point about the importance of Gramsci’s studies in linguistics,? none has addressed the specifics of the debate concerning the relationship一antagonistic or complementary一between Gramsci's linguistics and his Marxism (and Leninism). In Germany with Wolfgang Fritz Haug's important comparisons especially with Bertolt Brecht,8 the work of Frank Jablonka9 and Utz Maas’ contribution (chapter 5), Gramsci’s focus on language gained some recognition. However, as De Mauro wrote in 1991, “Everything considered, either one deals with language and linguistics, and therefore not with Gramsci, or one deals with Gramsci the politician and, again, not with Gramsci the linguist” (this volume, chapter 14). This statement has great resonance with the myriad of poststructualist-inspired work claiming to go beyond Gramsci, including Laclau and Mouffe.10 The contributions to this volume show an alternative; various ways (and the debates they raise) to fully integrate Gramsci’s political theory and his linguistic concerns. This collection is far from exhaustive in terms of important current work being carried out in these areas. There is also significant scholarship addressing the significance of language to Gramsci’s legacy that we were unable to include for reasons of space and coherency. To give a few examples, Stefano Selenu’s excellent essay, “Alcuni aspetti della questione della lingua sarda attraverso la diade storiagrammatica: un’impostazione di tipo gramsciano” [“Some Aspects of the Sardinian Language Question through the History-Grammar Dyad: A Gramscian Formulation”], both interprets and uses Gramsci within the specific context of Sardinian.11 Alessandro Carlucci has recently stressed the impact of Gramsci’s receptivity to linguistic and cultural diversity to his overall political theory.12 Giancarlo Schirru has traced out the more intimate relations between Gramsci’s linguistics and linguistic development in the United States in the twentieth century.13 Benedetto Fontana’s work does not focus specifically on Gramsci’s writings on language, but by taking Gramsci’s ideas back to their Greek roots in questions of rhetoric, logos, reason and democracy, he touches on several of the main themes raised in this volume concerning the importance of Gramsci’s interest in language and reason in relation to democracy.14 And no other than the Nobel Prize winner Amartya Sen has traced out the significant influence of Gramsci and Wittgenstein on the economist Piero Sraffa, a friend and key correspondent of Gramsci while in prison. As Sen writes, “it is useful to see how Gramsci’s [prison] notes relate to the subject matter of Sraffa’s conversations with Wittgenstein, including the part played by rules and conventions and the reach of what became known as ‘ordinary language philosophy.’” He argues that key parts of what Wittgenstein famously called language games “seem to figure quite prominently in the Prison Notebooks：'15 And, according to Sen, these ideas are at the core to Sraffa’s contributions in economics. We hope this volume will highlight and contribute to such diverse considerations of Gramsci’s influence and importance.
尽管一些英语学术研究关注了洛·皮帕罗关于葛兰西语言学研究重要性的总体观点，但没有一篇涉及葛兰西的语言学与他的马克思主义（以及列宁主义）之间——是敌对还是互补——关系的具体争论。在德国，沃尔夫冈·弗里茨·豪格（尤其与贝托尔特·布莱希特进行比较）的著作、弗兰克·雅布隆卡的著作以及乌茨·马斯（第五章）的贡献，都使葛兰西对语言的关注获得了一些认可。然而，正如德·毛罗 1991 年所写，“总而言之，要么你研究语言和语言学，因此不是葛兰西；要么你研究葛兰西的政治思想，再次不是葛兰西的语言学研究”（本卷，第 14 章）。这句话与众多受后结构主义启发的研究（包括拉克兰和穆夫）声称超越葛兰西的观点产生了强烈的共鸣。本卷的贡献则展现了一种替代方案；各种（以及由此引发的争论）将葛兰西的政治理论和语言学关切完全整合起来的方式。 这篇文章的收录远非涵盖了这些领域所有重要的当前研究。由于篇幅和连贯性原因，我们未能收录大量关注语言对葛兰西遗产意义的学术研究。举几个例子，斯特凡诺·塞莱努的优秀论文“通过历史语法二元论考察撒丁语问题的一些方面：一种葛兰西式的阐释”[“Some Aspects of the Sardinian Language Question through the History-Grammar Dyad: A Gramscian Formulation”]，既诠释了葛兰西，又在撒丁岛的特定语境中运用了他的思想。11 阿莱桑德罗·卡鲁奇最近强调了葛兰西对语言和文化多样性的接受性对他整体政治理论的影响。12 詹卡洛·斯基鲁追踪了葛兰西的语言学与 20 世纪美国语言发展之间的更密切联系。13 贝内代托·福朗特纳的作品并非专门关注葛兰西关于语言的著作，但他将葛兰西的思想追溯到修辞、逻各斯、理性以及民主的希腊根源，从而触及了本卷中关于葛兰西对语言和理性与民主关系的关注的重要主题。14 诺贝尔奖得主阿马蒂亚·森也追溯了葛兰西和维特根斯坦对经济学家皮耶罗·斯拉法的影响，斯拉法是葛兰西在狱中的朋友和主要通信对象。正如森所写，“了解葛兰西的[狱中]笔记如何与斯拉法与维特根斯坦的对话主题相关，包括规则和习俗所扮演的角色以及‘日常语言哲学’的范围，是有益的。”他认为，维特根斯坦著名的“语言游戏”的关键部分在《狱中札记》中似乎相当突出。15 据森所说，这些思想构成了斯拉法在经济学贡献的核心。我们希望本卷能够突出并促进对葛兰西的影响和重要性的各种思考。

Perhaps out of respect for Lo Piparo’s painstaking and vital research, the Italian responses did not take an overly polemical form. But especially throughout the 1990s as questions of language and communication grew in importance throughout Italian society due to increasing globalization, technological change and academic trends, the significance of Gramsci’s approach to language became increasingly apparent. This is one of the points that Edoardo Sanguineti, a leading Italian intellectual, poet, writer and translator, makes in an interview which we are delighted to have as chapter 6. It is in this context that earlier debates on Lo Piparo’s work open onto a richer groundwork that pays much closer attention to his prison writings as a site of his intellectual development and transformation, synthesizing the multiple sources of "hegemony.”16 Thus, our project here is to go well beyond presenting Lo Piparo’s most contentious thesis and the Italian retorts. As Sanguineti notes, from the broader perspective, and especially considering Gramsci’s conception of “translation,” the narrow debate that Lo Piparo kicked off becomes superfluous at the level of the desire for a single answer. The various contributions to this volume highlight crucial work carried out mostly in Italian, but also German and English, focusing on how Gramsci utilized linguistic concepts, concerns over language politics and translation, and how these link and build on connections among the many themes of Gramsci’s entire thought. Thus, Francisco F. Buey (chapter 12) explains how “the fight to give meaning to the words of one’s own tradition and the fight to name things is probably the first autonomous act of the fight among ideas during the end of the twentieth century,” emphasizing Gramsci’s importance in helping us increase communication among generations. Similarly, Anne Showstack Sassoon (chapter 13), focusing not on what Gramsci writes about language and translation, but how he uses language, highlights the subversive method by which Gramsci approaches the concepts and positions of others.17
或许出于对洛·皮帕罗艰辛而重要的研究的尊重，意大利的回应并未采取过于论战的形式。但在 20 世纪 90 年代，随着全球化、技术变革和学术潮流在意大利社会日益凸显语言和交流的重要性，葛兰西对语言的理解变得日益显而易见。这是意大利著名知识分子、诗人、作家和翻译家埃多阿尔多·桑吉内蒂在接受采访（我们很高兴将其作为第 6 章收录）时提出的观点之一。正是在这种语境下，关于洛·皮帕罗作品的早期辩论，得以拓展到一个更加丰富的基础，更加关注他的狱中著作作为其知识发展和转变的场所，综合了“霸权”的多种来源。16 因此，我们的项目旨在超越呈现洛·皮帕罗最具争议的论点及其意大利回应。正如桑吉内蒂所指出的，从更广阔的视角来看，特别是考虑到葛兰西对“翻译”的理解，洛·皮帕罗引发的狭隘辩论在追求单一答案的层面变得多余。 本书各章的贡献，主要集中于意大利语，也包括德语和英语的研究，重点探讨了葛兰西如何运用语言概念、关注语言政治和翻译，以及这些如何联系并建立在葛兰西思想诸多主题之间的联系。例如，弗朗西斯科·F·布伊（第 12 章）解释道，“赋予自身传统词汇意义的斗争以及为事物命名，很可能是 20 世纪末思想斗争中的第一个自主行为”，强调葛兰西在促进代际沟通方面的意义。类似地，安·肖斯塔克·萨松（第 13 章），并非关注葛兰西关于语言和翻译的论述，而是关注他如何运用语言，突出了葛兰西批判性地对待他人概念和立场的策略。17

Many of the analyses presented here follow a very philological and close textual reading of Gramsci’s writings. They utilize the provisional, unfinished nature of Gramsci’s notes to delve into the processes of Gramsci’s thinking, his way of approaching analysis. Chapters 7, 10 and 15 draw on the specific distinction between Gramsci’s passages that, following the Gerratana edition, scholars label as A-texts, B-texts and C-texts. The former are passages that are like first drafts, which Gramsci returned to and rewrote with minor or major revisions in later notebooks. Gerratana labeled these rewritten passages C-texts. B-texts are passages that Gramsci wrote originally and never revised.18 The method of tracing out the differences in Gramsci’s writings as they develop and the general focus on the minutia of Gramsci’s writings may initially seem arcane and give the impression that the goal is solely the reconstruction of Gramsci’s thought for a specialist audience. However, there are two things to keep in mind concerning this method. One, as described above, is the obstinacy that has faced the thesis that language is at the heart of Gramsci’s thought, both within Gramscian scholarship and the larger fields in which Gramsci has been very influential. Especially within Gramscian scholarship, this close textual method is quite important in thoroughly establishing the centrality of language and translation to his entire thought. The other more important point to keep in mind is that this method, far from just taking Gramsci’s word as gospel, should be seen as the opposite—as a window into how Gramsci approached and developed historical analysis rather than just what he wrote or thought. As Stuart Hall has famously argued, Gramsci’s fragmentary writings are a positive feature that resist the “seamless garment of Orthodoxy.”19 By highlighting that Gramsci was continually revising and, indeed, “translating” his own writings, we can better understand Gramsci’s way of thinking, his method.
本文许多分析都遵循对葛兰西著作的细致文献学解读和文本研读。它们利用葛兰西笔记的临时性和未完成性，深入探究葛兰西的思维过程及其分析方法。第七、十和十五章借鉴了葛兰西文本（根据杰拉塔纳版本）中 A 文本、B 文本和 C 文本的具体区分。前者为初稿，葛兰西在后来的笔记本中返回修改，进行小幅或大幅的修订。杰拉塔纳将这些重写后的段落标记为 C 文本。B 文本是葛兰西最初撰写且从未修改的段落。18  追踪葛兰西著作发展中的差异，以及对葛兰西著作细枝末节的关注，最初可能显得深奥，并给人一种仅仅是为了重建葛兰西思想供专家读者阅读的印象。然而，关于这种方法，有两点需要牢记。 一，正如上文所述，语言是葛兰西思想核心的论题，在葛兰西研究领域以及葛兰西产生广泛影响的更大领域内，都面临着顽固的反对。尤其在葛兰西研究内部，这种密切的文本方法对于彻底确立语言和翻译在他整个思想中的核心地位至关重要。另一个更重要的考虑点是，这种方法并非简单地将葛兰西的言论奉为圭臬，而应视为其反面——它揭示了葛兰西如何理解和发展历史分析，而非仅仅是他写了什么或想到了什么。正如斯图亚特·霍尔（Stuart Hall）所著名论证的那样，葛兰西的零散著作是一种积极的特征，它抵制着“正统的无缝衣袍”。通过强调葛兰西不断地修订，甚至“翻译”他自己的著作，我们可以更好地理解葛兰西的思维方式，他的方法论。

Engaging Language in Social, Cultural and Political Theory
社会、文化和政治理论中的互动语言

Our hope is that this collection will speak to a broad range of issues and disciplines by opening up Gramsci’s focus on language and translation. In the realm of social theory, for example, comparisons between Gramsci and other theorists for whom language is central—Foucault, Habermas, Chomsky, Bakhtin, Bourdieu—are common, but without an understanding of the role of language in Gramsci’s approach, such comparisons remain shallow. Similarly, feminist analyses of production, reproduction and the role of ideology and identity that usefully draw on Gramsci20 could be expanded and broadened through a thorough engagement with his views of the transformation of “common sense,” connections between thought and action, and the intricacies of consensual power relationships all provided by Gramsci’s discussions of language.21 These issues could also be fruitfully related to the rich and varying feminist approaches to language from Julia Kristeva to Dale Spender and Deborah Cameron.22
我们希望通过打开葛兰西对语言和翻译的关注，使这套文集能够触及广泛的问题和学科。例如，在社会理论领域，葛兰西与其他将语言置于核心地位的理论家（如福柯、哈贝马斯、乔姆斯基、巴赫金、布迪厄）之间的比较很常见，但如果没有理解葛兰西方法论中语言的作用，这些比较仍然肤浅。类似地，对生产、再生产以及意识形态和身份作用进行的女性主义分析，能够从葛兰西的视角获得有益的启发，但可以通过深入探讨他关于“常识”的转变、思想与行动之间的联系以及共识性权力关系的复杂性（这些都体现在葛兰西对语言的讨论中）来扩展和拓宽。这些问题还可以与从朱莉娅·克里斯蒂娃到戴尔·斯宾德和黛博拉·凯梅隆等女性主义者对语言的丰富而多样的视角进行富有成效的关联。

Many of the chapters in this volume show how attention to Gramsci’s writings on language and translation enables engagements with major thinkers of the twentieth century concerning language. Gensini (chapter 4) does not mention Gramsci until almost the halfway mark. Rather he starts with a critique of Chomskian linguistics by going back to Ferdinand de Saussure, and a particular reading of Saussure as providing a more dialectical, social framework that does not bracket out spoken language, or parole, in the manner that standard interpretations often describe. Gensini mobilizes a host of linguists against Chomsky, including ex-Chomskians, Wittgenstein and William Labov, all of which crucially lead him to Gramsci and the central theme of all the articles in part I of this volume, the relationships between language and society. Summarizing Lo Piparo’s contribution and noting its positive value, Gensini proceeds to critique Lo Piparo for “flattening” Gramsci to a “liberal-linguistic” version that does not do justice to the diversity of his life experiences and his contributions to the line of thinking about language (contra Chomsky) within social and political relations of speakers from Saussure and Wittgenstein to Labov and the post-Chomskians. One could extend this notion of a flattened Gramsci to the way Laclau and Mouffe interpret and critique him.23 Gensini’s use of Gramsci to illustrate a Marxist approach to language resonates with other Marxist theories of language such the important work of Jean-Jacques Lecercle, Jean Louis Houdebine and Marnie Holborow.24 However, it is Gramsci’s specific perspective that enables Gensini, Buey and other contributors to this volume to raise questions of ideology and culture in a Gramscian way that other Marxist considerations of language never quite reach.
本书许多章节都展示了关注葛兰西关于语言和翻译的著作如何促使人们与二十世纪主要语言思想家展开对话。根西尼（第四章）直到接近一半才提及葛兰西。相反，他从对乔姆斯基语言学的批判开始，追溯到费迪南·德·索绪尔，并对索绪尔进行特殊解读，将其视为提供更具辩证性和社会性的框架，该框架不会像标准解释通常描述的那样排除口语或言语。根西尼调动了大量语言学家与乔姆斯基对抗，包括前乔姆斯基主义者、维特根斯坦和威廉·拉博夫，所有这些都至关重要地引导他走向葛兰西以及本书第一部分所有文章的核心主题——语言与社会的关系。 总结了洛·皮帕罗的贡献及其积极价值后，根西尼继续批评洛·皮帕罗将葛兰西“扁平化”成一种“自由主义语言学”版本，这未能体现其丰富的生活经历以及他对语言思想的贡献（反对乔姆斯基），从索绪尔和维特根斯坦到拉博夫和后乔姆斯基学派，涵盖了说话者在社会和政治关系中的语言研究。人们可以将这种“扁平化”的葛兰西概念延伸到拉克兰和穆夫对他的解读和批评中。23 根西尼利用葛兰西来说明马克思主义的语言观，这与其他马克思主义语言理论，例如让-雅克·莱塞尔、让-路易·乌德宾和马妮·霍尔博罗的著作，产生共鸣。24 然而，正是葛兰西的特定视角，使根西尼、布伊和其他卷内贡献者能够以葛兰西的方式提出意识形态和文化问题，而其他马克思主义语言研究从未真正触及。

Postcolonial scholars, and especially the subaltern studies group, draw on certain themes within Gramsci’s notion of “hegemony” and "subalternity,” finding similarities with Gramsci’s analysis of Italy but also emphasizing the very different dynamics of colonial and neocolonial power dynamics. However, their important attention to the role of languages in this process has never been connected substantially to Gramsci’s own writings on language politics. Gayatri Spivak’s influential essay "Can the Subaltern Speak?” grapples with the subaltern studies utilization of Gramsci’s conception of the “subaltern” but totally ignores Gramsci’s own concentration on this very question of subaltern speech.25 Ranajit Guha captures succinctly in the very title of his book, Dominance without Hegemony, the distinction between European capitalist state dominance and the colonial type of domination. Drawing on some standard interpretations of Gramsci, Guha views hegemony as the construction of consent and persuasion. Because in colonial India, Guha argues, consent was “outweighed” by coercion, “hegemony” is inadequate to describe the dominance at hand. This is why he is constantly on guard against “spurious” notions of hegemony.26 And yet, as Maas, Borghese, Frosini and Buey suggest, Gramsci’s writings on language and translation provide a much richer and intricate analysis of state coercion and persuasion that does not weigh the two as if they were separate notions. The analyses of these chapters here could open new spaces to investigate Guha’s analysis of the prestige that Gandhi fought for in 1920-1922, with the dynamics of hegemony, and especially the linguistic aspects of colonial power and domination of which Guha and others are so acutely aware. Gramsci’s insight into language, politics and translation can also potentially shed light on how this rich historical analysis can be brought to bare on the changing situation in India today.27
后殖民学者，特别是次等研究小组，借鉴了葛兰西“霸权”和“次等”概念中的某些主题，发现其与葛兰西对意大利的分析具有相似之处，但也强调了殖民和新殖民权力动态的巨大差异。然而，他们对语言在此过程中作用的关注，从未与葛兰西本人关于语言政治的著作建立实质性联系。Gayatri Spivak 的有影响力的文章“次等阶层能否说话？”探讨了次等研究小组对葛兰西“次等”概念的利用，但却完全忽略了葛兰西本人对次等阶层言语权这一问题的关注。25。Ranajit Guha 在其著作《没有霸权的统治》的书名中简洁地捕捉到了欧洲资本主义国家统治与殖民统治类型之间的区别。借鉴葛兰西的一些标准诠释，Guha 将霸权视为共识和说服的构建。由于在殖民印度，Guha 认为，同意被“压倒”了，因此，“霸权”不足以描述眼前的统治。 这就是为什么他时刻警惕“虚假”霸权观念。26 然而，正如马斯、博格塞、弗罗西尼和布埃所建议的那样，葛兰西关于语言和翻译的著作，对国家强制和劝服提供了更为丰富和细致的分析，并非将两者视为截然不同的概念。本章的分析可以为研究古哈对甘地 1920-1922 年所争取的声望，以及霸权动态，特别是殖民权力和统治的语言方面（古哈及其他学者对此非常敏锐）提供新的研究空间。葛兰西对语言、政治和翻译的洞察力，也有可能阐明如何将这种丰富的历史分析应用于当今印度的变革性局面。27

Nation, Language, People 民族、语言、人民

Turning to another example of how this volume may intervene in current debates, several scholars have put forth the vague notion that Gramsci was somehow locked by his historical period in a narrow conception of the nation-state, or addressed it in a manner that makes his concerns anachronistic and limited for us today. For instance, Susan Buck-Morss writes, “whereas Gramsci’s discussion concerns hegemony within the nation-state (the process whereby a nation assimilates all of society to itself), political hegemony is described today as extending globally.”28 Due to this perceived shortcoming, Buck-Morss finds it necessary to leave Gramsci in favor of Carl Schmidt and his conception of sovereignty. This notion that Gramsci’s hegemony is confined to the nation-state is indeed supported by Richard Bellamy’s emphasis on Gramsci as a national thinker who must be understood within the confines of his historical context.29 Even those advocating the use of Gramsci’s concepts to analyze late twentieth- and twenty-first-century processes of “globalization,” such as Robert Cox and Stephen Gill, reinforce this notion by describing the “neo-Gramscian” international political economy (IPE) project as “internationalizing” his concepts, translating them not from the historical context of the 1920s and 1930s to the 1980s and the twenty-first century, but from the domestic or national level to the international or global level.30 Their critics frame their opposition to neo-Gramscian IPE in terms of whether or not Gramsci’s concepts from civil society to hegemony can be “internationalized” and made relevant on a global scale.31
转向该卷如何介入当前学术讨论的另一个例子，一些学者提出了一种模糊的概念，即葛兰西由于其历史时期，以狭隘的民族国家概念为局限，或者其论述方式使他的关切对当今时代而言显得过时且局限。例如，苏珊·巴克-莫尔斯写道：“葛兰西的论述关注的是民族国家内部的霸权（一个国家将整个社会同化于自身的进程），而今天的政治霸权则被描述为在全球范围内延伸。”28 由于这种感知的不足，巴克-莫尔斯认为有必要抛弃葛兰西，转而支持卡尔·施米特及其对主权的理解。这种认为葛兰西的霸权局限于民族国家的观点，确实得到了理查德·贝拉米对葛兰西作为一名民族思想家，必须在其历史背景下理解的强调的支持。29 即使那些倡导使用葛兰西的概念来分析二十世纪后期和二十一世纪“全球化”进程的人，例如罗伯特·考克斯和斯蒂芬·吉尔，也通过将“新葛兰西主义”国际政治经济学 (IPE) 项目描述为“国际化”他的概念来强化这一观点，他们并非将这些概念从 1920 年代和 1930 年代的历史语境翻译到 1980 年代和二十一世纪，而是从国内或国家层面翻译到国际或全球层面。30 他们的批评者将他们对新葛兰西主义 IPE 的反对置于葛兰西的概念，从公民社会到霸权，能否被“国际化”并在全球范围内具有相关性。31

Yet, as Adam Morton has astutely argued, this entire debate can only take place by ignoring Gramsci’s insistence that state formation and the nation be put in the (“international”) context of European and world history and the development of interstate systems. In supporting his argument, it is not just coincidental that some of Morton’s key references are passages in which Gramsci is discussing language.32 Many of the chapters here, including Buey, Maas, Borghese and Lacorte’s attention to the international or non-national dimensions of Gramsci’s reflections on language and translation, highlight such points. This does not mean Gramsci’s relevance to our contemporary world should not be challenged. Rather it insists that such challenges cannot hinge upon ignoring the places where we find his considerations of what we now call the “global” level. We hope that this volume can push such debates in neo-Gramscian IPE onto richer terrain.
然而，正如亚当·莫顿敏锐地论证的那样，这场争论的整个过程只能通过忽略葛兰西的坚持来进行，即国家形成和民族必须置于（“国际”）欧洲和世界历史以及国际体系发展的语境中。支持他的论点并非偶然的是，莫顿的一些关键参考文献是葛兰西讨论语言的段落。32 本书中的许多章节，包括布伊、马斯、博尔格塞和拉科尔特对葛兰西关于语言和翻译的反思的国际或非国家维度的高度关注，都突出了这一点。但这并不意味着葛兰西对我们当代世界的相关性不应该受到挑战。相反，它坚持认为，这种挑战不能建立在忽略我们现在称之为“全球”层面的葛兰西考虑的地方。我们希望本书能够将新葛兰西国际政治经济学中的此类辩论推向更丰富的领域。

Translation, Translatability
翻译，可译性

Gramsci’s understanding of translation—both as an actual practice and a metaphor for political and cultural analysis—shares several important themes with recent perspectives in translation studies which include a particularly linguistically influenced analysis of nationalism. André Lefevere and Lawrence Venuti, inspired by Jacques Derrida, highlight the active role translators play in the political choices they make that is tied to the national identities and relations to “foreignness” of the presumed readers. Thus, Gramsci’s position in the southern question against biologically defined conceptions of “races” and his critique of the naturalization of the notion of a “nation” raises similar issues as Venuti’s critique of the role of translation in the construction of nationalism.33 Venuti writes, “Translation can be described as an act of violence against a nation only because nationalist thinking tends to be premised on a metaphysical concept of identity as a homogenous essence, usually given a biological grounding in an ethnicity or race and seen as manifested in a particular language and culture.”34 While it may be too hasty to draw any tighter connection here, and perhaps there are crucial differences which should not be overlooked, Gramsci’s writings on translation and translatability enable engagements between Gramscian scholarship and what Edwin Gentzler has called the “power turn” in translation studies.35
葛兰西对翻译的理解——无论是作为实际的实践还是作为政治和文化分析的隐喻——与翻译研究的近期视角有着几个重要的主题共通之处，其中包括对民族主义进行一种特别受语言学影响的分析。受雅各布·德里达启发，安德烈·莱费弗尔和劳伦斯·维努蒂强调了翻译者在其政治选择中所扮演的积极角色，该角色与假想读者的民族认同和对“异域性”的关系紧密相连。因此，葛兰西在南方问题中反对以生物学定义的“种族”概念，以及他对“民族”概念的自然化批判，与维努蒂对翻译在民族主义建构中作用的批判提出了类似的问题。维努蒂写道：“翻译可以被描述为对一个民族的暴力行为，仅仅是因为民族主义思维往往建立在对身份作为同质本质的形而上学概念之上，通常在种族或民族的生物学基础上予以阐释，并被视为体现于特定语言和文化之中。”34 虽然在此贸然建立更紧密的联系可能为时过早，或许存在一些不容忽视的关键差异，但葛兰西关于翻译和可译性的著作，使得葛兰西学派研究与埃德温·根茨勒所称的翻译研究中的“权力转向”得以互动。35

Gramsci scholars, especially in Italy, have increasingly come to understand translation as a fundamental concept for Gramsci. Domenico Jervolino has argued that Gramsci’s conception of translation is a successful response to the aporias of how Benedetto Croce and Giovanni Gentile deal with translation. Where Croce argues that translation in aesthetic realms (i.e., poetry) is impossible, it is a constant and necessary condition for everything in prose: philosophy, science and technology. Jervolino traces out Gentile’s critique of such a stark delimitation of translation, but argues persuasively that Gentile’s solution “ends up dissolving more than resolving this problem [of translation].” He argues that in his writings on translation, “Gramsci goes beyond Croce and Gentile and gets close to that rediscovery of hermeneutics realized in the 1920’s in the arena of existentialist philosophies.”36 And, as Jervolino emphasizes, it is because Gramsci approaches translation as a practical activity, as the philosophy of praxis, that he rethinks translation in a manner that does not confine it as Croce does, nor expand it in a manner that leads to the spiritual idealism of Gentile.
葛兰西学者，尤其是在意大利，日益将翻译视为葛兰西思想中的一个基本概念。多梅尼科·杰尔沃利诺认为，葛兰西对翻译的理解成功地回应了贝内德托·克罗齐和乔瓦尼·詹蒂莱在处理翻译问题上的困境。克罗齐认为，在美学领域（例如诗歌）翻译是不可能的，但在散文领域（例如哲学、科学和技术）则是一种持续且必要的条件。杰尔沃利诺追溯了詹蒂莱对这种严厉的翻译界定的批判，但他有力地论证了詹蒂莱的解决方案“最终导致了问题的加剧而非解决”。他认为，葛兰西在翻译方面的著作“超越了克罗齐和詹蒂莱，接近于 20 世纪 20 年代存在主义哲学领域中对诠释学的重新发现”。36 并且，正如杰尔沃利诺强调的那样，正是因为葛兰西将翻译视为一种实践活动，作为实践哲学，他以一种既不局限于克罗齐的观点，也不走向詹蒂莱的精神唯心主义的视角重新思考了翻译。

As the four essays that make up part II of this volume demonstrate, Gramsci is concerned about the actual politics of translation, but also uses the linguistic concept to its full metaphorically analytical power in order to push socio-cultural-political analysis beyond a mere comparative structure acknowledging the profound and historical interactions across time and space, but also intricate relations of how Gramsci conceives of “common sense” and "philosophy” interacting with concrete politics, class relations and power.
正如本卷第二部分的四篇论文所展示的那样，葛兰西关注翻译的实际政治，但也充分利用了语言概念的隐喻分析能力，以超越单纯的比较结构，从而探究跨时空的深刻历史互动，以及葛兰西如何理解“常识”和“哲学”与具体政治、阶级关系和权力相互作用的错综复杂关系。

Lucia Borghese's article (chapter 8), originally published in 1981, illustrates significant frustration with the state of Gramsci studies when it comes to language and translation.37 She criticizes Valentino Gerratana, who is usually applauded for his meticulous attention to detail in his editing of the "complete,” chronologically ordered, 1975, Italian edition of Gramsci's Prison Notebooks. She is also very critical of the publication of an edition that included Gramsci's translations of the Brothers Grimm's fairy tales. While her responses may read as uncompromising and harsh, they are a sign of dissatisfaction caused by the silence concerning the importance of language and translation in Gramsci's work. Her contribution must be taken within its context of the early 1980s, but her rich analysis of Gramsci's own translations of the Brothers Grimm is as fresh and evocative today as it was when originally published. Borghese's general points concerning the role of translation as a metaphor for politics but also a specific practice have, to a significant degree, been accepted, as Frosini, Lichtner and Lacorte's articles here (chapters 9, 10 and 11) demonstrate. It is only near the end of Borghese's chapter that you will discover how this all relates to the metaphor in her title about Gramsci's aunt riding her bicycle.
博格塞（Lucia Borghese）1981 年发表的文章（第 8 章）对葛兰西研究领域在语言和翻译方面存在的问题表达了极大的不满。37 她批评了通常因其对葛兰西 1975 年意大利文“全集” （按时间顺序编排）的精细编辑而受到赞扬的瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳。她同样强烈批评了出版包含葛兰西翻译的格林童话的版本。虽然她的回应可能显得强硬和尖锐，但这反映了她对葛兰西著作中语言和翻译重要性缺乏关注的失望。她的贡献必须放在 20 世纪 80 年代初的语境中理解，但她对葛兰西本人翻译格林童话的精辟分析，如今依然新鲜而引人入胜，如同最初发表时一样。博格塞关于翻译作为政治隐喻以及特定实践的总体观点，在很大程度上已被接受，正如弗罗西尼、利希特纳和拉科尔特在此（第 9、10 和 11 章）的文章所展示的那样。 直到博尔赫斯章节的末尾，你才能发现这一切与她书名中关于葛兰西的姑妈骑自行车的隐喻有何关联。

In 2004, Derek Boothman, a practicing translator, translation professor and meticulous scholar of Gramsci, published a book-length study detailing the many layers of Gramsci's approach to translation and translatability, Traducibilità e Processi Traduttivi: Un caso, A. Gramsci linguista [Translatability and the processes of translation: The Case of A. Gramsci, the linguist]. Chapter 7 draws significantly from that longer study, showing, as Frosini and Lacorte do in different ways (see chapters 9 and 11), that Gramsci goes well beyond the base/superstructure debates transforming the key components of those discussions into a richer dynamic of translation and translatability. Due to such detailed examinations like these, there is a growing awareness and acceptance of the notion that translation, as Prestipino writes, is a “cardinal element in Gramsci’s conceptual dictionary.”38 This concurs with Borghese’s argument in chapter 8 that “translation allows us to prevent contingent truths from being considered absolute and becoming fossilized as ideologies.”39
2004 年，从业翻译、翻译教授，同时也是葛兰西细致研究者的德里克·博斯曼出版了一本关于葛兰西翻译及可译性多层面的研究著作，书名为《可译性与翻译过程：葛兰西语言学家案例》（Traducibilità e Processi Traduttivi: Un caso, A. Gramsci linguista）。第七章从该长篇研究中汲取了大量内容，正如弗罗西尼和拉科尔特在各自不同的章节（见第 9 章和第 11 章）所展现的那样，葛兰西的思想超越了基础/上层建筑的争论，将这些讨论的关键要素转化为更丰富的翻译和可译性动态。正因这些细致的考察，人们日益认识到并接受了普雷斯蒂皮诺的观点，即翻译是“葛兰西概念词典中的核心要素”。38  这与博尔格塞在第八章的论点相符，即“翻译使我们能够防止偶然的真理被视为绝对真理，并将其僵化成意识形态”。39

These essays not only contribute to understanding of Gramsci’s thought, but also provide a crucial platform from which to approach Gramsci’s continued (perhaps increased) relevance for the twenty-first century. As Michael Cronin has shown in great detail, translation as a practical activity and a powerful metaphor is at the heart of any thorough understanding of the unwieldy set of phenomena often grouped together under the label of “globalization.”40 Fabio Frosini’s contribution (chapter 9) makes a parallel argument that Gramsci’s writings on translation get to the root of the philosophical status of Marxism and the integral connection between culture, philosophy and politics. It is also this conception of translation that Frosini and Lacorte use to show how, unlike many other Marxists, Gramsci’s notion of politics is not about “unveiling ideology,” simply showing that it does not correspond to “reality." Frosini comes quite close to Slavoj Zizek5s contention that to view ideology as false consciousness that can be unveiled through recourse to “reality” is to misunderstand that ideology is real一“it consists in overlooking the illusion which is structuring our real, effective relationship to reality."41 Of course, Gramsci’s awareness of this dynamic does not lead to anything like the psychoanalytic perspectives of Zizek, but to more institutional and materialist analyses of these operations.
这些论文不仅有助于理解葛兰西的思想，也提供了一个至关重要的平台，让我们可以探讨葛兰西思想对二十一世纪的持续（或许是日益增长的）相关性。正如迈克尔·克罗宁详细阐述的那样，翻译作为一种实践活动和一种强大的隐喻，是任何透彻理解通常被统称为“全球化”的复杂现象的核心。40 法比奥·弗罗西尼的贡献（第九章）提出了一个类似的论点，即葛兰西关于翻译的著作触及了马克思主义的哲学地位以及文化、哲学和政治之间内在联系的根源。弗罗西尼和拉科尔特也正是运用这种翻译的理解方式，来表明与许多其他马克思主义者不同，葛兰西的政治概念并非关于“揭示意识形态”，而仅仅在于表明它与“现实”并不相符。弗罗西尼与斯拉沃热·齐泽克的观点非常接近，即把意识形态看作可以通过诉诸“现实”来揭示的虚假意识，是误解了意识形态的真实性——“它在于忽略了构建我们与现实的真实有效关系的幻象”。当然，葛兰西对这种动态的认识并没有导致像齐泽克的精神分析视角那样的结果，而是对这些运作方式进行了更制度化和唯物主义的分析。

Translation has also become a key metaphor, often unexamined, in such a wide variety of discussions of “globalization” in all the different ways that term is used. Advocates of cosmopolitanism, multiculturalism, identity politics and global governance are quick to grasp at “translation” as a metaphor but they rarely offer much theoretical underpinning for it.42 All too often, the concept of translation (not unlike language) is stripped of its political content and used to cast a vaguely positive glow of acceptance, accessibility, and interest in things “other.” For Gramsci, in contrast, translation is always political and frequently related to questions of revolution. Just as Gramsci connects his use of linguistic metaphors for political relations to the actual power relationship involved in language use and language policy, so too is he at once aware of the critical and political nature of actual translation at the same time as using translation and translatability to articulate his political, cultural and social theory. In a letter to his wife on September 5, 1932, Gramsci recommends that she become “an increasingly qualified translator” which he goes on to explain would involve much more than just literal translation but would require “a critical knowledge” of the cultures involved.43 Even in this practical advice, Gramsci concurs with the recent trends in translation studies insisting that it goes well beyond technical matters of transferring meaning between two languages. As the work of Susan Bassnet, André Lefevere, Edwin Gentzler and Michael Cronin has insisted, the economic, political and social contexts in which translation takes place are crucially important and inseparable from the methods and techniques of translation itself, including the minutia of specific word choices in specific translations, be they of literature, movies, product packaging, discussion of so-called global civil society or political treaties and agreements (such as those that form the European Union).
翻译也已成为一个关键的隐喻，在各种关于“全球化”的讨论中（无论该术语如何使用）经常被忽略。支持世界主义、多元文化主义、身份政治和全球治理的倡导者们很快抓住“翻译”这个隐喻，但他们很少为其提供多少理论基础。42 常常将翻译的概念（与语言类似）剥离其政治内涵，并用来营造一种模糊的积极氛围，即接受、可及性和对“异质”事物的兴趣。与之相反，对于葛兰西而言，翻译始终是政治性的，并且经常与革命问题相关。正如葛兰西将语言隐喻在政治关系中的运用与语言使用和语言政策中的实际权力关系联系起来一样，他也同时意识到实际翻译的批判性和政治性，并利用翻译和可译性来阐述他的政治、文化和社会理论。 1932 年 9 月 5 日，葛兰西写给妻子的信中建议她成为一名“日益合格的翻译家”，他进一步解释道，这不仅需要超越字面翻译，还需要对相关文化有“深刻的理解”。43 即使在这一实用建议中，葛兰西也认同了翻译研究的最新趋势，即翻译远超语言之间意义的转换。正如苏珊·巴斯内特、安德烈·勒费弗尔、埃德温·根特勒和迈克尔·克罗宁等人的著作所强调的那样，翻译发生时的经济、政治和社会背景至关重要，并且与翻译的方法和技巧（包括特定翻译中具体词语的选择）密不可分，无论这些翻译是文学作品、电影、产品包装、关于所谓的全球公民社会的讨论，还是政治条约和协议（例如构成欧盟的那些协议）。

On a more philosophical level, Sanguineti may be alone in this volume arguing that Gramsci was in favor of a “universal language,” looking to mathematics as a model, although Derek Boothman makes a nod in that direction balancing it with more historical particularity while Frosini and, to an even greater degree, Lichtner emphasize Gramsci’s historicism as drawing away from any such “universalist” dimension. This parallels recent debates in social theory concerning “universalism” and “particularism.” Our hope is that the readers of this volume will find in it various ways of rereading Gramsci, of seeing how his writings relate in new and different ways to other debates and discussions and ultimately that this work will help enable in our day what Gramsci was aiming for in his: a furthering of the struggle to understand and transform the exploitation, alienation and domination that characterizes the lives of so many of us today.
在更具哲学层面的探讨中，桑格内蒂或许是本书中唯一一位认为葛兰西支持“普适语言”，并以数学为模型的作者。尽管德里克·布斯曼也略有暗示，但其论述更侧重于历史的特殊性；而弗罗西尼，以及更大程度上利希特纳，则强调葛兰西的历史主义，将其与任何“普适主义”维度区分开来。这与社会理论中关于“普适主义”与“特殊主义”的近期争论相呼应。我们希望本书读者能够从中找到多种重新解读葛兰西的方法，了解其著作如何以新的、不同的方式与其他争论和讨论相关联，最终，这项工作将有助于我们在当今时代实现葛兰西的目标：进一步推进理解和改变剥削、异化和支配的斗争，这些现象塑造着我们许多人的生活。

The Texts and Translation
文本和翻译

Translating these texts presented various challenges and decisions as did the questions of how to present the very different citations styles and methods. We have converted all the various citations to a standard endnote Chicago-style system, with full citations for each work the first time it is cited within a chapter, so that the chapters stand on their own in terms of reference material. In the case of Gramsci’s works, we have included a list of abbreviations on pages ix-x.
翻译这些文本带来了各种挑战和决策，正如如何呈现截然不同的引文风格和方法的问题一样。我们已将所有各种引文转换为标准的脚注芝加哥风格系统，在每个章节首次引用每篇文章时提供完整引文，以便章节在参考文献方面独立存在。对于葛兰西的作品，我们在 ix-x 页列出了缩写列表。

We have tried to use existing English translations for the authors5 quotations and citations of Gramsci and all other material. All of the chapters that were originally in Italian use the 1975 critical edition of Gramsci’s Prison Notebooks, which is taken as the definitive source due to its chronological ordering and comprehensiveness.44 We have noted the several places where we found it necessary to alter the existing English translations. All other translations are done by the translator of that chapter unless indicated. The English translation of the critical edition of Gramsci’s Prison Notebooks by Joseph Buttigieg based on Gerratana edition is still under way. Volumes 1-3 have been published, which include Notebooks 18, but much material from later notebooks has been translated in various anthologies. We have adopted the now-standard citation method of giving both the translation, if available, but also the notebook number preceded by a Q (for Quaderno, “notebook” in Italian) and then a § followed by the section number. This should make it easy to locate the passage across several editions. There is an excellent set of concordance tables compiled by Marcus E. Green available on the International Gramsci Society website: www.internationalgramscisociety.org/resources/concordance_table/.
我们尝试使用现有的英文翻译来处理作者引用葛兰西和其他材料的引文和参考文献。所有最初用意大利文撰写的章节都使用 1975 年葛兰西狱中札记的批判性版本，由于其时间顺序和完整性，该版本被视为权威来源。44 我们已标注了我们在必要时修改现有英文翻译的几个地方。除非另有说明，否则所有其他翻译均由该章节的译者完成。基于格拉塔纳版本，约瑟夫·巴蒂吉耶对葛兰西狱中札记批判性版本的英文翻译仍在进行中。第一至第三卷已出版，其中包括第 18 本札记，但来自后期札记的许多材料已在各种文集中翻译。我们采用了现在标准的引用方法，即提供翻译（如果可用），以及以“Q” (意为“札记”的意大利语) 开头的札记编号，然后是“§”和章节编号。这应该方便在不同版本中查找相关段落。马库斯·E.编制了一套极好的同义词表。 绿色可从国际葛兰西协会网站获取：www.internationalgramscisociety.org/resources/concordance_table/。

All of the translators5 or editors5 additions are in square brackets:[]. This includes places where we felt it best to supply the original term一for example, when Gramsci uses the terms lingua and linguaggio. In Italian, specific languages are referred to with the term lingua (and lingue in plural), whereas linguaggio is more general, denoting the human capability to use language in speech or writing. It would be a mistake to conflate this distinction between the French langue and parole or its utilization by Saussure, although there is a slight overlap. As Rosiello notes (chapter 2),
所有译者或编辑的增补均以方括号[ ]标出。这包括我们认为最好提供原文词语的地方——例如，当葛兰西使用 lingua 和 linguaggio 这两个词语时。在意大利语中，特定语言用 lingua（复数为 lingue）表示，而 linguaggio 则更具一般性，指人类使用语言进行言语或书写的能力。混淆法语的 langue 和 parole 之间的区别，或索绪尔对其运用的方式，将会是一个错误，尽管两者存在轻微的重叠。正如罗西耶罗在第二章中指出的，

Gramsci never provides a theoretical distinction between lingua and linguaggio. Thus, we have included the term in brackets to allow the reader to see for himself or herself how the distinction is utilized both by Gramsci and by the authors.
葛兰西从未在理论上区分语言（lingua）和语言学（linguaggio）。因此，我们在括号中包含该术语，以便读者自行了解葛兰西及其作者如何使用该区别。

Notes 笔记

1. Franco Lo Piparo, Lingua, Intellettuali e Egemonia in Gramsci (Bari: Laterza, 1979). See chapters 3 and especially 15 of this volume for discussions of the early works on Gramsci and language. Lo Piparo is currently working on an updated and revised edition of this book.
1. 法兰克·洛皮帕罗，《语言、知识分子与葛兰西的霸权》（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1979）。请参阅本书第 3 章，特别是第 15 章，了解葛兰西早期关于语言的著作讨论。洛皮帕罗目前正在撰写该书的更新和修订版。

2. See this volume, page 21.
2. 见本卷第 21 页。

3. Luigi Ambrosoli, “Nuovi contributi agli ‘Scritti giovanili5 di Gramsci,” Rivista Storica del Socialismo 3 (1960): 545-50.
3. 路易吉·安布罗索利，“对葛兰西的‘青年著作’的新贡献”，《社会主义史评论》第 3 期（1960 年）：545-550。

4. Pier Paolo Pasoini, "Laboratorio,” Nuovi Argomenti 1, an abstract of which was published as "Gramsci's Language,” in Approaches to Gramsci, ed. Anne Showstack Sassoon (London: Writers and Readers, 1982), 180-87.
4. 皮耶罗·帕索里尼，“实验室”，《新论题》第 1 期，其摘要发表于安·肖斯塔克·萨松主编的《接近葛兰西》（伦敦：作家与读者，1982），第 180-87 页。

5. See chapters 2, 3 and 4, respectively, and M. Emilia Passaponti, “Gramsci e le questioni linguistiche,” in Lingua, Linguaggi e Società, second edition, ed. Sefano Gensini and Massimo Vedovelli (Florence: Tipolitografia F.lli Linari, 1981), 119-28.
5. 分别参见第 2、3 和 4 章，以及 M. Emilia Passaponti，“葛兰西与语言问题”，载于《语言、语言学与社会》，第二版，Gensini 和 Vedovelli 编 (佛罗伦萨：Linari 兄弟印刷厂，1981)，第 119-28 页。

6. See chapter 10, page 198.
6. 见第 10 章，第 198 页。

7. See Niels Helsloot, “Linguistics of All Countries ... ! On Gramsci's Premise of Coherence,” Journal of Pragmatics 13 (1989): 547-66; Leonardo Salamini, The Sociology of Political Praxis: An Introduction to Gramsci’s Theory (London: Routledge, 1981), esp. 181-96; and Fabiana Woodfin, “Lost in Translation: The Distortion of Egemonia,” in Marxism and Cultural Studies, ed. Lee Artz, Steve Macek and Dana L. Cloud (New York: Peter Lang: 2006), 133-56. Nevertheless, none of these grapple with what is at stake in Lo Piparo's position as noted above. For example, Fabiana Woodfin seems to adopt Lo Piparo's emphasis on the roots of Gramsci's “hegemony” being “primarily” in historical linguistics, but she then emphasizes the Marxist context in which Gramsci utilized it precisely to critique Stuart Hall. Thus, ironically, she oversteps Lo Piparo's separation of Gramsci's “hegemony” from its Marxist roots.
7. 参阅 Niels Helsloot，“所有国家的语言学……！论葛兰西的连贯性前提”，《语用学杂志》第 13 期（1989）：547-66；Leonardo Salamini，《政治实践的社会学：导论葛兰西理论》（伦敦：Routledge，1981），尤其第 181-96 页；以及 Fabiana Woodfin，“失落的翻译：霸权的扭曲”，载于 Lee Artz、Steve Macek 和 Dana L. Cloud 编，《马克思主义与文化研究》（纽约：Peter Lang，2006），第 133-56 页。然而，以上这些论述均未触及本文所述洛皮帕罗观点的核心问题。例如，Fabiana Woodfin 似乎采纳了洛皮帕罗关于葛兰西“霸权”根源“主要”在于历史语言学的观点，但她随后又强调了葛兰西恰恰利用“霸权”这一概念批判斯图亚特·霍尔的马克思主义语境。因此，具有讽刺意味的是，她超越了洛皮帕罗将葛兰西的“霸权”与其马克思主义根源割裂的界限。

8. Wolfgang Fritz Haug, Philosophieren mit Brecht und Gramsci (Hamburg: Argument Verlag, 1996). See also Wolfgang Fritz Haug, “Philosophizing with Marx, Gramsci, and Brecht,” Boundary 2, 34, 3 (Fall 2007): 143-60.
8. 海因里希·弗里茨·豪格，《与布莱希特和葛兰西的哲学思考》（汉堡：Argument 出版社，1996）。另见海因里希·弗里茨·豪格，“与马克思、葛兰西和布莱希特的哲学思考”，《边界 2》杂志，第 34 卷，第 3 期（秋季 2007 年）：143-160。

9. Frank Jablonka, “War Gramsci ein Poststrukturalist ‘avant la lettre'? Zum linguistic turn bei Gramsci,” in Gramsci-Perspektiven, ed. Uwe Hirschfeld (Berlin: Argument-Verlag, 1998), 23-36.
9. 弗兰克·雅布隆卡，“葛兰西是否是一位‘文字游戏’之前的后结构主义者？葛兰西的语言转向”，载于乌韦·希尔施费尔德编，《葛兰西透视》（柏林：Argument 出版社，1998），第 23-36 页。

10. See, for example, Peter Ives, “Language, Agency and Hegemony: A Gramscian Response to Post-Marxism,” Critical Review of International Social and Political Philosophy 8, 4 (2005): 45568. There I argue that Laclau and Mouffe's seminal work, Hegemony and Socialist Strategy, requires that they ignore Gramsci's writings on language in order to narrate a post-Marxist trajectory from an economically confined Marxism to a linguistically influenced post-Marxism.
例如，参见彼得·艾夫斯，“语言、能动性与霸权：对后马克思主义的葛兰西回应”，《国际社会与政治哲学批判评论》第 8 卷第 4 期（2005 年）：455-68。我在其中论证，拉克兰和穆夫的开创性著作《霸权与社会主义策略》要求他们忽略葛兰西关于语言的著作，以便讲述一条从经济受限的马克思主义到语言影响的后马克思主义的路径。

11. Stefano Selenu, “Alcuni aspetti della questione della lingua sarda attraverso la diade storiagrammatica: un'impostazione di tipo gramsciano,” Antologia Premio Gramsci IX (January 2005): 223-358.
11. 斯特法诺·塞莱努，“关于撒丁语问题的某些方面，通过历史语法对偶：一种葛兰西式的视角”，葛兰西奖九期文集（2005 年 1 月）：223-358。

12. Alessandro Carlucci, “The Political Implications of Antonio Gramsci’s Journey through Languages, Language Issues and Linguistic Disciplines,” Journal of Romance Studies 9, 2 (Summer 2009): 27-46.
12. 阿莱桑德罗·卡鲁奇，“安东尼奥·葛兰西的语言之旅及其政治含义：语言问题与语言学学科”，《罗马语研究杂志》第 9 卷第 2 期（2009 年夏季）：27-46 页。

13. Giancarlo Schirru, “La Diffusione del Pensiero di Gramsci nella Linguistica Americana,” paper presented at the conference “Le Culture e il Mondo,” organized by the Fondazione Istituto Gramsci and the International Gramsci Society, Rome, April 27-28, 2007.
13. 吉安卡罗·斯基鲁，“葛兰西思想在美国语言学界的传播”，于 2007 年 4 月 27-28 日在罗马由葛兰西基金会和国际葛兰西学会主办的“文化与世界”会议上宣读。

14. See especially his article “The Democratic Philosopher: Rhetoric as Hegemony in Gramsci,” Italian Culture 23 (2005): 97-123.
14.  特别是其文章“民主哲学家：葛兰西的霸权论述”，载于《意大利文化》23 期（2005 年），第 97-123 页。

15. Amartya Sen, “Sraffa, Wittgenstein, and Gramsci,” Journal of Economic Literature 41 (December 2003): 1240-55, here 1244-45.
15. 阿马蒂亚·森，“斯拉法、维特根斯坦和葛兰西”，《经济文献杂志》41 期（2003 年 12 月）：1240-1255，此处为 1244-1245 页。

16. For a succinct summary of the other sources of hegemony, see Derek Boothman, “The Sources for Gramsci’s Concept of Hegemony,” Rethinking Marxism 20, 2 (April 2008): 201-16.
16. 欲了解其他霸权来源的简要概述，请参阅 Derek Boothman，“葛兰西霸权概念的来源”，《马克思主义再思考》20 卷 2 期（2008 年 4 月）：201-216 页。

17. An interesting comparison and contrast could be made between Sassoon’s discussion of Gramsci’s “subversive use of language” and the “subversive” translation strategy of Suzanne Jill Levine that Edwin Gentzler uses to highlight different ways in which poststructuralism has been used in translation studies, to be discussed below. See Edwin Gentzler, “Translation, Poststructuralism and Power,” in Translation and Power, ed. Maria Tymoczko and Edwin Gentzler (Amherst: University of Massachusetts Press, 2002), 203-6.
17.  萨松对葛兰西“语言的颠覆性运用”的讨论，与苏珊·吉尔·莱文所采用的“颠覆性”翻译策略之间，可以进行有趣的比较和对比，这将在下文探讨。详见埃德温·根茨勒， “翻译、后结构主义与权力”，载于《翻译与权力》一书，玛丽亚·蒂莫茨科和埃德温·根茨勒编 (美国马萨诸塞大学出版社，2002)，第 203-206 页。

18. For a full description, see Joseph Buttigieg, “Preface” to Antonio Gramsci, Prison Notebooks, vol. 1 (New York: Columbia University Press, 1992), xiv.
18. 完整描述请参见约瑟夫·巴蒂吉格，在安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》第一卷（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，1992），第十四页。

19. Stuart Hall, “Introductory Essay” in Roger Simon, Gramsci's Political Thought: An Introduction, revised edition (London: Lawrence & Wishart, 1991), 8. See also Buttigieg, 42-64, on the connections between philological approaches to Gramsci’s writings and Gramsci’s own method and the fragmentary nature of his writings.
19. 斯图亚特·霍尔，“导论”载于罗杰·西蒙著，《葛兰西的政治思想：导论》，修订版（伦敦：劳伦斯与威沙特出版社，1991），第 8 页。另见巴蒂吉耶，第 42-64 页，关于葛兰西著作的语义学方法与葛兰西自身方法之间联系，以及其著作的零散性质的讨论。

20. See for example, Anne Showstack Sassoon, ed., Women and the State (Boston: Unwin Hyman, 1987); Michele Barrett, Women's Oppression Today: The Marxist/Feminist Encounter, revised edition (London: Verso, 1988); Gundula Ludwig, “Governing Gender: The Integral State and Gendered Subjection,” in Gramsci and Global Politics, ed. Mark McNally and John Schwartzmentel (London: Routledge, 2009), 93-106.
20. 例如，参见安·肖斯塔克·萨松编辑的《女性与国家》(波士顿：温文海曼出版社，1987)；米歇尔·巴雷特著的《当代女性的压迫：马克思主义/女权主义的相遇》，修订版（伦敦：Verso 出版社，1988）；以及根杜拉·路德维希在马克·麦克纳利和约翰·施瓦茨曼特尔编辑的《葛兰西与全球政治》一书中所著的“治理性别：整体国家与性别压迫”一文（伦敦：Routledge 出版社，2009），第 93-106 页。

21. For example, see Renate Holub, Antonio Gramsci: B^^ond Marxism and Postmodernism (London: Routledge, 1992), for feminist considerations of Gramsci that show extensive awareness of Gramsci’s writings and the Italian literature.
例如，参阅 Renate Holub 的《安东尼奥·葛兰西：超越马克思主义与后现代主义》（伦敦：Routledge，1992），其中包含对葛兰西的女性主义解读，展现了对葛兰西著作及其意大利文学的深刻理解。

22. For example, see Julia Kristeva, Language: The Unknown, trans. Anne M. Menke (New York: Columbia University Press, 1989); Dale Spender, Man Made Language (London: Routledge, 1980); and Deborah Cameron, Feminism and Linguistic Theory (London: Macmillan, 1992).
例如，参见朱莉娅·克里斯蒂娃著，安妮·梅恩克译，《语言：未知》（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，1989）；戴尔·斯宾德著，《人造语言》（伦敦：朗文出版社，1980）；以及黛博拉·卡梅伦著，《女权主义与语言理论》（伦敦：麦克米伦出版社，1992）。

23. See note 10. 23. 见注 10。

24. Jean-Jacques Lecercle, A Marxist Philosophy of Language, trans. Gregory Elliott (Leiden: Brill, 2006); Jean Louis Houdebine, Langage et Marxisme (Paris: Klincksieck, 1977); and Marnie Holborow, The Politics of English: A Marxist View of Language (London: Sage, 1999).
24. 让-雅克·莱塞尔克尔，《马克思主义语言哲学》，格雷戈里·埃利奥特译 (莱顿：布里尔，2006)；让·路易·胡德宾，《语言与马克思主义》(巴黎：克林克西克出版社，1977)；以及马妮·霍尔博罗，《英语的政治：一种马克思主义的语言观》(伦敦：萨奇出版社，1999)。

25. Gayatri Chakrovorty Spivak, “Can the Subaltern Speak?” Marxism and the Interpretation of Culture, ed. Cary Nelson and Lawrence Grossberg (Urbana: University of Illinois Press, 1988), 271313. For a critical discussion of Spivak and Ranajit’s different uses of Gramsci, see Marcus Green, “Gramsci Cannot Speak: Presentation and Interpretation of Gramsci’s Concept of the Subaltern,” Rethinking Marxism 14, 3 (Fall 2002): 1-24; and chapter 16 of this volume.
25. Gayatri Chakravorty Spivak，“被压迫者能说话吗？”《马克思主义与文化诠释》，Cary Nelson 和 Lawrence Grossberg 编 (伊利诺伊大学出版社，1988)，271-313 页。关于 Spivak 和 Ranajit 对葛兰西的不同运用方式的批判性讨论，参见 Marcus Green，“葛兰西不能说话：对葛兰西的‘被压迫者’概念的呈现与诠释”，《马克思主义再思考》第 14 卷，第 3 期（秋季 2002 年）：1-24 页；以及本书第 16 章。

26. Ranajit Guha, Dominance without Hegemony (Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1997).
26. 冉吉特·古哈，《非霸权的统治》（剑桥，马萨诸塞州：哈佛大学出版社，1997）。

27. See, for example, Selma Sonntag, The Local Politics of Global English (Lanham, Md.: Lexington, 2003), 59-78. Another example of an analysis of colonialism that uses Gramsci’s writings on language explicitly is Epifanio San Juan Jr., “Sneaking into the Philippines, Along the Rivers of Babylon: An Intervention into the Language Question,” Kolum Kritika 11 (August 2008): 78-88.
例如，参见塞尔玛·松塔格，《全球英语的本地政治》(Lanham, Md.: Lexington, 2003)，第 59-78 页。另见以葛兰西关于语言的著作为明确分析基础的殖民主义分析范例，如埃皮法尼奥·圣胡安（Jr.），“偷偷进入菲律宾，沿着巴比伦河：对语言问题的介入”，《批评专栏》第 11 期（2008 年 8 月）：78-88 页。

28. Susan Buck-Morss, “Sovereign Right and the Global Left,” Rethinking Marxism 19, 4 (October 2007): 440.
28.  苏珊·巴克-莫斯，“主权权利与全球左翼”，《重思马克思主义》19 卷 4 期（2007 年 10 月）：440 页。

29. Richard Bellamy, “Gramsci, Croce, and the Italian Historical Tradition,” History of Political Thought 11, 2 (1990): 313-17; and Richard Bellamy and Darrow Schecter, Gramsci and the Italian State (Manchester: Manchester University Press, 1993). See Adam Morton’s discussion of this approach as “austere historicism” in Unravelling Gramsci (London: Pluto, 2007), 24-29.
29. 理查德·贝拉米，“葛兰西、克罗齐和意大利历史传统”，《政治思想史》第 11 卷第 2 期（1990）：313-317；以及理查德·贝拉米和达罗·谢克特合著，《葛兰西与意大利国家》（曼彻斯特：曼彻斯特大学出版社，1993）。参见亚当·莫顿在其《解构葛兰西》一书（伦敦：普鲁托出版社，2007）中对这种方法的讨论，第 24-29 页，他将其称作“严谨的历史主义”。

30. Robert Cox, “Gramsci, Hegemony and International Relations,” Millenium 12, 2 (1983): 16275; and Stephen Gill, ed., Gramsci, Historical Materialism and International Relations (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1993).
30. 罗伯特·考克斯，“葛兰西、霸权与国际关系”，《千年》第 12 卷第 2 期（1983）：162-75；以及斯蒂芬·吉尔编辑，《葛兰西、历史唯物主义与国际关系》（剑桥：剑桥大学出版社，1993）。

31. See Randall Germain and Michael Kenny, “Engaging Gramsci: International Relations Theory and the New Gramscians,” Review of International Studies 24, 1 (1998): 3-21.
31. 见兰德尔·格尔曼和迈克尔·肯尼，“与葛兰西对话：国际关系理论与新葛兰西主义者”，《国际研究评论》第 24 卷第 1 期（1998 年）：3-21。

32. Morton, Unravelling Gramsci, 56-59.
32. 莫顿，《解构葛兰西》，56-59 页。

33. Antonio Gramsci, “Some Aspects of the Southern Question,” in Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Political Writings 1921-1926, ed. and trans. Quintin Hoare (Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1978), 441-62.
33. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，“南方问题的一些方面”，载于安东尼奥·葛兰西，《1921-1926 年政治著作选集》，昆廷·霍尔编，译（明尼苏达大学出版社，1978），第 441-462 页。

34. Lawrence Venuti, “Local Contingencies: Translation and National Identity,” in Nation, Language and the Ethics of Translation, ed. Sandra Bermann and Michael Wood (Princeton, N.J.: Princeton University Press, 2005), 177-202, 177.
34. 劳伦斯·维努蒂，“地方偶然性：翻译与民族认同”，载于《民族、语言与翻译伦理》，桑德拉·贝曼和迈克尔·伍德编 (普林斯顿，新泽西州：普林斯顿大学出版社，2005)，第 177-202 页，第 177 页。

35. Edwin Gentzler, “Translation, Poststructuralism and Power,” in Translation and P^^er, ed. Maria Tymoczko and Edwin Gentzler (Amherst: University of Massachusetts Press, 2002), 195-218. See also Barbara Godard, “Writing Between Cultures” and “Relational Logics: Of Linguistic and Other Transactions in the Americas,” in Canadian Literature at the Crossroads of Language and Culture, ed. Smaro Kamboureli (Edmonton: NeWest Press, 2008), 201-34 and 315-58.
35.  爱德温·根茨勒，“翻译、后结构主义与权力”，载于玛丽亚·蒂莫茨科和爱德温·根茨勒编，《翻译与权力》（美国马萨诸塞大学出版社，2002），第 195-218 页。另见芭芭拉·戈达，“跨文化写作”和“关系逻辑：美洲语言及其他事务的逻辑”，载于斯马罗·坎布雷利编，《加拿大文学与语言文化交汇》（埃德蒙顿：NeWest 出版社，2008），第 201-34 页和第 315-58 页。

36. Domenico Jervolino, “Croce, Gentile e Gramsci sulla traduzione,” in Croce Filosofo, two volumes, ed. Giuseppe Cacciatore, Girolamo Cotroneo and Renata Viti Cavaliere (Soveria Mannelli: Rubbettino Editore, 2003), 431-41, here 36 and 39.
36. 杰尔沃利诺（Domenico Jervolino），“关于翻译的克罗齐、詹蒂莱和葛兰西”，载于《克罗齐哲学》（两卷本），由卡奇亚托雷（Giuseppe Cacciatore）、科特尼奥（Girolamo Cotroneo）和维蒂·卡瓦利耶（Renata Viti Cavaliere）编辑（索维利亚·马内利：鲁贝蒂诺出版社，2003），第 431-441 页，此处指第 36 和 39 页。

37. Borghese has follwed this work up in various articles一most recently, Lucia Borghese, “Gramsci, Goethe, Grimm o L'Archeologia dei Desideri,” Belfagor 63 (2008): 12H7.
37. 博尔格塞在其各种文章中继续该项研究——最近一篇是 Lucia Borghese，“葛兰西、歌德、格林或欲望的考古学”，《贝尔法戈尔》第 63 期（2008 年）：12H7。

38. Giuseppe Prestipino, Tradire Gramsci (Milan: Teti, 2000), 6.
38. 吉乌塞佩·普雷斯蒂皮诺，《背叛葛兰西》(米兰：特提出版社，2000)，第 6 页。

39. See chapter 8, page 135.
见第 8 章，第 135 页。

40. Michael Cronin, Translation and Globalization (New York: Routledge, 2003).
40. 克罗宁（Michael Cronin），《翻译与全球化》（纽约：Routledge，2003）。

41. Slavoj Zizek, The Sublime Object of Ideology (London: Verso 1989), 33.
41. 斯拉沃热·齐泽克，《意识形态的崇高客体》（伦敦：Verso，1989），第 33 页。

42. For a nice overview, see Michael Cronin, Translation and Identity (London: Routledge, 2006), 6-42. See also Peter Ives, “Cosmopolitanism and Global English: Language Politics in Globalisation Debates,” Political Studies 58, 3 (2010): 516-35.
42. 欲了解概览，请参阅 Michael Cronin 著《翻译与身份》（伦敦：Routledge，2006），第 6-42 页。另见 Peter Ives，“世界主义与全球英语：全球化辩论中的语言政治”，《政治研究》58 卷 3 期（2010）：516-535。

43. Antonio Gramsci, Letters from Prison, vol. 2, ed. Frank Rosengarten, trans. Raymond Rosenthal (New York: Columbia University Press, 1994), 207.
43. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中书简》第二卷，弗兰克·罗森加特编，雷蒙德·罗森塔尔译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，1994），207 页。

44. Antonio Gramsci, Quaderno del Carcere, four volumes, ed. and trans. Valentino Gerratana (Turin: Einaudi, 1975).
44. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》，四卷，瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳编，译（都灵：埃纳迪出版社，1975）。

I
Gramsci’s Linguistics and Gramsci’s
Marxism
葛兰西的语言学与葛兰西的马克思主义

1
The Linguistic Roots of Gramsci’s NonMarxism
Franco Lo Piparo*
葛兰西非马克思主义的语言根源  弗朗哥·洛皮帕罗*

Preface and Guide to Reading “The Linguistic Roots of Gramsci’s Non-Marxism”**
《葛兰西非马克思主义的语言根源》前言及阅读指南

In my book, Lingua, Intellettuali, Egemonia in Gramsci [Language, Intellectuals, Hegemony in Gramsci],1 I provided broad documentation of the pervasive reflection on language [linguaggio] in Gramsci’s work. In that book, I intentionally did not deal with the political implications of my research. Yet the following fundamental question is unavoidable: are the hidden sources of the cultural originality of Italian communism in the second half of the twentieth century to be found in the linguistic imprint that the young Gramsci received at the University of Turin in the school of Matteo Bartoli? The sociology of culture connected to the formation of the national states is not debated within Marxism during the 1920s and 1930s. But it does constitute a central subject in the Italian debates around the question of the [Italian] language [lingua]. Graziadio Isaia Ascoli’s Proemio [Preface] to the Archivio Glottologico Italiano [Italian Glottological Archive] (1873), which both the young Gramsci and the Gramsci secluded in the fascist prison cite continuously, looks like a delightfully Gramscian essay if read with hindsight. Unlike his other works, in this essay inspired by a particular interpretation of liberalism, Ascoli grasped the theoretical knots starting from the question of language [lingua] which Gramsci’s reflections never abandoned: the nexus between the organization of culture and the formation of the state; the civil role of intellectuals; and languages as places from which one can read their speakers’ social relationships.
在我所著的《语言、知识分子与葛兰西的霸权》（Lingua, Intellettuali, Egemonia in Gramsci）一书中，我广泛论述了葛兰西著作中对语言的深刻反思。在该书中，我故意避开了研究的政治含义。然而，以下基本问题不可避免：二十世纪后半期意大利共产主义文化原创性的隐藏根源，是否在于年轻的葛兰西在都灵大学马特奥·巴尔托利学派接受的语言印记？20 世纪 20 年代和 30 年代的马克思主义理论中，并未讨论与民族国家形成相关的文化社会学。但它确实构成了意大利关于语言问题的核心议题。如果带着后见之明阅读，格拉齐亚迪奥·伊萨亚·阿斯科利在《意大利语音学档案》（Archivio Glottologico Italiano）的序言（1873）中，其内容对年轻的葛兰西和被法西斯监狱隔离的葛兰西来说，都像是令人愉悦的葛兰西风格的论文。 与他其他著作不同，这篇受特定自由主义诠释启发的论文中，阿斯科利从语言问题入手，把握了理论要点，这与葛兰西的思考从未放弃的主题相呼应：文化组织与国家形成之间的联系；知识分子的公民角色；以及语言作为解读其使用者社会关系的场所。

The essay published here was meant to be an attempt to open a debate on these themes. Written in 1987, just two years before the Berlin Wall fell, times were ripe for a serene reflection on the non-Marxist origin of Gramsci’s thought. The article was sent to Critica Marxista, the periodical of the Italian Communist Party in those days,2 in order to facilitate the start of a debate on these matters. The title originally proposed was “The Linguistic Roots of Gramsci’s Non-Marxism,” but the editors changed it to “The Study of Language and Gramscian Theory” [Studio del linguaggio e teoria gramsciana].
本文发表的论文旨在引发对这些主题的讨论。该文写于 1987 年，柏林墙倒塌仅两年之前，正值对葛兰西非马克思主义思想来源进行平静反思的时机。该文章当时投稿至意大利共产党机关刊物《马克思主义批判》杂志，旨在促进关于这些问题的讨论。最初拟定的标题为“葛兰西非马克思主义的语言根源”，但编辑将其改为“语言研究与葛兰西理论”。

The article published in Critica Marxista [reproduced below in translation] ended with a short paragraph entitled A Doubt and a Question. I am not going to include it in the body of the article printed here because it only has archeological and not current value. Yet I would like to quote it in this brief note. I am also going to include a clause, emphasized with italics, which was incomprehensibly censored by the editors of Critica Marxista.
《马克思主义批判》杂志发表的文章（下文即为译文）结尾有一段题为“疑问与问题”的小段。由于这段文字仅具有考古价值而非现实意义，我不会将其包含在本文主体中。然而，我希望能在此短文中引用这段文字。此外，我还将包含一段由《马克思主义批判》杂志编辑处令人费解地删除的文字，该文字用斜体字标出。

A Doubt and a Question
一个疑问和一个问题

In a historical period in which the question on orthodoxy (whatever it be) is pressing and urgent within the ideological debates of the PCI [the Italian Communist Party]—and the entire Left is preoccupied with searching for new cultural identities—is it possible in the ideological periodical of the PCI3 to raise a doubt in the form of a question without being excessively scandalous? What if the Marxism of Gramsci (above all the Gramsci of the Notebooks) were only a very superficial exterior crust? Even if the PCI should be the first to respond to this question, it is obviously not the only one: Gramsci’s heritage, as Togliatti loved to say, belongs to Italian culture as a whole.
在一个意识形态争论中正统性（无论其为何物）问题紧迫而紧急的历史时期，在意大利共产党（PCI）——以及整个左翼都在忙于寻找新的文化认同——的意识形态期刊上，提出一个疑问的形式的质疑，而不至于过于耸人听闻，是否可能？如果葛兰西的马克思主义（尤其是葛兰西的笔记）仅仅是一个非常表面的外壳呢？即使 PCI 应该率先回应这个问题，显然也不是唯一一个：葛兰西的遗产，正如托利亚蒂所爱说的那样，属于整个意大利文化。

The Linguistic Roots of Gramsci’s Non-Marxism
葛兰西非马克思主义的语言根源

The Silences in the Literature on Gramsci
葛兰西著作研究中的沉默

After more than half a century of debate about Gramsci and almost thirty years after the Prison Notebooks’ critical edition, a philological question has still to be answered by Gramsci scholars—mainly from those scholars who study Gramsci as an original theorist of politics and intellectual work. The question is simple: a multiplicity of convergent indications (autobiographical testimonies, annotations of contemporaries, organization of the arguments in the Prison Notebooks, etc.) compels the formulation of the hypothesis that Gramsci had fully developed his theory of intellectuals, civil society, etc., while he was professionally interested in language [linguaggio]. The primitive matrix of his philosophy should not be searched for in Marx or in Lenin or in any other Marxist, but in the science of language [linguaggio]. We will cite only three among the many possible texts. Two of them are very well known and habitually cited but, notwithstanding their notoriety, the scholars of Gramsci’s political thought seem to have difficulty transforming the unequivocal information contained in them into organic parts of their interpretations.
半个多世纪以来关于葛兰西的争论，以及《狱中札记》批判性版本出版三十多年后，一个语义学问题仍然有待葛兰西学者——特别是将葛兰西视为政治和知识工作原创理论家的学者——解答。这个问题很简单：多种汇聚的迹象（自传性证词、同时代人的注释、狱中札记的论证组织等）迫使我们提出一个假设，即葛兰西在他职业上对语言[linguaggio]感兴趣时，就已经充分发展了他的知识分子、公民社会等理论。他的哲学原始形态不应该在马克思、列宁或任何其他马克思主义者那里寻找，而应该在语言学[linguaggio]中寻找。我们将仅列举其中三个可能的文本。其中两个非常有名，通常被引用，但尽管名气很大，葛兰西政治思想的研究者们似乎难以将它们所包含的明确信息转化为其解读的有机组成部分。

A

Let’s begin with the very famous letter to Tania [Schucht] of November 17, 1930. We shall quote almost all of it because it is this entire context that throws into relief the autobiographical information unequivocally furnished by Gramsci which the Gramscian literature leaves absent:
让我们从 1930 年 11 月 17 日写给塔妮娅·舒赫特的著名信件开始。我们将几乎全部引用它，因为正是这个完整的语境突显了葛兰西毫不含糊地提供，而葛兰西文献中缺失的自传信息。

I’ve focused on three or four principle subjects, one of them being the cosmopolitan role played by Italian intellectuals until the eighteenth century, which in turn is split into several sections: the Renaissance and Machiavelli, etc. If I had the possibility of consulting the necessary material I believe that there is a really interesting book to be written that does not yet exist; ... Meanwhile I write notes, also because reading the relatively little that I have brings back to mind my old readings of the past. Besides, this is not a completely new thing for me, because ten years ago I wrote an essay on the [Italian] language [lingua] question according to Manzoni, and that required a certain research into the organization of Italian culture, from the time when the written language (the so-called medieval Latin, that is, that Latin written from 400 AD until 1300) became completely detached from the language spoken by the people, which, Roman centralization having come to an end, was fragmented into infinite dialects. This medieval Latin was followed by vulgar languages, which were again submerged by humanistic Latin, giving rise to an erudite language, vulgar in lexicon but not in its phonology and even less in its syntax, which was reproduced from Latin: thus there continued to exist a double language, the popular or dialectical one and the erudite, that is, the language of intellectuals and the cultivated classes. Manzoni himself, in rewriting The Betrothed and in his treatises on the Italian language, actually only took into account a single aspect of the language, the lexicon, and not the syntax that is in fact the essential part of any language, so much so that English, though it contains more than 60 percent of Latin or neo-Latin words, is a Germanic language, whereas Roumanian [sic], though it contains more than 60 percent of [sic] Slavic words, is a neo-Latin language. As you see, this subject interests me so much that I’ve let it carry me away.4
我主要关注三到四个主要主题，其中之一是意大利知识分子在 18 世纪之前的世界主义角色，这又细分为几个部分：文艺复兴时期和马基雅维利等。如果我有机会查阅必要资料，我相信有一本尚未撰写的非常有趣的书；……与此同时，我写下笔记，也因为阅读我所拥有的相对较少的内容，唤起了我过去旧时的阅读。此外，这对我来说并非完全新鲜事物，因为十年前，我写了一篇关于曼佐尼对意大利语言问题的论文，这需要对意大利文化组织进行一定的研究，从书面语言（所谓的中古拉丁语，即公元 400 年至 1300 年期间的拉丁语）完全脱离民众口语的那一刻开始，由于罗马中央集权的终结，它分裂成无数方言。 中古拉丁语之后是通俗语言，它们又被人文主义拉丁语所淹没，由此产生了一种博学的语言，其词汇通俗，但其语音甚至语法都源于拉丁语：因此，双语现象持续存在，即大众或方言语与博学语，也就是知识分子和文化阶层的语言。曼佐尼本人，在重写《婚约》以及其关于意大利语的论文中，实际上只考虑了语言的一个方面，即词汇，而没有考虑语法，语法实际上是任何语言的核心部分，以至于英语，虽然包含超过 60%的拉丁语或新拉丁语词汇，却是一种日耳曼语，而罗马尼亚语，虽然包含超过 60%的斯拉夫语词汇，却是一种新拉丁语。正如你所见，这个主题如此吸引我，以至于让我着迷。4

This text is important, not only because it explicitly declares that his first systematic reflections on the “organization of Italian culture” arose while Gramsci was writing “an essay on the question of the language in Manzoni,” but also for the way in which the topic is being developed. The theme is “the cosmopolitan function that the Italian intellectuals have had until the end of the eighteenth century,” but in the whole letter Gramsci is dealing with only one aspect of the problem, the language, so that he “let it carry me away." He does not say a word about the other aspects.
这篇文字重要，不仅因为它明确声明格拉姆斯基关于“意大利文化组织”的首次系统思考，缘起于他撰写“关于曼佐尼语言问题的论文”之时，而且也因其主题的展开方式。主题是“意大利知识分子在 18 世纪末之前所具有的世界性功能”，但在整封信中，格拉姆斯基只探讨了问题的一个方面，即语言，以至于他“被它带走了”。他没有提及其他方面。

B

The next text is quoted even more often and is more famous than the first. On March 19, 1927, Gramsci tells Tania he is “tormented ... by this idea: that I should do something für ewig." The subjects he aims at to study are four:
下一段引文更常被引用，也比第一段更著名。1927 年 3 月 19 日，葛兰西告诉塔妮娅，他“被这个想法折磨着：我应该为永恒做一些事情”。他想要研究的主题有四个：

(1) a study on the formation of the public spirit in Italy during the past century; in other words a study of Italian intellectuals, their origins, their groupings in accordance with cultural currents, and their various ways of thinking. . . . (2) A study of comparative linguistics! Nothing less; but what could be more “disinterested" and für ewig than this? It would of course be a matter of dealing only with the methodological and purely theoretical part of the subject, which has never been dealt with completely and systematically from the new point of view of the neolinguists as opposed to the neogrammarians (this letter of mine, dear Tania, will horrify you!) A major intellectual “remorse" of my life is the deep sorrow that I caused my good professor Bartoli at the University of Turin, who was convinced that I was the archangel destined to put to definitive rout [profligare] the neogrammarians, since he, belonging to the same generation and bound by a million academic ties to this mob of most infamous men, did not wish, in his pronouncements, to go beyond a certain limit set by convention and by deference to the old funerary monuments of erudition. (3) A study of Pirandello's theatre and of the transformation of Italian theatrical taste that Pirandello represented and helped form. . . . (4) An essay on the serial novel and popular taste in literature. . . . What do you say about all of this? At bottom, if you examine them thoroughly, there is a certain homogeneity among these four subjects: the creative spirit of the people in its diverse stages and degrees of development is in equal measure at their base.5
(1) 对过去一个世纪意大利公共精神形成的研究；换言之，对意大利知识分子及其起源、根据文化潮流的群体划分以及各种思维方式的研究…… (2) 一项比较语言学研究！绝非小事；但这还有什么比这更“无私”且永恒的呢？当然，这将只涉及该主题的方法论和纯粹理论部分，从新语言学家（与老语言学家）的新视角来看，从未得到过完整和系统的处理（亲爱的塔妮娅，我的这封信会吓到你！）我一生中最大的知识“懊悔”是，我给都灵大学的好教授巴尔托利教授带来了深深的悲痛，他确信我是注定要彻底击败老语言学家的守护天使，因为他属于同一代人，并因数百万学术联系而与这群臭名昭著的人们联系在一起，在他的言论中，不愿超越习俗和对旧的学术纪念碑的尊敬所设定的界限。 (3) 对皮兰德罗的戏剧及其所代表和帮助形成的意大利戏剧品味变革进行研究……(4) 一篇关于连载小说和文学大众口味的论文……对此您怎么看？仔细考察下来，这四个主题本质上存在某种同质性：人民的创造精神及其不同发展阶段和程度，在其中都占据着同等重要的地位。5

Here too linguistics, even viewed from its strictly methodological aspects, is fundamental, and is judged to be a subject of study that has affinities with topics concerning intellectuals, Pirandello and the serial novel, “at bottom, if you examine them thoroughly, there is a certain homogeneity among these four subjects.” I tried to provide an explanation for this proclaimed homogeneity in Lingua, intellettuali, egemonia in Gramsci. Perhaps other explanations are possible; but those who study Gramsci as a theoretician of intellectuals have yet to provide one.
语言学，即使从其严格的方法论角度来看，在这里也是根本性的，并且被认为是一门与知识分子、皮兰德罗和连载小说等主题相关的学科，“仔细考察，这四者之间确实存在某种同质性”。我试图在《语言、知识分子与葛兰西的霸权》中解释这种宣称的同质性。或许还有其他解释；但是，将葛兰西视为知识分子理论家的研究者们，尚未提供一种。

C

On November 19, 1933, Gramsci was transferred from the prison of Turi to the infirmary of the prison of Civitavecchia and, on December 7, to a clinic in Formia. From this moment onwards, the censors decreased their control and the Notebooks do not bear the preventative stamp of the prison authorities anymore.6 On October 25 of the subsequent year, Gramsci obtained conditional freedom. In these conditions of semi-freedom he compiles what will be his last Notebook, dated 1935. He devotes it not to immediately political subjects, but to the concept of grammar.
1933 年 11 月 19 日，葛兰西从图里监狱转至奇维塔韦基亚监狱医院，12 月 7 日转至福尔米亚诊所。从此时起，审查员减少了控制，笔记不再带有监狱当局的预防性印章。6 次年 10 月 25 日，葛兰西获得有条件的自由。在这种半自由状态下，他编纂了他最后一本笔记，日期为 1935 年。他将其内容并非用于直接的政治议题，而是致力于语法概念。

Language [linguaggio] continues to be at the center of his intellectual activity until the end of his life. Is this a sign that the key to his political philosophy is to be found in language? This question demands an answer, whatever the answer, from the scholars of Gramsci’s political theory. However, what remains is the fact that the founder of the Italian Communist Party,7 and the theoretician of the cultural apparatuses and of the concept of hegemony, debuts intellectually as a linguist (“pupil of the good professor Bartoli,” as a university student, and still called, in the Avanti! of January 26 and February 7, 1918, “emeritus scholar of glottology” and “young comrade, philosopher and glottologist”)and concludes his theoretical activity as author of a short but dense tract on language [lingua]. This biographical information is waiting to become part of the reconstructions and theoretical treatises on Gramsci.
语言 [linguaggio] 一直是他终身智力活动的中心。这是否意味着他的政治哲学的钥匙隐藏在语言中？这个问题需要学界对葛兰西政治理论做出解答，无论答案是什么。然而，事实仍然是，意大利共产党创始人、文化机器和霸权概念的理论家，在知识上以语言学家身份开启了他的职业生涯（作为大学生，“好教授巴尔托利”的学生，并在 1918 年 1 月 26 日和 2 月 7 日的《前进报》上被称为“语言学资深学者”和“年轻的同志、哲学家和语言学家”），并以一篇关于语言 [lingua] 的简短而密集的论文结束了他的理论活动。这些生平信息有待成为葛兰西研究和理论著作的一部分。

These and other philological indications (which I dealt with in my book quoted above) lead us to deem Gramsci’s linguistics to be of interest not only to linguists and philosophers of language [linguaggio], but also to those political theorists who are, or have been, inspired by Gramsci’s writings and those who are interested in giving an account of the nonLeninist, maybe not even Marxist, specificity of Gramsci’s philosophical proposal.
这些以及其他语言学方面的迹象（我在上述引用的著作中讨论过）使我们认为葛兰西的语言学不仅对语言学家和语言哲学家[语言]感兴趣，而且对那些受葛兰西著作启发或曾经受其启发，以及那些试图阐释葛兰西哲学主张的非列宁主义，甚至可能是非马克思主义的特殊性的政治理论家们也感兴趣。

Gramsci is not like one of the many Marxist philosophers from whom one can deduce a philosophy of language along with any number of other theories. Gramsci’s case is radically different. His reflections on language [linguaggio] and his linguistic culture were the generative mechanism of his originality and what renders him radically different from other Marxists. This, obviously, does not mean that other experiences have not converged in the formation of his thought, Soviet Marxism included. The question at stake is different. Did those experiences have the original theoretical results that they did because they were grafted on to a branch predisposed to grow towards the theory of intellectuals and of hegemony? Or would their author’s genius have caused them to reach the same theoretical results, regardless? The question could be reformulated in another way. If the theory of intellectuals and hegemony had Leninist or generically Soviet or Marxist origins, why did Togliatti not produce anything similar, considering that he went through a longer and more absorbent immersion in Soviet and non-Soviet Marxism? Is the recourse to Gramsci’s greater geniality and inventiveness a satisfying explanation?
葛兰西不像其他许多马克思主义哲学家，从他们那里可以推导出语言哲学以及其他各种理论。葛兰西的情况截然不同。他对语言和语言文化的思考是他独创性的生成机制，也使他与其他马克思主义者截然不同。这显然并不意味着其他经验没有在他思想的形成中发挥作用，包括苏联马克思主义。问题在于：这些经验是否因为植根于一种倾向于发展知识分子和霸权理论的枝干，才产生了其理论成果？或者，即使没有这种枝干，作者的天赋也会导致他们得出同样的理论结果？这个问题可以换一种方式来表述。如果知识分子和霸权理论源于列宁主义、苏联或一般马克思主义，那么，考虑到托利亚蒂在苏联和非苏联马克思主义中经历了更长更深入的浸润，为什么他没有产生类似的成果？ 对葛兰西的更高才能和创造力进行求助是否是一个令人满意的解释？

The People-Nation8 and Language [Lingua]
人民-民族 8 和语言[语言]

In the Notebooks one can find several books: on the theory and history of intellectuals, on the “Party-Prince” as agent of transformation, on the Risorgimento, on folklore, on the philosophy of Benedetto Croce, on American industrial democracy, on the sociology and history of literature, on language [lingua] and maybe more. Togliatti divided them, and probably no one could do better. Gramsci argued on various occasions that the subjects he treated were deeply homogeneous. Scholars have often forgotten this indication of Gramsci. Each of the scholars has singled out their own Gramsci: a Gramsci fitting with their own discipline, without worrying excessively about the coherence between their Gramsci and the Gramsci singled out by their colleagues.
在笔记中，人们可以找到关于知识分子理论和历史、关于“党王”作为变革代理人的著作、关于意大利统一运动、关于民间文学、关于贝内德托·克罗齐的哲学、关于美国工业民主、关于文学的社会学和历史、关于语言等等书籍。托利亚蒂将它们分门别类，或许没有人能做得更好。葛兰西曾多次论证，他所研究的主题具有深刻的同质性。学者们常常忘记了葛兰西的这一提示。每位学者都挑选出他们自己的葛兰西：一个符合他们自身学科的葛兰西，而不过分关注他们各自的葛兰西与同行们所挑选的葛兰西之间的连贯性。

What ties the more than two thousand pages of the Notebooks together? One and only one question: the theoretical and historical study of the conditions “that enable action on a dispersed and shattered people to arouse and organise its collective will,”9 in particular that collective will which Gramsci calls the people-nation. The socialist revolution is only one of the ways (although certainly for Gramsci the most important) in which the problem of the formation of cohesive national-popular organisms may present themselves in history. Starting from the notion of a people-nation, all the theoretical concepts and the historical analyses can be easily related back to an ordered and coherent system: hegemony, civil society, “Party-Prince,^ folklore, Italian intellectuals5 cosmopolitanism, city-country, the failure of the Risorgimento, Jacobinism, intellectual and moral reform, grammar and so on.
笔记的超过两千页内容之间有什么联系？只有一个问题：对“使分散破碎的人民行动起来，唤醒和组织其集体意志”的条件进行理论和历史研究，特别是葛兰西所说的民族人民的集体意志。社会主义革命只是历史中民族人民有机体形成问题的一种方式（尽管对葛兰西来说，无疑是最重要的）。从民族人民的概念出发，所有理论概念和历史分析都可以很容易地联系回一个有序且连贯的体系：霸权、公民社会、“党-王子”、民间文化、意大利知识分子、世界主义、城乡、复兴运动的失败、雅各宾主义、智识和道德改革、语法等等。

With respect to the formation of unitary and cohesive national-popular wills, language [linguaggio] works simultaneously as: (A) a microcosm and laboratory in which one can find mechanisms and procedures that operate in a more complex way on the macro-social scale; and (B) an indispensable constitutive factor of complex collective wills such as the people-nations. Let’s now examine these two points separately.
关于统一和凝聚的民族-大众意志的形成，语言同时发挥着以下作用：（A）微观世界和实验室，其中可以发现那些在宏观社会层面运作的机制和程序；以及（B）复杂集体意志，例如民族意志，不可或缺的构成因素。现在让我们分别考察这两个方面。

A

Gramsci studied the mechanisms that preside over the formation of a language [lingua] common to an entire people-nation since the very first years of his university apprenticeship in Matteo Bartoli’s approach to glottology. It was in this context of specialized studies that he precociously came in touch with the nineteenth century’s most penetrating analysis of the role of the intellectuals and of the cultural apparatuses with respect to the formation of a national language: the Proemio [Preface] that Graziadio Isaia Ascoli wrote for the first issue of the Archivio Glottologico Italiano [Italian Glottological Archive] (1873). Here the lack of popularity of the Italian language was related both to the “scarce density of culture” or the “concentration of knowledge in a handful of persons” in modern Italy, and to the cosmopolitanism of the Italian intellectuals. Ascoli’s essay is continually absent in the library of Gramsci’s scholars, yet its affinity with many of Gramsci’s analyses is simply surprising.
葛兰西从他在马特奥·巴尔托利教授的语言学研究中，大学时期就开始研究一个民族共同语言（lingua）的形成机制。正是在这种专业研究的背景下，他早早地接触到了 19 世纪对知识分子和文化机构在民族语言形成中作用最深刻的分析：格拉齐亚迪奥·伊萨亚·阿斯科利为《意大利语系语言学档案》（1873 年第一期）撰写的《序言》。文中将意大利语的缺乏普及性，归因于近代意大利的“文化密度不足”或“知识集中于少数人手中”，以及意大利知识分子的世界主义。阿斯科利的文章在葛兰西研究者的文献中经常缺失，然而其与葛兰西许多分析的亲和力却令人惊讶。

The study of language [linguaggio] compels the young Gramsci to go back to the history and sociology of intellectuals because of an even more theoretical aspect. In the years in which he was preparing for his career as a glottologist, some European linguists (Gilliéron, Meillet, “the good professor Bartoli”) were attempting to explain the diffusion of a language [lingua] beyond its original geographic and social confines by recourse to geographic centers and social groups capable of irradiating cultural prestige. A language is diffused neither by the force of armies nor by state coercion—this is the sociocultural thesis of the Italian neo-linguistics and of French sociological school—but because the ones who speak a different language spontaneously consent to the speech of the groups with cultural prestige. We cite here only one article that Meillet published in 1911 in the magazine Scientia:
语言学的研究促使年轻的葛兰西回到知识分子史和社会学，原因在于一个更理论的方面。在他准备从事语言学家职业的那些年里，一些欧洲语言学家（吉耶龙、梅耶，以及“好教授巴尔托利”）试图通过地理中心和能够辐射文化声望的社会群体来解释一种语言超越其最初的地理和社会界限的传播。语言的传播既不是通过军队的力量，也不是通过国家强制——这是意大利新语言学和法国社会学学派的社会文化论点——而是因为说不同语言的人自愿接受那些拥有文化声望的群体的语言。我们在此仅引用梅耶 1911 年在《科学》杂志上发表的一篇文章。

It is inevitable that among the actual ways of speaking some are used by more powerful groups or groups with superior civilization, which for some reason are given a greater prestige. Such ways of speaking function as models for the other ones. With respect to relationships among groups, if it is not possible to speak exactly the same way, the goal is to approximate the models. This is the beginning of the evolution through which the creation of a common language gets its start on the basis of one of the group’s way of speaking and through which strictly local linguistic innovations are partly or entirely eliminated.10
在实际的语言使用方式中，一些由更强大或拥有更高文明的群体所使用的方式，由于某种原因而获得了更高的声望，这是不可避免的。这些语言方式充当了其他方式的典范。就群体之间的关系而言，如果无法完全以相同的方式表达，目标就是尽量接近这些典范。这是语言演变的开端，在此基础上，一种群体的语言方式成为共同语言形成的基础，而严格意义上的地方性语言创新则部分或完全被消除。

I have tried to document the similarities between the concept of hegemony and the linguistic concept of prestige. In the years in which the term “hegemony” either does not emerge or emerges according to the banal meaning of “supremacy,” Gramsci refers to the “spiritual government that knows how to produce spontaneous consensus” by using the term learnt from Matteo Bartoli’s school: “irradiation of prestige." I will cite one suitable example from an article that appeared on December 27, 1919:
我试图阐述霸权概念与语言学中的声望概念之间的相似性。在“霸权”一词要么不出现，要么仅以“至高无上”的平庸含义出现的那些年份里，葛兰西运用从马特奥·巴尔托利学派学来的术语——“声望的辐射”，来指代“懂得如何制造自发共识的精神统治”。我将援引一篇发表于 1919 年 12 月 27 日的文章中的一个合适的例子：

With its revolutionary programme, the Socialist Party pulls out from under the bourgeois State apparatus its democratic basis in the consent of the governed. . . . And so that the Party comes to be identified with the historical consciousness of the mass of the people, and it governs their spontaneous, irresistible movement. This is an incorporeal government that is transmitted through millions and millions of spiritual links; it is a irradiation of prestige, that can become a truly effective government only in climactic moments.... The Party . . . exercises the most
凭借其革命性的纲领，社会主义党从资产阶级国家机器下抽离了其民主基础——被统治者的同意…… 因此，该党得以与人民群众的历史意识相认同，并驾驭他们自发的、不可抗拒的运动。这是一种无形的政府，通过数百万数百万的精神联系得以传递；它是一种声望的辐射，只有在关键时刻才能成为真正有效的政府……该党……行使着

effective of the dictatorships, a dictatorship based on prestige, on the conscious and spontaneous acceptance of authority that workers see as indispensable if their mission is to be accomplished.11
专制制度的有效性，一种建立在威望之上的专制，建立在工人认为其任务完成必不可少的、自觉和自发的权威接受之上。

If it is true that the concept of hegemony was first forged in the theoretical laboratory of linguistics, the role of Leninism and/or Marxism within Gramsci’s philosophy will have to be radically rediscussed.
如果霸权概念最初是在语言学的理论实验室中锻造出来的，那么列宁主义和/或马克思主义在葛兰西哲学中的作用就必须进行根本性的重新讨论。

A collective will is held together also by a common language. Gramsci insists on this aspect of the problem with obsessive frequency. We quote only a long methodological note from Notebook 10 and a quick annotation from Notebook 13:
集体意志也由共同语言维系。葛兰西对此问题反复强调。我们仅引用第 10 本笔记中的一段较长的方法论注释和第 13 本笔记中的一则简短注释：

Language, languages and common sense. If philosophy is conceived as a conception of the world—and philosophical activity is not to be conceived [solely] as the “individual” elaboration of systematically coherent concepts, but also and above all as a cultural battle to transform the popular “mentality” and to diffuse the philosophical innovations which will demonstrate themselves to be “historically true” to the extent that they become concretely—i.e. historically and socially universal—then the question of language [linguaggio] and languages [lingua] must be “technically” put at the forefront of our enquiry. ... It seems that one can say that “language” [linguaggio] is essentially a collective term which does not presuppose any single thing existing in either time or space.
语言、诸语言与常识。如果哲学被理解为世界观——并且哲学活动不应仅仅被理解为系统连贯的概念的“个人”阐释，而首先且主要地被理解为一场文化斗争，旨在转变大众的“思维方式”并传播那些将证明其“历史真实性”的哲学创新，其真实性在于它们变得具体——即在历史上和社会上普遍——那么语言[linguaggio]和诸语言[lingua]的问题就必须被“技术性”地置于我们研究的最前沿。……似乎可以说，“语言”[linguaggio]本质上是一个集体性术语，它不预设任何存在于时间或空间中的单一事物。

Language [linguaggio] also means culture and philosophy (if only at the level of common sense) and therefore, the fact of “language” [linguaggio] is in reality a multiplicity of facts more or less organically coherent and coordinated. At the limit, it may be said that every speaking being has her own personal language [linguaggio], i.e., her own way of thinking and feeling. Culture, in its various levels, unifies a larger or smaller number of individuals into many strata which come into greater or lesser expressive relations and understand each other to varying degrees, etc. . . . From this one can deduce the importance of the “cultural aspect,” even in practical (collective) activity. Every historical act can only be performed by “collective man,” and this presupposes the attainment of a “cultural-social” unity through which a multiplicity of dispersed wills, with heterogeneous aims, are welded together with a single aim, on the basis of an (equal) and common conception of the world. . . . Since this is the way things happen, the importance of the general question of language comes to light, that is, the question of collectively attaining a single cultural “climate.”12
语言 [linguaggio] 也意味着文化和哲学（即使只是在常识层面），因此，“语言” [linguaggio] 事实上是或多或少有机地连贯和协调的多种事实。极限情况下，可以说每个说话者都有她自己的个人语言 [linguaggio]，即她自己思考和感受的方式。文化在其各个层面，将多或少的人团结成许多阶层，这些阶层以不同程度的表达关系相互联系，并以不同程度地相互理解，等等……由此可以推导出“文化方面”的重要性，即使在实践（集体）活动中也是如此。任何历史行为都只能由“集体人类”执行，这需要通过“文化-社会”统一来实现，通过这种统一，具有异质目标的众多分散意志，在对世界（相同）和共同的观念的基础上，被焊接成一个共同的目标……既然事情就是这样发生的，那么语言的一般问题的重要性就显而易见，即集体获得单一文化“氛围”的问题。

When can one say that there exist the conditions in order a collective national-popular will may be given rise and develop? . . . Why in Italy was not there the absolute monarchy at Machiavelli’s times? One must go back until the Roman Empire (question of language, of intellectuals etc.).13
什么时候才能说集体民族-大众意志能够产生和发展？……为什么在马基雅维利时代意大利没有绝对君主制？必须追溯到罗马帝国时期（语言、知识分子等问题）。

Due to its natural predisposition to form from “a multiplicity of fragmented wills” "a cultural-social unity” (i.e., a “national-popular collective will”), language [lingua] is the place in which one can read successes and failures of hegemonies and of processes of formation of the people-nations. This is the theme to which the last Notebook is devoted (bearing an only apparently odd title, National language and Grammar [Lingua nazionale e grammatical]), and that must, instead, be read for what it is: a small and dense tract on the processes of the formation and on the conditions of success of the hegemonies capable of unifying and aggregating complex
由于语言[lingua]天生倾向于由“多种破碎意志”形成“文化社会统一”（即“民族大众集体意志”），它构成了衡量霸权成功与失败以及民族形成过程的场所。最后一本日记（标题看似奇怪，但应理解为《民族语言与语法[Lingua nazionale e grammatical]》）即致力于此主题，它实际上是一篇关于霸权形成过程及其成功统一和整合复杂社会条件的小而密集的论文。

organisms such as the people-nation. Some of the passages from this notebook are very well known to the Italian linguists. We now call them to the attention of the nonlinguist readers. Yet the entire ntebook must be read as the central nucleus of Gramsci’s theory of power:
例如“人民-民族”之类的有机体。该笔记本中的某些段落对意大利语言学家来说非常著名。我们现在将它们介绍给非语言学读者。然而，整个笔记本必须被视为葛兰西权力理论的核心。

One could sketch a picture of the “normative grammar” that operates spontaneously in every given society, in that this society tends to become unified both as a territory and as a culture, in other words it has a governing class whose function is recognized and followed. The number of “immanent or spontaneous grammars” is incalculable and, theoretically, one may say that each person has a grammar of her own. Yet, alongside this actual “disaggregation,” one has to consider the movements of unification, of greater or lesser amplitude both as territorial area and as “linguistic volume.” Written “normative grammars” tend to embrace an entire national territory and the entire “linguistic volume,” to create a unitary national linguistic conformism, that, under another respect, places expressive “individualism” at a higher level, because it creates a more robust and homogeneous skeleton for the national linguistic organism of which every individual is the reflection and the interpreter.14
可以勾勒出在任何特定社会中自发运作的“规范语法”图景，因为该社会趋向于在地域和文化上实现统一，换言之，它拥有被承认并遵循其职能的统治阶级。 “内在或自发的语法”的数量是无法计算的，理论上可以认为每个人都有自己的一套语法。然而，在这一实际的“解体”背后，我们必须考虑统一运动，其幅度大小不一，既涉及地域范围，也涉及“语言体量”。书面“规范语法”倾向于涵盖整个国家领土和整个“语言体量”，以创造一种统一的国家语言教条主义，这从另一个角度来看，提升了表达的“个人主义”，因为它为国家语言有机体创造了一个更强大、更同质的骨架，每个个体都是该有机体的反映和阐释者。

Every time that the question of the language [lingua] surfaces, in one way or another, it means that a series of problems are coming to the fore: the formation and enlargement of the governing class, the need to establish more intimate and secure relationships between the governing groups and the national-popular mass, in other words to reorganize the cultural hegemony.15
每当语言问题以某种方式出现，就意味着一系列问题浮出水面：统治阶级的形成和扩大，统治集团与民族大众建立更密切和更安全的联系的需求，换句话说，重组文化霸权。

The failure of the Risorgimento and the incapacity of the nineteenth-century bourgeois at exercising hegemony (diffusive cultural direction) on the entire nation-people are historical processes isomorphic to the nonpopularity of the Italian language, to the vitality of folkloric cultures and of the idioms of dialects: “The question of the language posed by Manzoni also reflects this problem, that of the moral and intellectual unity of the nation and the state, sought in the unity of the language.”16
“民族复兴运动的失败以及 19 世纪资产阶级未能对整个民族人民实施统治（弥散性文化引导）的历史进程，与意大利语的普及程度不足、民间文化和方言活力密切相关：“曼佐尼提出的语言问题也反映了这个问题，即寻求国家和国家在语言统一上的道德和智力统一。”16

Notes 笔记

1. Franco Lo Piparo, Lingua, intellettuali, egemonia in Gramsci (Bari: Laterza, 1979).
1. 弗朗哥·洛皮帕罗，《语言、知识分子和葛兰西的霸权》（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1979）。

2. [We should note that Critica Marxista was (and remains) officially an independent journal, although Lo Piparo is highlighting the overlap in specific people and interests between the two in 1987.]
2. [我们需要注意的是，《批判马克思主义》杂志（以及现在）官方上仍然是一份独立的期刊，尽管洛·皮帕罗在 1987 年强调了该杂志与两者之间在特定人物和利益上的重合之处。]

3. [This phrase in italics was edited out of the original publication as noted above. See note 2.]
3. [如上所述，原文中这段斜体文字已在原出版物中删除。请参阅注释 2。]

4. Antonio Gramsci, Letters from Prison, vol. 1, ed. Frank Rosengarten, trans. Raymond Rosenthal (New York: Columbia University Press, 1994), 360-61, hereafter LP1. See pages ix-x for a list of abbreviations.
4. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中书简》，第一卷，弗兰克·罗森加登编，雷蒙德·罗森塔尔译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，1994），360-61 页，以下简称 LP1。请见第 ix-x 页以获取缩写列表。

5. LP1, 83-84. Italics Lo Piparo’s.
5. LP1，83-84。_洛皮帕罗_

6. See Valentino Gerratana’s notes in Antonio Gramsci, Quaderni del Carcere (Turin: Einaudi, 1975), 2369-2442, hereafter QC.
6. 见瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳（Valentino Gerratana）在安东尼奥·葛兰西（Antonio Gramsci）的《狱中札记》（都灵：艾纳迪出版社，1975 年），第 2369-2442 页的注释，以下简称《狱记》。

7. [Many people were involved in founding the Partito Communista d’Italia (which became the Partito Communista Italiano) and Gramsci’s prominance is still a subject of debate.]
7. [意大利共产党（后来的意大利共产党）的创建者众多，葛兰西的地位仍然存在争议。]

8. [Lo Piparo uses nazione-popolo, which is a concept Gramsci uses a few times in the Prison Notebooks. But Gramsci uses popolo-nazione much more frequently. Given this situation and that in Italian modifying adjectives often follow the nouns they modify, we have translated nazione-popolo as people-nation.]
8. [洛·皮帕罗使用“民族-人民”这一概念，葛兰西在《狱中札记》中也曾数次提及。但葛兰西更频繁地使用“人民-民族”。鉴于此，以及意大利语中修饰语通常置于被修饰名词之后，我们翻译“民族-人民”为“人民-民族”。]

9. Q13§1, QC, 1556. [To facilitate locating passages in various translations and anthologies, we use the standard method of providing the notebook [Quaderno] number—in this case 13—followed by the section number, §. See the introduction, page 12, for discussion. We will indicate the English translation, if used.]
9. Q13§1，QC，1556。[为方便在各种译本和文集中查找段落，我们采用标准方法，提供笔记本[Quaderno]编号——在本例中为 13——后跟章节编号，§。请参阅导言，第 12 页，以了解更多讨论。我们将标注英语译文，如有使用。]

10. Antoine Meillet, Différentiation et unification dans les langues, in Scientia, vol. IX, V (1911): n.9, and Linguistique historique et linguistique générale, vol. 1 (Paris: E. Champion, 1921), 122.
10. 安托万·梅耶，语言的差异化和统一化，载《科学》杂志，第九卷，第五期（1911）：第 9 页，以及历史语言学与普通语言学，第一卷（巴黎：E. 冠军出版社，1921），第 122 页。

11. Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Political Writings, 1910-1920, ed. Quintin Hoare and trans. John Matthews (London: Lawrence & Wishart, 1977), 143项4. Italics Lo Piparo’s.
11. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《政治著作选集》，1910-1920 年，昆廷·霍尔和约翰·马修斯译（伦敦：劳伦斯与维沙特出版社，1977），第 143 页第 4 项。斜体字为洛·皮帕罗所著。

12. Q10§44, QC, 1330-31. We have altered the translation to better convey Gramsci’s style and meaning but also to exploit grammatical ambiguities of Italian to introduce feminine pronouns. See Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Quintin Hoare and Geoffrey Nowell Smith (New York: International Publishers, 1971), 348项9, hereafter cited as SPN.
12. Q10§44, QC, 1330-31。我们修改了翻译，以便更好地传达葛兰西的风格和含义，同时也利用意大利语的语法歧义引入了女性代词。参见安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记选编》，昆廷·霍尔和杰弗里·诺韦尔·史密斯编著，译著（纽约：国际出版社，1971），第 348 页，以下简称《狱记》。

13. Q13§1; SPN, 130. 13. Q13§1；SPN，130。

14. Q29§2, QC, 2343. English translation, modified slightly, in Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Cultural Writings, ed. D. Forgacs and G. Nowell-Smith, trans. W. Boelhower (Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1985), 181, hereafter SCW.
14. Q29§2，QC，2343。摘自安东尼奥·葛兰西《文化著作选集》，第 181 页，由 D. Forgacs 和 G. Nowell-Smith 编辑，W. Boelhower 翻译（剑桥，马萨诸塞州：哈佛大学出版社，1985），以下简称 SCW。

15. Q29§3, SCW, 183-84. 15. Q29§3，SCW，183-84。

16. Q21§5, SCW, 210. 16. Q21§5，SCW，210。

* Translation of “Studio del linguaggio e teoria gramsciana,” Critica Marxista 2/3 (1987): 167-75. See preface for explanation about the title change.
《语言研究室与葛兰西理论》，《马克思主义批判》第 2/3 期（1987）：167-175。请参阅前言了解标题更改说明。

** Translated by Rocco Lacorte with assistance by Peter Ives. This is a previously unpublished note that Franco Lo Piparo asked us to use to introduce his previously published essay.
由罗科·拉科尔特及彼得·艾夫斯协助翻译。这是法兰克·洛·皮帕罗先生要求我们用来介绍他之前发表的论文的一篇未发表笔记。

2
Linguistics and Marxism in the Thought of Antonio Gramsci
Luigi Rosiello*
2 语言学与马克思主义在安东尼奥·葛兰西思想中的地位  路易吉·罗西耶罗*

The centrality of linguistic questions, both genetic and synchronic, to the political and sociological thought of Antonio Gramsci (1891-1937) has been demonstrated by Franco Lo Piparo.1 Rejecting previous assumptions, he argues that Gramsci’s linguistic interests一which matured during his years at university independently of Marxism一in large part influenced his future theoretical elaborations regarding the relationships between intellectuals and society and also the originality of his position in the arena of Italian Marxism. One of the theses sustained by Lo Piparo “is that Gramsci looked for those theoretical instruments which would allow understanding the question of language [lingua] in its exact terms and the problem related to it regarding the relationship between linguistic history, cultural apparatuses and society, inside the debate between neogrammarians and neo-
弗朗哥·洛皮帕罗（Franco Lo Piparo）论证了语言问题（无论是遗传的还是同步的）对安东尼奥·葛兰西（1891-1937）的政治和社会学思想的核心地位。[1] 他驳斥了先前的假设，认为葛兰西的语言兴趣——其在大学时期独立于马克思主义而成熟——很大程度上影响了他日后的理论阐述，涉及知识分子与社会的关系，以及他在意大利马克思主义领域中的独特地位。洛皮帕罗的一个论点是，葛兰西寻求那些理论工具，以便准确理解语言问题及其与语言史、文化机构和社会之间关系的关联问题，尤其是在新语法主义者和新——

linguists."2 I cannot completely agree with this position since Gramsci did not look for “theoretical instruments” within the neo-linguistic view of Bartoli against the neo-grammarians’ positivism. Gramsci, rather, simply looked for methodological canons that would fit into the frame of a materialistic theory of history better than the ones of the neo-grammarians. This is the case provided that what he wrote in Avanti! on January 29, 1918, is true: “I am preparing my thesis for graduation on the history of language [linguaggio], trying to apply the critical methods of historical materialism even to this research.”3 For the young student, the methodological instrument to apply was Bartoli’s neo-linguistics, which seemed to offer the possibility to highlight the sociocultural conflicts constituting linguistic changes rather than their linearity.
语言学家们“2 我不能完全同意这种观点，因为葛兰西并没有在巴尔托利的新语言学视角（对抗新语法学家的实证主义）中寻找“理论工具”。葛兰西只是寻找能够更好地融入唯物史观框架的方法论规范，而不是新语法学家的方法论规范。前提是，如果他在 1918 年 1 月 29 日《前进报》上的文字属实：“我正在为语言史的毕业论文做准备，试图将历史唯物主义的批判方法应用于这项研究。”3 对这位年轻的学生来说，应用的方法论工具是巴尔托利的新语言学，它似乎提供了突出构成语言变化的社会文化冲突而非其线性发展模式的可能性。

During his years at the University of Turin, Gramsci attended Matteo Bartoli’s classes on glottology diligently and with interest. Gramsci collaborated with Bartoli both with his class in 1912-1913, editing the notes Bartoli wrote to be distributed to his students,4 and in making available his proficiency as a speaker of Sardinian. Sardinian dialects always attracted Bartoli’s interest since they tend to preserve their Latin features. He dealt with this topic in an early essay5 and also in his exposition of the spatial theory of linguistic areas in order to document the norm of the isolated area (“the most isolated area usually preserves its anterior phase”). It may be that Bartoli was first interested in Gramsci as a Sardinian speaker—namely, as a possible direct source of information regarding words and Sardinian syntactical constructions—before discovering and appreciating his pupil’s intellect. Gramsci did in fact write home in 1912 and 1913, including lists of Sardinian words and constructions, and asking his father or sister to carry out actual small investigations to check for their existence in the spoken language or to verify their phonetic and semantic exactness. Gramsci wrote the following to his father in January 1913:
在都灵大学期间，葛兰西认真且有兴趣地参加了马特奥·巴尔托利教授的语言学课程。葛兰西与巴尔托利合作，于 1912-1913 年参与其课堂，编辑巴尔托利教授留给学生的笔记；4 并且利用其萨丁岛方言的熟练口语能力。萨丁岛方言一直吸引着巴尔托利教授的兴趣，因为它们往往保留着拉丁语特征。他在早期论文 5 中以及阐述语言区域空间理论时都论及此话题，以证明孤立区域的规范性（“最孤立的区域通常保留其早期阶段”）。或许，巴尔托利最初对葛兰西的兴趣在于其萨丁岛方言的使用者身份——即作为获取萨丁语词汇和语法结构直接信息的潜在来源——而非发现并欣赏其学生的智力。事实上，葛兰西在 1912 年和 1913 年给家人写信，其中包含萨丁语词汇和语法结构的列表，并要求父亲或姐姐进行实际的小规模调查，以检验其在口语中的存在，或验证其语音和语义的准确性。1913 年 1 月，葛兰西写信给父亲，内容如下：

I am sending a list of words: have somebody translate them into Sardinian, yet into the dialect of Fonni (asking around will let you be more precise). Indicate clearly, for example, which S must be pronounced softly, as in rosa and which muted as in sordo. I beg you not to make mistakes, since this is an assignment that I was given by a professor with whom I must take an exam this year. I would not like to jeopardize myself by something foolish. As soon as you write it down, send it to me immediately, because my professor needs it for a work of linguistics he is carrying out.6
我正在发送一个单词列表：请有人将它们翻译成萨丁岛语，具体是方尼方言（多方打听才能更准确）。请明确指出，例如，哪些 S 发音为柔和，如 rosa，哪些发音为清音，如 sordo。请务必不要犯错误，因为这是一项我必须在今年与教授考试的作业。我希望不要因为一些愚蠢的事情而危及自己。请尽快将翻译写下来，并立即发送给我，因为我的教授需要它来进行他的语言学研究。

It does not seem that Bartoli used the materials with which Gramsci provided him in any way. Yet it is clear that Gramsci (and therefore Bartoli) was interested in the dialectal variety of “logudorese” [Logudoro’s dialect], which is the most conservative among the various Sardinian dialects, if one considers, first of all, where the inquiry would have been carried out (in Fonni, a town in the Nuoro area) and the lists of words and constructions Gramsci sent to his sister Teresina (letter of November 1912: pamentile, omine de pore, su pirone, accupintu, pingula, etc.; letter of March 1913: pus for “poi,” puschena, portigaie, poiu and poiolu).7 Probably, Bartoli wanted to further document this “logudorese” variety of Sardinian through Gramsci’s help, because, as he would write later in 1925, “Central Sardinia is a more isolated area than Northern or Southern Sardinia.”8
巴尔托利似乎并未以任何方式使用葛兰西提供给他的材料。然而，显而易见的是，葛兰西（以及因此巴尔托利）对“洛古多雷斯语”[洛古多罗方言]的方言差异感兴趣，如果首先考虑调查地点（位于努奥罗地区的法尼镇）以及葛兰西寄给其妹妹特雷西娜的词汇和结构列表（1912 年 11 月信件：pamentile、omine de pore、su pirone、accupintu、pingula 等；1913 年 3 月信件：pus 作“poi”之用、puschena、portigaie、poiu 和 poiolu），那么它在各种撒丁岛方言中是最保守的。7  巴尔托利可能想通过葛兰西的帮助进一步记录这种“洛古多雷斯语”撒丁岛方言，因为正如他后来在 1925 年所写的那样，“撒丁岛中部地区比北部或南部地区更加孤立”。8

There is a trace of these inquiries on Sardinian dialects conducted through Bartoli’s advising, in Gramsci’s famous letter from prison (March 26, 1927), in which he recommends to his sister Teresina to let her son, Franco, speak in Sardinian. In this way, she would have facilitated his free spontaneity of linguistic expression during the first stage of his learning, without making the mistake of constraining his child’s fantasy in the “straitjacket” of an inadequate Italian, made out of few sentences and words: “For one thing Sardinian is not a dialect, but a language in itself, even if it does not have a great literature, and it is a good thing for children to learn several languages, if it is possible.”9
巴尔托利指导下，萨丁岛方言的研究中，留有这些探究的痕迹。在葛兰西著名的狱中信件（1927 年 3 月 26 日）中，他建议妹妹特雷西娜让其儿子弗朗哥说萨丁语。通过这种方式，她在其语言学习初期，能够促进其语言表达的自由自发性，避免将孩子的天赋想象力束缚在“紧身衣”式的贫乏意大利语（由少量句子和词汇构成）之中：“首先，萨丁语并非方言，而是一种独立的语言，即使它没有丰富的文学作品，让孩子们学习多种语言，如果可能的话，也是一件好事。”9

The contraposition language [lingua]/dialect is affected by certain abstract schematization at this stage (as we will see, Gramsci will deal with the language/dialect relationship in the Prison Notebooks in a different way): on the one hand, he speaks like a specialist used to thinking of Sardinian dialects as an autonomous variety of Romance languages, without any sociolinguistic consideration of their communicative function. On the other hand, he shows that he is aware that the free formation of a complete linguistic proficiency cannot but favor languages’ learning.
在此阶段，对立语言[语/方言]受到某些抽象模式化的影响（正如我们将看到的，葛兰西将在《狱中札记》中以不同的方式处理语言/方言的关系）：一方面，他像一位专家一样，习惯于将撒丁岛方言视为罗曼语系的一种自主变体，而不考虑其交流功能的社会语言学因素。另一方面，他表明他意识到，完整的语言能力的自由形成只能有利于语言的学习。

In his first years in prison, Gramsci feels the urgent need to devote himself to work on topics that have broad theoretical dimension and are destined to last beyond what is contingent (für ewig). What appears in the outline for his research sent to his sister-in-law, Tatiana, in the letter of March 19, 1927, is “a study of comparative linguistics” (perhaps he meant “general”)，where he would deal with the methodological aspect of the neo-linguistic theory against the naturalistic positivism (that is how at least it was understood) of the neo-grammarians’ method. Moreover, this project had, for Gramsci, also an emotional value: it was meant to solve the old debt to his teacher. As Gramsci writes, “A major intellectual ‘remorse’ of my life is the deep sorrow that I caused my good professor Bartoli at the University of Turin, who was convinced that I was the archangel [arcangelo] destined to put to definitive rout [profligare] the ‘neo-grammarians.’”10 Gramsci’s ironic use of words such as arcangelo and profligare is meant to temper the emotions due to his memory “of private conversations he had with his professor when he was a student.”11
在狱中最初几年，葛兰西感到迫切需要致力于研究具有广泛理论意义且注定超越特定时期的课题（für ewig）。1927 年 3 月 19 日写给其嫂子塔蒂亚娜的论文大纲中提到“比较语言学研究”（或许他指的是“普通语言学”），其中他将探讨新语言学理论的方法论，与新语法学派（至少当时是这样理解的）的自然主义实证主义相对比。此外，该项目对葛兰西而言还具有情感价值：它旨在偿还他老师的旧债。正如葛兰西所写，“我一生中最大的知识‘懊悔’是深深的悲伤，我给都灵大学的好教授巴尔托利造成了深深的悲伤，他坚信我注定是将‘新语法学派’彻底击败的先知[arcangelo]。”10 葛兰西使用“先知”和“彻底击败”等带有讽刺意味的词语，是为了缓和他对“与教授在学生时代进行的私人谈话”的记忆所带来的情感。11

As we have seen, Gramsci feels the need to apply “the critical methods of historical materialism” to his linguistic research since his first years at the university. The method of neo-linguistics, which Bartoli was forging in Italy as a proliferation of Gilliéron’s geographic method, was, in Gramsci’s eyes, the most appropriate to be utilized according to a sociological approach that, while developing the history of languages, would tend to explain the facts concerning linguistic innovations through objective criteria inherent in the history of people and social class. The research Gramsci probably carried out for his graduation thesis convinced him to consider the formation of a national language as an historical and cultural fact strictly linked to the formation of the dominant intellectual stratum. Still, this will be one of the themes that Gramsci will meditate on incessantly, during his solitary elaboration in the Prison Notebooks. This conception of language [lingua] as cultural and social historicity is, however, already operating while he was a political militant of the Italian Socialist Party. He will indeed use it to fight and correct those ideological utopic-humanitarian and cosmopolitan tendencies which were still operating in the socialist movement. In the polemic against supporters of Esperanto, Gramsci unfolds in three pieces—two in the Avanti! (Contro un pregiudizio [Against one prejudice], January 24, 1918; Teoria e pratica [Theory and Practice]12) and one in “The Grido del Popolo” (La lingua unica e l'esperanto [A Single Language and Esperanto], February 16, 1918)13—he uses his scientific capabilities to assert the historicity of languages in opposition to the illusory utopia of a language created artificially without any ground or cultural participation, like Esperanto. Such an opposition results from the comparison between the history of the formation of a national language (like Italian, with a history in both productive activities and the intellectual strata) and the history of the attempts to form artificial languages, born because of the “impetus of seventeenth-century dogmatism and the eighteenth-century French Enlightenment,” and whose task was to “give rise to the language of the bourgeois cosmopolis, the unity of bourgeois thought created by the propaganda of the Encyclopaedists.”14
正如我们所见，葛兰西自大学时期起就致力于将“历史唯物主义的批判方法”应用于他的语言研究。巴尔托利在意大利发展起来的、以吉耶龙地理方法为基础的新语言学方法，在葛兰西看来，最适合于一种社会学方法，这种方法在研究语言史的同时，力图通过语言变革内在的、与人民和社会阶层历史相关的客观标准来解释语言事实。葛兰西为完成毕业论文所做的研究，很可能使他确信，民族语言的形成是一个与统治阶层知识分子形成紧密相关的历史和文化事实。然而，这将是葛兰西在狱中札记中不断思考的主题之一。这种将语言视为文化和社会历史性的观念，在他还是意大利社会主义党政治活动家时就已经在运作。 他确实会利用它来对抗和纠正社会主义运动中仍然存在的那些空想人道主义和世界主义倾向。在反驳支持世界语者方面，葛兰西在三篇文章中展开论述——两篇发表在《前进报》上（一篇《反对一种偏见》（1918 年 1 月 24 日）；一篇《理论与实践》（12）），一篇发表在《人民呼声报》上（《一种语言与世界语》（1918 年 2 月 16 日）13）——他运用其学术能力，主张语言的历史性，反对那种脱离任何土壤或文化参与，凭空创造的语言（如世界语）的虚幻乌托邦。 这种对立源于比较民族语言（如意大利语，其历史包含生产活动和知识阶层）的形成史与人造语言形成尝试的历史。后者因“十七世纪教条主义的冲动和十八世纪法国启蒙运动”而产生，其任务是“创造资产阶级世界城市的语言，由百科全书派宣传创造的资产阶级思想统一”。14

The historiographic discourse on international languages is complex because it should imply a more subtle periodization, where one would at least distinguish among the following: an hypothesis about an artificial language created for scientific communication (sixteenth-century empiricism); the research for logico-linguistic universals (sixteenth- and seventeenth-century general grammar); and, finally, the proposal of an international language of communication like Volapük or Esperanto (eighteenth-century humanitarianism). But what Gramsci is interested in is grasping the ideological aspect of the problem, namely, the bourgeois matrix of thought that constitutes the origin of the ideals of a linguistic unification artificially created. Gramsci opposes to such linguistic ideology the arguments of the science that is grounded on an empiricist conception of the historicity of languages: “An international language is, scientifically speaking, inappropriate. Languages are very complex and subtle organisms and cannot be artificially created.”15 This is what Gramsci firmly states against the ideological abstractionism of those who pretend to unite the people on the ground of a communicative instrument that does not correspond to the real cultural condition of the people themselves: “This is a cosmopolitan, not international, preoccupation, of those bourgeois who travel for business or leisure, namely, of nomads, rather than of steadily productive citizens.”16 Every process of national and international linguistic unification is based on existing politico-cultural realities, as Graziadio Isaia Ascoli argued against the Manzonians. Gramsci uses and quotes Ascoli’s theses17 in order to demonstrate the groundlessness of any artificially created solution and how the formation of a linguistic (national or international) unity is nothing other than the result of the convergent action of real intellectual and productive forces.
国际语言史学话语复杂，因为它应暗示一种更微妙的时期划分，至少应区分以下几个方面：一种关于为科学交流而创造的人工语言的假设（16 世纪经验主义）；对逻辑语言普遍性的研究（16 世纪和 17 世纪普通语法）；以及最后，提出像沃拉普克语或世界语这样的国际交流语言（18 世纪人道主义）。但葛兰西感兴趣的是把握该问题的意识形态方面，即构成人工语言统一理想起源的资产阶级思维矩阵。葛兰西反对这种语言意识形态，他提出基于经验主义语言历史观的科学论据：“就科学而言，国际语言是不合适的。语言是极其复杂精细的有机体，无法人工创造。”15 格拉姆斯基坚定地反对那些试图以不符合人民自身实际文化状况的沟通工具来团结人民的意识形态抽象主义： “这是一种大都市的，而非国际的，关注点，那些为了生意或休闲旅行的资产阶级，即游牧民，而非稳产的公民。”16 任何国家和国际语言统一的过程都建立在现有的政治文化现实之上，正如格拉齐迪奥·伊萨亚·阿斯科利反对曼佐尼主义者所论证的那样。格拉姆斯基使用并引用了阿斯科利的论点 17，以证明任何人为制造的解决方案的毫无根据性，以及语言（国家或国际）统一的形成不过是真实知识分子和生产力量汇聚作用的结果。

Gramsci, however, is capable of going beyond his adhesion to Ascoli’s position, by defining the relationship language[lingua]-nation in correct materialistic terms:
然而，葛兰西能够超越他对阿斯柯里立场的附和，通过用正确的唯物主义术语来定义语言-民族的关系

[Languages] have never determined national formations. Nations were formed because of the economic and political necessities of one class: the language [lingua] has only been one of the visible documents needed for propaganda, which bourgeois writers used to promote consensus among sentimental people and the ideologues. On the contrary, it is the national unification that has always and everywhere determined the diffusion of the traditional literary language among the learned strata belonging to a certain region.18
语言从未决定民族的形成。民族的形成源于一个阶级的经济和政治需求：语言（lingua）仅仅是资产阶级作家用来在感性人群和意识形态者中宣传共识的可见文件之一。相反，正是民族统一始终且普遍地决定了传统文学语言在特定区域的知识阶层中的传播。

The correct setting of the historical problem of national language formation, its correspondence to hegemonic class needs, and its function as an instrument of organization of consensus provides the idea of how Gramsci proceeded in utilizing the results of the science of linguistics connecting them with “the critical methods of historical materialism.” Gramsci reverses the relationship language-nation established by romantic idealism thanks to this type of critical analysis. He thinks that the relationship language-nation is based on determined historical conditions that have permitted a determined social class to become hegemonic within the arena of a national unity.
正确设定民族语言形成的历史问题，其与统治阶级需求的对应关系，以及其作为共识组织工具的功能，阐明了葛兰西如何利用语言学研究成果并将其与“历史唯物主义批判方法”相结合。通过这种批判性分析，葛兰西颠覆了浪漫主义理想主义所确立的语言-民族关系。他认为，语言-民族关系建立在特定的历史条件之上，这些条件使得特定社会阶级能够在民族统一的领域内取得统治地位。

On a more general level, Gramsci demonstrates that he knows how to correctly posit the problem about the relationship that must exist between linguistic science and the way Marxist theory is to be applied and specified. Gramsci posits the problem mentioned above the same way as Friedrich Engels does in his essay on The Franconian Dialect [Il dialetto francane] (1881-1882). In this work, Engels showed how it is possible to correctly integrate the methods elaborated and the results achieved by linguistics in his times in a global materialistic theory of history and society.19 In other words, Gramsci一and before him Engels一starts forging not so much an illusory pretense for grounding a Marxist theory of language [linguaggio], but rather an epistemologically correct proposal aimed at utilizing linguistic science within the framework of a more powerful theory, which should be capable of instituting the nexuses necessary for explaining interactive relationships between linguistic systems and the historically determined structure of social relationships.
从更一般的层面来看，葛兰西展现了他理解如何正确地提出语言学与马克思主义理论应用和具体化之间关系的问题。葛兰西提出的问题与弗里德里希·恩格斯在其关于法兰克方言（Il dialetto francane）的论文（1881-1882）中所提出的问题如出一辙。在这篇文章中，恩格斯展示了如何在全球唯物史观和社会理论中正确地整合当时语言学方法论和成果。19 换言之，葛兰西——在他之前是恩格斯——开始锻造的并非建立马克思主义语言理论的虚假借口，而是一个旨在利用语言学知识，并在更强大的理论框架内提出具有认知正确性的方案，该方案应能够建立必要的联系，解释语言系统与历史决定的社会关系结构之间的互动关系。

Gramsci’s reflection on linguistic themes becomes deeper and more articulated during his years in prison. Yet he could not realize his project of theoretically dealing with the neo-linguistic method, which he planned as one of the works für ewig. On many occasions, however, he deals with linguistics in connection with a whole series of other problems regarding the nature of Italian culture and the organization of intellectuals, the folklore and the culture of subaltern classes, the politics of education and teaching methods, etc. Today, since the critical edition of the Prison Notebooks is available to us, we can grasp better than before Gramsci’s theoretical depth and follow the unfolding of the linguistic problem throughout the reading of the writings that go from 1929 to 1935. Gramsci opens the “First Notebook (February 8, 1929)” with a list of topics to treat and expand. “The question of the language in Italy: Manzoni and G. I. Ascoli”； “Neo-grammarians and neo-linguists (‘this round table is square')"20 appear among these topics. Notebook 29 (1935) is the last one (except for the four devoted to translations) and is entitled “Notes for an introduction to the study of grammar.” It closes with the annotation, “The title of this study could be: ‘national language and grammar.’”21 It represents another among the projects Gramsci was forced not to realize.
葛兰西在狱中对语言主题的思考更加深入和细致。然而，他未能实现他计划作为“永恒之作”的、对新语言学方法进行理论探讨的项目。然而，他多次将语言学与一系列其他问题联系起来，这些问题涉及意大利文化的本质、知识分子组织、下层阶级的民间文化和文化、教育政策以及教学方法等等。如今，由于《狱中札记》的批判性版本已可供我们查阅，我们可以比以往更好地把握葛兰西的理论深度，并追踪 1929 年至 1935 年期间其著作中语言问题的演变。葛兰西在《第一笔记本》（1929 年 2 月 8 日）中以待处理和扩展的主题清单开篇。“意大利语言问题：曼佐尼和阿斯科利”；“新语法学家和新语言学家（‘这个圆桌是方的’）”等主题也出现在其中。笔记本 29（1935 年）是最后一本（除四本翻译本外），标题为“语法研究导论笔记”。它以“本研究的题目可以是：‘民族语言和语法’”的注释结束。21 这代表着另一项格拉姆斯基被迫未能实现的项目。

In the first letter he wrote, after his arrest, in the jail of Regina Coeli, Gramsci asks his landlord, Mrs. Passarge, to have some of his books sent to him, among which was the “Breviario di [neo]linguistica by Bertoni and Bartoli." The letter, however, never reached its destination since the police seized it. In a letter to Tatiana written in October 1927, Gramsci asks again to have this book sent, which he will henceforth recall, even in the Prison Notebooks, with the title Manualetto di linguistica. Still in December 1927 he says he never received this book from a librarian he ordered it from. As a matter of fact, the latter does not appear in the list of books he had in prison.22 Gramsci also says that he will have to renounce dealing with the theme: “This round table is square," even though he regrets it, because “it is not a small question, if you consider that it means: ‘What is grammar?5 and that every year, in all the countries in the world, millions upon millions of textbooks on the subject are devoured by specimens of the human race, without those unfortunates having a precise awareness of the object they are devouring."23 This theme, as we have seen, goes back to his plan of work from 1929 and will constitute the subject matter of the notes written in the last notebook (1935) positioned within his project of organic examination. In the outline of 1929, Gramsci relates his treatment of the theoretical aspects of the neo-linguistic method to his other theme concerning the definition of grammar. Gramsci was inspired by reading an essay by Benedetto Croce, “This round table is square," where the Neapolitan philosopher wants to demonstrate the theoretical and scientific groundlessness of grammars, using a sentence by Steinthal to highlight the difference between logic and grammar. Thus, the definition of grammar becomes a topic on which Gramsci constantly meditates. He becomes aware of the theoretical importance and sociological relevance concerning the use of grammar or grammars in relation to a different series of cultural and social questions: the definition of the concept of language, formation of literary-linguistic norms, relationship of language/dialects, cultural function of scholastic teaching and so forth.
在第一次被捕后，格拉姆斯基写于圣母堂监狱的信中，他请求房东夫人帕萨日将他的几本书寄给他，其中包括贝托尼和巴尔托利合著的《[新]语言学简编》。然而，这封信从未到达目的地，因为警方扣押了它。1927 年 10 月，格拉姆斯基写信给塔蒂亚娜，再次要求寄送这本书，此后他甚至在《狱中札记》中将其称为《语言学入门》。1927 年 12 月，他仍然抱怨从他订购的图书管理员那里没有收到这本书。事实上，这本书并未出现在他狱中藏书的清单上。22 格拉姆斯基还表示，他将不得不放弃研究“这个圆桌是方的”这个主题，尽管他为此感到遗憾，因为“这不是一个小问题，如果你考虑到这意味着：‘语法是什么？’并且每年全世界数百万教科书都被人类吞噬，而这些不幸的人对他们正在吞噬的对象却缺乏明确的认识。23 这个主题，正如我们所见，可以追溯到他 1929 年的工作计划，并将构成他有机考察项目中最后一本笔记本（1935 年）中笔记的主题。在 1929 年的提纲中，葛兰西将他对新语言学方法的理论方面处理与他关于语法定义的另一个主题联系起来。葛兰西受贝内代托·克罗齐一篇论文的启发，“这圆桌是方的”，那里的那不勒斯哲学家想要论证语法在理论和科学上的缺乏根据性，并用施泰因塔尔的一句话来突出逻辑和语法之间的区别。因此，语法定义成为葛兰西不断思考的话题。他意识到语法或语法的使用在与一系列不同的文化和社会问题相关的理论重要性和社会相关性：语言概念的定义、文学语言规范的形成、语言/方言的关系、学校教学的文化功能等等。

In attempting an organic reconstruction of Gramsci’s thought on linguistics, one must first notice, in order to place it exactly historically and theoretically, the anti-idealistic and in particular anti-Crocean position characterizing the numerous pages of the Prison Notebooks devoted to linguistic problems. Lo Piparo focuses on the influence that Crocean philosophy exercised on the intellectual formation of the young linguist, Gramsci, documenting and insisting in terms of linguistic theory, what was already understood on a more general level by Gramsci’s own statement, “I tended to be rather Crocean.”24 This does not rule out the hypothesis that the development of Gramsci’s linguistic thought during the prison years leads him to a consciously anti-idealistic and anti-Crocean position. On the contrary, we can maintain that in Italy in those years Gramsci’s neglected voice was the only one that was objectively anti-idealistic. Many linguists, indeed, were declaring in various ways their agreement with the reigning idealism, whereas others went on with their linguistic work, isolating themselves, using the traditional method of the neo-grammarians without intervening on theoretical questions.25
要尝试对葛兰西语言学思想进行有机重建，首先必须注意到，为了将其置于准确的历史和理论位置，在《狱中札记》中专门讨论语言问题的诸多篇章中，体现着反唯心主义，特别是反克罗齐主义的立场。洛·皮帕罗专注于克罗齐哲学对年轻语言学家葛兰西的思想形成的影响，并从语言理论的角度论证和强调，葛兰西自己曾说过“我倾向于有点克罗齐主义”，这在更一般的层面上已经为人所知。24 但这并不排除葛兰西在狱中时期语言思想发展导致他形成一种有意识的反唯心主义和反克罗齐主义立场的假设。相反，我们可以认为，在那个时期的意大利，葛兰西的被忽视的声音是唯一客观上具有反唯心主义色彩的声音。 许多语言学家，事实上，以各种方式声明他们同意盛行的唯心主义；而另一些人则继续进行他们的语言学研究，自我隔离，采用新语法学派的传统方法，而不介入理论问题。25

Instead, Gramsci intervenes, stressing and developing, in a Marxist sense, the sociological implications of Bartoli’s linguistic method, taking almost for granted his overcoming of the polemic against the positivism of the neogrammarians. The controversy Gramsci engages with Bertoni regarding the Breviario di Neolinguistica is indicative of the extent to which he unveils the fundamental misunderstanding encompassing the Italian culture of those times—namely, the bad consciousness of those intellectuals who, although scientifically formed in the positivist school, were repeating the formulas of idealistic philosophy on the level of the declarations of general principles without any critical attitude. One of these intellectuals was Giulio Bertoni, who wrote the “Principi generali” [“General Principles,” part I] of the Breviario di Linguistica, whereas Bartoli composed the “Criteri tecnici” [“Technical Criteria,” part II]. Gramsci criticizes Bartoli for having accepted to collaborate with Bertoni: “Bartoli is esteemed for his concrete works: letting Bertoni write the theoretical part [of the Breviario] induce students to make mistakes, pushing them onto the false path. In this case modesty and disinterest become guilt.” There is indeed a sharp difference between the “General Principles” and the “Technical Criteria.” In the former, Bertoni reduces linguistics to an aesthetics of words, assuming language [lingua] and its innovations as spiritually and individually created facts; in the latter, Bartoli sets out heuristic methods and criteria that postulate and study language in its objectively definable historical and geographical organization. Gramsci rightly observes that “Bertoni has failed both to provide a general theory of Bartoli’s innovations in linguistics and to understand the substance as well as the practical and theoretical importance of these innovations.”26 Eighteen years later, Giuseppe Vidossi (1948:209), a friend and collaborator of Bartoli, will confirm Gramsci’s statement about Bertoni and Gramsci’s criticisms of the misunderstanding characterizing idealistic and Crocean linguistics. Yet Gramsci continues noting that Bertoni misunderstood not only the innovations brought forth by Bartoli, but also the aesthetics of Croce in the sense that he has been unable to derive from Crocean aesthetics a coherent research method: “He [Bertoni] did nothing but paraphrase, exalt, and wax eloquent about certain impressions: he is essentially a positivist who swoons at the sight of idealism because it is more fashionable and provides the occasion for flights of rhetoric.”27
相反，葛兰西介入其中，从马克思主义的角度强调和发展了巴尔托利语言学方法的社会学意义，几乎默认了巴尔托利已经克服了对新语法学实证主义的批判。葛兰西与贝托尼就《新语言学概要》的争论，表明了他揭示了当时意大利文化所固有的根本性误解——即那些在实证主义学派接受过科学训练的知识分子，在一般原则的声明层面重复唯心主义哲学的公式，却缺乏批判态度的“坏意识”。这些知识分子之一是朱利奥·贝托尼，他撰写了《语言学概要》的“一般原则”[第一部分]，而巴尔托利则撰写了“技术标准”[第二部分]。葛兰西批评巴尔托利接受与贝托尼合作：“巴尔托利因其具体著作而受人尊敬：让贝托尼撰写理论部分[《概要》的]，会引导学生犯错误，将他们引向错误的道路。” 在这种情况下，谦逊和漠不关心就变成了内疚。”“总则”和“技术标准”之间确实存在着显著差异。在“总则”中，贝托尼将语言学简化为一种言语美学，将语言及其创新视为精神上和个人创造的事实；在“技术标准”中，巴尔托利则提出了启发式方法和标准，从而在客观可定义的历史和地理组织中假设和研究语言。葛兰西正确地指出，“贝托尼既未能提供巴尔托利语言学创新的总体理论，也未能理解这些创新的实质以及其实践和理论重要性。”26 十八年后，巴尔托利的友人和合作者吉乌塞佩·维多西（1948：209）将证实葛兰西关于贝托尼以及葛兰西对理想主义和克罗齐语言学所存在误解的批评。 然而，葛兰西继续指出，贝托尼不仅误解了巴尔托利带来的创新，而且也误解了克罗齐的美学，因为他未能从克罗齐的美学中推导出一个连贯的研究方法：“他（贝托尼）仅仅是对某些印象进行释义、赞扬和夸夸其谈：他本质上是一个实证主义者，一看到理想主义就为之倾倒，因为它更时髦，并提供了进行修辞飞跃的机会。27

The contradiction Gramsci grasps acutely in Bertoni’s theorizations is typical of the cultural situation of Italian linguistics in those years. The unproblematized trust in a factual legitimization of the science of linguistics disarmed Italian linguists theoretically in the face of idealistic intrusiveness. Italian linguists, since they were lacking the capability and habit of theorizing, happened to accept ideas and theories placing linguistics out of their scientific field. The negative influence Croce’s theories had does not consist so much in that they have divulged a conception of linguistic activity as aesthetical individual activity, but rather its isolation as a consequence of Croce’s dialectic of distincts because Crocean theories have produced a fracture between empirical method and scientific theory, technical research and methodological discourse, and between the study of language and that of style. This is precisely what Gramsci infers when reproaching Bartoli for collaborating with Bertoni. Bertoni did not even know how to re-elaborate Croce’s theses in a linguistic and stylistic way (as Vossler did) and made recourse to certain empirical categories, such as “language” [lingua] and "speech” [linguaggio] (absolutely not comparable with the Saussurian concepts of langue and parole) in order to justify linguistics, on the one hand, as aesthetics and, on the other hand, as cultural instrumentality.28
葛兰西敏锐地把握了贝托尼理论中的矛盾，这典型地反映了当时意大利语言学界的文化境况。对语言学科学事实合法性的不加质疑的信任，在理想主义的侵入面前，使意大利语言学家在理论上丧失了武装。由于缺乏理论化能力和习惯，意大利语言学家恰好接受了将语言学置于其科学领域之外的思想和理论。克罗齐理论的负面影响并非在于它宣扬了语言活动是审美个体活动的观念，而在于其作为克罗齐区分辩证法的结果而造成的孤立，因为克罗齐理论在经验方法与科学理论、技术研究与方法论论述、语言研究与风格研究之间制造了裂痕。葛兰西正是从这一点出发，批评巴尔托利与贝托尼的合作。 贝尔托尼甚至不知道如何用语言和风格的方式重构克罗齐的论点（就像沃斯勒那样），而是诉诸于某些经验范畴，例如“语言”和“言语”（与索绪尔学派的语言和言语概念完全不可比拟），一方面为了证明语言学是美学，另一方面证明其作为文化工具。28

Certainly, the aesthetic dimension of a linguistic act is completely extraneous with respect to the way Bartoli practices the conception of language [lingua]. Gramsci rightly affirms:
当然，语言行为的审美维度与巴尔托利对语言的理解方式完全无关。葛兰西正确地指出：

I do not perceive any direct relationship of dependence between Bartoli’s method and Croce’s theories; Bartoli’s relationship is with historicism in general, not with a particular form of historicism. Bartoli’s originality consists precisely in this: that he took linguistics, narrowly conceived as a natural science, and transformed it into a historical science rooted in “space and time” and not in the physiology of the vocal apparatus.29
我不认为巴尔托利的方法与克罗齐的理论之间存在直接的依赖关系；巴尔托利的关联在于一般意义上的历史主义，而非某种特定形式的历史主义。巴尔托利的独创性恰恰在于：他将狭义的语言学，视为一门自然科学，并将其转化为植根于“时空”而非发音器官生理学的历史科学。

Evidently, Gramsci did not know about the theoretical formulations of the neo-grammarian method contained, for example, in Herman Paul’s Prinzipien der Sprachgeschichte [Principles of the History of Language] (1880)30: he does nothing but report the rather narrow terms and expressions of Bartoli’s polemic against the Italian neo-grammarians. What concerns Gramsci the most, however, is to place Bartoli’s neo-linguistic method in the realm of historicism. Historicism itself is not here to understand in the speculative sense idealistic philosophies assigned to it. Such philosophies would consider historical (linguistic) facts as events that are individual, unrepeatable and revealing spiritual and universal values. On the contrary, I think that historicism must be here understood in a more general, I would say methodological, sense: designating the time-space dimension of as a criterion for understanding and explaining the historicity of linguistic events and structures. Gramsci makes explicit the precise meaning of this “historicism” when he affirms:
显然，葛兰西并不知道，例如，赫尔曼·保罗的《语言史原理》(1880)30 中包含的青年语法学派理论阐述：他只是报道了巴尔托利针对意大利青年语法学派的论战中较为狭隘的术语和表达。然而，葛兰西最关心的，是将巴尔托利的语言学方法置于历史主义的范畴。这里所说的历史主义，并非指理想主义哲学赋予它的思辨意义。那些哲学会将历史（语言学）事实视为个体、不可重复且揭示精神和普遍价值的事件。相反，我认为，这里所说的历史主义，应该理解为一种更为普遍的，我愿意说，是方法论意义上的：以时间-空间维度作为理解和解释语言事件和结构的历史性的标准。葛兰西在断言时明确了这种“历史主义”的精确含义：

The history of the languages [lingue] is history of linguistic innovations, but these innovations are not individual (as in art); they are innovations of an entire social community that has renewed its culture and “progressed” historically. To be sure, they, too become individual, not as the individual-artist but in the complete, determinate individual qua [cultural]-historical element.
语言的历史是语言革新的历史，但这些革新并非个体（如艺术）的；它们是整个社会共同体在更新文化和在历史上“进步”过程中产生的革新。当然，它们也成为个体，并非作为个体艺术家，而是作为完整的、确定的个体，即作为文化-历史要素。

Gramsci goes on clarifying that linguistic innovations occur:
葛兰西继续阐明语言创新发生：

by interference of different cultures, etc., and this takes place in very different ways, it still occurs for whole masses of linguistic elements, and it takes place molecularly. (For example: Latin, as a “mass,” transformed the Celtic of the Gauls, but it influenced the Germanic language “molecularly,” that is, by lending it individual words and forms.)31
通过不同文化的干扰等，这种现象以多种方式发生，但它仍然发生在大量的语言要素中，并且以分子水平进行。（例如：拉丁语作为“整体”改变了高卢人的凯尔特语，但它影响日耳曼语则是“分子水平”的，即通过借用个别词汇和形式。）

The tradition of sociologically oriented historical linguistics, which Gramsci directly or indirectly experienced during his university years— Ascoli, Gilliéron, Bartoli and certainly Meillet, as Lo Piparo has demonstrated32—is mirrored in those pages of the Prison Notebooks mentioned above, where the concept of linguistic and cultural “interference” emerges, which remains one of the privileged themes of modern sociolinguistics. Yet Gramsci regards the phenomenon of molecular interference and influence, not only with respect to relationships between languages, but also within the same linguistic community: “There can be interference and a ‘molecular’ influence within a the same nation, between diverse strata etc.; a new class that becomes the ruling class brings about changes ‘on mass’ but the jargon of various professions, that is, of particular societies, changes in a molecular way.” Gramsci defines the same relationship between speech and dialect under a sociocultural and not merely linguistic respect: “even dialect is language[lingua]-art. Between dialect and national-literary language, however, something—precisely the cultural and politico-moral-sentimental environment—has changed.”33 This would amount to saying more explicitly that it is not possible to define the distinction between the concept of “language” [lingua] and that of “dialect” in linguistic terms. These concepts must refer to the different cultural, social, political and economic conditions that constitute the cause of the hegemony of one dialect or language over other languages and dialects related to the hegemony of one social class and intellectual stratum over an entire community. The dynamics of social relations are implied in the complex network of relationships established when the linguistic system is modified and when the linguistic norm (literary, national language) imposes itself as an element that unifies and organizes the diversity of the uses characterizing social stratifications or diversities.
社会学取向的历史语言学传统，葛兰西在其大学时代直接或间接地经历过——阿斯科利、吉耶龙、巴尔托利，当然还有梅耶，正如洛·皮帕罗所论证的那样——在上述狱中札记的篇章中得到了体现，其中语言和文化“干扰”的概念出现，这仍然是现代社会语言学中的一个优先主题。然而，葛兰西将分子干扰和影响的现象，不仅视为语言之间关系，还在同一语言社群内部考察：“在一个民族内部，不同阶层之间可能存在干扰和‘分子’影响；一个新兴的统治阶级带来‘大规模’变化，但各种职业的术语，也就是说，特定社会中的术语，则以分子方式发生变化。”葛兰西在社会文化而非仅仅语言的角度定义了语言与方言之间的关系：“方言也是语言艺术。” 然而，方言与民族共同语之间，却有所不同——准确地说，是文化、政治、道德和情感环境发生了变化。”33 这意味着，用语言学术语来界定“语言”[lingua]和“方言”的概念是不可能的。这些概念必须指涉不同的文化、社会、政治和经济条件，这些条件构成了某种方言或语言的霸权，以及某种社会阶层和知识阶层对整个社会群体的霸权。社会关系的动态蕴含于语言系统发生改变时所建立的复杂关系网络之中，以及当语言规范（文学的、民族的语言）作为统一和组织体现社会分层或多样性特征的各种用途的因素时。

Yet, as Lo Piparo rightly says, “the great novelty to stress is that, with respect to Ascoli, Gilliéron, Meillet and Bartoli, Gramsci introduces the concept of hegemony,”34 which synthesizes the understanding of historico-geographical linguistics with militant Marxism: “Language [linguaggio] is transformed with the transformation of the whole of civilisation, through the acquisition of culture by new classes and through the hegemony exercised by one national language [lingua] over others, etc.”35 As Lo Piparo has widely demonstrated, the antecedent of the concept of hegemony is the one of linguistic and cultural prestigio [prestige] that can be found in Meillet and Bartoli’s pages36 (“one can say that the causes of linguistic innovations are, in ultimate analysis, resolved by imitating other languages having greater prestige. When we say: imitating other languages, we mean all languages, without distinguishing ‘languages’ and ‘dialects’ . . . and provided that they have greater prestige”).37 Bartoli further clarifies the concept of prestige in terms of relationship between the linguistic varieties of the dominant and dominated class. Yet the term “hegemony,” which appears the first time in an article devoted to Lenin in Ordine Nuovo (March 1, 1924), offers to Gramsci the possibility to use a wider and more comprehensive concept used by Soviet militant Marxism and that can therefore be referred not only to the linguistic field. Indeed, as Perry Anderson states, “Gramsci’s own treatment of the idea of hegemony descends directly from the definitions of the Third International” and from Lenin as Buci-Glucksmann and Gruppi have demonstrated, and as Gramsci himself has acknowledged.38 At some point, Gramsci inserts the concept of “prestige” into the “theoretico-practical principle of hegemony,”39 partly modifying its content, thus making the sphere of its applicability larger. Gramsci’s trajectory—from the use of prestigio to that of “hegemony”一 shows (also on a terminological level) that he continues to realize his scientific plan (“to apply even to this research the critical methods of Historical Materialism”)by inserting the concepts and methods of historico-geographical linguistics in the theoretical sphere of a wider Marxist theory of history.
然而，正如洛·皮帕罗正确指出的那样，“需要强调的重大新颖之处在于，相较于阿斯科利、吉耶龙、梅耶和巴尔托利，葛兰西引入了霸权的概念”，34 这将历史地理语言学与战斗的马克思主义相融合：“语言随着整个文明的变革而发生转变，通过新阶级获取文化以及一种民族语言对其他语言的霸权行使等等。”35 正如洛·皮帕罗广泛论证的那样，霸权概念的前提是梅耶和巴尔托利著作中存在的语言和文化声望[prestige]的概念 36（“可以说，语言革新的原因最终归结于模仿声望更高的其他语言。当我们说：模仿其他语言时，我们指的是所有语言，而不区分‘语言’和‘方言’……只要它们具有更高的声望”）。37 巴尔托利进一步阐明了声望的概念，即在统治阶级和被统治阶级的语言变体之间的关系。 然而，“霸权”一词，首次出现在《新秩序》杂志（1924 年 3 月 1 日）一篇关于列宁的文章中，为葛兰西提供了运用苏联激进马克思主义中更广泛、更全面的概念的可能性，其应用范围不仅限于语言领域。正如佩里·安德森所言，“葛兰西对霸权思想的处理直接源于第三国际的定义”，以及列宁的思想，正如布西-格卢克斯曼和格鲁皮所证明的那样，葛兰西本人也承认这一点。38 在某个阶段，葛兰西将“威望”的概念融入“霸权的理论实践原则”中，39 部分地改变了其内涵，从而使其适用范围更广。葛兰西从使用“威望”到使用“霸权”的转变，表明（在术语层面亦然）他继续着他的科学计划（“将历史唯物主义的批判方法应用于这项研究”），将历史地理语言学的概念和方法融入更广泛的马克思主义历史理论领域。

The basic points of the sociological conception of language [linguaggio] that neatly emerge from Gramsci’s pages are the meaning of language [lingua] as a cultural product and his acknowledgment of the social conflicts intervening in the establishment of linguistic norms. Gramsci’s sociological conception of language presupposes the encounter between the historico-geographic linguistics of his time and the materialist theory of history. Gramsci’s conception retains its theoretical efficacy for contemporary sociolinguistics, even without the mediation of Saussure, of whom, it seems, Gramsci did not know. It must be clarified, however, what Gramsci means when he says, for example, that linguists “study languages in so far as cultural expression of a given people.”40 These statements should not make us think about Gramsci’s conception of language [lingua] as the kind of generic cultural-linguistic relativism, on the grounds of which language [lingua] would be understood as subjective expression of an undifferentiated cultural community. On the contrary, Gramsci conceives language [lingua] as really produced by the convergence of the social and historical interests of a determined human group that both collectively reaches a common way of expressing and also expresses social and cultural differentiations and conflicts.
从葛兰西的著作中清晰地浮现出的语言社会学概念的基本要点是语言作为文化产品的意义，以及他对语言规范确立过程中社会冲突的承认。葛兰西的语言社会学概念预设了他那个时代的历史地理语言学与历史唯物主义理论的相遇。即使没有经过索绪尔的调和，葛兰西的概念在当代社会语言学中仍然具有理论效力，似乎葛兰西并不了解索绪尔。然而，必须阐明葛兰西在例如说语言学家“研究语言，因为它是特定民族的文化表达”时，其含义。这些陈述不应让我们将葛兰西的语言概念理解为那种泛文化的语言相对主义，根据这种相对主义，语言会被理解为一个未分化的文化共同体的主观表达。 相反，葛兰西认为语言[lingua]是特定人类群体社会和历史利益汇合的产物，该群体既集体形成共同的表达方式，也表达社会和文化差异与冲突。

It seems that one can say “language” [linguaggio] is essentially a collective term which does not presuppose any “unique” thing neither in time nor in space. Language [linguaggio] also means (even though at the level of common sense) culture and philosophy. Therefore, the fact “language” [linguaggio] is in reality a multiplicity of facts more or less organically coherent and coordinated: it may be said that every speaking being has her own personal language [linguaggio], at the least, i.e., her own way to think and feel. Culture in its various degrees unifies a majority or minority of individuals in numerous strata, more or less in expressive contact, and that understand each other in diverse degrees etc. It is these differences and historico-cultural distinctions that are reflected into common language [linguaggio].41
似乎可以说，“语言”本质上是一个集体概念，既不预设时间上的“唯一”事物，也不预设空间上的“唯一”事物。“语言”也意味着（即便在常识层面）文化和哲学。因此，“语言”实际上是或多或少有机地联系和协调的诸多事实的集合：可以说，每个说话者至少拥有她自己独特的语言，即她自己思考和感受的方式。文化在其不同程度上将多数或少数个体统一在众多阶层中，他们或多或少地进行表达交流，并以不同程度地相互理解。正是这些差异和历史文化差异反映在共同的语言中。

And that one must explain and interpret on the grounds of analyses conducted on the entire communicative context. Thus, language [lingua] expresses the culture of a given people, even if each culture contains some differences and diversities that are determined by historico-social conditions, which are expressed in various types of socially connoted language [linguaggio]. The existing relationships between these cultural and linguistic strata are not seen in terms of static opposition, but of reciprocal dialectical influence: “although one may say that each social group has its own ‘language’ [lingua] yet it must be noticed (with a few exceptions) that there is a continuous adherence and exchange between the popular language [lingua] and that of the learned classes.”42
因此，必须根据对整个交际语境的分析来解释和阐释。 因此，语言表达了特定人群的文化，即使每种文化都包含由历史社会条件决定的差异和多样性，这些差异和多样性体现在各种社会意义的语言中。 这些文化和语言层次之间的现有关系并非以静态对立，而是以相互的辩证影响为特征：“尽管可以说每个社会群体都有其自身的‘语言’，但必须注意到（除少数例外），大众语言与知识阶层语言之间存在着持续的依附和交流。”42

Perhaps, in Gramsci, there is no full theoretical awareness of how to use the two terms: "language” [lingua] and "speech” [linguaggio] (Saussure’s definitions were not operating). However, I believe that we can still interpret Gramsci’s thought by saying that if, on the one hand, language [lingua] can express one culture in its whole entirety and concrete realizations, on the other hand, single “languages” [linguaggio] can be analyzed only in relation to concrete and differentiated communicative situations on the ground of the real sociocultural conditions.
或许在葛兰西的著作中，对如何运用“语言”（lingua）和“言语”（linguaggio）这两个术语缺乏完整的理论认识（索绪尔的概念并未被运用）。然而，我认为我们仍然可以通过以下方式解读葛兰西的思想：一方面，“语言”（lingua）可以表达一个文化及其全部的具体实现；另一方面，单一的“言语”（linguaggio）只能在具体的、不同的交流情境中，根据实际的社会文化条件进行分析。

The fact that Gramsci takes into account the sociocultural conditions of the speakers explains his position in relation to the problem concerning the relationship between national language and dialects, which, as it seems to me, expresses the same attitude he had toward the relationship between dominant and folkloric culture.43 As we have seen, the distinction between speech and dialect must be referred to the cultural conditions and not to the linguistic quality of language systems. Yet a dialectal linguistic system linked to a narrow and subaltern cultural environment will have more limited and sectarian communicative potentials than those offered by the national language that, despite its internal differentiations, expresses a hegemonic culture:
葛兰西考虑到说话者的社会文化背景，这解释了他对民族语言与方言关系问题的立场，在我看来，这反映了他对统治文化与民间文化关系的相同态度。43 正如我们所见，语言与方言的区分应参照文化条件，而非语言系统的语言学特征。然而，与狭隘和附属文化环境相关的方言语言系统，其交流潜力将比民族语言（尽管内部存在差异，但它表达了霸权文化）所提供的交流潜力更加有限和狭隘。

Someone who only speaks dialect, or understands the standard language incompletely, necessarily has an intuition of the world which is more or less limited and provincial, which is fossilised and anachronistic in relation to the other major currents of thought which dominate world history. His interests will be limited, more or less corporate or economistic, not universal. While it is not always possible to learn a number of foreign languages in order to put oneself in contact with other cultural lives, it is at the least necessary to learn the national language properly. A great culture can be translated into the language of another great culture, that is to say a great national language with historic richness and complexity, and it can translate any other great culture and can be a world-wide means of expression. But a dialect cannot do this.44
只会方言或对标准语言理解不充分的人，其世界观必然或多或少地局限于地方，在支配世界历史的其它主要思想潮流面前显得僵化和过时。他的兴趣将局限于，或多或少地局限于企业或经济层面，而非普世。虽然并非总是可能学习多种外语以接触其他文化，但至少有必要掌握本国语言。伟大的文化能够被翻译成另一种伟大文化的语言，也就是说，一种拥有丰富历史和复杂性的伟大民族语言，能够翻译任何其他伟大的文化，并成为全球表达的媒介。但方言却做不到这一点。

The fact that Gramsci’s sociolinguistic approach is organic makes it possible to posit the problem of the relationship between language [lingua] and dialects in the programmatic terms of politics of language: As a matter of fact, Gramsci rejects the conception of dialect as expression of uncontaminated popular genuineness that is typical of romantic and populist ideology. He thinks that popular masses—to the extent that they organize themselves to become hegemonic class—must overcome every sectarianism of dialects in order to gain a more powerful communicative instrument, capable of expressing the new culture and of exercising new hegemony. For Gramsci, this does not mean that one has to negate the realities of dialects: he has never argued that dialects must disappear; he only affirmed that it is necessary to set in motion a determined cultural and political situation in order for popular classes to overcome every cultural and linguistic sectarianism45 and to get the kind of linguistic system capable of guaranteeing the communication of universal cultural content, which characterize the new hegemonic function exercised by the proletariat.
葛兰西的社会语言学方法论的整体性，使得我们可以用语言政治学的范畴来探讨语言[lingua]与方言的关系问题：事实上，葛兰西拒绝了浪漫主义和民粹主义意识形态中将方言视为未受污染的民众本真的观点。他认为，为了成为具有支配地位的阶级，民众必须克服方言的任何宗派主义，从而获得一种更强大的沟通工具，能够表达新的文化并行使新的支配地位。对于葛兰西而言，这并不意味着否定方言的现实性：他从未论证方言必须消失；他只是主张，为了让民众阶级克服任何文化和语言的宗派主义，并获得能够保证传播普世文化内容的语言体系，从而行使无产阶级新的支配功能，就必须推动特定的文化和政治局面。

When Gramsci talks about national language, however, he is well aware of using a compromised concept that, in order for it to be freed from every romantic and idealistic ideological implication, must be redefined in sociological terms and verified in the light of historical and social determinations. Therefore, Gramsci explains the formation of national languages directly relating it to the modalities in which intellectual strata are formed, to the latter political and social function and to the traits of the hegemonic culture they represent. This particular way of positing the problem of the formation of national languages constitutes one of the most original contributions that Gramsci’s linguistic thought adding to the progress of knowledge in studies of history and sociology of language. His contribution is still productive if one connects it to the strong expansion of the modern sociology of language, which is attentively looking, for example, at linguistic policies in the developing countries. Gramsci complains about the lack of works of history of the Italian language carried out using the sociological method, such as F. Brunofs Histoire de la Langue Franqaise [History of the French Language], which constituted the ground for Balibar and Laporte’s study of the formation of the concept of the national language in France as a product of the politics of language actuated by the bourgeois class ruling after the revolution in 1789.46
然而，当葛兰西谈及民族语言时，他很清楚地意识到，为了摆脱浪漫主义和理想主义的意识形态含义，必须用社会学术语重新定义它，并根据历史和社会决定因素进行验证。因此，葛兰西将民族语言的形成直接与知识阶层的形成方式、其后者的政治和社会功能以及他们所代表的霸权文化特征联系起来。这种将民族语言形成问题提出的特殊方式，构成了葛兰西语言思想对语言史和社会语言学研究知识进步的最具原创性的贡献之一。如果将其与现代语言社会学蓬勃发展的态势联系起来，例如关注发展中国家的语言政策，那么他的贡献仍然具有现实意义。葛兰西抱怨缺乏运用社会学方法进行的意大利语史研究，例如 F. 布鲁诺夫的《法兰西语言史》，为巴利巴尔和拉波特研究法国民族语言概念的形成奠定了基础，该概念是 1789 年革命后统治的资产阶级推行的语言政策的产物。46

Paragraph 76 of Prison Notebook 3 is entitled “The question of the language and the Italian intellectual classes.”47 In a few pages, Gramsci outlines the history of the Italian language as the history of those intellectual strata that have practiced this language for centuries. He shows how the basic character of the literary, written language, not the spoken or popular language, depends on the cosmopolitan function exercised by the intellectual caste since the times when it was the language through which the Catholic and universalistic culture of the dominant class used to express itself.
《狱中札记》第三册第七十六段题为“语言问题与意大利知识分子阶层”。47 在几页篇幅中，葛兰西勾勒了意大利语的历史，将其视为那些数百年来使用这种语言的知识分子阶层的历史。他表明，书面文学语言的基本特征，而非口语或大众语言，取决于知识分子阶层自古以来所行使的宇宙性功能，即作为统治阶级天主教和普世文化表达媒介的语言。

The growth of the communes propelled the development of the vernaculars, and the intellectual hegemony of Florence consolidated it; that is, it created an illustrious vernacular. But what is this illustrious vernacular? It is the Florentine [dialect] developed by the intellectuals of the old tradition: the vocabulary as well as the phonetics are Florentine, but the syntax is Latin. The victory of the vernacular over the Latin was not easy, however: with the exception of poets and artists in general, learned Italians wrote for Christian Europe not for Italy; they were a compact group of cosmopolitan and not national intellectuals. The fall of the communes and the advent of the principality, the creation of a governing caste detached from the people, crystallized this vernacular in the same way literary Latin had been crystallized. Italian became, once again, a written and not a spoken language, belonging to the learned, not to the nation.48
公社的兴起推动了方言的发展，佛罗伦萨的知识精英统治巩固了这种发展；也就是说，它创造了一种辉煌的方言。但这辉煌的方言是什么？它是旧传统知识分子发展起来的佛罗伦萨[方言]：词汇和语音都是佛罗伦萨的，但语法是拉丁语的。然而，方言战胜拉丁语并非易事：除了诗人和艺术家，意大利的学者一般为基督教欧洲而非意大利写作；他们是一个紧密的、具有世界主义而非民族主义的知识分子群体。公社的衰落和君主制的出现，以及一个脱离民众的统治阶层的形成，以与文学拉丁语结晶相同的方式使这种方言凝固。意大利语再次成为书面语言而非口语，属于学者而非民族。48

Perhaps, a specialist of the history of the Italian language will be able to find some schematic simplifications, some lacunae in Gramsci, but such a specialist certainly cannot do so without grasping the originality of the sociological method applied by Gramsci, who, for the first time, established an explicative relationship between the history of language and the history of the organization of the Italian culture:
或许，意大利语史专家能够发现葛兰西著作中的一些概括性简化或一些缺漏，但没有理解葛兰西所应用的社会学方法的独特性，就肯定无法做到这一点。葛兰西首次在意大利语言史与意大利文化组织史之间建立了说明性的关联

After a brief interval (the freedom of the communes) during which intellectuals of popular (bourgeois) class origins flourished, the intellectual function was reabsorbed into the traditional caste where the individual members came from the people but where the character of the caste prevailed over their origins. In other words, it is not the case that an entire stratum of the population creates its own intellectuals when it attains power (which is what happened in the fourteenth century); rather, a traditionally selected body assimilates single individuals into its cadres (the typical example of this is the ecclesiastical structure).49
在短暂的公社时期（知识分子自由发展时期），出身于平民（资产阶级）阶层的知识分子得以蓬勃发展。然而，知识分子功能随后被重新吸收回传统的等级制度，个体成员虽然来自平民，但等级的特性却凌驾于其出身之上。换言之，并非整个阶层获得权力后便会产生自己的知识分子（十四世纪的情况并非如此）；相反，一个传统选拔的群体将个体吸纳进其队伍（教会结构就是一个典型例子）。

This explains the absence of a popular literature, the permanent fragmentation into dialects, the perpetuation of the question of language conceived as an “aspect of the political fight” or as
这解释了流行文学的缺失，永久性的方言分裂，以及将语言视为“政治斗争的方面”或

a reaction of the intellectuals to the fragmentation of the political unity that existed in Italy under the name: “equilibrium of the Italian States” and to the fragmentation of the economic and political classes that came to gain shape after the year one thousand with the communes and it represents the attempt, which one can say in great part succeeded, to preserve and even empower a unified intellectual stratum, whose existence had to have not little significance in the eighteenth and nineteenth century (in the Risorgimento).50
知识分子对意大利“意大利诸邦平衡”时期政治统一的瓦解，以及公元一千年后由城邦兴起而导致的经济和政治阶层分裂的反应；它代表着试图保持甚至加强一个统一的知识阶层，该阶层的生存对 18 世纪和 19 世纪（在意大利统一运动时期）至关重要，并且在很大程度上取得了成功。

The linguistic history of a society is the history of its own culture viewed with respect to the formation and organization of the dominant classes, of the intellectual strata and of the relationships the latter have with the popular classes, but it is also a key for the interpretation of the conditions in which popular classes participate in the life of an entire society. Gramsci became aware of the centrality of the linguistic thematic by dealing with a series of historical problems: this is also quantitatively measurable taking into account Gramsci’s insistence in repeating the references to the linguistic thematic in an endless number of prison notes, which here I cannot examine thoroughly and in detail. But the Noterelle sulla cultura cinese [Little Notes on Chinese Culture] deserve to be mentioned to show the enormity of Gramsci’s sociolinguistic interests. In these “little notes,” Gramsci takes into account, first of all, the ideographic writing system as a way of organizing (and transmitting) the culture characteristic to an intellectual caste of the “cosmopolitan” kind, completely detached from the popular base, which does not have instruments other than the oral ones (“oratory, conversation”)to transmit its own culture:
一个社会的语言史，是其自身文化的历史，视角在于统治阶层、知识阶层及其与民众阶层的关系的形成和组织，但也为理解民众阶层参与整个社会生活之条件提供了关键。葛兰西意识到语言主题的核心地位，是因为他处理了一系列历史问题：考虑到葛兰西在无数的狱中笔记中反复提及语言主题，这一点也是可以量化的，但我这里无法详尽考察。但《关于中国文化的札记》值得提及，以彰显葛兰西的社会语言学兴趣之宏大。在这些“小札记”中，葛兰西首先考虑了表意文字系统，作为组织（和传播）知识分子阶层（“世界主义”类型）特有的文化的方式，这种文化完全脱离了民众基础，除了口头方式（“演讲、谈话”）之外，没有其他传播自身文化的工具

In certain respects, the Chinese situation can be compared to that of western and central Europe during the Middle Ages; in other words, it can be compared to “Catholic cosmopolitanism,” when “Middle Latin” was the language of the ruling classes and their intellectuals.51
在某些方面，中国的情况可以与中世纪的西欧和中欧相比较；换言之，它可以与“天主教世界主义”相比较，当时“中世纪拉丁语”是统治阶级及其知识分子的语言。

Gramsci broadens the dimension of his sociolinguistic approach applied to the study of the linguistic policies pursued by the dominant classes. In other words, this approach also includes the problematic related to semiological writing systems analyzed as facts emerging from determined types of organization and the diffusion of culture. The same function that was performed in medieval Europe by a linguistic system was in China performed by the system of writing. In other words, this function consisted in transmitting the culture of a certain dominant class not rooted in the popular and national cultural and linguistic reality. Starting from the polemics against Esperanto in 1918 and going on with the reflections on the linguistic history of Italian culture and the notes on Chinese culture, Gramsci’s thought developed until informally elaborating a methodological scheme of sociolinguistic research. This scheme, based on the analysis of the relationships between communication (oral and written) and cultural organizational modalities, engages a wide-ranging thematic related both to the description of present conditions and to historical precedents.
葛兰西将他的社会语言学方法的维度扩展，应用于研究统治阶级推行的语言政策。换言之，这种方法也包括了被分析为源于特定组织类型和文化传播事实的符号学书写系统的问题。中世纪欧洲语言系统所发挥的功能，在中国由书写系统来执行。换言之，这一功能在于传播特定统治阶级的文化，而这种文化并非植根于民众和民族的文化及语言现实。从 1918 年反对世界语的论战开始，到对意大利文化语言史的反思以及对中国文化的笔记，葛兰西的思想发展到非正式地构建了一个社会语言学研究的方法框架。该框架基于对沟通（口头和书面）与文化组织方式之间关系的分析，涵盖了广泛的主题，既涉及当下状况的描述，也涉及历史先例。

Now, (chronologically) the last topic I have to deal with is the Notes devoted to “grammar” in the last notebook—namely, the twenty-ninth. These notes, as I said, should have constituted the ground for a wider and more organic examination. The point of departure (and the objective) of these notes is still the polemic against Croce and idealism, that is, the analysis of Croce’s essay “This roundtable is square,” where Croce wanted to demonstrate the theoretical groundlessness of grammar. But what is not “grammatically exact” can be justified “as an element of a vaster and inclusive representation." As a matter of fact, “the proposition [this roundtable is square] can be non-logical, contradictory, in itself, but at the same time, ‘coherent5 in a vaster picture" (i.e., that in which, as we would say today, are included other significant elements, like contexts, situations and the pragmatic scopes of communication). Since idealistic philosophy does not acknowledge grammar as having scientific status, because it does not allow it in the sphere of spiritual cognitive activities, it is not able to adequately answer the question: “What is grammar?” Gramsci provisionally answers that “grammar is ‘history’ or ‘historical document:5 it is the ‘picture’ of a determined phase of a certain national (collective) language [linguaggio] [historically formed and continuously developing itself] or the basic traits in a picture." This is the way Gramsci defines the kind of synchronic-descriptive grammar that documents a determined historical phase of a certain language [lingua] (it must be noticed that, according to Gerratana’s critical edition of the Prison Notebooks, Gramsci himself adds the reference to diachronic historicity in the quotation above only later on). This way of defining grammar does not exhaust all of its modalities. Gramsci as a sociologist of language [linguaggio] feels the need to reformulate the question in more adequate terms: “How many forms of grammar can exist?" First of all, there exists an “immanent" grammar, that is, those rules almost unconsciously practiced by the speakers. Moreover, “one can say that each of us has his/her own grammar." Furthermore, as a matter of fact, there exists a nonwritten normative grammar constituted by all those interventions and judgments (“by reciprocal monitoring, teaching and censorship that surfaces in questions like: ‘What did you mean or want to say?’ ‘What do you mean?’ ‘Make yourself clearer5 etc., through caricature, mockery, etc.") enacted by the speakers, who, going through a series of actions and reactions, tend to create a certain “grammatical conformism" reproducing a linguistic norm of prestige (“subaltern classes try to speak as the dominant ones and the intellectuals"). If, on the one hand, normative nonwritten grammar bears the characteristic of being spontaneous, on the other hand, written normative grammar represents a planned intervention over an entire national territory and over all the “linguistic volume in order to create a national unified linguistic conformism." Written normative grammar, however, cannot do without historical grammar or without the history of language, of which it is intended to propose an “exemplary phase" as the only one worthy of representing the common language of a certain nation.
现在，（按时间顺序）我最后要处理的主题是最后一本日记中关于“语法”的笔记——即第二十九本日记。正如我所说，这些笔记本应构成更广泛和更具组织性的考察的基础。这些笔记的出发点（和目标）仍然是针对克罗齐和唯心主义的论战，即对克罗齐的论文“这个圆桌是方的”的分析，克罗齐试图证明语法缺乏理论基础。但是，并非“语法上精确”的东西可以被“作为更宏大且包容的表征的要素”来辩护。事实上，“命题[这个圆桌是方的]本身可以是非逻辑的、自相矛盾的，但同时在更广阔的图景中‘连贯’”（即，正如我们今天所说，其中包括其他重要的元素，例如语境、情境和交流的实用范围）。由于唯心主义哲学不承认语法具有科学地位，因为它不允许语法存在于精神认知活动领域，因此它无法充分回答“语法是什么？”这个问题。葛兰西暂时回答说，“语法是‘历史’或‘历史文献’：它是特定民族（集体）语言[linguaggio] [在历史上形成并不断发展]的特定阶段的‘图景’或基本特征的‘图景’。” 这是葛兰西定义的描述性共时语法的方式，它记录了特定语言[lingua]的特定历史阶段（必须注意到，根据杰拉塔纳（Gerratana）的《狱中札记》批判性版本，葛兰西本人在上面的引文中稍后才补充了关于历时史性的参考）。这种定义语法的方式并非穷尽其所有模式。葛兰西作为语言[linguaggio]的社会学家，感到有必要以更恰当的术语重述这个问题：“有多少种语法可以存在？”首先，存在一种“内在”语法，即说话者几乎不自觉地实践的规则。此外，“可以说我们每个人都有自己的语法”。此外，事实上，存在一种由所有干预和判断构成的非书面规范语法（“通过相互监督、教学和审查，例如：‘你是什么意思？’‘你想要表达什么？’‘说得更清楚些’等等，通过漫画、嘲讽等方式”），由说话者实施，他们通过一系列行动和反应，倾向于创造出某种“语法遵从性”，再现一种语言的权威规范（“下层阶级试图像统治阶级一样说话，知识分子也是如此”）。一方面，非书面规范语法具有自发性特征，另一方面，书面规范语法代表着对整个国家领土以及所有“语言体量”的计划性干预，旨在创造一种全国统一的语言遵从性。然而，书面规范语法不能脱离历史语法，也不能脱离语言的历史，它旨在提出一个“典范阶段”作为代表特定民族共同语言的唯一可取阶段。

Normative grammar equals historical grammar the same as politics equals history in a relationship of complementary necessity. The “exemplary phase” of normative grammar is indeed determined by a series of historical, and hence not only linguistic, factors. This phase is chosen on the basis of a politico-cultural will: “Normative written grammar is therefore always a ‘choice,’ a cultural direction.5 In other words, normative written grammar is always an act of cultural-national politics” that, even though, on the one hand, tends to organize and centralize spontaneous and inorganically diffused tendencies in society, on the other, should not reasonably find cultural and political forces opposed to it on principle. Put in another way, if the intervention meant to unify the dominant class is based on real processes of popular participation that tend to overcome particularism and tend to cultural and linguistic unification, an opposition on principle to such an intervention must be considered anachronistic and reactionary. It is necessary, however, to be aware of the factors that act both in the direction of the irradiation of linguistic innovations and in that of the creation of the “national linguistic conformism in the large national masses." Gramsci lists these factors in detail; they are: (1) schools; (2) newspapers; (3) artistic and popular writers; (4) theater and sonorous cinema; (5) radio; (6) any kind of public reunion, included the religious ones;
规范语法等同于历史语法，正如政治等同于历史，两者存在互补的必要性。规范语法的“典范阶段”的确是由一系列历史因素，而非仅仅语言因素决定的。这一阶段的选择基于政治文化意志：“规范性书面语法因此始终是一种‘选择’，一种文化方向。5 换言之，规范性书面语法始终是文化民族政治的行动”，它一方面倾向于组织和集中社会中自发且无机地扩散的倾向，另一方面，原则上不应遇到对其的文化和政治力量的反对。换句话说，如果旨在统一统治阶级的干预基于民众参与的真实过程，这些过程倾向于克服地方主义并趋向文化和语言的统一，那么原则上反对这种干预必须被视为是过时的和反动的。 然而，必须认识到那些既促使语言创新传播，又促成“大规模民族语言趋同”的因素。葛兰西详细列出了这些因素： (1) 学校；(2) 报纸；(3) 艺术家和通俗作家；(4) 剧院和有声电影；(5) 收音机；(6) 任何形式的公共集会，包括宗教集会

(7) the “conversational" relationships between the various more or less learned strata of the population; and (8) local dialects and regional speeches. All these factors一both the ones that innovate and the ones that only diffuse linguistic innovations一are effectively implied in the real process of formation and diffusion of a certain Italian linguistic type effectively spoken in a period when the formation and the enlargement of the ruling class have determined, as Gramsci says, “the necessity of establishing deeper and well-built relationships between ruling groups and the popular-national masses, that is, of reorganizing the cultural hegemony."52 But, as Gramsci concludes (reformulating his discourse in Ascoli’s terms), the complexity of the historical process of formation and diffusion of a unified linguistic type is such that an organized intervention can be considered “decisive" in order to surely reach “a determined unified language: a unified language will be obtained if this language is a necessity. An organized intervention will speed up the time of the already existing process." In other words, an organized intervention must consensually respond to the real conditions and cultural and linguistic needs of the entire mass of the speakers.
(7) 各个不同程度受过教育的社会阶层之间的“对话式”关系；以及 (8) 当地方言和区域语言。所有这些因素——无论是推动创新还是仅仅传播语言创新的因素——都在一定时期意大利语言类型的形成和传播过程中得到有效体现，在统治阶级形成和扩张的过程中，正如葛兰西所说，“建立统治集团与民众——民族群众之间更深厚和更牢固的关系，即重建文化霸权”的必要性已确定下来。52 但是，正如葛兰西总结的那样（在阿斯科利（Ascoli）的术语中重新表述），统一语言类型形成和传播的历史过程的复杂性是如此之大，以至于有组织的干预可以被视为“决定性的”，以便确保达到“一种确定的统一语言：如果这种语言是必要的，那么统一语言就会实现。有组织的干预将加快已经存在的进程。换句话说，有组织的干预必须在共识的基础上，回应所有说话者的实际情况以及文化和语言需求。

One of the ways to realize an organized intervention is the accomplishment of the “political act” consisting in the school system’s adoption of a written normative grammar. Croce’s and Gentile’s idealism tended to exclude such types of intervention, so devaluating the role of grammatical teaching in schools:
实现有组织的干预的一种方式是完成“政治行为”，即学校系统采用书面规范语法。克罗齐和詹蒂莱的理想主义倾向于排除此类干预，从而贬低语法教学在学校中的作用。

In reality, the national-popular mass is excluded from learning the educated language, since the highest level of the ruling stratum, which traditionally speaks the [national] "language,” passes it form generation to generation, through a slow process that begins with the first stutterings of the child under the guidance of its parents, and continues through conversation (with its “this is how one says it,” “it must be said like this,” etc.) for the rest of one’s life: in reality, one “always” studies grammar, etc. (through imitating admired models, etc.) In Gentile’s position there is much more politics than one could believe and a lot of unconscious reactionary thought ...there is all the reactionism of the old liberal conception.53
实际上，民族大众被排除在掌握书面语的学习之外，因为统治阶层中最高层级，传统上使用这种“语言”，通过一个缓慢的过程将其代代相传，从孩子咿呀学语开始，在父母的指导下，并通过终生的对话（“这就是怎么说”、“必须这样说”等等），不断学习：事实上，人们“总是”在学习语法等（通过模仿受人敬仰的榜样等等）。在詹蒂莱的立场中，政治因素远超想象，包含着许多无意识的反动思想……其中包含着旧式自由主义观念的所有反动成分。

Gramsci places the concepts of grammar defined above in the social reality of the scholastic situation and, beyond the polemic contingency, he focuses on one of the central knots of every program of linguistic education. “Immanent” grammar exists in “real life” and is what in a more modern way we would now call speaker competency. This kind of grammar acts in a much less conscious way when the speakers belong to the lower classes, whereas at the level of the upper classes it is more conscious for the speakers in terms of cultural selection. Excluding “normative” written grammar (we would say: grammatical theory) from scholastic teaching, means the subtraction of a rational instrument from the mass of the speakers. Yet this is an instrument needed to develop one’s own linguistic competencies and to elevate oneself to a higher level of consciousness. Those who belong to the high classes, and who have the adequate cultural instruments at their disposal to develop their own rational competencies, can, instead, reach this level of competence even independently of teaching. Yet Gramsci asks, “Even if one admits that traditional normative grammar were not sufficient, is this a good reason not to teach any ‘grammar,’ that is, not to engage oneself with the speeding up of learning how to speak in a certain linguistic realm in any way, yet letting ‘one learn the language [lingua] within the living language [linguaggio]’ (or whatever other similar expression by Gentile or the Gentilians one would like to use)?”54 In fact, whereas, on the one hand, Croce, for whom grammar is excluded from the theoretical activities of the spirit, justifies it on the level of practical activities, on the other, Gentile excludes grammar even from the practice of educative intervention. Gramsci’s polemic against Gentile is, at the same time, political and theoretical: his is a sociological position that goes against an essentially naturalistic conception of language [lingua] that, by arguing in favor of linguistic spontaneity, subtracts an instrument central to the formation of their hegemony—the linguistic one—from the popular masses. The contents of this notebook (Lo Piparo is right)55 cannot be read without taking into account the other prison notebooks, where Gramsci develops his political thought about the modalities in which organized workers can gain power in civil society and the modalities of exercising their ruling role before their complete conquest of state power.
葛兰西将上述语法概念置于学校情境下的社会现实中，并超越了论战的偶然性，聚焦于所有语言教育计划的核心环节之一。“内在”语法存在于“现实生活”之中，用更现代的术语来说，就是说话者的能力。当说话者属于下层阶级时，这种语法运作方式更为不自觉，而上层阶级说话者则更具文化选择意识，其运作方式更为自觉。从学校教学中排除“规范性”的书面语法（我们现在可以说：语法理论），意味着从说话者群体中剥夺了一项理性的工具。然而，这项工具对于发展自身语言能力，提升自身意识水平至关重要。那些属于上层阶级，拥有充分的文化工具来发展自身理性能力的人，则可以独立于教学，达到这种能力水平。 然而，葛兰西问道：“即使承认传统的规范语法不足，这是否就意味着不教任何‘语法’，即不以任何方式参与加速在特定语言领域学习语言，却让‘人们在活生生的语言中学习语言’（或任何其他类似的詹蒂莱或詹蒂莱派表达）？”54 事实上，一方面，对于克罗齐而言，语法被排除在精神的理论活动之外，却在其实践活动层面予以认可；另一方面，詹蒂莱甚至将语法排除在教育干预的实践之外。葛兰西对詹蒂莱的批判，同时具有政治和理论双重性质：他的立场是社会学的，与一种本质上将语言视为自然现象的观念相悖，这种观念主张语言的自然发生性，从而剥夺了大众形成其霸权（包括语言霸权）的关键工具。 如果不考虑格拉姆斯基的其他监狱笔记（洛·皮帕罗是对的）55，就无法理解这本日记的内容。在这些笔记中，格拉姆斯基发展了他关于组织工人如何在公民社会获得权力以及在完全掌握国家权力之前行使统治角色的方式的政治思想。

Notes 笔记

1. Franco Lo Piparo, Lingua intellettuali in Gramsci (Bari: Laterza, 1979).
1. 法兰克·洛皮帕罗，葛兰西的知识分子语言 (巴里：拉特萨出版社，1979)。

2. Lo Piparo, 15. 2. 洛皮帕罗，15.

3. Luigi Ambrosoli, “Nuovi contributi agli ‘Scritti giovanili5 di Gramsci,” Rivista Storica del Socialismo 3 (I960): 545-50 [referenced in English translation in Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Cultural Writings, ed. David Forgacs and Geoffrey Nowell-Smith, trans. William Boelhower (London: Lawrence & Wishart, 1985), 26n.4, hereafter SCW. For a list of abbreviations, see pages ix-x]. On November 17, 1930, Gramsci writes to his sister-in-law Tatiana: “ten years ago I wrote an essay on the language question according to Manzoni, and that required a certain research into the organization of Italian culture, from the time when the written language (the so-called medieval Latin, that is, Latin written from 400 AD until 1300) became completely detached from the language spoken by the people, which Roman centralization having come to an end, was fragmented into numberless dialects.” Antonio Gramsci, Letters from Prison, vol. 1, ed. Frank Rosengarten, trans. Raymond Rosenthal (New York: Columbia University Press, 1994), 360, hereafter LP1. It is hard to believe that Gramsci would find time to write such an essay in 1920, the year in which the factories of Turin were occupied. It has perhaps to be dated back to the year 1918; Leonardo Paggi, Antonio Gramsci e il moderno principe (Rome: Editori Riuniti, 1970), 76. Maybe the elaboration of the thesis for Gramsci’s university diploma constituted the nucleus of this “essay.” Alternatively, and more probably, as Lo Piparo (8) hypothesizes, this essay would be the introduction to the volume Scritti sulla lingua italiana [Writings on the Italian Language] by Manzoni that Gramsci should have had published in the Collezione dei classici italiani [Collection of Italian Classics] edited by G. Balsamo-Crivelli for the Press UTET, as indicated by a 1918 booklet by the same press (and as noted by Giancarlo Bergami, “Gustavo Balsamo-Crivelli,” Belfagor 30 [1975]: 537-38). Gramsci’s essay is, unfortunately, considered lost.
3. 路易吉·安布罗索利，“关于葛兰西‘青年著作’的新贡献”，《社会主义史评论》第 3 期（1960 年）：545-50 [引自安东尼奥·葛兰西，《文化著作选集》，戴维·福格卡斯和杰弗里·诺韦尔-史密斯编，威廉·博霍沃翻译（伦敦：劳伦斯与威舍特出版社，1985），26 页注 4，以下简称 SCW。缩写列表见第 ix-x 页]。1930 年 11 月 17 日，葛兰西致其弟媳塔蒂亚娜： “十年前，我写了一篇关于曼佐尼语言问题的论文，那需要对意大利文化的组织进行一定的研究，从书面语言（所谓的中古拉丁语，即公元 400 年至 1300 年间所使用的拉丁语）完全脱离民众口语的那一刻开始，罗马中央集权瓦解后，分裂成无数方言。” 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中书信》，第一卷，弗兰克·罗森加登编，雷蒙德·罗森塔尔翻译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，1994），360 页，以下简称 LP1。1920 年，都灵的工厂被占领，很难相信葛兰西会有时间写这样的论文。 或许可以追溯到 1918 年；莱昂纳多·帕吉，《安东尼奥·葛兰西与现代王子》(罗马：联合出版社，1970)，第 76 页。或许，葛兰西大学毕业论文的撰写构成了这篇“随笔”的核心。或者，更可能的是，正如洛·皮帕罗（8）假设的那样，这篇随笔是曼佐尼的著作《关于意大利语的著作》（Scritti sulla lingua italiana）的导言，葛兰西原本打算在巴尔萨莫-克里维利（G. Balsamo-Crivelli）编辑的“意大利经典文库”（Collezione dei classici italiani）中出版，该文库由 UTET 出版社出版，正如该出版社 1918 年出版的小册子所表明的那样（以及吉安卡洛·贝加米在《贝尔法戈尔》杂志（Belfagor）第 30 期（1975 年）第 537-38 页的文章“古斯塔沃·巴尔萨莫-克里维利”中所指出的）。不幸的是，葛兰西的这篇随笔被认为已遗失。

4. Renzo De Felice, “Un corso di glottologia di Matteo Bartoli negli appunti di Antonio Gramsci,” Rivista Storica del Socialismo 7 (1964): 169-79.
4. 伦佐·德·费利切，“马特奥·巴尔托利语言学课程的笔记——安东尼奥·葛兰西的记录”，《社会主义史评论》第 7 期（1964 年）：169-179。

5. Matteo Baroli, “Un po’ di sardo,” Archeografo Triestino 29 (1903): 129-55.
5. 马特奥·巴罗利，“一点撒丁语”，《特里斯特文集》第 29 卷（1903 年）：129-155。

6. Guido Melis, ed., Antonio Gramsci e la questione sarda (Cagliari: Della Torre, 1975), 45项6.
6.  梅利斯（Guido Melis）编，安东尼奥·葛兰西与撒丁岛问题（卡利亚里：德拉托雷出版社，1975），第 45 项

7. See Melis, 44, 47. Almost all the words that Gramsci lists are from the geographical area where the “logudorese” dialect is spoken; Max L. Wagner, Dizionario etimologico sardo (Heidelberg: Winter, 1960-1964).
7. 见梅利斯（44, 47 页）。葛兰西列出的几乎所有词语都来自“洛古多雷斯”方言使用的地理区域；马克·L·瓦格纳，《撒丁语词源字典》（海德堡：温特出版社，1960-1964）。

8. Giulio Bertoni and Matteo Bartoli, Breviario di neolinguistica (Modena: Società Tipografica Modenese, 1925), 70.
8. 吉乌利奥·贝尔托尼和马特奥·巴尔托利，《新语言学简明教程》（摩德纳：摩德纳印刷社，1925），第 70 页。

9. LP1, 89. 9. LP1，89。

10. LP1, 84. For a different translation, see Antonio Gramsci, Letters from Prison, trans. Lynne Lawner (New York: Harper and Row, 1973), 79.
另见安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中书简》，林恩·劳纳译（纽约：哈珀和罗出版公司，1973），第 79 页。

11. Lo Piparo, 57. 11. 洛皮帕罗，57.

12. In Ambrosoli, 548-50.
12.  见安布罗索利，第 548-550 页。

13. Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Cultural Writings, ed. David Forgacs and Geoffrey NowellSmith, trans. William Boelhower (Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1985), 27, hereafter SCW. [These articles and the debate of which they were interventions are available at www.andreamontagner.it/?p=43.]
13. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《文化著作选集》，戴维·福格卡斯和杰弗里·诺韦尔史密斯编，威廉·博伊霍韦尔译（麻省剑桥：哈佛大学出版社，1985），27 页，以下简称 SCW。[这些文章及其所参与的讨论可参见 www.andreamontagner.it/?p=43]

14. SCW, 27. 14. SCW，27.

15. SCW, 27. 15. SCW，27。

16. SCW, 27, translation altered slightly.
16. SCW，27，翻译略有改动。

17. “It had transpired that a scholar of the history of the language, Graziadio Isaia Ascoli, had set some thirty pages against the hundreds of pages by Manzoni in order to demonstrate: that not even a national language can be created artificially, by order of the state; that the Italian language was being formed by itself and would be formed only in so far as the shared life of the nation gave rise to numerous and stable contacts between the various parts of the nation; that the spread of a particular language is due to the productive activity of the writings, trade and commerce of the people who speak that particular language.” SCW, 28. See Lo Piparo about the influence of Ascoli on the formation and thought of Gramsci.
17. “语言史学者格拉齐亚迪奥·伊萨亚·阿斯科利曾用大约三十页的篇幅反驳曼佐尼数百页的论述，旨在证明：即使是民族语言也不能通过国家命令人为地创造；意大利语正在自行形成，并且只有当民族的共同生活促使国家各部分之间产生大量稳定联系时，才能形成；特定语言的传播源于使用该语言的人民的写作、贸易和商业活动。” SCW，28。参阅洛·皮帕罗关于阿斯科利对葛兰西思想和形成的影响。

18. Cited in Ambrosoli, 548.
引自安布罗索利，第 548 页。

19. Frederick Engels, “Note: The Franconian Dialect,” in Karl Marx and Frederick Engels: Collected Works, vol. 26 (London: Lawrence & Wishart, 1990), 81-107.
19.  弗里德里希·恩格斯，“法兰克人方言的注释”，载《马克思恩格斯全集》第 26 卷（伦敦：劳伦斯与维沙特出版社，1990），第 81-107 页。

20. Antonio Gramsci, Quaderni del Carcere, four volumes, ed. Valentino Gerratana (Turin: Einaudi, 1975), 5, hereafter QC. Q1§0. [To facilitate locating passages in various translations and anthologies, we use the standard method of providing the Notebook (Quaderno) number, in this case 1, followed by the section number, §. See the introduction, page 12, for discussion. We will indicate the English translation, if used.]
20. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》，四卷，瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳编（都灵：埃纳迪出版社，1975），第 5 卷，以下简称 QC。Q1§0。[为了方便在各种译本和文集中查找段落，我们采用标准方法，提供笔记本（Quaderno）编号，在本例中为 1，后跟节次编号，§。请参阅导言第 12 页以了解讨论内容。如果使用英文译本，我们将予以标注。]

21. Q29§9, QC, 2351. 21. Q29§9，QC，2351。

22. See Giuseppe Carbone, “I libri del carcere di Antonio Gramsci,” Movimento Operaio 4 (1952): 640-89, here 653.
22. 见吉乌塞佩·卡尔波内，“安东尼奥·葛兰西的狱中书籍”，《工人运动》第 4 期（1952 年）：640-89 页，此处为 653 页。

23. LP1, 160. 23. LP1，160。

24. Lo Piparo, 49ff. 24. 洛皮帕罗，49 页以下。

25. As the Soviet scholar E. Ja. Egerman (“Voprosy lingvistiky v teooreti eskix trudax Antonio Gramsci,” VJa 4, no. 5 [1954]: 114-15) says: “He [Gramsci] understood how harmful the neolinguists, who transform positivism into the new form of neo-idealism, are to Italian linguistics. Therefore, reelaborating the methodological questions of linguistics, Gramsci does not criticize the theories of the neo-grammarians as much as the reactionary conception of the so-called idealist neolinguists." As a matter of fact, in the prison notes, the polemic against linguistic positivism seems quite vague and essentially reduced to a repetition of stereotyped formulas (linguistics “narrowly conceived as a natural science," “the vocal apparatus physiologically conceived," etc.). In reality, the picture Gramsci had of the neo-grammatical method derived, above all, from the terms of the polemic set up by Bartoli. Gramsci was not exactly aware of the fact that there was not as great a distance between the neo-linguistic and neo-grammatical method as appeared on the level of militant polemic. In fact, both methods use the same logical paradigm to explain linguistic change and innovation一a paradigm that, in turn, uses inductive and statistical laws. Thus, I would not insist on the real anti-positivism of Gramsci’s linguistic thought nor would I accept Lo Piparo’s (80) epistemological continuity between the theories of the neo-grammarians and the positivist Marxism of the Second International. On the contrary, what must be noticed is Gramsci’s interest in a typical product of German anthropo-linguistic positivism, namely, in the book by F. N. Finck, Die Sprachstämme des Erdkreises, third ed. (Leipzig: B. G. Teubner, 1923), which, in the years 19291931, he translated completely in the translation Notebooks B and C. Valentino Gerratana provides an articulated philological description of them (QC, 2437-38) and I hope I will soon be able to fulfill my commitment to publish this translation.
25.正如苏联学者 E. Ja. Egerman（“Antonio Gramsci 的理论著作中的语言学问题”，《语言学问题》第 4 卷，第 5 期[1954 年]：114-15）所言：“他[葛兰西]理解新语言学家（他们将实证主义转化为新形式的唯心主义）对意大利语言学的危害。因此，在重新阐述语言学方法论问题时，葛兰西并非过多地批评新语法学派理论，而是批评所谓的唯心主义新语言学派的倒退观点。”事实上，在狱中札记中，对语言学实证主义的论战显得相当模糊，基本上只是重复一些陈腔滥调（将语言学“狭隘地理解为一门自然科学”，“以生理学观点看待发音器官”等等）。实际上，葛兰西对新语法方法的理解，首先源于巴尔托利所展开的论战。葛兰西并没有完全意识到，在激烈的论战层面，新语言学方法与新语法方法之间并非像表面上看起来那样存在巨大的差距。 事实上，两种方法都使用相同的逻辑范式来解释语言变化和创新——一种依次运用归纳和统计规律的范式。因此，我不会坚持葛兰西语言思想的真正反实证主义，也不会接受洛·皮帕罗（80）关于新语法学派理论与第二国际实证主义马克思主义之间存在认识论连续性的观点。相反，必须注意到葛兰西对德国人种语言实证主义典型产物——即 F. N.芬克的著作《地球上的语族》（第三版，莱比锡：B. G.特布纳，1923 年）——的兴趣，他在 1929-1931 年间，将其全部翻译成《翻译笔记》B 和 C。瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳对其进行了细致的文献学描述（QC，2437-38），我希望很快能够履行我的承诺，发表这份译文。

26. Q3§74; Antonio Gramsci, Prison Notebooks, vol. 2, trans. Joseph Buttigieg (New York: Columbia University Press, 1996), 70, hereafter PN2.
26. Q3§74；安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》第二卷，乔瑟夫·巴蒂吉耶译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，1996），第 70 页，以下简称 PN2。

27. Q3§74, PN2, 71. 27. Q3§74，PN2，71。

28. In a famous article, Croce engaged in a battle to demolish Bertoni’s conception highlighting its contradictory inconsistency from Croce’s philosophical point of view. Benedetto Croce, “La filosofia del linguaggio e le sue condizioni presenti in Italia," La Critica 39 (1941): 169-79.
28. 在一篇著名的文章中，克罗齐展开了一场论战，旨在推翻贝托尼的观点，从克罗齐的哲学角度揭示其内在的矛盾和不一致之处。贝内德托·克罗齐，“意大利的语言哲学及其当前状况”，《批评》杂志第 39 期 (1941)：169-179。

29. Q3§74, PN2, 71. For a different translation, see SCW, 174.
29. Q3§74，PN2，71。另见 SCW，174。

30. Hermann Paul, Principien der Sprachgeschichte, fifth ed. (Halle: Niemeyer, 1920). Translation based on Hermann Paul, Principles of the History of Language, second ed., trans. H. A. Strong (London: wan Sonnenschein, Lowrey, 1888).
30. 赫尔曼·保罗，《语言史原理》，第五版（哈勒：尼迈耶，1920）。译自赫尔曼·保罗，《语言史原理》，第二版，强·A·斯特朗译（伦敦：万森出版社，洛雷出版社，1888）。

31. Q6§71, Antonio Gramsci, Prison Notebooks, vol. 3, trans. Joseph Buttigieg (New York: Columbia University Press, 2007), 52, hereafter PN3.
31. Q6§71，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》，卷 3，乔瑟夫·巴蒂吉耶译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，2007），52 页，以下简称 PN3。

32. Lo Piparo, 101-2. 32. 洛皮帕罗，101-2。

33. Q6§71, PN3, 52. 33. Q6§71，PN3，52。

34. Lo Piparo, 104. 34. 洛皮帕罗，104。

35. Q11§24, Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Quintin Hoare and Geoffrey Nowell Smith (New York: International Publishers, 1971), 451, hereafter SPN.
35. Q11§24，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》选集，昆廷·霍尔和杰弗里·诺韦尔·史密斯译（纽约：国际出版公司，1971），第 451 页，以下简称《狱记》。

36. Lo Piparo, 103-51. 36. 洛皮帕罗，103-51。

37. Bertoni and Bartoli, 94.
37. 贝托尼和巴尔托利，94。

38. Perry Anderson, “The Antinomies of Gramsci," New Left Review 100 (1976/1977): 18; Christine Buci-Glucksmann, Gramsci and the State, trans. David Fernbach (London: Lawrence & Wishart, 1980), 174-85; Luciano Gruppi, Il Concetto di Egemonia in Gramsci (Rome: Editori Riuniti, 1972), and Q7§33.
38.  佩里·安德森，“葛兰西的矛盾”，《新左评论》第 100 期（1976/1977）：18；克里斯蒂娜·布西-格鲁克斯曼，葛兰西与国家，戴维·费恩巴赫译（伦敦：劳伦斯与威沙特，1980），174-85；卢恰诺·格鲁皮，葛兰西的“领导权”概念（罗马：联合出版社，1972），以及 Q7§33。

39. Q10II§12, SPN, 365. 39. Q10II§12，SPN，365。

40. Q6§71, SCW, 177. 40. Q6§71，SCW，177。

41. Q10§44, SPN, 349, translation altered, see QC, 1330.
41. Q10§44，SPN，349，翻译已修改，见 QC，1330。

42. Q6§62; for a slightly different translation, see PN3, 45.
42. Q6§62；另见 PN3，45。

43. See Albero Cirese, Intellettuali, Folklore, Istinto di Classe (Turin: Einaudi, 1976), 65-105.
43. 见阿尔贝罗·齐雷塞，《知识分子、民间传说、阶级本能》（都灵：埃纳迪出版社，1976），65-105 页。

44. Q11§12, SPN, 325. 44. Q11§12，SPN，325。

45. See Antonio Carrannante, “Antonio Gramsci e i Problemi della Lingua Italiana," Belfagor 28 (1973): 551-52.
45. 见安东尼奥·卡兰南特，“安东尼奥·葛兰西与意大利语问题”，《贝尔法戈尔》第 28 期（1973 年）：551-552 页。

46. Renée Balibar and Dominique Laporte, Le Frangais National (Paris: Hachette, 1974).
46.  巴里巴尔（Renée Balibar）和拉波特（Dominique Laporte），《民族的法国》（巴黎：哈切特出版社，1974）。

47. PN2, 72-76. 47. PN2，72-76。

48. Q3§76, PN2, 73-74. 48. Q3§76，PN2，73-74。

49. Q3§76, PN2, 73-74. 49. Q3§76，PN2，73-74。

50. Q29§7, SCW, 187-88. 50. Q29§7，SCW，第 187-188 页。

51. Q5§23, PN2, 286. 51. Q5§23，PN2，286。

52. This sociolinguistic thematic is broadly explored by De Mauro; however, Gramsci is only used marginally and only quoted twice. Tullio De Mauro, Storia Linguistica dell'Italia Unita (Bari: Laterza, 1970).
52. 德·毛罗（De Mauro）广泛探讨了这一社会语言学主题；然而，葛兰西（Gramsci）的运用仅限于次要方面，仅被引用两次。图利奥·德·毛罗，《统一意大利的语言史》（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1970）。

53. Q29§6, SCW, 187, translation altered.
53. Q29§6，SCW，187，翻译已修改。

54. Q29§6, SCW, 187. 54. Q29§6，SCW，187。

55. Lo Piparo, 256. 55. 洛皮帕罗，256。

* Translation of “Linguistica e Marxismo nel Pensiero di Antonio Gramsci,” in The History of Linguistics in Italy, ed. Paolo Ramat, Hans-J. Niederehe and Konrad Koerner (Amsterdam: John Benjamins, 1986), 237-57. Translated by Rocco Lacorte with assistance by Peter Ives.
意大利语言学史（Paolo Ramat、Hans-J. Niederehe 和 Konrad Koerner 编），《安东尼奥·葛兰西的语言学与马克思主义思想》（第 237-257 页），罗科·拉科尔特翻译，彼得·艾夫斯协助。

3
Language from Nature to History: More on Gramsci the Linguist
Tullio De Mauro*
3 自然到历史的语言：论葛兰西的语言学  图利奥·德·毛罗*

Spesso a cuori e a picche From hearts and spades ansiose bocche anxious mouths chiedono la verità. often ask for truth
常常，心急的嘴巴，从红桃和黑桃中，寻求真相。

Principi e plebe Princes and commoners come
王侯与平民

vengono qua: Madame of Tebe madame de Tebe reads the cards le carte fa.
特贝夫人来这里：特贝夫人读牌。

M. Lombardo, Madame de Tebe1
L. 伦巴多，特贝夫人

1

Today, we can understand that the relevance of the amount of space Antonio Gramsci devoted to language [linguaggio] in his historical and theoretical reflections is not only biographical or quantitative. Sozzi, Rosiello and Carannante’s pioneering studies are well behind us.2 A linguist would be surprised when confronted with such an articulate and original view of Italian linguistics and, especially, of language [linguaggio] and of written national languages [lingue] (as evident in the way I presented Gramsci’s contribution in one of my earlier works, Storia Linguistica delTItalia Unità [Linguistic history of united Italy]).3 By the early 1970s, this had already given way (not only in my experience) to more systematic attention to the strength of some of the points in Gramsci’s linguistic thought—namely, that human language [linguaggio] is constantly innovative and metaphorical, which means one should regard language from a semantic point of view in both ordinary and scientific languages. Gerratana’s edition of Gramsci’s Prison Notebooks^ was decisive in that it enabled the reconnecting of fragments, like Lo Piparo’s study at the end of the 1970S.5 The amazement or silence about Gramsci’s interest in linguistics that has long predominated Gramsci studies since Gobetti’s times has now given way to a diffused consciousness about Gramsci’s interest in linguistics. There is a renewed need to understand the role and the limits of this specific linguistic interest with respect to his thought taken as a whole and to understand its vitality within the scholarship.
今天，我们可以理解，安东尼奥·葛兰西在其历史和理论反思中对语言的关注程度，其重要性不仅在于传记或数量方面。索齐、罗西埃洛和卡拉南特先驱性的研究已经远落在我们身后。2 一位语言学家在面对如此清晰、独到的意大利语言学观点，特别是语言以及书面民族语言（正如我在我早期著作《意大利统一史的语言史》中所呈现的那样）时，可能会感到惊讶。3 到了 20 世纪 70 年代初，这种观点（不仅在我个人经验中）已经让位于对葛兰西语言思想中某些观点的更系统关注——即人类语言不断创新和隐喻性，这意味着人们应该从语义角度看待普通语言和科学语言。格拉塔纳的葛兰西《狱中札记》的版本至关重要，因为它促进了碎片的重新连接，例如 20 世纪 70 年代末洛皮帕罗的研究。5 自从戈贝蒂时代以来，长期以来格拉姆斯基研究界对格拉姆斯基对语言学的兴趣所表现出的惊叹或沉默，如今已让位于对格拉姆斯基对语言学兴趣的弥散性认识。 重新理解这种特定语言学兴趣在其思想整体中的作用和局限性，以及其在学术研究中的活力，已成为一种新的需求。

This interest is not exclusively Italian anymore. It is shared by linguistics internationally. If, at the end of the 1980s, Niels Helsloofs work was a thankful, but still an isolated appearance, Gramsci’s name now appears— finally—in the very technical International Encyclopedia of Linguistics (1993) and a large lexical entry in the Lexicon Grammaticorum: Who}s Who in the History of the World Linguistics is devoted to him.6 Moreover, British, North American and French scholars who study the theme of “language and power” and that current, which proudly titles itself “critical linguistics,”7 explicitly tie themselves to Gramsci. We can now approach this side of Gramsci’s heritage with a less troubled and stirred mind.8
这种兴趣不再仅仅是意大利的专属。它已成为国际语言学界的共同关注。如果在 20 世纪 80 年代末，尼尔斯·海尔斯洛夫的工作只是一个令人感激但仍孤立的现象，那么葛兰西的名字如今——最终——出现在了《国际语言学百科全书》(1993)中，并在《世界语言学史词典：世界语言学史名人录》中占据了大量的词条。6 此外，研究“语言与权力”主题以及自豪地将自己命名为“批判语言学”的英国、北美和法国学者，明确将自己与葛兰西联系起来。7 现在我们可以以一种更平静、更清晰的头脑来探讨葛兰西遗产的这一方面。8

2

It is important to remember and stress that Gramsci came to language [linguaggio]—namely, to linguistic critical reflection—through many paths and was stimulated by heterogeneous experiences. It is not possible to substitute a Gramsci seen as entirely devoted to books of linguistics for the Gramsci seen as a mere Marxist ideologue that dominated the old vernacular gramsciology, or for the Gramsci seen as a pure politician that one can find in recent works. Gramsci’s world was rather much wider and various, and his way of approaching linguistic facts was a vital one, as I tried to show in my preface to Lo Piparo’s book twenty years ago (to tell the truth, without much of an impact). Here, I will enumerate some of Gramsci’s crucial experiences, namely, the real linguistic experimentation that he was very conscious of:
务必记住并强调，葛兰西对语言——即语言批判性反思——的理解，是通过多种途径获得的，并受到各种不同经验的刺激。不能用一个将葛兰西完全视为语言学书籍爱好者的形象来取代旧的葛兰西研究中将葛兰西视为纯粹马克思主义意识形态家，或近期的研究中将葛兰西视为纯粹政治家的形象。葛兰西的世界更为广阔多样，他处理语言事实的方式至关重要，正如我在二十年前为洛·皮帕罗的书所写的序言中所尝试展示的那样（说实话，并没有产生多大影响）。在这里，我将列举葛兰西的一些关键经验，即他非常意识到的真正的语言实验：

1) First of all, his personal experience as a youth, where his dense Sardinian dialects met, or rather clashed with, Turin’s linguistic reality. Turin was still in fact divided by a dense set of dialects, although they were very different from those of Sardinia, and an imminent use of regional Italian (a dialect mechanically Italianized, Gramsci would say later, echoing a bias diffused in De Amicis and Terracini’s Turin) and of learned spoken Italian, the first signs of which were manifested in Turin and Naples in the 1910s (whereas in Rome, it had been spoken for centuries).
首先，他青年时期个人的经历，其中他浓厚的撒丁岛方言与都灵的语言现实相遇，或者更确切地说，是冲突。事实上，都灵仍然被一套密集的方言所分割，尽管它们与撒丁岛的方言大相径庭，并且即将使用区域意大利语（葛兰西后来会说，这是一种被机械地意大利化的方言，回响着德·阿米契斯和特拉奇尼都灵著作中传播的偏见）以及书面意大利语，其最初迹象在 20 世纪 10 年代的都灵和那不勒斯显现（而在罗马，这种语言已经使用几个世纪）。

2) Gramsci’s long and intense experience as a theatre critic, his reflections on dialects and language and on verbalism, mask and gesture, as well as on cinema.
2) 格拉姆斯基作为一名戏剧评论家，长期且深入的经验，他对方言、语言以及口语化、面具和姿态，以及电影的思考。

3) Gramsci’s experience writing for newspapers seeking to fuse more learned local and national and, later, international political groups, with the urban proletariat. Gramsci was conscious of this experience and he reflected on it, as evident in his notes on journalism. This was an intense and original experience, as attested to by Paolo Spriano.9
3) 格拉姆斯基为寻求融合更具学识的当地和国家，以及后来的国际政治团体，与城市无产阶级，而撰写报纸文章的经历。格拉姆斯基意识到这一经历，并在其新闻工作笔记中对此进行了反思。正如保罗·斯里亚诺所证实的那样，这是一次强烈而独创的体验。

4) Gramsci’s glottological studies at the school of Matteo Bartoli, who was an original figure within early twentieth-century linguistics. Bartoli made Gramsci study the processes of innovation and consolidation of linguistic innovations, the linguistic repercussions of innovative centers’ socioeconomic, cultural and political prestige, and traditional German, French and, in Italy, Ascoli’s historical linguistics.
4) 格拉姆斯基在马特奥·巴尔托利（Matteo Bartoli）的学派中进行的语言学研究，巴尔托利是 20 世纪早期语言学领域的一位开创性人物。巴尔托利让格拉姆斯基研究语言革新的发展和巩固过程，创新中心在社会经济、文化和政治上的声望对语言变革的影响，以及德国、法国和意大利的阿斯科利（Ascoli）历史语言学传统。

5) Gramsci’s relationship to Turin’s logicians and pragmatists, who were the first to discuss semantics in Italy and to pay crucial attention to the relationships between the semantics of ordinary, daily languages and the construction of the symbolic and scientific ones. It is thanks to the latter, more than to his teacher Bartoli, that Gramsci comes to know the Essai de Semantique [Essay on Semantics] by Michel Bréal.
5) 格拉姆斯基与都灵的逻辑学家和实用主义者之间的关系至关重要，他们首先在意大利讨论语义学，并密切关注普通日常语言的语义与象征性语言和科学语言构建之间的关系。 正是由于后者，而非他的老师巴尔托利，格拉姆斯基才得以接触米歇尔·布雷尔的《语义学尝试》。

If we look at all these experiences together, and, furthermore, if we think of Gramsci in Vienna or in Moscow, we can see that they are all experiences of "translation”： translation from dialect into a multilingual urban world and一especially一vice versa; translation from the language [linguaggio] of politicians and ideological intellectuals into clear journalistic writing; translation of learned experiences and exigencies of workers (who were comrades) into general political guidelines; and later, translation of intellectual Italian culture一from Machiavelli to Ascoli to Croce—into the European language of the philosophy of praxis and retranslation of the latter into terms that are Italian not only phono-morphologically but also culturally and semantically; translation of Gramsci himself from the world of humanistic, idealistically orientated culture fraught with spiritualism and anti-scientism into the world of (even idealistic international) culture, of techniques, of natural sciences—a world that he understood and that, again, he retranslated, freeing it from any scientistic residue, from any Lorian idolatry of technical instruments. Before acting as a theoretician, “Antonio the Hunchback”10 himself lived through these linguistic conflicts and the experience of overcoming them. In this respect, his was really and literally the non-erudite philosophy of a varied and direct praxis. His readings of linguistics—Ascoli, Bréal, Bartoli and, do not forget, Croce—catalyzed this non-erudite philosophy, but his raw materials were constituted by his life and his activities as an intellectual.
如果我们把所有这些经历放在一起考虑，并且进一步想象一下葛兰西在维也纳或莫斯科的经历，我们可以看到，它们都是“翻译”的经历：从方言到多语言的城市世界，以及——尤其是——反之亦然；从政治家和意识形态知识分子的语言[linguaggio] 到清晰的新闻写作；将工人的学习经验和需求（他们曾经是同志）翻译成通用的政治指导方针；后来，将意大利知识分子文化——从马基雅维利到阿斯科利再到克罗齐——翻译成欧洲实践哲学的语言，并将后者翻译成不仅在语音形态上，还在文化和语义上都是意大利语的术语；将葛兰西本人从充满神秘主义和反科学主义的人文主义、理想主义导向的文化世界翻译到（甚至理想主义的国际）文化、技术、自然科学的世界——一个他理解的世界，并且再次进行翻译，将其从任何科学主义的残余、任何对技术工具的洛里安崇拜中解放出来。 在成为理论家之前，“驼背安东尼奥”10 本人亲身经历了这些语言冲突以及克服它们的历程。在这方面，他的确切切地是一种实践经验丰富且直接的非学术哲学。他对语言学的阅读——阿斯科利、布雷尔、巴尔托利，以及，别忘了，克罗齐——催化了这种非学术哲学，但他所用的原材料，则是他的人生以及作为知识分子的活动。

3

The first coalescence of those experiences took place during the final years of World War I, while Gramsci was about to write his graduation thesis with Bartoli on Ascoli, Manzoni and the linguistic situation of a recently united Italy. In the meantime, he was combining an aspect of his commitment to socialist and workers5 organizations and his approach to the great texts of classical German philosophy and of Marx. When in 1920 the publisher UTET entrusted him with an edition of Manzoni’s linguistic writings, he had not abandoned his thesis proposal yet.
第一次融合发生在第一次世界大战的最后几年，那时葛兰西即将与巴尔托利合著关于阿斯科利、曼佐尼以及新统一的意大利语言状况的毕业论文。与此同时，他将对社会主义和工人组织的投入与对德国古典哲学和马克思伟大著作的研究结合起来。当 1920 年出版商 UTET 委托他编辑曼佐尼的语言著作时，他尚未放弃他的论文提案。

It is in those years that one of Gramsci’s articles appeared in a politically activist newspaper. Gramsci writes:
在那些年，葛兰西的一篇文章发表在了一份政治活动家报纸上。葛兰西写道：

Manzoni asked himself: now that Italy is formed, how can the Italian language be created? He answered: all Italians will have to speak Tuscan and the Italian state will have to recruit its elementary teachers in Tuscany. Tuscan will be substituted for the numerous dialects spoken in the various regions and, with Italy formed, the Italian language will be formed too. Manzoni managed to find government support and start the publication of a Novo dizionario which was supposed to contain the true Italian language. But the Novo dizionario remained half-finished and teachers were recruited among educated people in all regions of Italy. It had transpired that a scholar of the history of the language, Graziadio Isaia Ascoli, had set some thirty pages against the hundreds of pages by Manzoni in order to demonstrate: that not even a national language can be created artificially, by order of the state; that the Italian language was being formed by itself and would be formed only in so far as the shared life of the nation gave rise to numerous and stable contacts between the various parts of the nation; that the spread of a particular language is due to the productive activity of the writings, trade and commerce of the people who speak that particular language.11
曼佐尼自问：既然意大利已形成，意大利语该如何创造？他回答：所有意大利人必须说托斯卡纳语，意大利国家必须在托斯卡纳招聘小学教师。托斯卡纳语将取代各地众多方言，意大利形成后，意大利语也将形成。曼佐尼设法获得了政府支持，并开始出版一本名为《新词典》的书，该书旨在收录真正的意大利语。但《新词典》未完成，教师则在意大利各地的受过教育的人员中招聘。 语言史学者格拉齐亚迪·伊萨亚·阿斯科利曾用约三十页的篇幅反驳曼佐尼数百页的论述，旨在证明：即使是民族语言也不能通过国家命令人为地创造；意大利语的形成是自身演进的过程，只有当民族的共同生活促使全国各地产生大量稳定联系时，它才会形成；特定语言的传播源于使用该语言的人民的写作、贸易和商业活动。11

As one can see, Gramsci still regarded Italian linguistic history in historical, “idiographic” and particular terms—that is, apparently according to Ascoli’s perspective.
正如可见，葛兰西仍然以历史的、"描写性的"和具体的视角看待意大利语言史——也就是说，表面上看来，是遵循阿斯柯利的观点。

With regard to this latter remark, however, it is necessary to make a twofold consideration. At this stage of his experience, Gramsci has already established, in an historical way, the terms of a certain dialectic between society and language to which he will later return. Moreover, besides Gramsci’s evident retrieval of Ascoli’s positions, it would seem undeniable that, at this stage, he also recognized the way in which Ascoli’s positions are becoming his own and are being represented by Croce.
关于后一点，需要作双重考虑。在这个经验阶段，葛兰西已经以历史的方式确立了社会与语言之间某种辩证关系的框架，他之后还会对此重返。此外，除了葛兰西明显地汲取了阿斯科利（Ascoli）的立场外，似乎毋庸置疑的是，在这个阶段，他也认识到阿斯科利立场正转化为自身，并由克罗齐（Croce）所代表。

In 1900, Croce had already written the following in his Tesi fondamentali di un,estetica come scienza dell'espressione e linguistica generale [Fundamental Theses of Aesthetics as Science of Expression and General Linguistics]:
1900 年，克罗齐在其著作《美学作为表达科学和普通语言学的基本命题》中已写道：

Language is perpetual creation; what is expressed at one time in words is not repeated save in the reproduction of what has already been produced; ever new impressions give rise to a continually changing set of sounds and meanings, that is, to ever new expressions. To search for a model language is, then, to look for a motionless motion. . . . It is not only without good reason that the most ardent supporter of this or that solution to the problem of the unity of the language [lingua] (be it the adoption of a Latinate, fourteenth-century, or Florentine language, or whatever else) when he comes to speak, in order to communicate his views and to make them understood, feels reluctant to apply his theories; since he senses that to substitute the Latin, fourteenth-century, or Florentine words for those of a different origin which correspond to his natural impressions, would be to falsify the genuine form of the truth; so that from being a speaker, he would become a conceited listener to himself, from a serious man, a pedant; from a sincere person, a histrionic one.
语言是永恒的创造；一次用词表达的内容，除了对已产出的内容的再现外，不会重复；不断的新鲜印象会产生不断变化的声音和意义，也就是不断的新表达。因此，寻找一种模式语言，就如同寻找一种静止的运动……不仅如此，对于语言统一问题（无论是采用拉丁语、十四世纪语言还是佛罗伦萨语，或其他任何语言）的任何热心支持者，当他试图表达自己的观点并使之被理解时，都会感到不愿应用他的理论；因为他感觉到，用拉丁语、十四世纪语或佛罗伦萨语来代替与他的自然印象相对应的不同来源的词语，将是歪曲真理的真实形式；这样，他从一个说话者变成了一个自以为是的倾听者，从一个严肃的人变成了一个书呆子；从一个真诚的人变成了一个表演者。

The question of the unity of language continually crops up because, as it is posed, it is insoluble, being founded on a false conception of what language is. It is not an arsenal of beautiful finished weapons, and it is not a vocabulary, which is a collection of abstractions, that is to say, a cemetery of corpses more or less progressively updated.
语言统一的问题不断出现，因为正如其提出的方式，它无法解决，因为它建立在对语言的错误理解之上。语言并非一组精美的成品武器库，也不是一个词汇表，词汇表是抽象的集合，也就是说，是或多或少逐渐更新的尸体的墓地。

We would not want, by this somewhat brusque way of cutting short the question of a model language, or of the unity of the language, to appear less than respectful to the great throng of writers, who have for centuries discussed it in Italy.12
我们不希望通过这种略显生硬的方式草率地结束关于模式语言或语言统一性的讨论，从而显得对那些几百年来一直在意大利讨论这个问题的众多作家不够尊重。

Croce, the young scholar, uses these paragraphs almost verbatim with only a few typographical corrections, in a volume entitled Estetica come scienza dell'espressione e linguistica generale [The Aesthetic as the Science of Expression and of the Linguistic in General] published by Sandron in Palermo. This volume, as is known, shocked Bartoli because it came close to plagiarizing him; he even recommended it to his students. This version of the text was not changed in the subsequent editions published by Laterza. But in the first version (1900), this passage is followed by one (quoted below) where Croce posited the premises for an historical rethinking of what the question of language had been. In this earlier version, he writes with more vivacity and uses concrete and openly politico-social references, reminiscent of Pontano.13 The subsequent versions of the Estetica are more sober and he attenuates the politico-social references. Here is the continuation of the passage quoted above from the 1900 version:
克罗齐这位年轻学者，几乎逐字逐句地使用这些段落，仅作少量排版校正，并在桑德隆出版的《美学作为表达科学和一般语言学》（Estetica come scienza dell'espressione e linguistica generale）一书中收录。众所周知，此书令巴尔托利震惊，因为它几乎构成剽窃；他甚至向他的学生推荐了此书。此文本在后来的拉特萨版中未作更改。但在第一版（1900 年），这段文字之后紧跟着一段（见下文），其中克罗齐提出了对语言问题进行历史性反思的前提。在早期版本中，他写得更加生动，并使用了具体且公开的政治社会参考，令人想起蓬塔诺。13  《美学》的后续版本更加冷静，他淡化了政治社会参考。以下是 1900 年版本中以上引文的下文：

[We would not want to appear less than respectful . . .] especially to the last great promoter of it [the unity of the language], Alessandro Manzoni. I will add that, in my opinion, the true problem troubling Manzoni was aesthetic and was not a problem of aesthetic science, of literature or of the theory of literature, of effective speaking and writing and not of linguistic science. Manzoni’s theory was rigorous, logical and quite sophisticated, but it was wrong because its practical solution looked like a scientific thesis, which it could not by definition be. Rejecting this thesis does not mean affirming that Manzoni and his followers were working on an empty terrain. Under Manzoni’s banner, the spiritual needs of Italy in the new era, the needs of unity and democracy, the reaction against the pompous formalism of old Italy, and so on and so forth, emerged on the battle field. What was at stake were new impressions demanding new expressions. This situation was serious, although Manzoni’s scientific thesis, which was put forward in order to justify these new needs, was inadmissible. Moreover, the question [of the unity of the language] that had been solved practically, remained theoretically unresolved or was badly resolved by means of the false conception that Florentine authors were the repository of the only real Italian linguistic tradition. Anyone who speaks or writes in Italy nowadays has felt the effectiveness of the movement promoted by Manzoni; even his adversaries felt it. As is the case ... not infrequent in history: beneficial movements are made by means of erroneous theories.14
我们不希望显得不够尊重……尤其对于语言统一的最后一位伟大倡导者亚历山德罗·曼佐尼。我想补充的是，在我看来，困扰曼佐尼的真正问题是美学问题，而不是美学科学、文学或文学理论、有效口语和写作以及语言科学的问题。曼佐尼的理论严谨、逻辑清晰且相当复杂，但它却是错误的，因为其实践解决方案看起来像一个科学论题，而它本质上不可能是科学论题。否定这一论题并不意味着肯定曼佐尼及其追随者是在一片空地上工作。在曼佐尼的旗帜下，新时代意大利的精神需求、统一和民主的需求、对旧意大利的浮夸形式主义的反叛等等，都出现在了战场上。关键在于新的感受需要新的表达方式。这种情况很严重，尽管曼佐尼为了证明这些新需求而提出的科学论题是不可接受的。 此外，[语言统一性]这个问题，虽然在实践中已得到解决，但在理论上却仍未得到解决，或者由于错误地认为佛罗伦萨作家是唯一真正的意大利语言传统的载体而得到了糟糕的解决。如今，在意大利说话或写作的任何人，都感受到了曼佐尼所倡导的运动的有效性；即使他的反对者也感受到了。正如历史上……并非罕见的情况：有益的运动是通过错误的理论实现的。14

The interpretation Croce draws out from Manzoni’s position is close to the reading provided by Graziadio Isaia Ascoli (whom Croce knew and even appreciated as a prose writer) in the Proemio [Preface] that he used to begin the publication of the journal Archivio Glottologico Italiano [Italian Glottological Archive]. In the less precise editing of the Estetica, the distance between Ascoli and Croce’s interpretations of Manzoni’s position seems to increase. Yet Croce’s conclusive words added in the Estetica to the passage mentioned above (from his previous Tesi) definitely sound like Ascoli’s: “The social need for an easier understanding can only be satisfied by the diffusion of culture and by the growth of communication and of intellectual exchanges between people.”15 Gramsci certainly already knew about these passages because of their clarity, grounding, source and location; he keeps them in his mind through his last notebook.
克罗齐从曼佐尼的立场得出的解释，与格拉齐亚迪·伊萨亚·阿斯科利（克罗齐认识甚至欣赏其散文）在《意大利语语源档案》杂志开刊的序言中提供的解读接近。在《美学》的编辑中，阿斯科利与克罗齐对曼佐尼立场的解读似乎有所疏离。然而，克罗齐在《美学》中补充在上述段落（来自他之前的论文）的结语，听起来却与阿斯科利如出一辙：“社会对更易于理解的需求，只能通过文化传播、交流和人与人之间智力交流的增长来满足。”15  由于这些段落的清晰性、基础、来源和位置，葛兰西无疑已经了解过这些段落；他通过他最后一本笔记本保留了这些内容。

Three decades later, the linguist Alfredo Schiaffini and Antonio Gramsci find themselves far enough from those texts to consider the question of language with the detachment of the historian, in the former case in a specialized journal, Italia dialettale [Italian Dialect], and the latter, notes written in prison.
三十年后，语言学家阿尔弗雷多·斯基亚菲尼和安东尼奥·葛兰西已经足够远离那些文本，以历史学家的视角审视语言问题，前者在专业期刊《意大利方言》上，后者则在狱中笔记中。

The intention of historicizing the old question of language is present in both Gramsci and Schiaffini. They both highlight the objective components of the discussions among the intelligentsia. Schiaffini unfolds his analysis paying attention to objective linguistic conditions (the secular persistence of dialectal heterogeneity, Tuscany’s lack of hegemonic capability after the sixteenth century, lack of spoken Italian outside Tuscany) and to the inevitable questions regarding stylistic choices imposed by those conditions on Italian writers, including Manzoni (who was also conscious of these questions). Moreover, as is known, the subsequent historical studies have deepened, specified, and confirmed the interpretive lines Schiaffini had enunciated.
格拉姆斯基和斯基亚菲尼都意在将语言的旧问题置于历史背景中。他们都强调知识分子讨论的客观成分。斯基亚菲尼展开他的分析，关注客观的语言条件（方言异质性的世俗持久性，托斯卡纳地区在十六世纪之后缺乏霸权能力，托斯卡纳以外地区缺乏意大利语口语），以及这些条件对意大利作家（包括曼佐尼，他也意识到了这些问题）施加的风格选择所必然提出的问题。此外，众所周知，随后的历史研究加深、细化并证实了斯基亚菲尼所阐述的解释思路。

In the Notebooks, Gramsci’s emphases are partly different. In the prison notes, the question of language in Italy is a central knot of the “nexus of questions” that the historian of Italian reality can provide to those reflecting on the interplay of forces regulating life in society, not so much en historien but rather en philosophe—even though as a philosopher of “praxis.” The shift of Gramsci’s focus from history and the history of Italian linguistics to general theory, from idiographic to nomographic, appears evident above all in Notebook 29, Gramsci’s last one, written in 1935 and entitled “Notes for an Introduction to the study of Grammar.”
在《狱中札记》中，葛兰西的侧重点有所不同。在狱中札记中，意大利语言问题是意大利现实史家可以为思考调节社会生活的力量互动提供给那些思考者们的“问题网络”中的核心问题，与其说是作为历史学家，不如说是作为哲学家——尽管是一位“实践”哲学家。葛兰西将焦点从意大利语言史和历史转向一般理论，从描述性转向规范性，这在 1935 年写成的《语法研究导论札记》（葛兰西的最后一本日记）中尤为明显。

As I recalled elsewhere, Giuseppe Giarrizzo has formulated a suggestive interpretive hypothesis regarding this matter. What Gramsci attempted to elaborate in his mind during the period of his stay in Vienna and in Moscow, and during the rise of the PCI [the Italian Communist Party] was a general national Italian response to the dramatic demands of the international communist movement and of the forthcoming fascisms.
正如我在其他地方提到的，朱塞佩·贾里佐对此问题提出了一个引人入胜的解释假设。葛兰西在维也纳和莫斯科期间，以及意大利共产党（PCI）兴起时期，试图在思想上构想的是对国际共产主义运动和即将到来的法西斯主义所提出的严峻要求做出的总体意大利国家回应。

This general hypothesis can be integrated with other considerations that are more specifically connected to the questions regarding the relationships between language, nationality and classes, which have been recently and rightly pointed out by Giancarlo Schirru, a young scholar from Rome. These questions are alive in international socialism in early 1920s. Lenin’s article Sulla cooperazione [On Cooperation] was published in 1923, in which he supports the necessity of developing alphabetization and culture as necessary complements of socialist politics. Lenin’s Die Nationalitätenfrage und die Sozialdemokratie [The National Problem and Social Democracy] came out in 1924 and was bitterly discussed by Kautsky and later by Stalin. These vital questions arise while the two great multilingual Austro-Hungarian and Ottoman empires are collapsing and new nationalities and languages are acquiring relevance, and while the Soviet Union starts a great alphabetization process of its population targeting the most disparate languages spoken in the country. All these languages are transformed from being almost exclusively oral to also being written languages. The alphabetization process occurs starting from the written languages and only later from the teaching of the Russian language. It must be noted that William McKey and Miguel Siguan, two of the major scholars of the processes of alphabetization in bilingual areas, have recently stressed, in Bilinguisme et education [Bilingualism and Education], what I have always held: the great experience of the Soviet linguistico-scholastic politics is an exemplary one.
这一普遍假设可以与其他更具体地联系到语言、民族和阶级关系问题的考虑相结合，这些问题最近被罗马年轻学者吉安卡洛·斯基鲁恰恰当地指明。这些问题在 20 世纪 20 年代初的国际社会主义中依然存在。列宁的《论合作》一文于 1923 年发表，其中他支持发展识字率和文化作为社会主义政治的必要补充。列宁的《民族问题与社会民主》一文于 1924 年出版，并遭到考茨基的强烈批判，后来又被斯大林批判。这些重要问题出现之际，两大多语言的奥匈帝国和奥斯曼帝国正在崩溃，新的民族和语言正在获得重要性，而苏联则开始对全国不同语言的民众进行大规模识字运动。所有这些语言都从几乎完全口头语言转变为书面语言。 字母表编排过程始于书面语言，之后才涉及俄语教学。值得注意的是，威廉·麦克基和米格尔·西格安，两位双语地区字母表编排过程的主要学者，最近在《双语与教育》一文中强调了，我一直所坚持的观点：苏联的语言学-教育政策有着典范意义的经验。

What fascism tried to kill—and effectively contributed to keeping smothered for a long time by imprisoning Gramsci—was the proliferation of a whole philosophical and anthropological theoretical view of social and cultural life and of the forms through which human beings forge techniques (yet, in Gramsci as well as in [Antonino] Pagliaro’s eyes, language is precisely the following: a technique of expressing and elaborating symbols). Thanks to these techniques history is constructed on the basis of nature. This view, if I am not wrong, is perfectly attuned with those Lev Vigotskij [Vigotsky] and Jean Piaget. Karl Bühler and the Prague Structuralists, the psychologists of Gestalt and cognition and Ludwig Wittgenstein were pursuing (or pursued) it in different environments. As with Hegel (who is quoted far more than Engels in the Prison Notebooks— as Kant is quoted more than Trotsky, Gentile more than Lenin, Croce more than Marx—yet this is not because Gramsci had to be careful as a prisoner), for Gramsci, “hand and word” sustain, materialize and project the human capacity of intervening in the order of nature, turning it to human needs as much as possible and transforming, in some way, its value. Starting from the vital natural base, human beings become historical subjects thanks to these techniques.
法西斯主义试图消灭的——并且通过囚禁葛兰西有效地长期压制——是一种关于社会和文化生活以及人类创造技术形式的完整哲学和人类学理论观点。 （然而，在葛兰西以及[安东尼诺]帕格利亚罗看来，语言恰恰是以下内容：一种表达和阐述符号的技术）。借助这些技术，历史是在自然的基础上构建的。如果我没有弄错，这种观点与列夫·维果茨基和让·皮亚杰、卡尔·布勒和布拉格结构主义者、格式塔和认知心理学家以及路德维希·维特根斯坦在不同环境中所追求（或曾追求）的观点完全一致。 正如在《狱中札记》中引文比恩格斯多得多（正如引文康德比托洛茨基多，詹蒂莱比列宁多，克罗齐比马克思多一样），对于葛兰西而言，“手和言辞”维系、物化和投射人类干预自然秩序的能力，尽可能地将自然转向人类需求，并以某种方式改变其价值。从基本的自然生命出发，人类凭借这些技术成为历史主体。

A “fundamental point,” for Gramsci, is to understand “how historical movement arises on the ground of the structure.”16 It is not so much the objectivity of the real that is central for him, as he writes:
对于葛兰西而言，“根本点”在于理解“历史运动是如何在结构的基础上产生的”。16  对他来说，与其说是现实的客观性，不如说是

but humanity forging its methods of research, continually correcting those of its material instruments which reinforce sensory organs and logical instruments of discrimination and ascertainment (which include mathematics): in other words culture, the conception of the world, the relationship between humanity and reality as mediated by technology. . . . Without humanity’s activity, which creates all, even scientific, values, what would “objectivity” be? A chaos, i.e., nothing, a void, if one can indeed say that, because in reality, if one imagines that humanity does not exist, one cannot imagine language and thought.17
但人类不断改进其研究方法，持续修正强化感官和逻辑辨别、确定工具（包括数学）的物质工具：换言之，文化、世界观、人类与现实之间的关系，由技术所中介……如果没有人类活动创造一切，甚至科学价值，那么“客观性”会是什么？一种混乱，即虚无，一个空洞，如果真能这么说，因为实际上，如果想象人类不存在，就无法想象语言和思想。17

During the historical evolution of the human species, these techniques become economic-productive activity, cultural heritage, language and political dimension.18
在人类物种的历史演变过程中，这些技术成为经济生产活动、文化遗产、语言和政治维度。

There is no pan-lingualism in Gramsci, as there is no economism. What Gramsci wants to investigate passionately and enlighten us by teaching is the nexus and the circularity of these elements: that is, the capability of transforming raw materials into new products. This means that, for Gramsci, the economic-productive element is interwoven with the element of invention and cultural elaboration, and both cannot subsist without being woven into the capability of linguistic elaboration and communication and with the construction of life in common in both the ethnic and national dimensions of life.
葛兰西的思想中不存在泛语言主义，正如不存在经济主义一样。葛兰西热切想要探究并启迪我们的，是这些要素之间的联系和循环性：即，将原材料转化为新产品的潜力。这意味着，对于葛兰西而言，经济生产要素与发明和文化阐释要素交织在一起，两者都不能存在于脱离语言阐释和交流能力的编织以及在民族和国家层面的共同生活构建之中。

Within this circle, which is vital for individuals and society, language and linguistic conformism constitute only one link; although the circle is broken without it. It can be hypothesized that Gramsci’s readings of Bréal and of the semantics of the Turin pragmatists and his reflections on the direct experiences of communication were valuable in enabling him to better understand Hegel, and thus, that the role of language cannot be eliminated from constituting, articulating and organizing the historical life of societies. This allows us to understand the value of the subject of linguists5 analytical, historical and descriptive inquiries. Croce, pushed by dramatic theoretically external factors of the fight against the obtuse savagery of fascism and Nazism, will follow Gramsci along this path, even though much later. In a new light, he valorizes institutions and “abstractions," the pursuit of life’s activities, of literature and its civil ethos, and, finally, of the place of the “language of linguists" in the life of society.
在这个对个人和社会至关重要的循环中，语言和语言遵从性只构成其中一个环节；尽管没有它，循环就会中断。可以假设，葛兰西对布雷尔和都灵实用主义者语义学的解读，以及他对沟通直接经验的思考，有助于他更好地理解黑格尔，因此，语言的作用不能从构成、表达和组织社会历史生活中被排除。这使我们能够理解语言学家分析性、历史性和描述性研究对象的价值。由于戏剧性的理论外部因素——对抗法西斯主义和纳粹主义的愚昧野蛮——的推动，克罗齐将沿着这条道路追随葛兰西，尽管时间要晚得多。他以新的视角看待制度和“抽象概念”，追求生活的活动、文学及其公民精神，以及最终“语言学家的语言”在社会生活中的位置。

5

Thus, for Gramsci, the events in Italy become a case study for the laboratory of his prison notes. Gramsci shifts from idiographic and particular to the general and “nomographic." In the last Notebook, Gramsci develops a social and political theory of grammar, which is meant to be a model (as Lo Piparo thought) or a complement (as it seems to me more correct to interpret) of a theory of society, culture and politics. In this notebook, Italy appears a little larger than the “terrestrial flower bed" Dante sees from paradise, because “the linguistic fact, like any other historical fact, cannot have strictly defined national boundaries, but . . . history is always ‘world history’ and . . . particular histories live only within the framework of world history."19
因此，对于葛兰西而言，意大利事件成为了他狱中札记的实验室案例研究。葛兰西从描述性和个别转向一般和“规范性”。在最后的札记中，葛兰西发展了一种社会和政治语法理论，它意在作为一种模型（正如洛·皮帕罗所认为的那样），或是一种补充（我认为更正确的解读是补充）社会、文化和政治理论。在这本札记中，意大利显得比但丁从天堂看到的“尘世花圃”略大，因为“语言事实，如同任何其他历史事实，都不能有严格界定的国界，但……历史永远是‘世界史’，并且……特定历史仅存在于世界历史的框架内。”

In a specific and successful way, “the archangel sent to destroy the neogrammarians” delineates the relationships between: (1) immanent grammaticality (always present when people talk and want to understand);
以一种特定且成功的方式，“被派去摧毁新语法学派的炽天使”勾勒出以下关系：（1）内在语法性（人们说话并想要理解时总是存在的）；

(2) “implicit” (as we say) or “lived” (as Lombardo Radice said) immanent and normative grammar, which is created in a group within and for mutual understanding; and (3) “written” (as Gramsci says), “explicit” (as we say today) or “reflected” grammar (as Lombardo Radice said). The latter is always a political act and, if adequate, leads to the constitution of more or less temporary written national languages.20 In some sense, one can find in this grammatical view of Gramsci’s the same picture drawn by Saussure in his third Course (an obvious comparison since both Gramsci and Saussure stem from Bréal), but viewed from the opposite perspective. Whereas one can observe a neverending mobility of immanent grammars in Saussure, even though concealed by the apparent inertness of written languages with respect to the vital and primary self-making and -unmaking of spoken langue; one can observe a neverending mobility of political situations and of the political effects springing out of the constitution of relatively inert written languages, which emerge by historic-political necessity from the mobile dynamics related to the permanent innovativeness of speaking. Saussure’s third Course [in General Linguistics] seems to tell us, “Be aware of the always fluid spoken and not only written language!” while Gramsci seems to tell us, “Be aware of the modalities through which written languages constitute themselves, namely, as great political events!” As in an ideal school in Athens, the two directions diverge, even though both equally and clearly delineate the same objective picture of the linguistic universe.
(2) “隐含的”（如我们所说）或“体验的”（如伦巴多·拉迪切所说）内在且规范的语法，是在群体内部及为相互理解而形成的；以及 (3) “书面”（如葛兰西所说），“显性的”（如我们今日所说）或“反映的”（如伦巴多·拉迪切所说）语法。后者始终是政治行为，如果恰当，则会导致或多或少临时性书面民族语言的形成。20 在某种意义上，人们可以在葛兰西的语法观点中找到与索绪尔在其第三门课程中所描绘的相同图景（由于葛兰西和索绪尔都源于布雷尔，这是一种显而易见的比较），但视角却相反。而索绪尔则观察到内在语法的永不止息的流动性，尽管书面语言的表观惰性掩盖了口语语言的活力和原始的自我构建和自我解构；人们则观察到政治局势和源于相对惰性的书面语言形成的政治效应的永不止息的流动性，这些书面语言由于历史政治的必然性而从与说话的持续创新性相关的动态中涌现。 索绪尔的三门[普通语言学]课程似乎告诉我们：“留意语言的口语形式，而非仅仅书面形式，它们总是流动的！”而葛兰西似乎告诉我们：“留意书面语言自身建构的方式，即作为重大的政治事件！”如同雅典的理想学校，两条方向分歧，尽管两者同样清晰地勾勒出语言宇宙的相同客观图景。

Gramsci adds, always generalizing and probably criticizing the progressive affirmation of those bureaucratic aspects emerging within cultural and linguistic policies of Stalin’s age:
葛兰西补充道，他总是进行概括，并可能批评了斯大林时代文化和语言政策中出现的那些官僚主义方面日益得到肯定

Since the process of formation, spread and development of a unified national language occurs through a whole complex of molecular processes, it helps to be aware of the entire process as a whole in order to be able to intervene actively in it with the best possible results. One need not consider this intervention as “decisive” and imagine that the ends proposed will be reached in detail, i.e., that one will obtain a specific unified language. One will obtain a unified language, if it is a necessity, and the organized intervention will speed up the already existing process: in any case, if the intervention is “rational,” it will be organically tied to tradition, and this is of no small importance in the economy of culture.21
由于统一民族语言的形成、传播和发展过程是一个复杂的分子过程，因此，了解整个过程有助于以最佳效果主动干预。不必将这种干预视为“决定性的”，也不必想象所提出的目标能够完全实现，即获得一种具体的统一语言。如果统一语言是必要的，那么有组织的干预将会加速已有的进程；无论如何，如果干预是“理性的”，它将有机地与传统相联系，这在文化经济中意义重大。

For Gramsci, the historical recuperation of the Italian language question stems from this general vision. This issue becomes an example, a valuable, personally experienced, first-hand example, though not more than an example:
对于葛兰西而言，意大利语问题史的复兴源于这种总体视野。这个问题成为一个范例，一个宝贵的、亲身经历的、第一手的范例，尽管它仅仅是一个范例。

Manzonians and “classicists." They had a type of language which they wanted to make prevail.
曼佐尼派和“古典主义者”。他们有一种想要推广的语言类型。

It is not correct to say that these discussions were useless and have not left traces in modern culture, even if the traces are modest. Over the last century a unified culture has in fact been extended, and therefore also a common unified language. But the entire historical formation of the Italian nation moved at too slow a pace.22
即使这些讨论在现代文化中的痕迹微弱，也不能说它们毫无用处。事实上，过去一个世纪以来，统一文化得到了扩展，因此也出现了一种共通的统一语言。但是，意大利民族整个历史形成的过程进展过于缓慢。

And again Gramsci returns to a conclusion of a more general character. Locked in prison, Gramsci does not look only at his own country, but rather at the more vast world of humans: “Every time that the question of language surfaces, in one way or another, it means that a series of problems are coming to the fore: the formation and enlargement of the governing class, the need to establish more intimate and secure relationships between the governing groups and the national-popular mass, in other words to reorganize the cultural hegemony."23
葛兰西再次得出更具一般性的结论。身陷囹圄的葛兰西并非只关注自身国家，而是将目光投向更广阔的人类世界：“每当语言问题以某种方式出现，都意味着一系列问题的凸显：统治阶级的形成和扩张，统治集团与民族大众建立更亲密和安全的联系的需要，换言之，重建文化霸权。”23

These memorable words became known in 1950, through the publication of these pages in Letteratura e vita nazionale [Literature and national life]. In Italy, they meant the achievement of a high goal and a demanding cultural and intellectual yardstick for the best minds to confront—writers like [Italo] Calvino, [Carlo Emilio] Gadda or [Pier Paolo] Pasolini, some scholars of linguistics, educators like Don Lorenzo Milani, who in the second half of the century addressed the questions of the linguistic organization of Italian society or more general reflections on the role language plays in history and human life.
这些令人难忘的词语于 1950 年通过《文学与民族生活》杂志的出版而为人所知。在意大利，它们象征着卓越目标的达成，以及对最优秀的头脑——如卡尔维诺、加达或帕索里尼等作家，一些语言学家，以及像多伦佐·米拉尼神父那样的教育家——提出的严苛文化和智力标准。他们在本世纪下半叶探讨了意大利社会语言结构的问题，或对语言在历史和人类生活中所扮演的角色进行更一般的反思。

Today, as I was recalling at the beginning of this piece, these questions are being translated into other languages and appear to have a broader attraction for those who work in the educative dimension or attend to theoretical studies on language and culture: like the tongue in cheek refrain, which Gramsci loved, Princes and people come: Madame of Tebe reads the cards.
今天，正如本文开头所述，这些问题正被翻译成其他语言，并且似乎对教育领域的工作者或从事语言文化理论研究的人更有吸引力：就像葛兰西钟爱的那个带有戏谑意味的警句一样，诸侯与民众来临：底比斯夫人解读牌局。

Notes 笔记

1. Quoted in M. L. Straiero, Un ritornello amato da Gramsci, in Osteria (Milan: Dischi del sole, 1969).
引自 M. L. Straiero，Gramsci 喜爱的回旋曲，载于 Osteria（米兰：太阳唱片，1969）。

2. Bartolo Tommasso Sozzi, Aspetti e Momenti della Questione Linguistica (Padova: Liviana, 1955). See Rosiello, this volume, chapter 2, and Antonio Carannante, “Antonio Gramsci e i problemi della lingua italiana,” Belfagor 28 (1973): 544-56.
2. 巴尔托洛·托马索·索齐，《语言问题之侧面与瞬间》（帕多瓦：李维安出版社，1955）。参见罗西耶罗，本书第 2 章，以及安东尼奥·卡兰南特，“安东尼奥·葛兰西与意大利语问题”，《贝尔法戈尔》杂志第 28 期（1973）：544-56 页。

3. Tullio De Mauro, Storia Linguistica dell'Italia Unita (Bari: Laterza, 1963).
3. 图利奥·德·毛罗，《意大利统一后语言史》(巴里：拉特萨出版社，1963)。

4. Antonio Gramsci, Quaderni del Carcere, four volumes, ed. Valentino Gerratana (Turin: Einaudi, 1975), hereafter QC.
4. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》，四卷，瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳编（都灵：埃纳迪出版社，1975），以下简称《狱记》。

5. Franco Lo Piparo, Lingua, Intellettuali, Egemonia in Gramsci (Bari: Laterza, 1979).
5. 法兰科·洛皮帕罗，《语言、知识分子与葛兰西的霸权》（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1979）。

6. Harro Stammerjohann, ed., Lexicon Grammaticorum: Who's Who in the History of the World Linguistics (Tübingen: Max Niemeyer Verlag, 1996).
6. 哈罗·施坦梅尔约翰主编，《语法学家词典：世界语言学史名人录》（图宾根：Max Niemeyer 出版社，1996）。

7. [Both expressions in quotation marks appear in English in the Italian text.]
7. [引号中的两个词语均出现在意大利语原文中。]

8. [The latter expression comes from Giambattista Vico, La Scienza Nuova [The New Science].]
8. [后一种表述源自吉安巴蒂斯塔·维科，《新科学》]

9. Paolo Spriano, Antonio Gramsci and the Party: The Prison Years, trans. John Fraser (London: Lawrence & Wishart, 1979).
9. 斯里亚诺（Paolo Spriano），《安东尼奥·葛兰西与党：狱中岁月》，约翰·弗雷泽译（伦敦：劳伦斯与维沙特出版社，1979）。

10. [De Mauro is using Gramsci’s nickname to recall the hardships and health problems of Gramsci’s childhood leading to his hunch condition.]
10. [德·马乌罗使用葛兰西的昵称是为了回忆葛兰西童年时期所经历的艰难困苦和健康问题，这些问题导致了他驼背的状况。]

11. Antonio Gramsci, “A Single Language and Esperanto,” in Selections from Cultural Writings, ed. D. Forgacs and G. Nowell-Smith, trans. W. Boelhower (Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1985), 28, hereafter SCW. There is a list of abbreviations on pages ix-x.
11. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，“一种单一语言与世界语”，载于《文化著作选集》，D. Forgacs 和 G. Nowell-Smith 编，W. Boelhower 译（马萨诸塞州剑桥：哈佛大学出版社，1985），第 28 页，以下简称 SCW。书中 ix-x 页有缩写列表。

12. Benedetto Croce, Tesi fondamentali di un'estetica come scienza dell'espressione e lingustica generali, Memoria letta all’Accademia Pontaniana, Naples, Stabilimento tipografico dell'università, 1900 (but actually published in 1901!), 80-81. [This translation is based on Benedetto Croce, The Aesthetic as the Science of Expression and of the Linguistic in General, trans. Colin Lyas (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1992), 163-84, translation altered slightly.]
12. 克罗齐，关于美学作为表达科学和一般语言学的根本论题，在庞蒂亚那学院宣读的论文，那不勒斯，大学印刷厂，1900 年（但实际上出版于 1901 年！），第 80-81 页。[本翻译基于克罗齐，《美学作为表达科学和一般语言学》，柯林·莱亚斯译（剑桥：剑桥大学出版社，1992），第 163-184 页，翻译略有修改。]

13. [Giovanni Pontano, 1426-1503, poet and writer known for his supple, pragmatic style.]
13. [乔瓦尼·庞塔诺，1426-1503，诗人兼作家，以其灵活务实的文风著称。]

14. Croce, Tesi Fondamentali, 81.
14. 克罗齐，《基本命题》，81 页。

15. See Croce, The Aesthetic, 164. Translation altered.
15. 见克罗齐，《美学》，164 页。译文有改动。

16. Q11§22, Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Quintin Hoare and Geoffrey Nowell Smith (New York: International Publishers, 1971), 431, hereafter cited as SPN. [To facilitate locating passages in various translations and anthologies, we use the standard method of providing the notebook (Quaderno) number——in this case 11——followed by the section number, §. See the introduction, page 12, for discussion. We will indicate the English translation, if used.]
16. Q11§22，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》选编，昆廷·霍尔和杰弗里·诺韦尔·史密斯译（纽约：国际出版公司，1971），431 页，以下简称《狱记》。[为方便在各种译本和文集中查找段落，我们采用标准方法，提供笔记本（Quaderno）编号——在本例中为 11——后跟节次编号，§。请参阅导言第 12 页以了解讨论内容。我们将标明使用的英文译本。]

17. Q11§37, Antonio Gramsci, Further Selections from the Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Derek Boothman (Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1995), 292.
17. Q11§37，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》节选，德雷克·布斯曼编著、翻译（明尼苏达大学出版社，1995），292 页。

18. On Croce, see Q10§54II, SPN, 351-54.
18. 关于克罗齐，见 Q10§54II，SPN，351-54 页。

19. Q29§2, SCW, 181. 19. Q29§2，SCW，181。

20. Q29§2, SCW, 181-82. 20. Q29§2，SCW，181-82。

21. Q29§3, SCW, 183. 21. Q29§3，SCW，183。

22. Q29§3, SCW, 183. 22. Q29§3，SCW，183。

23. Q29§3, SCW, 183. 23. Q29§3，SCW，183。

* Translated from “Il Linguaggio dalla Natura alla Storia: Ancora su Gramsci linguista,” in Gramsci da un Secolo all'Altro, ed. Giorgio Baratta and Guido Liguori (Rome: Editori Riuniti, 1999), 68-79. Translated by Rocco Lacorte with assistance by Peter Ives.
出自《从自然到历史的语言：论葛兰西的语言学研究》，载于《葛兰西：一个世纪的回望》，乔治·巴拉塔和盖多·利古里编著（罗马：联合出版社，1999），第 68-79 页。罗科·拉科尔特翻译，彼得·艾夫斯协助。

4
Linguistics and the Political Question of Language
Stefano Gensini*
4 语言学与语言的政治问题 斯特法诺·根西尼*

In the Introduction to the Second Course of General Linguistics (19081909), one can find Saussure’s metaphor of language as a “vessel not in dry-dock but on the sea.” This metaphor contains much more than a generic instance of sociohistorical contextualization of linguistic facts. There is a radical rupture with the tradition of positivist and neo-grammatical tradition in this metaphor, in a historical moment of both very dense theoretical and meta-theoretical reflection, where linguistics starts to constitute itself as science, while including itself in the class of the semiological disciplines. For the neo-grammarians, in fact, the society-language pair, though ever reaffirmed, did not go beyond the borders of a conventional and, therefore, a substantially static relationship. In this relationship, languages, as given entities, are placed alongside human communities, which nominally and mechanically signify them. On the contrary, for Saussure, “‘This social nature’ [of signs] is one of its internal, not one of its external, elements”1: The collectivity of speakers is defined as a constitutive principle of the functioning of language, in a historical time and space. This collectivity is the real historical agent that continuously establishes, disaggregates and reaggregates, the functional relationship of value within the linguistic system through social practices, in which the infinite individual linguistic acts (paroles) intertwine.
在《普通语言学教程》第二讲（1908-1909）的导论中，我们可以找到索绪尔将语言比作“并非停泊在船坞，而是航行于海上的船只”的隐喻。这个隐喻包含的意义远不止于对语言事实进行一般的社会历史语境化。在这个语言学开始确立自身为科学，并将其纳入符号学学科范畴的历史时刻，该隐喻与实证主义和新语法学传统存在着根本性的断裂。事实上，对于新语法学家而言，尽管社会-语言对始终被强调，但其关系并未超越约定俗成的、因此本质上是静态的范畴。在这个关系中，语言作为既定实体，被置于人类社会群体旁边，这些群体以名义上的、机械的方式指称它们。相反，对于索绪尔而言，“‘这种社会属性’[符号的社会属性]是其内在的，而非外在的要素”1：说话者的集体被定义为语言运作的历史时空中的构成性原则。 这个集体才是真正的历史主体，它不断地通过社会实践，在语言系统中建立、解体和重组价值的功能关系，其中无数个个体语言行为（言语）交织在一起。

It can even seem odd rereading certain pages of the Course that, to some materialistically oriented authoritative scholars, the lesson of the master from Geneva may have appeared tarnished by idealistic abstractness. In reality, against the founder of scientific linguistics [Saussure] and, notwithstanding his programmatic indications, the great part of twentiethcentury reflection in the field of linguistic sciences consisted of the effort of excluding from theory the bothersome presence of the “speaker” (or, better, of the speakers)—who, for Saussure, were the “prime principle” of his scientific construction—namely, the notion of arbitrariness, that is, of the radical impact of history and society on linguistic facts, as clearly distinct from the notion of conventionality.2 After all, this is what Noam Chomsky’s great journey consisted of: the elaboration of an idea of language as an (innate) self-regulating syntactic mechanism, which is, by definition detached from semantic implications and programmatically referred to “an ideal speaker-listener, in a completely homogenous speechcommunity, who knows its language perfectly.'? Chomsky consistently eliminates all the “grammatically irrelevant conditions' (among which he mentions mistakes, distractions, changes of interest or of attention) that belong to mere individual performances and that do not effect the generative schematics of competence that are not pertinent from a theoretical point of view. Therefore, Chomsky sees language as a kind of mathematics: it doesn’t matter who or why, or for what goal, the linguistic operation is performed. The living world of historico-natural languages fades into a neutral balance of calculations. The dialectical nature of the relationship individuals-society (parole-language[lingua]), which Saussure viewed as an always opened weaving between regularities and infractions and of innovation and conformism,4 is destroyed and flattened on the level of abstract competence, which must be presupposed as innate in the biological sense, in order to assure communication. In this way, however, both Noam Chomsky and his followers went back to that kind of despised empiricism which some had wanted to free linguistic science from forever. 5
甚至让人觉得奇怪的是，在重读课程某些章节时，某些唯物主义取向的权威学者可能会认为，日内瓦大师的教诲似乎蒙上了理想主义抽象的阴影。实际上，与科学语言学创始人索绪尔（Saussure）相对照，尽管他有所指示，但二十世纪语言学领域的大部分反思都致力于从理论中排除“说话者”（或更确切地说，是说话者）的令人困扰的存在——对于索绪尔而言，他们是其科学构建的“首要原则”——即任意性概念，也就是历史和社会对语言事实的根本影响，与习俗性概念截然不同。2 毕竟，诺姆·乔姆斯基的伟大旅程在于：构建一种语言观，将其视为一种（先天）自我调节的句法机制，其本质上与语义含义脱节，并以“理想的说话者-听者，在一个完全同质的言语共同体中，完美地掌握其语言”为纲领性参照。 乔姆斯基始终排除所有“语法上无关紧要的条件”（其中他提到了错误、分心、兴趣或注意力改变等），这些条件属于纯粹的个体表现，并不影响理论上无关紧要的、生成性能力图式。因此，乔姆斯基将语言视为一种数学：语言操作是由谁、为什么或为了什么目标进行的，并不重要。历史自然语言的生动世界消逝于计算的中性平衡。索绪尔认为的个体与社会（言语与语言）之间辩证关系，即一种在规律与违反、创新与顺从之间持续展开的编织，在抽象能力层面被破坏和扁平化，这种抽象能力必须被预设为以生物学意义上的先天存在，以确保沟通。然而，以这种方式，诺姆·乔姆斯基及其追随者都回到了那种被一些人希望永远摆脱的、被鄙视的经验主义。 5

Certainly, we can see all of this today. Thanks to the joint efforts of those who continue Saussure’s teaching—open to the sharpest logico-epistemological tradition of European thought—it was possible to elaborate the tools which do not throw out the social dimension of linguistic facts and to limit the intrusions of the culture of Chomskianism, revealing its internal incongruence. It seems to me, however, that one can find a rather interesting politico-cultural problem in the backdrop of these theoretical phenomena.
当然，我们今天都能看到这一切。由于那些继续传承索绪尔教诲的人——他们秉承欧洲思想最尖锐的逻辑认识论传统——的共同努力，我们得以完善那些既不抛弃语言事实的社会维度，又限制乔姆斯基主义文化入侵的工具，并揭示其内部的矛盾。然而，在我看来，在这些理论现象的背景中，我们可以发现一个相当有趣的政治文化问题。

I am alluding to the fact that Chomsky’s theoretical construction corresponded to, and somewhat formalized, a certain condition typical of intellectuals in the United States of America, notwithstanding their pacifism and progressive nature. A propos one can consider the open scission Chomsky makes between the theoretical work of the linguist and the “analysis of the social and political questions” in the notorious Intervista su Linguaggio e Ideologia.6 Chomsky’s declared intention is to take the mystifying presence of the technicians away from the realm of politics and to demonstrate the concrete public dimension that does not need specialization, but rather “only some Cartesian good sense.” This is certainly one way to react against the condition of politics conceived as mere technique and manipulation of power which is typical of the American world. Yet one can well suspect that Chomsky remains fully within the ideological schemes of the traditional separation of the intellectual from society, despite the merits he acquired through his generous democratic and anti-imperialist struggle. In fact, it seems that for him, on the one hand, politics, which is the arena of empirical things, only needs to be illuminated by Enlightenment’s raison (that works by itself, rather aristocratically outside of any political perspective which is or could be organized). On the other hand, the academic profession of a linguist is removed from social tensions in principle. Anyone who studies the marginal languages of New York’s ghettoes and the relationships between linguistic analysis, social situation of the speakers and scholastic condition does “a nice thing,” which is yet “evident and banal” on the theoretical level.7 William Labov’s sociolinguistics (which we will return to later) has a practical interest “on the level of education." But, for Chomsky, it does not enter the conceptual realm: “It remains something obscure, at this level," because, from the beginning, he negated the linguistic pertinence of the social element, that is, concerning who speaks and why one speaks. For Chomsky, the formal aspect of theory and the isolated condition of the American intellectual truly seem to come together and designate in their own way, a less than brief epoch of the culture of linguistics in these years.
我指的是，乔姆斯基的理论构建与美国知识分子的一种特定状态相对应，并多少对其进行了形式化，尽管他们秉持和平主义和进步立场。关于这一点，我们可以参考乔姆斯基在著名的《关于语言和意识形态的访谈录》中，将语言学家的理论工作与“对社会和政治问题的分析”明确区分开来。乔姆斯基声明他的目的是将技术专家神秘化存在从政治领域中剥离出来，并展示出不需要专业知识，而只需要“一些笛卡尔式的常识”的具体公共维度。这无疑是应对美国世界中将政治视为纯粹的技术和权力操纵的一种方式。然而，人们可以合理地怀疑，尽管乔姆斯基通过他慷慨的民主和反帝国主义斗争获得了功绩，但他仍然完全置身于知识分子与社会传统分离的意识形态框架之中。 事实上，对他而言，一方面，政治，作为经验事物的竞技场，只需要启蒙的理性（以一种自身运作、贵族化地超脱于任何政治视角的方式）来照亮。另一方面，语言学家的学术职业原则上与社会紧张状态隔绝。任何研究纽约贫民窟的边缘语言以及语言分析、说话者的社会状况和学术条件之间关系的人，都在做一件“美好的事情”，但在理论层面却显得“显而易见且平庸”。7 拉博夫的社会语言学（我们稍后会再次讨论）在“教育层面”上具有实际意义。但对乔姆斯基而言，它并未进入概念领域：“在这个层面，它仍然是模糊的”，因为从一开始，他就否定社会因素的语言相关性，即，关于谁在说话以及为什么说话。 对于乔姆斯基而言，理论的形式方面以及美国知识分子的孤立状态，似乎确实在这些年中，以其自身的方式汇聚并指明了语言学文化的一个短暂时期。

The Chomskian revolution consisted in what has been said above, socially and theoretically. If these considerations make sense, this revolution seems to have been a sort of “preventive counterrevolution” in the field of linguistic sciences (to paradoxically continue the metaphor). This is not the place to recall the intoxication of scientism and formalism that this revolution has brought not only to the United States, but also to some European universities, including Italian ones. Moreover, many European universities and some of the Italian ones that were intoxicated by this linguistic formalism and by scientism, while looking for mediations with other cultural currents, have not succeeded in overcoming the perfect (and yet unacceptable) rigor of the American master. Yet the situation is clearly changing today. After years of adjustments and theoretical compromises, of progressive modification to the standard Chomskian model, and of the breaks within Chomsky’s school, there is a profound tendency to recover the analytic direction inspired by historical and empirical experience that we will discuss below. After sixty years, the vitality of Saussure’s teaching, and, even beyond Saussure, of the relevance of the sociohistorical component seems to be reemerging.
乔姆斯基革命，就如上文所述，在社会和理论层面都产生了影响。如果这些考虑有意义，那么这场革命似乎是语言学领域的一种“预防性反革命”（为了延续这个比喻）。这里并非要回顾这场革命给美国，以及一些欧洲大学，包括意大利大学，带来的科学主义和形式主义的狂热。此外，许多欧洲大学以及一些受这种语言形式主义和科学主义影响的意大利大学，虽然在寻求与其他文化潮流的调和，却未能超越美国大师的完美（但又不可接受的）严谨性。然而，如今局势正在明显转变。经过多年的调整和理论妥协，对标准乔姆斯基模型的逐步修改，以及乔姆斯基学派内部的分裂，存在着一种深刻的趋势，即恢复由历史和经验启发的分析方向，我们将在下面讨论。 经过六十年的时间，索绪尔的教学活力，甚至超越索绪尔，社会历史成分的相关性似乎正在重新显现。

In this picture, of particular interest is the direction provided by Bruce Derwing in his Transformational Grammar as a Theory of Language Acquisition (1973).8 He is a scholar who went through the entire Chomskian experience and who got to the point of radically refuting it. Derwing severely criticizes the TGG9 both on the technical and on the epistemological level, destroying one by one all the bricks of Chomsky’s theoretical construction: innatism and linguistic universals, the concept of rule, the notions of competence and execution and the structure of his theory itself.
在这张图片中，布鲁斯·德尔文在他的《转换语法作为语言习得理论》(1973)中提出的方向尤其引人注目。8 他是一位经历了整个乔姆斯基学说的学者，最终对其进行了彻底的驳斥。德尔文严厉地批评了转换生成语法，9 既在技术层面，也在认识论层面，逐一摧毁了乔姆斯基理论结构的基石：先天论和语言普遍性，规则的概念，能力和执行的概念以及他理论的结构本身。

It is vital that we focus on two of these points. First of all, the discovery that Chomsky’s construction is not verifiable (which is something that has particular importance since Chomsky’s theory affirmed the introduction into linguistics of the unverified linguistic procedure of scientific rigor through the extreme complexity of its mathematical apparatus). Facing an established epistemological tradition that, from Popper to Bachelard, views the nature of scientific discourses as being disposed to falsification in an explicit and methodical way—insofar as their possibility of becoming social and their possible “cumulative” character would consist of being disposed to falsification. "Chomsky’s philosophy of linguistics is imbued with the idea that theories are tested by inquiring whether the data at hand are or are not compatible with a transformational-generative description; rarely does one find a transformationist exposing the basic tenets of TGG to falsification ‘in every possible way,’ or exposing them to ‘the fiercest struggle for survival’ against equally well-conceived and well-developed alternative accounts.”10
我们必须关注其中的两点。首先，乔姆斯基的构造不可验证的发现（这一点尤其重要，因为乔姆斯基的理论通过其复杂的数学装置，将未经验证的语言学程序引入语言学）。面对从波普尔到巴什拉的既定认识论传统，该传统明确而系统地将科学话语的本质视为易于证伪——只要其成为社会可能性的和可能的“累积”特征在于易于证伪。“乔姆斯基的语言学哲学蕴含着这样的思想：理论的检验在于探究手头的数据是否与转换生成描述相容；很少有人会将转换论的根本原则置于 TGG 的证伪‘在所有可能的方式中’，或将其置于与同样周全和完善的替代方案的‘最激烈的生存斗争’中。”10

The second point concerns, instead, Derwing’s positive proposal "toward a redefinition of linguistic research." Reexamining the classical modeling of linguistic processes introduced by communications5 engineering,11 Derwing becomes aware that the moment of “codification” and of “decoding”一namely, the initial and final moments (i.e., those of the sender and of the recipient) of the linguistic process are its decisive moments, despite the fact that the attention of the linguists falls on what is usually observable: the message as objective.
第二点则涉及德温格的积极建议“走向对语言研究的重新定义”。重新审视通信工程引入的经典语言过程模型，德温格意识到“编码”和“解码”的时刻——即语言过程的初始和最终时刻（也就是发送者和接收者的时刻）——尽管语言学家关注的通常是可观察到的客体——即信息，但却是其决定性时刻。

This point is decisive because the entire well-known theory of the “functions” of language (from Bühler to Jakobson and Halliday) is based on the theoretical equivocation that language per se possesses some opportunities which can be enumerated and described in a closed set, however large. The various imprints of objectivism and organicism characterize not only linguistic structuralism, but, among other things, many of its transpositions in the arena of literary criticism derived from this theoretical equivocation. Derwing’s conclusion is therefore of the highest interest, to the extent that it recognizes the source of linguistic unities一“at whatever 'level'" they would be recognized—in the consideration and in the unifying activity of the speaking subjects: in other words, of the “language user." Moreover, as he continues, in a more explicit way: "The explanation of the form of utterances is not to be found in the utterances themselves (though these provide helpful clues), but within the language user. . . . It is impossible to determine what the structure of a language is without broaching the question how that structure functions, since language has no structure independent of the process."12 In our view, this is a way to go back to Saussure's awareness, which was our starting point: namely, language viewed as a vessel which is no longer in the dry-dock, but in the midst of the sea, where the shape of the hull no longer counts, and whose course cannot be foreseen; language made for the reality of usage, ploughed by many and unforeseeable currents, and tied to the specificity of the situations and of the concrete speakers.
这一点至关重要，因为整个著名的“语言功能”理论（从布勒到雅各布逊再到哈利代）都建立在这样一个理论上的模棱两可之上，即语言本身拥有某些可以列举和描述的、尽管数量庞大的封闭集合中的机会。客观主义和有机主义的各种印记不仅表现在语言结构主义中，还在于许多由此理论模棱两可而衍生出的文学批评领域中的转化。德温的结论因此极具吸引力，因为它承认了语言单元的来源——无论在“任何层级”上被识别——在于说话主体的考虑和统一活动：换言之，在于“语言使用者”。此外，正如他进一步阐述的那样，以更明确的方式：“对话语形式的解释，并非在于话语本身（尽管这些提供了有用的线索），而在于语言使用者…… 不可能在不探讨语言结构如何运作的情况下确定语言的结构，因为语言的结构并非独立于其运作过程而存在。“12” 我们认为，这是回到索绪尔（Saussure）的认识方式的一种途径，这也是我们的出发点：即语言被视为一艘不再停泊在船坞，而是置身于大海之中的船只，船体的形状不再重要，其航向无法预知；语言是为了使用而存在的现实，被许多不可预见的潮流所推动，并与具体情境和说话者的特殊性联系在一起。

Derwing here finds himself一whether conscious or not—in agreement with the theoretical break performed by Wittgenstein in his Philosophical Investigations. In this work, Wittgenstein substitutes the notion of meaning elaborated by Frege and traditional logic (and, as he says, even by the author of the Tractatus Logico-Philosophicus一i.e., Wittgenstein!) with an idea of the processes of signifying,13 in which words are brought back to their daily usage (so allowing philosophy “to rest”) and to the possibility of being practiced by the users, which does not tolerate being confined to a restricted number of “language games.”14 In this manner, Derwing lays the foundation that allows an escape from the conception of linguistic facts that we called organicistic—this is what John Lyons does not succeed in doing with his vigorous manual of Semantics I-II, where the recovery of the philosophy of ordinary language and of Wittgenstein’s operationalism, on the one hand, and of Austin’s and Searle’s operationalism, on the other, only serves the goal of attributing one variable (the social one) among others to language and not of theoretically reconsidering its intrinsically sociohistorical nature, insofar as it is a semiologic system.
德尔文在这里（无论是否意识到）与维特根斯坦在其《哲学研究》中所进行的理论突破达成了共识。在这部著作中，维特根斯坦用一种关于意义的观念取代了弗雷格和传统逻辑（以及，正如他所说，甚至《逻辑哲学论》的作者——也就是维特根斯坦本人！）所阐述的观念。这种观念关注的是意义产生的过程，13  其中，词语被还原到其日常用法（从而使哲学“得以休息”），以及被使用者实践的可能性，这并不容许被限制在有限的“语言游戏”之中。14 如此，德尔文奠定了摆脱我们称之为有机论的语言事实概念的基础——约翰·莱昂斯在其《语义学 I-II》的雄辩手册中未能做到这一点，在那里，一方面对普通语言哲学和维特根斯坦的操作主义的恢复，另一方面对奥斯汀和西尔尔的行动主义的恢复，仅仅是为了将一个变量（社会变量）归于语言，而不是从理论上重新思考其作为一种符号学系统的内在的社会历史性质。

I am glad that such a conclusion comes from North America because it returns to the core of the problem—better than Chomsky or the post-Chomskians—namely, to reframe linguistics on the renewed grounds of social and historical theory in an experimental dimension, proceeding through hypotheses and exact verifications. Yet it is here that Derwing’s program shows its limits or its inevitable historical twists. I am alluding to his proposal of substantially reformulating linguistics as a branch of psychology. It no longer seems, however, that Chomsky (who, in the last years, has been the main supporter of the psychological nature of language) is behind Derwing’s theoretical proposal. Rather, it seems that Derwing’s is a non-Chomskian and experimental interest in “the problems concerning linguistic behaviors and processes.”15 It is, however, noteworthy that Derwing’s return to the speaker does not make him aware of the data (which for Chomsky were already “irrelevant”)that today seems to stimulate more robust sectors of the research on language (as we will soon show): namely, that regarding the social influence of linguistic facts, the sociocultural stratifications of the environment, and the weave of idiomatic and dialectal varieties in the competence of single individuals and of the communities. Derwing’s choice therefore shifts to the psychological ground, which, certainly, has a fundamental importance.16 However, in a more articulated theoretical framework, experiences and empirical works which are the patrimony of the last decades would find opportune development.
我很高兴这项结论来自北美，因为它回归了问题的核心——比乔姆斯基或后乔姆斯基学派更胜一筹——即，在实验维度上，以社会和历史理论为新的基础重新构建语言学，并通过假设和精确验证来进行。然而，正是这里，德尔文（Derwing）的方案展现了其局限性或其不可避免的历史扭曲。我指的是他将语言学实质性地重塑为心理学分支的提议。然而，现在看来，乔姆斯基（近年来一直是语言心理本质的主要支持者）并不支持德尔文的理论主张。相反，德尔文似乎对“语言行为和过程问题”怀有非乔姆斯基式的实验兴趣。15 然而，值得注意的是，德温的回归并没有使说话者意识到那些数据（对乔姆斯基而言，这些数据早已“无关紧要”），而这些数据如今似乎正在刺激语言研究的更强劲领域（正如我们即将展示的那样）：即关于语言事实的社会影响、环境的社会文化分层以及个体和社群语言能力中习语和方言变体的交织。因此，德温的选择转向了心理学领域，这无疑具有根本的重要性。16 然而，在一个更精细的理论框架中，过去几十年积累的经验和实证研究将找到合适的进展方向。

The volume Per Saussure contro Saussure 17 [For Saussure against Saussure], by Annibale Elia, can be useful to broaden the horizon and clarify the contorted cultural itinerary of the linguistic sciences in this century. Well aware of the epistemic and methodological importance of the social notion of language elaborated by Saussure, Elia documents very precisely the motifs concerning the progressive eclipse of the “social” in post-Saussurian philosophy of language. The inauthentic, rigid, dehistoricized Saussure, emerging from his pupils’ deficient reconstruction of the Cours de Linguistique Generale, has helped, as Elia explains, the simultaneous divorce between linguistic theory and social theory, which has been performed—even though under different, but deep down similar, perspectives—by European and American structuralism. In the famous [Prague School’s] “Theses of 1929,” one could see the beginning of a dangerous and philosophically compromising teleological trend of interpreting the Saussurean conception of linguistic change. There was also a misunderstanding of the methodological and non-organic character of the synchrony/diachrony dichotomy which departed from Saussure’s already fully developed awareness of the intrinsically historical character of every moment of the life of a langue.18 On both sides of the Atlantic Ocean, the nonsocial and nonsemantic nature of research perspectives correspond to each other: while Trubetzkoy bracketed meaning, in order to get at an advanced analysis of the signifier of the linguistic sign and laying an initial rigorous theorization of the concept of distinctive oppositions as found in his Principles [Grundzüge],19 Bloomfield and his followers reject meaning as inaccessible to objective analysis, which, under the behaviorist point of view, could be explained only on the ground of observable data. The theoretical value of these two instances is certainly very different, but the results that each of them achieves are not dissimilar. It can now be well understood (as Elia shows convincingly) how Chomsky’s theoretical effort rises from such bases. After all, the project of the GGT brings to its extreme consequences the goal that characterized various sectors of language research, not solely the American. The aim of achieving a “Parmenidean” model of language, namely, a closed system which can refer back to a fixed number of operations is the kind of objet20 that calms the linguist down. This is the case at both the theoretical level (where formal work on objects of study which are informal by nature is terribly complicated), and on the professional level taken in a broader sense (where it is not necessary to look outside the laboratory and to consider the “accidental” and not entirely foreseeable moment of linguistic usage).
安尼巴莱·埃利亚的著作《论索绪尔与反索绪尔》（Per Saussure contro Saussure 17）有助于拓展视野，阐明本世纪语言科学错综复杂的文化轨迹。埃利亚充分认识到索绪尔关于语言的社会概念在认识论和方法论上的重要性，并精确地记录了后索绪尔语言哲学中“社会性”逐渐被遮蔽的动机。从其学生对《普通语言学教程》的欠缺重建中，一个不真实的、僵化的、非历史化的索绪尔形象浮现出来，正如埃利亚所解释的那样，它促进了欧洲和美国结构主义者（尽管视角不同，但本质上相似）对语言理论和社会理论的同步分离。在著名的布拉格学派“1929 年论文集”中，可以看出一种危险且在哲学上具有妥协性的、解释索绪尔语言变化概念的形而上学倾向的萌芽。 同步/历时二分法的研究方法论和非有机特征也存在误解，这与索绪尔已充分认识到语言系统每个时刻的内在历史性相悖。18 大西洋两岸的研究视角在非社会性和非语义性方面相互对应：特鲁别茨科伊为了深入分析语言符号的意义载体，而将意义排除在外，并在他《原理》[Grundzüge]中对区别特征的观念进行了初步的严格理论化；19 布隆菲尔德及其追随者则拒绝将意义纳入客观分析，在行为主义的观点下，认为意义只能通过可观察的数据来解释。这两个例子的理论价值当然差异很大，但它们取得的结果却并不相异。现在可以很好地理解（正如埃利亚令人信服地展示的那样），乔姆斯基的理论努力是如何建立在这种基础之上的。 毕竟，GGT 项目将语言研究各个领域（不仅仅是美国）的目标推向了极致。实现一个“帕尔米尼德式”语言模型，即一个可以回溯到固定数量操作的封闭系统，正是这种能够安抚语言学家焦虑的目标。这既体现在理论层面（对本质上非正式的研究对象进行形式化工作极其复杂），也体现在更广义的职业层面（无需走出实验室，考虑语言使用中“偶然”且并非完全可预测的时刻）。

In different spheres, linguistic theories have run across the uncomfortable world of social phenomena. This is the case in Sapir, Malinowski and Firth’s anthropology; in Weinreich’s dialectology, which is devoted to the complex moment of the “contact” between languages; and of William Labov’s sociolinguistics. In this fashion, as Elia writes, “in the 1960’s, a revaluation of sociality—conceived above all as variation—in the linguistic theories and methodologies was achieved.”21 The most authentic interpretation of Saussure’s conception of language—in opposition to the one often proclaimed—was therefore rediscovered on the ground: it is this interpretation that, between 1957 (the year in which the Sources Manuscripts of the Course on General Linguistics [Cours de linguistique generale] came to light) and today, scholars such as Godel, De Mauro, Engler and Prieto have brought to the fore, making, as we said above, the concept of arbitrariness its pivot.
在不同的领域，语言学理论都触及了社会现象的复杂世界。例如，萨丕尔、马林诺夫斯基和费斯（Firth）的人类学；温赖希（Weinreich）的方言学，致力于语言之间“接触”的复杂时刻；以及威廉·拉波夫（William Labov）的社会语言学。正如埃利亚（Elia）所写，“20 世纪 60 年代，对语言学理论和方法中社会性——特别是变异性——的重新评估得到了实现。”21 因此，对索绪尔（Saussure）语言观的真正解读——与通常宣称的解读相反——在地面上重新被发现：正是这种解读，在 1957 年（《普通语言学教程》手稿问世之年）到今天，学者如戈德尔（Godel）、德毛罗（De Mauro）、恩格勒（Engler）和普里耶托（Prieto）都将其推到前台，正如我们上面所说，将任意性作为其核心概念。

The case of Labov—an author that, in my view, needs further valorization—is quite singular. In the essays recently gathered for the Italian public (Il Continuo e il Discreto nel Linguaggio22 [The Continuous and The Discrete in Language]), Labov strongly criticizes rigidly categorical conceptions of language, for which the linguistic structure would be “an ensemble of discrete categories, which are invariant and qualitatively defined.”23 He traces this conception back to a continuous line of thought that goes from Saussure to Chomsky. Differently from many “classic” structuralists working on language in use,24 Labov is aware that those who view linguistic phenomena through such categories neither succeed in explaining nor want to explain the infinite variants and particularities of the concrete linguistic practice in “marginal” social situations, which are very far from the ideal speakers as portrayed in the tradition of the generative linguists. It is clear that Labov’s attack addresses more the vulgarizations of Saussure (which were already mediated by Chomskism) than Saussure himself. But this is not the point. What counts is Labov’s claim, which is already theoretical despite Chomsky’s dismissal; a claim concerning the “continuous” nature of the object, language. In other words, the nature of language is intrinsically informal, specifically, social and manipulative. Moreover, the problem Labov posits—to construct a “theory of the limits” capable of understanding “how discrete categories can be imposed on the continuous substance of the world”25—seems to me analogous to the one briefly mentioned above, concerning how to provide rigorously a theory with the means by which a not entirely calculable object, such as a natural language, can be described.
拉博夫的情况——在我看来，需要进一步评价——非常特殊。在最近为意大利读者汇编的论文集《语言的连续性和离散性》（Il Continuo e il Discreto nel Linguaggio22）中，拉博夫强烈批评了语言的严格范畴化概念，认为语言结构是“一组不变且定性定义的离散范畴”。23 他追溯了这种观念，认为它源于从索绪尔到乔姆斯基的一脉相承的思想。与许多研究语言使用的“经典”结构主义者不同，24 拉博夫意识到，那些通过此类范畴看待语言现象的人既无法解释，也不想解释“边缘”社会情境中具体语言实践的无限变体和特殊性，这些情境与生成语言学家传统中描绘的理想说话人相去甚远。很明显，拉博夫的批评更多地针对的是索绪尔的庸俗化（这种庸俗化已经受到了乔姆斯基主义的影响），而不是索绪尔本人。但这并非重点。 关键在于拉波夫的论断，尽管受到了乔姆斯基的驳斥，但其本身已具有理论性；该论断关乎语言这一客体的“连续性”。换言之，语言的本质内在地是非正式的，具体而言，是社会性的和操纵性的。此外，拉波夫提出的问题——构建一个能够理解“如何将离散的范畴强加于世界的连续本质”的“极限理论”——在我看来，与之前简要提及的问题类似，即如何严谨地构建一个理论，以便描述一个并非完全可计算的客体，例如自然语言。

I believe that it is not by accident that Labov’s experience has been welcomed in Italy (also because of what his professional profile as a linguist presupposes; it seems to me that he constitutes a novelty in the recent cultural tradition in the United States).26 The possibilities for linguists pursuing "ideal” models of communicative competencies are reduced in America, by the politico-cultural emergence of the linguistic questions rooted in the varied inheritance of dialects and idioms of minorities, and in Italy, the dramatic sociocultural fractures that exist. No wonder that Italian scholars turned their interest to Labov’s research and, vice versa, since their interest coincided with the substantial nonpenetration of the most famous hypotheses by Bernstein, regarding the "compensation” of the so-called linguistic deficit in Italy. Whereas Labov’s model is programmatically "open” and politically unequivocal, Bernstein has in mind a concept of language that is closed and mechanically connected to social class conditions. The tight homology Bernstein establishes between "low” classes and "restricted code,” on the one hand, and, on the other hand, between middle classes and "elaborated code,” excluding a reciprocal permeability between these two levels, has rightly appeared fallacious on the theoretical level, falsified on the historical level (it is enough to think of the sociolinguistic dynamics in Italy in this century), and politically functional for a conservative view of society. For a full critique of Bernsteinism, one can refer to the Manuale di Sociolinguistica [Manual of Sociolinguistics] by Norbert Dittmar27 that is constructed on the grounds of an interesting perspective of "ideology critique”一which is not common among linguists一and that seems deficient only in the sense that it is affected by a certain schematism in the assessment of Labov’s experience.
我相信拉波夫在意大利的受认可并非偶然（也与其作为语言学家的专业背景有关；在我看来，他在美国近期的文化传统中代表了一种新颖性）。26  在美国，追求“理想”的交际能力模型的语言学家面临困境，因为以少数民族方言和习语为根基的语言问题在政治文化上日益凸显；而在意大利，剧烈的社会文化裂痕同样存在。难怪意大利学者将兴趣转向了拉波夫的研究，反之亦然，因为他们的兴趣与伯恩斯坦关于所谓语言缺失的“补偿”的最著名假设在意大利的实质性未被接受相吻合。而拉波夫的模型是程序性的“开放”且政治上明确的，伯恩斯坦则持有一种封闭的语言概念，该概念与社会阶层条件机械地联系在一起。 伯恩斯坦建立的“低”阶级与“受限语码”之间、以及“中”阶级与“精细语码”之间的紧密同源关系，一方面，另一方面，排除了两者之间的相互渗透性，在理论层面看来是错误的，在历史层面看来是伪造的（只需考虑本世纪意大利的社会语言动态），并且在政治上符合一种保守的社会观。要对伯恩斯坦主义进行全面批判，可以参考诺伯特·迪特玛的《社会语言学手册》[Sociolinguistics Manual]，该手册基于一种有趣的“意识形态批判”视角——这在语言学家中并不常见——并且似乎只有在评价拉波夫的经验时受某种模式化影响才显得不足。

To tighten the various separate and wandering threads of this discussion, we will use the assistance of the important work, Lingua, Intellettuali, Egemonia in Gramsci28 [Language, Intellectuals, Hegemony in Gramsci] by Franco Lo Piparo, with an engaging preface by Tullio De Mauro. In this essay the object of analysis is pushed back or rather qualitatively modified. The object does not concern university professors, but a politician and great intellectual [Antonio Gramsci]: a theoretician and strategist of the proletarian revolution in the West. What is the meaning, or meanings, of this type of change of analysis?
为了将讨论中各种分散的线索紧密联系起来，我们将借助弗朗哥·洛皮帕罗的著作《语言、知识分子、葛兰西的霸权》（Lingua, Intellettuali, Egemonia in Gramsci28），该书附有图利奥·德毛罗的精彩序言。本文将分析对象推回，或者更准确地说，进行质的改变。分析对象不再是大学教授，而是政治家兼伟大知识分子（安东尼奥·葛兰西）：西方无产阶级革命的理论家和战略家。这种分析变化的含义是什么？

The answer (I am trying to summarize and interpret Lo Piparo’s perspective) can perhaps be the following: with Gramsci, linguistic questions are definitively taken out of the realm of any kind of specialist, and are inserted deeply in the analysis of how society functions. Language appears as the real terrain where civil and political society intersect, as the site of socialization or separation of experiences, knowledge and needs. Likewise, language appears as the decisive dimension of politico-cultural stratification of the class system that crosses and defines the ways of thinking and feeling of entire populations from common sense to scientific theories of reality. Finally, language appears as the concrete space for every possible hegemony—namely, the site and condition of the “intellectual and moral reformation of the masses” of which the socialist revolution in Italy must consist.
答案（我试图总结并阐释洛·皮帕罗的观点）或许如下：与葛兰西一样，语言问题被明确地从任何专家领域剥离出来，并深深地嵌入到社会运作方式的分析中。语言呈现为公民社会和政治社会交汇的真实领域，作为社会化或经验、知识和需求分离的场所。同样，语言也呈现为阶级系统政治文化分层的决定性维度，它贯穿并定义了从常识到现实科学理论的整个社会群体的思维和感觉方式。最后，语言呈现为每一种可能的霸权的具体空间——即构成意大利社会主义革命的“大众的思想和道德改造”的场所和条件。

In this way, Lo Piparo both connects the case of Gramsci in the contemporary theoretical dispute, which is internal to linguistic sciences, and launches it again into the more complex historico-political debate, which, for several years, has characterized the reflections of Marxists in and outside of Italy.
通过这种方式，洛·皮帕罗将葛兰西的案例同时联系到当代语言学内部的理论争论，并将其重新投射到更复杂的历时政治辩论中，该辩论多年来一直是意大利国内外马克思主义者的反思主题。

Lo Piparo’s starting point is seriously and solidly philological. He presents the information he finds in Gramsci’s biography concerning his formation as a linguist, which, except for a few sporadic and partial exceptions,29 was never fully developed. Gramsci, before becoming a political leader, develops in Bartoli’s school of “neo-linguistics.” He studied theory and the history of language in a moment in which there is a struggle between the neo-grammarian and historicist tendencies and he became excited about the polemic between Manzoni and Ascoli, adhering to the latter’s historiographic perspective. Lo Piparo reconstructs with great care the materials that Gramsci certainly read and those that he probably read. Lo Piparo provides an abundant quantity of bibliographical references, with respect both to the Italian linguistic tradition and to the French sociology of Meillet and Gilliéron. Moreover, he comes to formulate the hypothesis that this liberal-linguistic formation does not fade in the mature Gramsci—the Marxist and the secretary of the PCI—but rather constitutes and characterizes some of the central categories of the Notebooks: namely, the theory concerning intellectuals and, through it, the notion of hegemony, which seems to have a substantial antecedent in the linguistic notion of prestige. In this fashion, Lo Piparo recuperates, for the rich legacy of Gramscian studies, one of the original points of the work-plan announced by Gramsci in the letter to Tania of March 19, 1927 (where second, after “a study of Italian intellectuals, and their origins etc.,” Gramsci mentions “a study of comparative linguistics! Nothing less”),30 and Gramsci’s conceptual connection between the unpopularity of Italian literature, the question of a national language, the need for an intellectual reformation of the masses, the unpopularity of the Risorgimento and so on as he announces it in the famous “nexus of problems.”31 The linguistic moment (that Gramsci elegantly introduces through the mischievous label of something für ewig) is therefore seen as one of the nodal passages of Gramsci’s thought and of his complex prison inquiry of an historical and political nature. This is how Lo Piparo puts the synthesis:
洛·皮帕罗的出发点是严肃而扎实的语言学研究。他呈现了在葛兰西传记中关于葛兰西语言学素养的资料，除了少数零星和部分例外，29 葛兰西的语言学素养从未完全发展成熟。葛兰西在成为政治领袖之前，曾在巴尔托利“新语言学”学派中学习。他研究语言理论和语言史，正值新语法学派与历史主义倾向斗争的时期，并对曼佐尼和阿斯科利的论战充满热情，认同后者的历史学视角。洛·皮帕罗非常仔细地重建了葛兰西肯定阅读过的材料和可能阅读过的材料。洛·皮帕罗提供了大量的书目参考，既涵盖了意大利语言学传统，也涵盖了梅耶和吉耶龙的法国社会语言学。 此外，他提出假设，这种自由主义语言建构并非在成熟的葛兰西（这位马克思主义者和意大利共产党总书记）那里消逝，反而构成并表征了《狱中札记》中一些核心范畴：即关于知识分子的理论，以及由此延伸出的霸权概念，其似乎在语言学中的“声望”概念中拥有实质性的先例。通过这种方式，洛·皮帕罗为葛兰西研究的丰富遗产回收了葛兰西 1927 年 3 月 19 日致塔尼娅的信中所宣布的工作计划的最初要点之一（信中，在“对意大利知识分子及其起源等的考察”之后，葛兰西提到了“对比较语言学的考察！绝非小事”），以及葛兰西在著名的“问题链”中所阐述的意大利文学不受欢迎、民族语言问题、对民众进行知识改造的必要性、复兴运动不受欢迎等问题之间的概念联系。31 格拉姆斯基巧妙地以“永远之物”这一标签引出的语言时刻，因此被视为格拉姆斯基思想以及他复杂的历史政治监狱调查中的一个关键环节。洛皮帕罗这样阐述了综合：

A solid theoretical chain in which every link that is necessary is formed by the theoretical and methodological study of comparative linguistics (i.e. cultural prestige as a cause of language change and diffusion), the theory and history of the intellectuals (i.e. intellectuals as producers and bearers of prestige-hegemony), the definition of the concept of the State (i.e. the force of cohesion and the national popularity of the State as the effects of its intellectuals5 capability of prestige-hegemony and of the social groups that represent it), and the question of language [lingua] (i.e. the means by which the cultural and linguistic history of Italy is proven and exemplified). The same problem is at stake in all four topics: how a nation-people-state is formed and organized and what invisible threads give rise to and unite it. Language and the reflection on language have an essential一decisive一place in this problem, which Gramsci did not disregard, nor can we.32
一个牢固的理论链条，其中每一个必要的环节都由比较语言学（例如文化声望作为语言变化和传播的原因）的理论和方法研究、知识分子（例如知识分子作为声望霸权的生产者和载体）的理论和历史、国家概念的定义（例如国家凝聚力以及国家民族声望作为其知识分子声望霸权能力以及代表它的社会群体的效果）以及语言问题（例如意大利文化和语言史的证明和例证手段）构成。这四个主题都面临着同样的问题：一个民族国家如何形成和组织，以及哪些看不见的线索导致和团结了它。语言以及对语言的反思在这个问题中具有至关重要的地位——决定性的地位——葛兰西没有忽视，我们也不能。

With this formulation, and above all with the many detailed analyses he carries out in his essay, Lo Piparo introduces a perspective in the study of Gramsci which is new in many respects. Anyone who is familiar with the state of research on Gramsci today一after the volumes by Paggi, Badaloni, Buci-Glucksmann and after the Conference in Florence in 1977一sees the grand “fusion of the sources” Gramsci performs in the mature phase of his theoretical reflection which becomes deeper and is enriched in Lo Piparo’s study.
凭借这种表述，尤其是他文章中诸多细致的分析，洛·皮帕罗为葛兰西研究引入了许多方面的新视角。任何熟悉当今葛兰西研究现状的人——在帕吉、巴达洛尼、布奇-格鲁克曼的著作以及 1977 年佛罗伦萨会议之后——都能看到葛兰西在其理论反思成熟阶段所进行的宏大“来源融合”，在洛·皮帕罗的研究中变得更加深刻和丰富。

Yet maybe Lo Piparo did not develop some possibilities that his analysis opened. This is partly due to the specific delimitation of his project.33 The first step, of course, was to fully highlight the consistency of the linguistic dimension in Gramsci (in this respect, Lo Piparo’s essay really represents a point of no return). Yet I have the impression that his discovery of what we have called above the liberal-linguistic component of Gramsci’s formation sometimes leads Lo Piparo to “flatten” Gramsci into his earlier cultural experiences. For instance, if it is true that Ascoli, against Manzoni’s linguistic centralism from above, claims the rights and “economic-cultural” spaces of civil society, it would still be risky to conclude that Gramsci’s concept of hegemony can only be applied to civil society itself. Gramsci’s enlargement of the concept of state, which he performs in relation to the turning point represented by world capitalism, shifts the hegemonic struggle onto more complex levels. The forms and contents of this struggle—as Buci-Glucksmann and Gerratana have shown well—are certainly not indifferent to the historical and political subjects that fight it. On the one hand, I understand Lo Piparo’s preoccupation with not reducing the notion of hegemony to a passive Soviet derivation and to give value to all the historical and cultural Italian components that constitute it. Yet, on the other hand, there are analogous risks in pushing back the date of the genesis of Gramsci’s notion of hegemony. The notion of hegemony must always be considered in relation to the background only of what, according to me, is decisive for a man like Gramsci, namely, that he is first of all a political leader. A propos, what must be taken into account is the concrete historical situation Gramsci faced, the immense structural and institutional transformations of the 1920s and 1930s together with the rise of state capitalism, the new articulations coming to light within the range of the intellectual functions, and the necessity to elevate at these levels the struggle of the communists. The notion of hegemony progressively acquires more and more definition within this situation, namely, in a very complex weave of historical analysis, theoretical reflection, and revolutionary planning. Regarding the relationship between Gramsci and Lenin, it seems to me that recent studies have validated Togliatti’s suggestion of 1957. He argued that Leninism taught the leader of the Italian working class the full primacy of politics, which was a decisive theoretico-practical direction for the Italian working class that had been closed in the impasse occurring between Reformism and Maximalism.34
或许洛皮帕罗并没有充分发展他分析中所开拓的某些可能性。这部分原因在于他项目的特定界定。33 当然，第一步是充分强调葛兰西的语言维度的一致性（在这方面，洛皮帕罗的文章确实代表了一个转折点）。然而，我感觉他发现的葛兰西的自由主义-语言成分有时会使洛皮帕罗“扁平化”葛兰西，将其归结于他早期的文化经历。例如，如果阿斯科利反对曼佐尼自上而下的语言中心主义，主张公民社会的权利和“经济文化”空间，那么得出葛兰西的霸权概念只能应用于公民社会本身，仍然是冒险的。葛兰西对国家的概念扩大，这是他针对世界资本主义转型所做的，将霸权斗争转移到更复杂的层面。正如布西-格鲁克斯曼和杰拉塔纳所很好地展示的那样，这场斗争的形式和内容当然不会对参与其中的历史和政治主体漠不关心。 一方面，我理解洛·皮帕罗致力于避免将霸权概念简化为苏联的被动衍生，并赋予构成霸权的所有意大利历史和文化因素价值。但另一方面，将葛兰西霸权概念的起源时间推迟也存在类似的风险。霸权概念必须始终相对于我看来对葛兰西这样的人至关重要的背景来考量，即他首先是一位政治领袖。顺便提一下，必须考虑葛兰西所处的具体历史环境，20 世纪 20 年代和 30 年代的巨大结构和制度变革，以及国家资本主义的兴起，知识功能范围内的新的阐释，以及在这些层面上提升共产主义斗争的必要性。在这一情境下，即在复杂的历史分析、理论反思和革命规划的交织中，霸权概念逐渐获得越来越明确的定义。 关于葛兰西与列宁的关系，我看来，最近的研究证实了 1957 年托里亚蒂的建议。他认为列宁主义教导了意大利工人阶级的领袖政治的至高无上性，这对陷入改良主义与极端主义之间困境的意大利工人阶级而言，具有决定性的理论实践方向。34

In a word, once Lo Piparo’s knowledgeable contribution is positively absorbed, I think that his position must be broadened through consideration of how Gramsci’s role as a politician had, in turn, an effect on his formation as a linguist.35 Far from impoverishing the dimension of language, this exalts and strengthens it, adding components that could not be present in the theoretical nucleus elaborated by Ascoli and Bartoli. And vice versa, it allows the articulation of the political perspective on levels of analysis and of intervention not thought of until Gramsci—and unfortunately also not after him.
总而言之，一旦充分吸收了洛·皮帕罗的知识贡献，我认为有必要拓展他的观点，思考葛兰西作为政治家的角色如何反过来影响了他作为语言学家的形成。35 这并非削弱语言维度，而是提升和强化它，增添了阿斯科利和巴尔托利所构建的理论核心无法包含的成分。反之亦然，它使政治视角能够应用于葛兰西之前（不幸的是，甚至在他之后）从未考虑过的分析和干预层面。

Thus, the problems related to the question of hegemony, in the time when the State was expanding, unfold through language [linguaggio] (taking this word in the strong sense that it has for Gramsci: namely, culture, form of civilization, popularity, “microcosm and metaphor” of the social, as Lo Piparo36 writes) in a closer connection between civil society and politics. It is along the lines of linguistic-cultural relationships which the following struggle is fought: that the proposition that the way out of the historical crisis is in terms of a passive revolution (which would be constructed starting from the factories through the Taylor-Fordist reorganization of the modes of production) and the proposition of a transition to socialism viewed as an “anti-passive revolution.”37 The leading democratic role of the producers shifts from the workplace to the ethico-political dimension, and includes all the cells of the social organism: but the conquest of a spontaneous linguistic “conformism”一namely, of a common and diffused critical consciousness of the masses—is the intermediate connection of this shift.
因此，在国家扩张时期，与霸权问题相关的难题，通过语言（借用葛兰西强烈的含义：即文化、文明形态、普及性、社会“微观与隐喻”，正如洛·皮帕罗所言）在公民社会与政治之间更紧密的联系中展开。以下斗争就沿着语言文化关系展开：一种观点认为，摆脱历史危机的出路在于被动革命（其构建将从工厂出发，通过泰勒-福特制生产方式的重组），而另一种观点则认为，过渡到社会主义是一种“反被动革命”。生产者的领导性民主作用从工作场所转移到伦理政治层面，并涵盖社会有机体的所有细胞：但赢得一种自发的语言“从众性”（即大众共同而弥散的批判意识）是这一转变的中介环节。

What has been learned after Gramsci on some points should also be stressed. Think of his attitude toward dialects: even though Gramsci fully understood their anthropological and sociohistorical value, he seemed to view them only as heritage from the past—namely, like the consequence of the lack of hegemony of the city over the country, as Lo Piparo has noted. Therefore, Gramsci sees the dialects as destined to be overcome by the national language during its expansive stage that will occur within an overall politico-cultural rise of the working classes. In this case, differently from Ascoli and from De Sanctis himself, Gramsci does not seem interested in a pedagogical and political perspective which takes into account bilingualism (his famous letter to Teresina, in fact, must not be interpreted as an indication of scholastic policy, but rather as a position of real oscillation of Gramsci’s thought). Is this situation equivalent to the one described in Gramsci’s pages on the relationship between master and pupil, characterized38 by an essential distrust of the “reciprocity” of teaching and by an element of dirigisme?
在格拉姆斯基之后，一些观点也值得强调。想想他对方言的态度：尽管格拉姆斯基充分理解了方言的人类学和社会历史价值，但他似乎只将它们视为过去遗产——即城市对乡村缺乏霸权的结果，正如洛·皮帕罗所指出的那样。因此，格拉姆斯基认为，方言注定会在工人阶级整体政治文化崛起过程中，随着民族语言的扩张而被克服。在这种情况下，与阿斯科利和德·桑克蒂斯本人不同，格拉姆斯基似乎对具有双语视角的教育和政治观点不感兴趣（事实上，他写给特雷西娜的著名信件，不应被解读为学校政策的指示，而应被视为格拉姆斯基思想的真正摇摆立场）。这种情况是否等同于格拉姆斯基著作中关于师生关系的描述，其特点是本质上不信任“教学的互惠性”，以及一种“指导主义”的因素？

Today, after the experiences of this century, we regard the question of dialects in a different fashion, both at the politico-institutional and at the scholastic level. There is a growing possibility of the consolidation of the dialects and of cultural expansion that would be part of a conquest of the major means of communication and of culture, and therefore, above all, of a national language (even today only 25 percent of the Italians claim to always use the Italian language in and outside their homes). This is what the many didactic and theoretical experiences of linguistic democratic education are teaching us (I am thinking of the long and hard work by the MCE [Movimento di Cooperazione Educativa—The Movement of Educative Cooperation] and by the CIDI [Centro Iniziativa Democratica Insegnanti—Center for Teachers’ Democratic Initiative], and of the indications provided by the "10 theses for democratic linguistic education,” which moreover acknowledge Gramsci’s linguistic conception as one of their more significant components).39
今天，在经历了本世纪的经验后，我们在政治体制和学术层面都以不同的方式看待方言问题。方言的巩固以及随之而来的文化扩张，有可能成为掌握主要传播媒介和文化，尤其是民族语言（即使在今天，也只有 25%的意大利人声称总是在家内外使用意大利语）的关键。许多语言民主教育的教学和理论经验都在告诉我们这一点（我想到 MCE[教育合作运动]和 CIDI[教师民主倡议中心]的长期艰苦工作，以及“10 条民主语言教育论纲”提供的指示，这些论纲进一步承认葛兰西的语言观是其重要组成部分之一）。

In any case, Lo Piparo does well in stressing that the pages devoted by Gramsci to dialect and folklore are the most radical denial of what has been pretentiously referred to as Gramsci’s "populism." Yet it seems to me that in the past years this particular thesis of Lo Piparo’s has not been very welcome.
无论如何，洛·皮帕罗（Lo Piparo）强调葛兰西关于方言和民间文学的篇章是对所谓的葛兰西“民粹主义”最彻底的否定，这一点做得很好。然而，在我看来，近年来，洛·皮帕罗的这一论点并未受到太多欢迎。

Returning to more general considerations, I believe that it should be now clear that Gramsci’s reflections on language must be interpreted according to a twofold fashion. Regarding the contemporary problems of linguistic sciences, Gramsci’s suggestions about language have at least two important implications. The first concerns the level of historiography: Gramsci draws a dense and precise interpretive outline of the linguistic events in Italy, developing Ascoli’s conception. The perspectives that Gramsci opens have been substantially verified by the most recent studies, recovering the depth of Gramsci’s analysis. They are linked to the following topics: the substance of the dialects and how they are rooted in local cultures; dialects being tied to a worldview and to a way of participating in "parochial" social life (this implies, in turn, a consequent linguistic-cultural polycentrism in Italy); the fact that the Italian language is extraneous to the great masses, which is an aspect of the nonpopular character of the state and of the Italian nation; the role of the press, of religious, political mass organizations and of the trade unions in diffusing the national language, and the analysis of the means by which “linguistic conformism” of a given population can be established; and the observations on the “Italianizing jargon” coming to light in the popular classes. The second implication concerns a more theoretical level. Here, it seems to me, the picture Gramsci draws of the language/society relationship contributes to important progress in our knowledge about this. Gramsci’s positions agree with the major accomplishments of the linguistic sciences of the twentieth century specifically; his diagnoses of “external linguistics” (to use Saussure’s term); his notion of “immanent grammar” as distinguished from normative grammar and perception of the political meaning of the latter; his discovery of the permanently metaphorical—semantically open—nature of language and the socially manipulable character of historico-natural languages; and more generally his incredibly acute examination of the relationships between language and worldview, and language and the way thought is organized. Classic names can be listed again like Saussure; the great Soviet psychologist, Lev S. Vigotskij; the Wittgenstein of the Philosophical Investigations and scholars like De Mauro, Prieto and Godel. They provide the trajectory of work in which Gramsci has the place of a master who tends to place the reflection on language in the perspective of an intrinsically critical and sociohistorical science.
回到更一般的考量，我相信现在应该清楚的是，葛兰西对语言的思考必须从双重角度解读。关于当代语言学问题，葛兰西关于语言的建议至少有两个重要的含义。第一点涉及历史学研究层面：葛兰西勾勒出意大利语言事件的密集而精确的解释框架，发展了阿斯科利的概念。葛兰西开创的视角已被最近的研究实质性地证实，从而恢复了葛兰西分析的深度。 它们与以下主题相关：方言的物质构成及其植根于地方文化；方言与世界观以及参与“地方性”社会生活的方式之间的联系（这反过来暗示了意大利的语言文化多中心主义）；意大利语对于广大民众而言是外来的，这是国家和意大利民族非大众化特征的一个方面；新闻媒体、宗教、政治群众组织和工会传播国家语言的作用，以及分析如何建立特定人群的“语言趋同性”；以及在民众阶层中出现的“意大利化行话”的观察。第二个含义涉及更理论的层面。在我看来，这里葛兰西描绘的语言/社会关系图景，对我们了解这一领域做出了重要的贡献。 葛兰西的观点与二十世纪语言学的主要成就相符；特别是，他诊断了“外部语言学”（使用索绪尔术语）；他将“内在语法”区别于规范语法和对后者政治意义的理解；他发现了语言的永久隐喻性——语义开放性——以及历史自然语言的社会操纵性；更一般地说，他对语言与世界观、语言与思维组织方式之间的关系进行了极其敏锐的考察。经典人物如索绪尔、伟大的苏联心理学家列夫·谢米奥诺维奇·维果茨基、著有《哲学研究》的维特根斯坦以及德毛罗、普里耶托和戈德尔等学者，可以再次列举。他们构成了一个研究轨迹，在这个轨迹中，葛兰西占据着一位大师的地位，倾向于将对语言的反思置于内在批判性和社会历史科学的视角。

Gramsci’s contribution to linguistic questions must, however, be assessed on a more overall political level. In other words, Gramsci is always, first of all, a revolutionary thinker and an organizer of real forces—that is, a political militant who grew through class and party experience, gathering all the components of his formation and culture under the great question arising in the 1930s: how to talk about the revolution in the West in the stage of the world crisis of the revolutionary process and during the complex restructuring of capitalistic power, both on the economico-social level and of the state in and outside Italy.
然而，必须从更全面的政治层面评估葛兰西对语言问题的贡献。换言之，葛兰西首先始终是一位革命思想家和现实力量的组织者——即一位通过阶级和党派经验成长起来的政治战士，在他的形成和文化的所有组成部分都汇聚于 20 世纪 30 年代出现的重大问题之下：如何在世界革命进程危机时期以及资本主义权力（包括其在经济社会层面和国家层面，以及在意大利国内外）复杂重组时期，谈论西方的革命。

The linguistic dimension—like all the other social and cultural points Gramsci is interested in, past and present, and that he analyzes (from the intellectuals to Fordism, from literature to the Risorgimento and the southern question)—permeates the Notebooks as a political question, namely, as one of the levels on which the possibility of transforming Italy into a socialist country is at stake.40 Thus, this problem rebounds to the present, where, in times of very deep sociocultural mutations, of radical modifications in the civil and cultural structure and in the tendencies and experiences of great masses of humans, the question of language [lingua] has already exploded on the national level. This question is intermingled with the political struggle and the social life of Italy on an infinite number of levels: in the schools, where from the nineteenth century on, because of ministry programs and the repressive attitude of the teachers, the reigning phobia of dialects is one of the main reasons for the exclusion of the popular masses from the right to education and from the real possibility of knowing and controlling society; in local life, in the cities in the towns in the neighborhoods—where the often-dramatic weave between the heritage of dialects and the national language must be summed up with the presence of three million citizens speaking a language other than Italian (not only the speakers of Greek, German and French, but also some half a million workers from the Third World with their cultures and idioms); in the factories and in the big cities of the north-central part of Italy—where the great internal immigration of the masses coming from the south has opened the immediate battle front concerning understanding and being understood and the struggle for language; in the Italian civil reality taken as a whole— characterized by a terrifying level of instruction (76.6 percent of Italians did not have more than an elementary school diploma and 32.4 percent of them had not finished any level of education), by a massive regression to semiilliterate condition of previously literate subjects and by a simply deficient diffusion of literature and press (Italy is the worst in Europe, even lower than Spain)41; inside the trade unions and the political parties—where every day a linguistic problem shows up as a need to understand and to break the fracture between the learned and the masses.
语言维度——如同葛兰西关注的所有其他社会和文化层面，过去和现在，以及他所分析的（从知识分子到福特主义，从文学到复兴运动和南方问题）——贯穿于《狱中札记》之中，作为政治问题，即作为能否将意大利转变为社会主义国家的可能性所涉及的层面之一。40 因此，这个问题回荡至今，在社会文化变革极其深刻的时代，在公民和文化结构以及广大民众的倾向和经验发生根本性变化的时代，语言问题已在国家层面爆发。这个问题与意大利的政治斗争和社会生活纠缠不清，在无数层面上都有体现：在学校里，从 19 世纪开始，由于教育部课程和教师的压制态度，对方言的恐惧是导致民众被排除在受教育权利和真正了解和掌控社会之外的主要原因之一；在地方生活中，在城市、城镇、社区——方言遗产与国家语言之间的复杂关系，以及有 300 万公民使用非意大利语的语言（不仅包括讲希腊语、德语和法语的人，还包括来自第三世界的数百万工人及其文化和语言）的现实，必须加以总结；在意大利北部中部的工厂和城市——来自南部的巨大内部移民浪潮，直接引发了关于理解和被理解以及语言斗争的战斗；在意大利的整个公民现实中——其教育水平令人震惊意大利人中，76.6% 的人受教育程度不超过小学毕业，32.4% 的人甚至没有完成任何学业，这反映出先前受过教育的人群大量回归半文盲状态，以及文学和报刊的传播严重不足（意大利在欧洲表现最差，甚至低于西班牙）41；在工会和政党内部，每天都出现语言问题，需要理解并弥合知识分子与大众之间的隔阂。

With respect to these facts, I think that Gramsci’s teaching is first of all valuable as an indication of how to grasp the nonextrinsic—but rather hegemonic and political—sense of the linguistic questions however they manifest themselves. It is also valuable to the extent that it presents an object of political analysis and an objective to work on. Insisting on these aspects may perhaps seem superfluous or tautological, but I have the sense that—even among us—an essentially rhetorical (and therefore easier) way of assessing the linguistic facts is still in fashion.
关于这些事实，我认为葛兰西的教诲首先在于如何把握语言问题（无论它们如何表现）的非外在性——而是霸权和政治意义。它也具有价值，在于它提供了一个政治分析的对象和一个努力的目标。坚持这些方面也许显得多余或循环论证，但我感觉——即使在我们中间——对语言事实进行本质上修辞的（因此更容易的）评估方式仍然流行。

I believe that this leads to a stagnation of our capabilities to relate to reality and therefore to transform it. Thus, what Gramsci writes in a crucial moment of his reflection in prison should be reread. He questions himself about the relationship between common sense and philosophy, concerning the struggle for hegemony leading to “collectively attaining a single cultural ‘climate’”：
我相信这导致我们与现实相关联，进而改变现实的能力停滞。因此，应该重新审视葛兰西在其狱中反思的关键时刻所写的内容。他质疑常识与哲学之间的关系，关注争取领导权的斗争，最终“集体地获得一种单一的文化‘氛围’”。

Once philosophy is conceived as a conception of the world and philosophical activity is not to be conceived [solely] as the “individual” elaboration of systematically coherent concepts, but also and above all as a cultural battle to transform the popular “mentality” and to diffuse the philosophical innovations which will demonstrate themselves to be “historically true” to the extent that they become concretely—i.e., historically and socially—universal—then the question of language [linguaggio] and languages [lingue] must be “technically” put at the forefront of our enquiry.42
一旦哲学被理解为世界观，并且哲学活动不仅被理解为系统连贯概念的“个体”阐释，更重要的是，作为一种文化斗争，旨在转变大众的“思维方式”并传播那些被证明“在历史上真实”的哲学创新（因为它们变得具体地——即在历史上和社会上——普世），那么语言[linguaggio]和语言[lingue]的问题就必须“技术性”地置于我们研究的最前沿。

Notes 笔记

1. Ferdinand de Saussure, Saussure's Second Course of Lectures on General Linguistics (19081909), ed. and trans. Eisuke Komatsu and George Wolf (Oxford: Pergamon, 1997), 14a.
1. 费迪南·德·索绪尔，《索绪尔普通语言学讲义》（1908-1909），由江口英介和乔治·沃尔夫编辑并翻译（牛津：培根出版社，1997），第 14a 页。

2. See note 65 by Tullio De Mauro in the Italian edition of Ferdinand de Saussure, Corso di linguistica generale, ed. and trans. Tullio De Mauro (Bari: Laterza, 1967).
2. 请见费迪南·德·索绪尔《普通语言学教程》意大利文版，图利奥·德·毛罗的注释 65。

3. Noam Chomsky, Aspects of the Theory of Syntax (Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press, 1965), 3.
3. Noam Chomsky，《句法理论概要》（剑桥，马萨诸塞州：麻省理工学院出版社，1965），第 3 章。

4. Ferdinand de Saussure, Course in General Linguistics, ed. Charles Bally and Albert Sechehaye, trans. Wade Baskin (New York: McGraw-Hill, 1966), 13-17. This is discussed and developed in the essay by Daniele Gambarara, “Il circuito della parole e il modo di riproduzione delle lingue” [The Circuit of Parole and the Way of Reproducing Languages], in Studi Saussuriani [Studies on Saussure], ed. R. Amacker, Tullio De Mauro and Luis J. Prieto (Bologna: Il Mulino, 1974), 133-64.
4. 费迪南·德·索绪尔，《普通语言学教程》，查尔斯·巴利和阿尔贝·谢哈耶编，韦德·巴斯金译（纽约：麦格劳-希尔，1966），13-17 页。丹尼埃莱·加马拉拉在“言语回路与语言再生产方式”一文中对此进行了讨论和发展，该文收录于阿马克、德·毛罗和普里耶托编著的《索绪尔研究》（博洛尼亚：伊尔·穆利诺，1974），第 133-164 页。

5. See the valid arguments of Piero Caracciolo, “Teorie linguistiche ed epistemologia marxista” [Linguistic theories and Marxist Epistemology], and Franco Lo Piparo, “Teoria linguistica e oggetto linguistico” [Linguistic theory and linguistic object], in Linguistica Semiologia Epistemologia [Linguistics, Semiology, Epistemology] (Rome: Bulzoni, 1972), 81-91 and 93-99.
5. 见皮耶罗·卡拉乔洛（Piero Caracciolo）的“语言理论与马克思主义认识论”及法兰克·洛皮帕罗（Franco Lo Piparo）的“语言理论与语言对象”两文，载于《语言学、符号学、认识论》（罗马：Bulzoni 出版社，1972），第 81-91 页及第 93-99 页。

6. Noam Chomsky, Intervista su Linguaggio e ideologia [Interview on language and ideology] (Bari: Laterza, 1977), 8-10.
6. 诺姆·乔姆斯基，《语言与意识形态访谈》（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1977），8-10 页。

7. Chomsky, Intervista, 55.
7. 乔姆斯基，访谈录，55 页。

8. Bruce L. Derwing, Transformational Grammar as a Theory of Language Acquisition (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1973).
8. 布鲁斯·L. 德尔文，《转换语法作为语言习得理论》（剑桥：剑桥大学出版社，1973）。

9. [TGG refers to “transformational-generative grammar,” which is the grammar of a natural language as deduced following Noam Chomsky’s linguistics.]
9. [TGG 指的是“转换生成语法”，即根据诺姆·乔姆斯基的语言学理论推导出的自然语言语法。]

10. Derwing, 236-37. The citations are from K. R. Popper, Logica della Scoperta Scientifica [The Logic of Scientific Discovery] (Turin: Einaudi, 1970), 24. Derwing could have also quoted the very different attitude one can find in Hjelmslev’s Prolegomena, where the principle of “adequateness” of theory opportunely sides—as a factor “having an equivalent importance” to—the one of the “arbitrariness” of theory, [translated into Italian as] I Fondamenti della Teoria del Linguaggio (Turin: Einaudi, 1968), 17.
10. 德尔文，236-37 页。引文出自 K. R.波普尔，《科学发现的逻辑》(Turin: Einaudi, 1970)第 24 页。德尔文也可以引用赫尔姆斯列夫《导论》中截然不同的态度，其中“理论的恰当性”原则恰当地与“理论的任意性”原则——作为“具有同等重要性”的因素——并列，[译自意大利语]《语言理论基础》(Turin: Einaudi, 1968)第 17 页。

11. See the classical work by C. E. Shannon and W. Weaver, The Mathematical Theory of Communication (Urbana: University of Illinois Press, 1949), which is recalled by the psychologist G. A. Miller, Language and Communication (New York: McGraw-Hill, 1951), which is at the base of the famous scheme by Jakobson.
11. 请参阅香农 (C. E. Shannon) 和韦弗 (W. Weaver) 的经典著作《通信的数学理论》(Urbana: 伊利诺伊大学出版社, 1949)，该书被心理学家米勒 (G. A. Miller) 在其著作《语言与沟通》(纽约：麦格劳-希尔, 1951) 中提及，并构成了雅各布森著名方案的基础。

12. Derwing, 306. 12. 德林，306。

13. [In the paragraph above, Gensini plays with the meaning of the Italian words significato (signified, meaning) and significare (signifying, to signify), where respectively the former conveys a static meaning and the latter a dynamic one, thus associating the first word to the traditional way of conceiving meaning.]
13. [在上文段落中，Gensini 运用意大利语“significato”（被指称的意义，意义）和“significare”（指称，表示）这两个词的含义，前者传达静态意义，后者传达动态意义，从而将第一个词与传统意义的理解方式联系起来。]

14. See the beautiful paragraph 23 in the Philosophical Investigations and, on the entire matter, Tullio De Mauro, Introduzione alla Semantica [Introduction to semantics] (Bari: Laterza, 1971), 189ff.; C. H. Brown, Linguistica Wittgensteiniana [Wittgenstein’s Linguistics] (Rome: Armando, 1978).
14. 请参阅《哲学研究》第 23 段，以及图利奥·德·毛罗（Tullio De Mauro）的《语义学导论》（Bari: Laterza, 1971）第 189 页及以下内容；以及 C. H. 布朗的《维特根斯坦的语言学》（Rome: Armando, 1978）。

15. Derwing, 353. Regarding the psychological nature of language, one should see Chomsky’s review of B. F. Skinner, Verbal Behavior, now included in the reading of F. Antinucci and C. Castelfranchi, Psicolinguistica: percezione, memoria e apprendimento del linguaggio [Psycholinguistics: Language Perception, Memory and Learning] (Bologna: Il Mulino, 1976), 21-65.
15. 德尔文，353。关于语言的心理本质，应参考乔姆斯基对 B.F. 斯金纳的《言语行为》的评论，现收录于 F. 安蒂努奇和 C. 卡斯特尔弗兰基合著的《心理语言学：语言感知、记忆和习得》（《心理语言学：语言感知、记忆和习得》）（博洛尼亚：伊尔穆利诺出版社，1976），第 21-65 页。

16. An instance of the importance of the psychological ground for linguistic facts should be noted in the work of a great student of Vygotskij, A. R. Luria, which synthesized the studies of the very active psycholinguistic Soviet school: Problemi Fondamentali di Neurolinguistica [Fundamental Problems of Neurolinguistics] (Rome: Armando, 1978), and Corso di psicologia generale [Course of General Psychology] (Rome: Editori Riuniti, 1979), especially 296-365. On the historical role and the achievements of Vygotskij’s school, see L. Mecacci, Cervello e Storia [Brain and history] (Rome: Editori Riuniti, 1977).
16. 值得注意的是，维果茨基杰出学生 A. R. 卢里亚的作品突显了心理基础对语言事实的重要性，该作品综合了苏联非常活跃的心理语言学派的研究成果：《神经语言学基本问题》(罗马：阿曼多出版社，1978)以及《普通心理学教程》(罗马：联合出版社，1979)，特别是第 296-365 页。关于维果茨基学派的历史作用和成就，请参阅 L. 梅卡奇的《大脑与历史》(罗马：联合出版社，1977)。

17. Annibale Elia, Per Saussure contro Saussure (Bologna: Il Mulino, 1978).
17. 安尼巴莱·埃利亚，《论索绪尔反驳索绪尔》(博洛尼亚：伊尔·穆利诺出版社，1978)。

18. [Langue is Saussure’s notion of language as a system, as opposed to parole, which is language in use.]
18. [朗格是索绪尔将语言视为一个系统，与之相对的是言语，即语言的使用。]

19. N. S. Trubetzkoy, Principles of Phonology, trans. Christiane Baltaxe (Berkeley: University of California Press, 1969). [Gensini uses tratto pertinente, which Baltaxe translates as “distinctive oppositions” to distinguish it from Trubetzkoy’s colleague and friend Roman Jakobson’s use of “distinctive features,” which, although parallel, should be distinguishable.]
19.  N. S. 特鲁别茨科伊，《音位学原理》，巴尔塔克斯译 (伯克利：加州大学出版社，1969)。[根西尼使用“相关特征”（tratto pertinente），巴尔塔克斯将其翻译为“区别对立”，以区别于特鲁别茨科伊的同事兼朋友罗曼·雅各布森的“区别特征”的使用，尽管两者平行，但应加以区分。]

20. [Gensini uses the French objet, meaning both “object” and "aspiration” or "aim.”]
20. [根西尼使用法语的“objet”，既指“对象”，也指“渴望”或“目标”。]

21. Elia, 103. 21. 伊利亚，103。

22. William Labov, Il Continuo e il Discreto nel Linguaggio (Bologna: Il Mulino, 1977).
22. 威廉·拉波夫，《语言中的连续性和离散性》（博洛尼亚：伊尔·穆利诺出版社，1977）。

23. Labov, 33. 拉波夫，33。

24. Labov, 190. 24. 拉博夫，190.

25. Labov, 23. 25. 拉波夫，23.

26. See his contribution to an important conference of the SLI in 1974 in Aspetti Sociolinguistici dell'Italia contemporanea, ed. Simone and G. Ruggiero (Rome: Bulzoni, 1977).
26. 参阅他 1974 年在意大利语言学学会（SLI）重要会议上发表的论文，收录于 Simone 和 G. Ruggiero 编辑的《当代意大利社会语言学》（罗马：Bulzoni 出版社，1977）。

27. Norbert Dittmar, Manuale di Sociolinguistica (Bari: Laterza, 1979) (German original edition: Frankfurt, 1973).
27. 诺伯特·迪特马尔，《社会语言学手册》(巴里：拉特萨出版社，1979 年)（德文原版：法兰克福，1973 年）。

28. Franco Lo Piparo, Lingua, Intellettuali, Egemonia in Gramsci (Bari: Laterza, 1979).
28. 法兰克·洛皮帕罗，《语言、知识分子与葛兰西的霸权》（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1979）。

29. The contributions by Luigi Rosiello are, among these exceptions, of particular relevance. His first one was delivered at the Conference on Gramsci in 1958.
29.  路易吉·罗西埃洛的贡献，在这些例外中尤为相关。他第一次在 1958 年葛兰西会议上发表。

30. Antonio Gramsci, Letters from Prison, vol. 1, ed. Frank Rosengarten, trans.Raymond Rosenthal (New York: Columbia University Press, 1994), 83.
30. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中书简》第一卷，弗兰克·罗森加特编，雷蒙德·罗森塔尔译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，1994），83 页。

31. Antonio Gramsci, Quaderni del Carcere, four volumes, ed. Valentino Gerratana (Turin: Einaudi, 1975), 2107ff., hereafter QC. A list of abbreviations is on pages ix-x. Q21§1 [To facilitate locating passages in various translations and anthologies, we use the standard method of providing the notebook (Quaderno) number——in this case 21——followed by the section number, §. See the introduction, page 12, for discussion. We will indicate the English translation, if used.]
31. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》，四卷，瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳编（都灵：埃纳迪出版社，1975），2107 页以下，以下简称 QC。缩写列表见第 ix-x 页。Q21§1 [为方便在各种译本和文集中查找引文，我们采用标准方法，即提供笔记本（札记）编号——在本例中为 21——后跟节次编号，§。有关讨论，请见导言第 12 页。我们将标明所使用的英文译本（如有）]

32. Lo Piparo, 155. 32. 洛皮帕罗，155.

33. Lo Piparo, 11. 33. 洛皮帕罗，11。

34. See, for example, R. De Felice, Serrati, Bordiga, Gramsci (Bari: De Donato, 1971), or the contributions to Lavoro Critico [Critical Activity], no. 9 (1977). The centrality of political praxis is referred back to the problematization of the theoretical instances of Marxism in the fundamental work by Leonardo Paggi, “La teoria generale del marxismo in Gramsci” [The General Theory of Marxism in Gramsci], in the Annali Feltrinelli, 1973, in particular 130ff.
34. 例如，参见 R. De Felice 的《塞拉蒂、博尔迪加、葛兰西》（巴里：De Donato 出版社，1971），或《批判活动》（Lavoro Critico）第 9 期（1977）的论文。政治实践的核心地位，可追溯至列奥纳多·帕吉的著作“葛兰西的马克思主义一般理论”（Annali Feltrinelli 出版物，1973 年），特别是第 130 页及后续页，对马克思主义理论范例的质疑。

35. An analogous suggestion is given by Tullio De Mauro in his “Preface” to Lo Piparo’s book, who insists on the effects Gramsci’s political, cultural, and human experience——which he had as a journalist, a militant and leader of the PCI, and a knower of the Italian sociocultural reality一should have had on his “theoretical linguistics.”
35. 图利奥·德·毛罗在其著作《洛·皮帕罗》的“前言”中提出了类似的建议，他强调葛兰西作为一名记者、一名共产党员和意大利共产党领导人，以及对意大利社会文化现实的了解，其政治、文化和个人经历对其“理论语言学”的影响。

36. Lo Piparo, 246. 36. 洛皮帕罗，246。

37. See Buci-Glucksmann’s paper, at the Conference in Florence, “Sui problemi politici della transizione: classe operaia e rivoluzione passiva” [On the political problems of the transition: working class and passive revolution], in Politica e Storia I (Rome: Editori Riuniti, 1977), 120ff.
37. 请参阅布奇-格鲁克斯曼在佛罗伦萨会议上的论文“关于转型政治问题：工人阶级与被动革命”，收录于《政治与历史》第一辑（罗马：统一出版社，1977），第 120 页及以下。

38. Q10II§44; SPN 350. 38. Q10II§44；SPN 350。

39. [The MCE is an association linked to the Federation internationale de l’Ecole Moderne established in Italy in 1951 (influenced by the ideas of Célestin and Elise Freinet) working toward a pedagogy for the people. Its goal is to create class environments where reciprocal listening and authentic communication between children and teachers can occur, in order to promote global development. Among the founders and members of the MCE were teachers and educators like: G. Tamagnini, A. Fantini, A. Pettini, E. Codignola and later B. Ciari, M. Lodi and many others (see www.mce-fimem.it/index1.htm, accessed on June 26, 2007). The CIDI is an association of teachers from all kinds and levels of schools and disciplines that works to reform the education system. Its objective is to realize a democratic school attentive to the cultural needs of the students (see www.cidi.it/index.php, accessed on June 26, 2007).]
39. [MCE 意大利于 1951 年成立，是与国际现代教育协会（受 Célestin 和 Elise Freinet 思想影响）相关的组织，致力于为大众发展教育。其目标是创造互动倾听和真实沟通的课堂环境，使师生之间能够交流，从而促进全球发展。MCE 的创始人及成员包括：G. Tamagnini、A. Fantini、A. Pettini、E. Codignola，以及后来的 B. Ciari、M. Lodi 等人（见 www.mce-fimem.it/index1.htm，访问日期：2007 年 6 月 26 日）。CIDI 是由来自各种学校、各级和学科的教师组成的协会，致力于教育体制改革。其目标是建立关注学生文化需求的民主化学校（见 www.cidi.it/index.php，访问日期：2007 年 6 月 26 日）。]

40. On this issue, see De Mauro——for whom Gramsci’s is “a political theory of language, a theory of language as an always mobile and fluid result or of the currents of consensus that plough and keep the body of a given society united in its parts and to the tradition” (“Preface” to Lo Piparo, xv-xvi)—— and Emilia Passaponti in the essay that introduces her anthology of Gramsci’s writings on language to be published by Prismi, in Catania, and entitled Gramsci and language. See also E. Passaponti, “Gramsci e le questioni linguistiche,” in Lingua, linguaggi e società, ed. Stefano Gensini and M. Vedovelli (Florence: Manzuoli, 1978), 106-15.
40. 关于这个问题，参见德毛罗——他认为葛兰西的理论是“一种语言政治理论，一种语言理论，即语言是不断变化和流动的结果，或者说，是形成共识的潮流，将一个特定社会的身体及其各个部分以及传统联系在一起”（《序言》至洛皮帕罗，第 xv-xvi 页）——以及埃米莉亚·帕萨蓬蒂在为其由普里西米出版社在卡塔尼亚出版的葛兰西语言著作文集撰写的导论文章中。另见 E. 帕萨蓬蒂，“葛兰西与语言问题”，载于斯蒂法诺·根西尼和 M. 维多维利主编的《语言、语言学和社会》（佛罗伦萨：曼祖利出版社，1978 年），第 106-15 页。

41. See the rich documentation De Mauro gathered in his Storia Linguistica dell'Italia Unita [Linguistic History of United Italy], vol. 1-2 (Bari: Laterza, 1976), and in the essay “La cultura” [Culture], in Come Siamo, come Eravamo 1968-1978 [How We Are, How We Were 1968-1978] (Bari: Laterza, 1979). The data on literacy that I cited (i.e., the last available: 1971) come from the ISTAT source; see them discussed in detail under the political and scholastic viewpoint in the volume by the same author: Scuola e Linguaggio [School and language] (Rome: Editori Riuniti, 1977), 114ff.
41. 请参阅德马罗在其《意大利统一语言史》第 1-2 卷（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1976 年）以及“文化”一文中所汇集的丰富资料，该文收录于《我们现在的样子，我们过去的样子 1968-1978》（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1979 年）。我引用的识字率数据（即最后可获得的：1971 年）来自 ISTAT 的数据；请参阅同一位作者的《学校与语言》（罗马：联合出版社，1977 年）中关于政治和教育视角的详细讨论，第 114 页及以后。

42. Q10§44, QC, 1330-31. Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans.
42. Q10§44，QC，1330-31。安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》选编，[编辑及译者]

Quintin Hoare and Geoffrey Nowell Smith (New York: International Publishers, 1971), 348-49.
霍亚尔（Quintin Hoare）和诺韦尔·史密斯（Geoffrey Nowell Smith）（纽约：国际出版公司，1971），第 348-349 页。

* Translation of “Linguistica e questione politica della lingua,” Critica Marxista 1 (1980): 151-65. Translated by Rocco Lacorte with assistance by Peter Ives.
《语言学与语言的政治问题》，《马克思主义批判》第 1 期（1980）：151-165。译者：罗科·拉科尔特，协助者：彼得·艾夫斯。

5
Gramsci the Linguist
Utz Maas*
5 格拉姆斯基的语言学家 乌兹·马斯*

In the widespread interest in Gramsci, the linguistic element still plays, at least outside of Italy, a subordinate role—even though Gramsci was a trained linguist (and thus, an exception in the workers5 movement) and pursued his linguistic project until the end of his life. Gramsci’s linguistic-theoretical considerations can offer a point of departure for recommencing the discussion about a materialist theory of language that seems to have been exhausted in recent years. I want to stimulate such a reception of Gramsci’s thought with this contribution, on the one hand, by reconstructing his argumentation in its historical context (and thus opposing the tendency of playing with decontextualized citations from the available selected editions, which is unfortunately still difficult to avoid in the German-speaking world), and, on the other hand, by developing further the implications of Gramsci’s thoughts.1
在对葛兰西的广泛关注中，语言因素，至少在意大利以外，仍然扮演着次要角色——尽管葛兰西是一位受过语言训练的学者（因此，在工人运动中是个例外），并且一直到生命的尽头都在进行他的语言项目。葛兰西的语言理论思考可以为重新开启关于一种似乎在近年已陷入困境的唯物主义语言理论的讨论提供一个出发点。一方面，本文旨在通过重构葛兰西的论证及其历史背景（从而反对在德语世界中仍然难以避免的、使用脱节引文的倾向，这些引文来自现有的精选版本）来激发对葛兰西思想的这种回应；另一方面，本文将进一步发展葛兰西思想的含义。

The Difficulties of Thinking About Language in the Tradition of the Workers’ Movement
在工人运动的传统中思考语言的困难

Linguistic questions are traditionally marginal in left-wing discussions, if not even suspect. Like all cultural approaches, they meet the suspicion of displacing the primacy of the social question. This is even more the case for questions of language: left-wing discussions are loaded with deep-seated reservations with respect to linguistics, which must surely be rooted in traumatic school experiences with grammar lessons. This discursive constellation can be traced back to the First International: political reflection or the attempt to elaborate its scientific-analytical foundation was at that time determined by the reaction to romantic-lyrical nationalism, above all in student circles, which sought a point of departure for a new political organization in linguistic criteria. The new national states were supposed to follow the postulate of “one language—one nation.”2
语言问题在左翼讨论中历来边缘化，甚至被怀疑。如同所有文化方法论，它们面临着被认为取代社会问题的首要地位的质疑。对于语言问题而言，情况更是如此：左翼讨论充斥着对语言学的根深蒂固的疑虑，这无疑源于对语法课的创伤性学校经历。这种话语格局可以追溯到第一国际：当时政治反思或试图构建其科学分析基础，主要受学生群体对浪漫主义抒情民族主义的反应所驱动，他们试图在语言标准中寻找新的政治组织的出发点。“一个民族一种语言”的论断，正被新兴民族国家所遵循。

Marxist analysis, on the other hand, aimed at the real, the social, the relationships that were merely covered over by “superficial'' linguistic-cultural differences (“the workers have no country'). Thus we can explain the cheeky—to put it mildly—remarks about the Romantic movement in, for example, the Rheinische Zeitung. However, with the organization of the workers5 movement and as the more political questions were discussed, the clearer it became to Marx that a simple reduction of linguistic problems was not possible. The reason for a more thoroughgoing concern with this question was the analysis of the liberation movements that mobilized the early workers5 movement: the Polish and then the Irish. Here, Marx recognized a relative dead weight of cultural organizational forms. In the case of the Irish question, this even provoked him to an outburst of free trade dogma. At the same time, analysis of the real difficulties of politicalrevolutionary undertakings (above all, consideration of the Paris Commune) led him to pose concrete political organization as an important question. Similarly, the social integration of the existing trade union organizations (above all, the English) compared to the “revolutionary elan' of the marginal movements became a problem for him.
另一方面，马克思主义分析关注现实、社会以及被“表面的”语言文化差异（“工人没有祖国”）所掩盖的关系。因此，我们可以解释《莱茵报》中关于浪漫主义运动的——姑且这么说——轻率言论。然而，随着工人运动的组织化以及政治问题的深入讨论，马克思愈发清楚地认识到，简单地将语言问题归结为某一因素是不可能的。对这个问题进行更深入的关注，缘于对早期工人运动中所动员的解放运动（波兰，然后是爱尔兰）的分析。在这里，马克思认识到文化组织形式的相对滞后性。就爱尔兰问题而言，这甚至激怒了他，让他迸发出自由贸易教条的言论。与此同时，对政治革命事业的实际困难的分析（尤其是对巴黎公社的考察）促使他将具体的政治组织摆在重要位置。 同样，现有工会组织（尤其是英国工会）的社会融合程度，与“边缘运动”的“革命热情”相比，也成了他关注的问题。

This led to a displacement that can be observed in Marx’s and Engels’s political writings in their numerous daily political contributions during their last years, and particularly in their letters. In the Second International, questions of culture moved into the foreground. However, they were always posed with a view to the world revolution: in the meantime, mobilizing as well as hindering cultural factors, including linguistic differences, were to be accommodated. This constellation then necessarily became worse under the conditions of “socialism in one country,' leading to the dogmatically imposed doctrinal versions of the Third International. Lenin had certainly seen the “residue' of the linguistic problem that was suppressed by this accentuation, but in his writings he limited himself to scheduling a systematic position of argumentation for this reflection.3
这导致了马克思和恩格斯在他们晚年众多日常政治贡献，特别是他们的信件中，政治著作中可观察到的位移。在第二国际，文化问题进入了前台。然而，它们始终是着眼于世界革命：与此同时，包括语言差异在内的文化因素，既能动员也能阻碍，都应予以考虑。在“一国社会主义”的条件下，这种局面必然恶化，导致了共产国际教条主义强加的教义版本。列宁无疑看到了这种强调所掩盖的语言问题“残余”，但在他的著作中，他仅限于为这种反思安排一个系统的论证立场。

This absence continues to take its revenge today: the repressed complex of a political analysis of linguistic questions can be seen in the theoretical scandal of the absence of an analytically clear position vis-à-vis the advent of regionalist movements (with the symptoms of the “dialect wave' here in Germany) or, even more dramatically, the emergence of “tribalist” tendencies in the revolutionary movements of the Third World. What one finds here are rather helpless recourses to citations from the classics with more or less moral-opportunistic concessions on the organizational-strategic level. In this perspective, we can see a particularly interesting aspect of Gramsci’s thought. Unlike these movements, he didn’t force his thinking into these templates and didn’t treat language problems abstractly “from above,” from the perspective of the existing or even of a future state, but from the perspective of social reproduction.
这种缺失至今仍在报复：对语言问题的政治分析的压抑复杂性，可见于区域主义运动兴起（例如德国的“方言浪潮”）或更具戏剧性的，第三世界革命运动中“部落主义”倾向的出现，在理论上缺乏清晰的分析立场。这里所发现的，更多的是对经典著作的无助引用，以及在组织策略层面上或多或少带有道德机会主义的让步。从这个角度看，葛兰西的思想尤其引人注目。与这些运动不同，他没有将自己的思想强加于这些模式，也没有从现有或未来国家的角度，抽象地从“上面”看待语言问题，而是从社会再生产的角度看待。

Gramsci brought particular presuppositions to this undertaking. Oriented toward Lenin’s thought and practice, he took up the tradition of the Marxist workers5 movement. However, as a trained linguist, he had, like almost no other in the workers’ movement before or after him, the conceptual instruments for analyzing questions of language systematically.4
葛兰西在这一事业中秉持着特别的预设。他致力于列宁的思想和实践，并继承了马克思主义工人运动的传统。然而，作为一名训练有素的语言学家，他拥有几乎在工人运动中任何其他人都没有的分析语言问题的系统化概念工具。

But for Gramsci, there was another decisive feature: as a Sardinian, he was immediately forced to deal with the contradictions of the Italian social modernization process. He could thus treat his analytical undertaking as a working out of his own subjective contradictions.5
但对葛兰西而言，还有一个决定性的特点：作为撒丁岛人，他立刻被迫面对意大利社会现代化进程的矛盾。因此，他可以将自己的分析工作视为自身主观矛盾的解决过程。

Gramsci left behind no closed theoretical work regarding linguistic questions, as he left little regarding other problems. His remarks must therefore be read in their particular context and should not be used as familiar quotations. This is the case with his early journalistic articles, written in the spirit of the organization of a revolutionary movement, just as for the later Prison Notebooks in which he reflected on the political defeat of the workers5 movement—and at the same time, according to a remark in a letter, sought to put his considerations into a form für ewig.6 The problem of language is continually found in a prominent position throughout his whole work. Until the very end, he had a plan for a historical-linguistic sociological presentation of Sardinian. For Gramsci, this undertaking was an indispensable part of his overall revolutionary project of the liberation of thought in the universal (critical) clarification of everything that is sedimented in an unclear form in “common sense” [Alltagsdenken],7 because otherwise it would always break out into action again as irrationality. To this extent, it required a systematic treatment from the “professional revolutionary” (which was how he conceived of himself), even more so, however, because for him such a critical liberation of thought was a revolutionary act.
葛兰西关于语言问题的理论著作并未形成完整的体系，这与他对其他问题的论述类似。因此，他的言论必须结合具体语境解读，不可作为简单的引文引用。这既适用于他早期的新闻文章，这些文章体现了组织革命运动的精神，也适用于他后来的《狱中札记》，其中他反思了工人运动的政治失败——同时，根据一封信中的评论，他试图将他的思考以一种“永恒”的形式呈现。语言问题贯穿他全部著作，始终占据突出地位。直到生命的最后，他都计划对撒丁岛的语言进行历史-语言-社会学研究。对于葛兰西而言，这项工作是他整体革命计划中不可或缺的一部分，旨在解放思想，以普遍（批判性）的视角阐明“常识”中所有沉淀不明确的东西，否则它总会以非理性形式再次爆发。 就此而言，它需要来自“职业革命家”（他就是这样看待自己的）的系统性处理，然而，更重要的是，因为他认为这种批判性的思想解放是一项革命行为。

The Linguistic-Political Point of Departure: “Popular Language”
语言政治的出发点：“大众语言”

The linguistic and thus educational relations in Italy led Gramsci to analyze a problem of cultural reproduction that appeared to have already been overcome in other bourgeois societies: the establishment of a national language and its anchoring in the popular education system. The debates of the Second International stood under the augury “knowledge is power” and thus the appropriation of the cultural legacy that was monopolized in the state apparatuses of education; popular literacy appeared to have been accomplished right up to the “margins” of society with the establishment of compulsory education. The pedagogical discussion of the late nineteenth century, however, knew better: even if it usually did not put in question the high or literary languages (high German, high French, etc.), it nevertheless clearly saw how illusionary an imposed official language [Oktroi] was that didn’t use the resources of the learner. In Germany, all throughout the nineteenth century there was the debate about language instruction that “picked up” the students5 spontaneously developed linguistic abilities (thus, as a rule, their dialect) and led them to a controlled appropriation of the literary language by means of reflection on the contrast between dialect and high language. In the last quarter of the nineteenth century, these methodological considerations were extended with the methodology of comparative linguistics and in particular their application to linguistic geography.8 In Italy, these debates were virulent after unification in 1861. On the side of the linguists, Graziadio Isaia Ascoli took up a position that brought to bear for Italy what were then the leading developments of German linguistics (neo-grammarians). He turned decisively against the then-propagated “Jacobinism” that comprehended the Risorgimento as an historical zero point and demanded the imposition of an artificial literary language, which was claimed to be predetermined due to the literary prestige of Tuscan (Alessandro Manzoni). In opposition, Ascoli provided a consistent linguistic-
意大利的语言及教育关系促使葛兰西分析了一个在其他资产阶级社会似乎已克服的文化再生产问题：建立民族语言及其在民众教育体系中的根植。第二国际的辩论笼罩在“知识即力量”的预言之下，因此，对被教育国家机器垄断的文化遗产的占有；普及识字率似乎已通过义务教育到达了社会的“边缘”。然而，19 世纪末的教育讨论却看得更清楚：即使通常不质疑高等或文学语言（高等德语、高等法语等），它仍然清楚地看到，一种不利用学习者资源的强加官方语言（强令）是多么的虚幻。 在德国，整个十九世纪，关于语言教学的争论都围绕着“汲取”学生们自发发展出的语言能力（因此，通常是他们的方言）并引导他们通过反思方言与高雅语言的对比来主动掌握书面语言展开。十九世纪最后四分之一，这些方法论的考虑又与比较语言学的方法，特别是其在语言地理学上的应用结合起来。在意大利，这些争论在 1861 年统一后变得激烈。语言学家方面，格拉齐亚迪奥·伊萨亚·阿斯科利（Graziadio Isaia Ascoli）采取了一种立场，为意大利带来了当时德国语言学（新语法学派）的领先发展。他坚决反对当时盛行的“雅各宾主义”，这种主义将复兴运动理解为历史的零点，并要求强加一种人为的书面语言，声称这种语言由于托斯卡纳语（亚历山德罗·曼宗尼）的文学声望而预先注定。反之，阿斯科利提供了一致的语言学

sociological argumentation. He showed that behind and within the question of the choice of the linguistic form there was the social problem of the socialization of education, in the foreground of which was the literacy of the great popular masses. Looking to historical development in Germany, Ascoli propagated literacy on the basis of the spontaneous language of the learner. He began from the supposition that becoming literate (for example, in a dialect) could be carried over to another language (the national language) unproblematically, because he saw in general the elaboration of a normative literary language as the endpoint of such a development.9
社会学论证。他表明，在语言形式选择问题背后和内部，存在着教育社会化的社会问题，其前台是广大民众的识字率。考察德国的历史发展，阿斯科利倡导以学习者的自发语言为基础的识字教育。他从一个假设出发，即掌握一种方言（例如）的识字能力可以毫无问题地迁移到另一种语言（国家语言），因为他普遍认为规范性文学语言的形成是这种发展的最终目标。

The Italian situation was and is still in certain respects more complex than the German one. Linguistic relations in Italy are distinguished by the extreme dialectal oppositions between north and south. There wasn’t a national cultural movement comparable to that which has taken place in Germany since the seventeenth century. In Germany, this movement, as a development of cultural decentralization, has devalued all regional forms in comparison to the literary language of “high German.” In Italy, language forms exist that are indeed closely related to Italian, but which are not to be assigned to it (Sardinian and Ladin), as well as the non-Romantic minorities of Albanian and Greek. Finally, the prestige-charged Tuscan literary dialect, in the wake of Dante and completely detached from the development of linguistic relations, functions as an additional factor hindering a national development, because reference to it explicitly excluded the real social centers of Rome and the north Italian industrial zones from the high cultural horizon. This confused cultural situation correlated with one of the highest rates of illiteracy in Europe.10
意大利的情况在某些方面仍然比德国更为复杂。意大利的语言关系以南北极端的方言差异为特征。意大利没有像德国自十七世纪以来发生的那样，具有可比的全国性文化运动。在德国，这场运动作为文化分散化的发展，贬低了所有区域形式，使其与“高德语”的文学语言相比显得逊色。在意大利，存在着与意大利密切相关的语言形式，但不能归属于意大利（如撒丁语和拉丁语），以及非浪漫语系的阿尔巴尼亚语和希腊语少数民族。最后，受但丁影响且完全脱离语言关系发展轨道的威望极高的托斯卡纳文学方言，作为额外的因素阻碍了民族发展，因为它明确地将罗马和北部意大利工业区排除在高文化视野之外。这种混乱的文化状况与欧洲最高的文盲率相对应。

This exerted an enormous pressure on Italian cultural politics. In the 1920s, language pedagogy finally officially changed to the use of the dialectal resources of the students. The methodological postulate “from dialect to language” became official school policy (formulated by Guiseppe Lombardo Radice). It was also retained as a constitutive component part of the forced modernization policy of fascism under Gentile’s ministry until 1931.11
这给意大利文化政策带来了巨大的压力。20 世纪 20 年代，语言教学最终正式转向学生方言资源的使用。方法论原则“从方言到语言”成为官方的学校政策（由吉乌塞佩·隆巴多·拉迪切提出）。在詹蒂莱部长任内，这也保留为法西斯强制现代化政策的构成部分，直至 1931 年。

As a linguist, Gramsci was familiar with these debates: in his early remarks on it, he explicitly named Ascoli as an authority. In an essay of 1918, he virtually paraphrased Ascoli’s argumentation.12 He developed, in
作为语言学家，葛兰西熟悉这些辩论：在他早期的相关评论中，他明确地将阿斯科利视为权威。1918 年的一篇论文中，他几乎完全概括了阿斯科利的论证。

a Crocean mode, the argument already presented by Ascoli, beginning from the “living” language (lingua vita) and counterposing “organic development” against the aloof “cosmopolitan” intellectuals. The linguistic form is precisely not arbitrarily available for linguistic political measures; it is not transparent for the therein “transported” content; rather, it is a determinate articulation of the relevant praxis which is itself an historical product. Linguistic form must be created after and then further developed in a creative process.13 How closely Gramsci was oriented to Croce in his earlier writing is demonstrated by repeated comments that the particular language form under consideration can only be judged according to the standard of the historically possible optimal embodiment in aesthetic literature.14
从克罗齐模式来看，阿斯柯里此前已提出的论点，从“活的”语言（lingua vita）出发，将“有机发展”与疏离的“世界主义”知识分子相对立。语言形式并非可随意用于语言政治措施；它并非其内“被运送”的内容的透明载体；相反，它是由相关的实践（自身是历史产物）决定的体现。语言形式必须在创造性过程中被创造出来，然后进一步发展。13 格拉姆斯基早期著作中与克罗齐的密切联系，体现在反复评论：所考虑的特定语言形式，只能根据其在美学文学中历史可能达到的最佳体现来判断。14

However, it was not a purely theoretical debate for Gramsci. He knew these problems as lived problems; this disrupts the extent of his Croceanism from the beginning. As a Sardinian who had to make his career in Italy at the expense of his own language, he had to live out these tensions himself. Stimulated by his teacher, Bartoli, he made it the object of his early scientific work (his early letters home to his family in Sardinia contain detailed questions regarding his home dialect).15 The later letters show that the theme remained a “living” one for him. Time and again he interspersed Sardinian expressions in these letters: whether in an excurse about dialect names for lizards in a letter to Tatiana (June 2, 1930); as intimate greetings to his son, Giuliano; but above all in the letters to his mother or those that are related to his mother, particularly her culinary specialties.16
然而，对葛兰西而言，这并非纯粹的理论争论。他将这些问题视为切身问题；这从一开始就打破了他对克罗齐主义的理解。作为一名在意大利谋求事业却不得不牺牲自己语言的撒丁岛人，他不得不亲身经历这些矛盾。受其老师巴尔托利的影响，他将其作为早期科学研究的对象（他写给撒丁岛家人的早期信件中包含关于家乡方言的详细问题）。15 后来的信件显示，该主题对他而言仍然是一个“活生生”的问题。他一次又一次地在这些信件中穿插撒丁语表达：无论是信中关于蜥蜴方言名称的闲聊（写给塔蒂亚娜的信，1930 年 6 月 2 日）；还是对儿子朱利亚诺的亲切问候；但最重要的是写给母亲或与母亲有关的信件，特别是关于母亲的烹饪特产。16

We can see how much the problem struck him above all in his pedagogical recommendations to his relatives. These letters, which were after all written as texts for readers, have in this regard perhaps a heavier weight than the notes in the Prison Notebooks. He prided himself on having rehearsed Sardinian songs with his son, Delio. In the same letter to Teresina of March 26, 1927, he disapproved of his niece, Edmea, for not being able to speak Sardinian (unlike his nephews).17 Almost as example of his agreement with the position taken up by the contemporary reform pedagogy on language development, he demanded that this should be played out spontaneously in the natural environment in which children are born. Edmea’s development confirmed that ex negativo: she clearly had difficulties with orthography.18
我们可以看到，这个问题尤其在他对亲属的教育建议中体现得淋漓尽致。这些信件，毕竟是写给读者看的文本，在这方面可能比《狱中札记》更具分量。他以和儿子德利奥一起练习萨丁岛歌曲为荣。在 1927 年 3 月 26 日的给特雷西娜的信中，他批评侄女埃德梅娅不会说萨丁语（不像他的侄子们）。17 几乎作为他认同当代改革教育学关于语言发展观点的例证，他要求语言发展应在儿童出生环境中自然而然地自发进行。埃德梅娅的发展从反面证实了这一点：她显然在正字法方面存在困难。18

Language is the expression of lived experiences (esperienze vissute),19 it is connected with them, and thus is not to be leapfrogged in development— otherwise, there will be hybrid results, a linguistic mishmash.20 However, Gramsci was a long way from any romanticism of rural living and nostalgia for dialects. The dialect was for him a more intimate linguistic terrain, which stood at the beginning of development—but which as a life-form that reversed the signs of development necessarily became a fetter. The lifeform that is written into the dialect “ties life to the church, to the family,” as he wrote drastically in an essay of 191721—conversation in dialect was sufficient for this life-form, but not however for its transformation.22
语言是生活体验（esperienze vissute）的表达，19 与之紧密相连，因此在发展中不可逾越——否则，将产生混合结果，一种语言的杂糅。20  然而，葛兰西与乡村生活的浪漫主义和对方言的怀旧情绪相去甚远。对他而言，方言是一个更私密的语言领域，它位于发展的起点——但作为一种逆转发展方向的生命形式，它必然成为束缚。方言中书写的生命形式“将生活与教堂、家庭联系起来”，正如他在 1917 年的一篇文章中犀利地写道 21——方言对话足以维持这种生命形式，但不足以使其转型。22

The Linguistic-Political Mirage: Universal Language
语言政治的幻象：通用语言

Gramsci was thus not unfamiliar with the themes of the Jacobin discourse or the devaluation of dialects as antiquated. They were also dominant in the linguistic discourse of the workers5 movement in the tradition of the French revolution. Since the First International they were not only a theoretical theme, but also present in a practical form: the “ancestors” had to struggle permanently with practical language questions, at international conferences as well as in contact with different sections, but also inside these, where regional teams continually naturally formed that practiced policies of linguistic exclusion (particularly against migrant workers). In certain aspects, these practical problems of the International were reflected in the abstract way in which linguistic questions were articulated in programmatic expressions. At the congresses of the First International the liberation of humanity by stages already in the present was demanded—for example, by means of the practice of an international language. These projects were nurtured by a multiplicity of projects for an international language, among which Esperanto was only one. The demand for a universal language that corresponds to human linguistic nature (often in connection with the radical orthography reform emphasized as “natural” or a demand for “phonography”)was propagated as a struggle against the unnatural limitation of human nature by the bourgeois states and their educational apparatuses. In the Roman federations such efforts had a certain significance; Gramsci also had to deal with them in his Turin section.23
因此，葛兰西并不陌生雅各宾话语的主题，以及对方言的贬低，视为过时之物。这些主题也在法国大革命传统的工人运动的语言话语中占主导地位。自第一国际以来，它们不仅是理论主题，还在实践中存在： “先辈们”必须持续应对实际的语言问题，在国际会议以及与不同支部接触时，亦在支部内部，因为区域团队不断自然形成，并实行语言排斥政策（尤其针对移民工人）。在某些方面，国际组织的这些实际问题反映在纲领性表述中对语言问题的抽象阐述。在第一国际的代表大会上，人们要求通过现今的阶段性实践来解放人类——例如，通过使用国际语言的实践。这些项目由多种国际语言项目滋养，其中世界语只是其中之一。 对与人类语言本性相符的通用语言的需求（通常与强调为“自然”的激进文字改革或对“音标文字”的需求联系在一起）被宣传为资产阶级国家及其教育机构对抗人类本性的非自然限制的斗争。在罗马联邦，这些努力具有一定的意义；葛兰西也在他的都灵支部中不得不处理它们。23

His clearest early expressions on the linguistic problematic occur in this context. In a polemical article of 1918 against the Esperanto movement, he explicitly makes recourse to the authority of linguistics.24 He argues fundamentally against any way of approaching questions of language “from above,” both in terms of Esperanto in the international context and in terms of the imposition [Oktroi] of an artificial national language in the national context. This can only be a formal state instrument of oppression (Gramsci takes aim here explicitly at purist attempts to exclude the variety of dialects). Here there is also the notion of language as expression of lived experiences, already noted above. Instead of making the linguistic form an ostensible problem, it must be a case of building up a new culture that entails a correspondingly new language. He denounced the opposed efforts as “cosmopolitanism.” The realization of the project of an international language is thus for Gramsci fundamentally linked to the realization of socialism.25
他关于语言问题的最清晰的早期表述出现在这个语境中。在 1918 年一篇针对世界语运动的论战文章中，他明确地诉诸语言学的权威。24 他从根本上反对任何从“上层”来探讨语言问题的方式，无论是在国际语境中的世界语，还是在国家语境中强加人工国语。这只能是压迫的正式国家工具（葛兰西在此明确地针对纯粹主义者排斥方言的多样性）。这里也有语言作为生活经验表达的观念，正如上面所述。与其将语言形式作为显而易见的问题，不如建立一种新的文化，从而带来相应的新的语言。他谴责这种对立的努力为“世界主义”。因此，对于葛兰西来说，实现国际语言的项目与实现社会主义从根本上是联系在一起的。25

Already a year before, in another article in the context of his militant engagement in the Turin workers5 movement, Gramsci clarified where he thought political linguistic reflection had to set to work: in the overcoming of the cultural barriers against social participation, in the struggle against illiteracy.26 Pointedly, he asserted that when the limitation of the local horizon is written into the dialectal language and life-form, obligatory school requirements can’t achieve anything either: they can certainly force school attendance, but not the transformation of a way of life in which writing is necessary and has meaning, that is, the urban life-form (of the city dwellers). Only from the perspective of this way of life does the development of language have its place; only here does there emerge “the necessity of writing and language” (both of which here characteristically stand against the dialect).
一年之前，在另一篇关于他参与都灵工人运动的文章中，葛兰西就阐明了政治语言反思应该如何开展：克服阻碍社会参与的文化壁垒，对抗文盲问题。26 他尖锐地指出，当地方视野的局限性写进方言语言和生活形式中时，强制性的学校要求也无法奏效：它们或许能强制学生入学，却无法改变一种将书写视为必要且有意义的生活方式，即城市生活方式（城市居民的生活方式）。只有从这种生活方式的角度出发，语言的发展才有其位置；只有在这里，才会出现“书写和语言的必要性”（两者在此都典型地与方言相对立）。

However, Gramsci displaces the problem not simply from the ostensible formal debate to the underlying social question. Rather, he is interested in the cultural determinations lying in the linguistic form. He continued this interest also in prison. The continuity of his thoughts, but also the clarity he gained, is demonstrated when, for example, he writes in Notebook 11:
然而，葛兰西并非仅仅将问题从表面的形式辩论转移到潜在的社会问题，更在于他关注语言形式中所蕴含的文化决定因素。他在狱中也继续保持着这种关注。例如，他在第 11 本笔记中所写的内容，体现了他思想的延续性，以及他所获得的清晰性。

Someone who only speaks dialect, or understands the standard language incompletely, necessarily has an intuition of the world which is more or less limited and provincial, which is fossilised and anachronistic in relation to the major currents of thought which dominate world history. His interests will be limited, more or less corporate or economistic, not universal.27
只会说方言，或者对标准语言理解不完全的人，必然拥有或多或少局限且地方化的世界观，相对于主导世界历史的重大思想潮流而言，这种世界观是僵化和过时的。他的兴趣将局限于或多或少企业或经济方面，而非普世。

A language-form expresses the experiences of a community. It cements the categories of experience in which the members of a community recognize each other and which make possible for them the unproblematic coordination of activity and agreement among each other—at the price of the reproduction of these structures. In this sense, Gramsci always says that language belongs together with the life-form organically, that every language [linguaggio] “contains the elements of a conception of the world and a culture.” With that, however, language represents at the same time a limitation of praxis, which is to be overcome through educational work in the perspective of its universalization. Universal in this sense, however, does not mean formally the same for all. The development of a national language is the development and sublation of particularism even if in national form: this remains related to the family of dialects that “dwell” under its roof; the local limitations will be overcome, without however losing the ground of the lived experiences. Culture is for Gramsci in this sense linked to linguistic translatability, which for him, to a certain extent, by definition only occurs between national languages, related to the universal contents that are articulated in culturally specific forms. For the dialects, as symbolic expression of particular cultural praxes, that is excluded.28
一种语言形式表达了一个社群的经验。它确立了社群成员相互认定彼此经验的范畴，并使他们能够顺利协调活动和达成共识——以这些结构的再生产为代价。从这个意义上说，葛兰西始终认为语言与生活形式有机地联系在一起，每一种语言“都包含着世界观和文化的要素”。然而，语言同时也是实践的限制，需要通过旨在使其普遍化的教育工作来克服。在这里，普遍并不意味着形式上对所有人的相同。民族语言的发展是特殊主义的发展和扬弃，即使是以民族形式：这仍然与在其“屋檐”下“居住”的方言家族有关；地方限制将被克服，但不会失去生活经验的基础。 对于葛兰西而言，文化在这个意义上与语言的可翻译性相关联，而对他来说，这种可翻译性在一定程度上，原则上仅发生在民族语言之间，与以文化特定形式表达的普世内容相关。对于方言，作为特定文化实践的象征性表达，则被排除在外。28

Liberation of Labor, Liberated Language
劳动的解放，语言的解放

Gramsci overcomes the aporia of the language debate of his times (which remains operative to a certain extent even today) by mediating “dialectically,” on the one hand, the Romantic emphasis that stressed the spontaneity of the natural tongue (the dialect) with, on the other hand, the Enlightenment-Jacobin pathos of progressiveness of the universal language. In order to do this he uses the vitalizing terms of lived praxis: the life of language and organic cohesion. The linguistic-political question was presented to him not as a decision between competing linguistic forms or varieties, but rather as work on the language, as working out of the potential of spontaneous linguistic forms and thus at the same time as their valorization. The dialect is not to be repressed, but also not to be jumped over. Rather, it is to be elaborated into a universal language that is not a completely other language, or a fixed form as such (thus Gramsci’s polemic against any form of purism!), but a flexible instrument in the life-forms in transformation. The elaboration of language is therefore for him necessarily linked to the socialist social project.29
葛兰西通过调和同时代的语言论争的困境（这种困境在今天某种程度上依然存在），一方面是强调自然语言（方言）自发性的浪漫主义思潮，另一方面是强调普适语言进步性的启蒙运动—雅各宾派思潮。“辩证”地克服了这一困境。他运用充满活力的生活实践术语：语言的生命力和有机联系。语言政治问题在他看来并非是选择相互竞争的语言形式或变体，而是对语言的改造，是发展自发性语言形式的潜力，从而同时提升其价值。方言不应被压制，也不应被轻易跳过。相反，它应被提升为一种普适语言，这种语言并非完全不同的语言，也不是一种固定的形式（因此葛兰西反对任何形式的纯粹主义！），而是一个在不断变化的生活形式中灵活运用的工具。对他而言，语言的完善必然与社会主义社会项目联系在一起。

Here we find the same emphatic mode of argumentation that we also encounter in Marx’s writings, which sometimes makes it difficult to separate analytical from empirical statements. Education doesn’t mean the appropriation of something completely other, but rather the development of the potential that the learners bring along with them. Thus the Prison Notebooks are pervaded by formulations such as “all men are intellectuals,” which function as pointed comments of the scandal that characterizes an organization of society in which this fundamental human determination is not valid and operative. They are thought as contra-determinations for the analysis of the existing (and insofar, precisely those that have to be transformed) relations: “not all men have the function of intellectuals in the society.”30 But intellectual potential is also manifested in the praxis that is not correspondingly valorized: namely, in common sense [Alltagsdenken], with its contradictions. Lived experience is the necessary point of departure for any educational work and thus also for any linguistic work. Rendering coherent spontaneous philosophy, the philosophy of the nonphilosophers, can only succeed through objectivization in language [linguaggio]. This is the reason for the close linkage of language and writing, in opposition to dialects: the communal praxis of oral conversation is embedded in the flux of the immediate happening, of the interactive constellation. Only through the objectivization of language in writing do the heterogeneous moments become comprehensible and linguistic critique becomes accessible.31
在这里，我们发现与马克思著作中相同的强调论证模式，这有时使得难以区分分析性陈述与经验性陈述。教育并非完全获取外在事物，而是发展学习者自身所拥有的潜能。因此，“狱中札记”充斥着诸如“所有的人都是知识分子”之类的表述，这些表述是对一种社会组织方式的丑闻进行尖锐评论，在这种社会组织方式中，这种根本的人类属性并非有效和运作。它们被视为对现有（并且因此，正是那些必须被改变的）关系进行分析的反决定因素：“并非所有的人在社会中都具有知识分子功能”。30 但知识潜能也在相应的价值未被体现的实践中展现出来：即，在包含矛盾的常识[Alltagsdenken]中。生活经验是任何教育工作以及任何语言工作必要的出发点。 将非哲学家的自发哲学，即连贯的自发哲学，以语言（linguaggio）客观化才能成功。这是语言与书写紧密联系，而非方言的原因所在：口语对话的共同实践植根于当下事件的流变之中，即互动星座。只有通过书面语言的客观化，异质的时刻才能变得可理解，语言批判才能被获取。31

Language is not a fixed formally definable system, but rather, liberated praxis. Gramsci’s remarks about working on language must be read together with his extensive comments on the liberation of labor (cf. above all the articles from the time of the Turin factory councils). Praxis necessarily contains moments that exceed its (externally determined) organization in the reproduction process; liberated praxis develops these surplus moments.32 With the development of the capitalist production process (which for the young Gramsci is still an inevitable law), workers increasingly appropriate the intelligence entrapped in the means of production. They are thus pressured into forms of self-organization (thus also to a transformation of the language praxis on the job), which tendentiously increases their access to moments of the social organization of labor. They become intellectuals, who shape the forms of labor organization in employment itself: liberation of labor, valorization of labor as intellectual and liberation of language constitute a situation whose realization is only possible in communism.33
语言并非一个固定的、形式可定义的系统，而是一种解放的实践。葛兰西关于语言工作的说法必须结合他关于劳动解放的广泛评论一起阅读（特别是都灵工厂委员会时期文章）。实践必然包含超越其（外在决定的）再生产过程组织的时刻；解放的实践发展了这些剩余时刻。32 随着资本主义生产过程的发展（对于年轻的葛兰西来说，这仍然是一条不可避免的法则），工人日益掌握被困在生产工具中的智慧。因此，他们被迫采取自我组织的形式（从而也导致了工作场所语言实践的转变），这倾向于增加他们获得劳动社会组织时刻的机会。他们成为知识分子，在就业本身中塑造劳动组织形式：劳动的解放、劳动作为智力的提升以及语言的解放构成了一个只有在共产主义中才能实现的局面。33

Linguistic-Theoretical Generalizations
语言理论概括

Gramsci had thus found a theoretical starting point that enabled him to overcome prevalent short-circuited reductions of linguistics. Nevertheless, we still should not expect to find a closed theoretical system. We should not only attend to the “passages” in which the word language itself appears, for it is precisely in these that Gramsci is caught up in the vitalistic forms of expression of the early twentieth century. One must work out his linguistic theory to a certain extent against the written word.34
葛兰西因此找到了一个理论起点，使他能够克服语言学领域盛行的简化和片面理解。然而，我们仍然不应期待一个封闭的理论体系。我们不仅应该关注“语言”一词出现的“段落”，因为正是在这些段落中，葛兰西陷入了二十世纪初的生命主义表达形式。人们必须在一定程度上从书面文字中推演他的语言学理论。

Gramsci’s argumentation is based on a radical historicization of the concept of praxis, which he comprehended on the basis of the current material conditions of reproduction. In this context, language praxis (spoken language) becomes comprehensible as an exceptional moment.35
葛兰西的论证基于对实践概念的激进历史化，他理解实践是建立在当前的物质再生产条件之上的。在这种语境下，语言实践（口语）成为一个特殊的时刻。

The point of departure is perhaps most evident in the early writings on the factory councils. Labor is determined by, respectively, the relations of production and the culture linked with them. In a very optimistic argument that sounds like something from the Proletkult, Gramsci comprehends the development of capitalism as an increasing displacement of organizing activities into production itself. The decisions are then no longer made outside, but by the producers themselves, the qualified factory workers and the “technical intelligence.”
出发点或许在早期关于工厂委员会的著作中最为明显。劳动力分别由生产关系及其相关的文化所决定。在听起来像是来自“无产阶级文化”的非常乐观的论证中，葛兰西理解资本主义的发展，是组织活动日益向生产本身的转移。然后，决策不再由外部做出，而是由生产者自己，即合格的工厂工人和“技术智慧”做出。

Here is the criterion for an analytical concept of intelligence: organizing intervention in production. Capitalist property and domination relations, however, in the end prevent the realization of the free disposal of intelligence in the production process, because the state power apparatus secures external determination in production; the final liberation of labor is therefore only possible as a form of liberated living together (he speaks expressly of convivenza umana)36 in communist society. Intelligence stands here against the purely instrumental dimensions of the labor process (operare tecnicamente, industrialmente), for the moment of autonomy.
智力的分析概念标准是：组织生产中的干预。然而，资本主义的财产关系和统治关系最终阻碍了生产过程中智力的自由支配，因为国家权力机构确保了生产中的外部决定；因此，劳动的最终解放只能以共产主义社会中解放的共同生活（他明确提到了 convivenza umana）的形式实现。智力在这里与劳动过程的纯粹工具维度（operare tecnicamente, industrialmente）相对立，代表着自主性时刻。

In the later works, Gramsci then grasped the analysis of the industrial labor process more realistically and defined the analytic concept of intelligence more exactly. In a radicalization of these considerations, he subsumed the activities of the “Taylorized intelligence” to be addressed “intellectually” as totally externally determined activity under operare tecnicamente; in this sense he speaks of the school as an intellectual Taylorization, which precisely does not develop the above-addressed intellectual-linguistic potential of the students.37
在后期的著作中，葛兰西对工业劳动过程的分析更加现实，并更精确地界定了“智力”这一分析概念。在对这些观点的激进化阐释中，他将“泰勒化智力”的活动归纳为完全受 operare tecnicamente 外在决定的活动，并将其视为需要“智力”上的处理；从这个意义上说，他将学校比作一种智力的泰勒化，它恰恰没有发展学生上述的智力-语言潜力。37

For Gramsci language is to be analyzed against the background of self/external determination. Where this is externally determined, the potential of the language is reduced to the more or less ritualized reproduction of forms of intercourse. Linguistically, it can be largely substituted by nonverbal gestures, as in communicatively trusted interactions; here we encounter Gramsci’s dictum of the narrowmindedness of local forms of speech. It is otherwise if the relations are not reproduced behind the backs of the subjects, but are instead controlled by them. A symbolic control is then particularly necessary, if, as in more developed social forms with a developed social division of labor, the relations are not immediately manageable, but only become accessible through a symbolic synthesis.
对于葛兰西而言，语言应在自我/外部决定论的背景下进行分析。当语言受外部决定时，其潜力便会降低为对交往形式的或多或少程式化的再现。在语言学上，它在交流上可信赖的互动中，很大程度上可以被非言语性姿态所取代；在这里，我们遇到了葛兰西关于地方语言狭隘性的论断。如果关系并非在主体背后被再现，而是由主体控制，情况则会不同。如果，如同在社会分工发达的更发达的社会形态中，关系并非立即可控，而只能通过象征性综合才能获得，那么象征性控制就显得尤为必要。

That is valid for the self-ascertainment of the conditions of action no less than for the assurance of social consensus, insofar as it is not only a case of conformity, which is possible pre-linguistically or at the “zero point” of language to a certain extent in relations of external determination, but is a case of organized efforts for the transformation of relations.38
这对于行动条件的自觉把握，至少与社会共识的保障一样有效，因为这不仅是某种程度上的遵从，在外部决定关系中，甚至在语言的“零点”前，就已经是可能的；而且是关系转型有组织的努力。38

A further consideration here can highlight the short-circuit of the linguistic-theoretical functionalisms, often also presented as “materialist”: genetically, languages can be developed out of the conditions of the coordination of action (that is also to be tracked ontogenetically, where social praxis is antecedent for the child who orients himself on the praxis of the parents). But when the categories of language praxis are developed, they exhibit a symbolic excess over the functional finalizations, which can be used for the making sense and ascertainment of the goals of action. This process is repeated in a more potent form with writing, which is similarly learned in communicative relationships (and thus is perhaps also socially developed), which, however, has potentials for the development of processes of meaning that are free, released from the communicative stress of interaction. Admittedly, the realization of potentials does not follow inevitably from being practiced, as demonstrated by everyday ("phatic”) speaking as well as utility-writing (communicative marks as substitute for oral communication). Not by chance, Gramsci linked discussion of the developed language to writing in the binomian formula alphabet and language [linguaggio].
此处进一步考虑可以凸显语言理论功利主义（通常也被称为“唯物主义”）的短路现象：从遗传学角度看，语言可以由行动协调的条件发展而来（这也需要在个体发生学上进行追踪，其中社会实践对以父母的实践为导向的儿童而言是先于语言的）。但是，当语言实践的范畴发展起来时，它们在功能目标上表现出象征性的超额，这可以用于理解和确定行动的目标。这一过程在书写中以更强烈的形式重复，书写同样是在交流关系中习得的（因此或许也是社会发展的结果），然而，它具有发展自由、摆脱互动交流压力的意义生成过程的潜力。诚然，潜力的实现并非必然源于实践，正如日常的（“寒暄的”）言语以及实用性书写（作为口头交流替代的交流标记）所证明的那样。 并非偶然，葛兰西将发达语言与二元字母表中的书写和语言联系起来。

The linguistic-theoretical approaches of Gramsci are thus to be taken up culturally and analytically: as dynamic analysis from the perspective of the liberation of praxis but also from the perspective of the limitations that are immanent to the historical language forms and relations (thus Gramsci’s determined opposition to all projects that codify language forms normatively).
因此，葛兰西的语言理论方法应从文化和分析的角度加以探讨：作为从实践解放视角，以及从历史语言形式和关系的内在局限性视角进行的动态分析（因此，葛兰西坚决反对所有规范化语言形式的项目）。

Language and Intelligence: Traditional and Organic Intellectuals
语言与智力：传统与有机知识分子

The following comments are related to Gramsci’s own formulations quite loosely. They are only to be taken in regard to his analysis of the intellectuals in which he clarifies in particular the relation of analytical and empirical concepts. Similar to Marx (one thinks of the opalescent category of the “total worker”)，Gramsci has great difficulties in making a division of the two categories; in his early writings, this is not even present.39
以下评论与葛兰西的自身表述关系较为松散。它们仅应被视为关于他对于知识分子分析的评论，其中他特别阐明了分析性概念和经验性概念的关系。类似于马克思（人们会想到“总体工人”这个朦胧的概念），葛兰西在区分这两个范畴方面存在很大困难；在他早期的著作中，甚至不存在这种区分。

Gramsci’s essay on “The Southern Question” of 1926 plays a key role for the development of his thought in this regard (incidentally, it was the last work that he prepared for publication, first published in Paris in 1930).40 Conceptual clarification occurs here, which is then later strengthened in the Prison Notebooks, under the pressure of the changed political problem: how was it possible that fascism could take power? (Here, differently from in the Prison Notebooks, Gramsci does not yet assume a fundamental defeat of the workers5 movement, but a “transitional period.”)Intelligence plays a key role in this context, both as a socially comprehensible group (gruppo or strato sociale), which he can identify as people (here he plays ironically with the suffixes一iotti, iali and so on, which is hard to approximate in German [or English]), as well as in an analytical sense, as the question regarding the articulation of social consciousness. He thus turns, more or less explicitly, against any type of economistic reduction of consciousness and emphasizes the relative autonomy of the linguistic problematic.41 Articulation can integrate praxis in social reproduction; however, it can also destabilize it and “disarticulate” the “ruling bloc” (that is the role of the left intellectuals); finally, it can also articulate a revolutionary praxis (that is the role of intellectuals in the communist parties). He defines here the social function of intellectuals as social cement [soziales Bindemittel] (collegamento organico).
1926 年葛兰西的“南方问题”文章对于他思想的发展起着关键作用（顺便一提，这是他最后为出版准备的作品，1930 年在巴黎首次出版）。40  此处出现了概念澄清，之后在《狱中札记》中，在变化的政治问题压力下得到了加强：法西斯主义是如何上台的？（在这里，与《狱中札记》不同，葛兰西尚未假设工人运动的根本失败，而是一个“过渡时期”。）智识分子在这个语境中扮演着关键角色，既是一个社会上可理解的群体（gruppo 或 strato sociale），他可以将其识别为特定的人群（此处他以讽刺的方式玩弄后缀-iotti、-iali 等等，这在德语（或英语）中难以近似），也以分析意义上的社会意识的阐释问题出现。因此，他或多或少明确地反对任何形式的经济决定论对意识的简化，并强调语言问题的相对自主性。41 论述可以将实践融入社会再生产；然而，它也可以破坏社会再生产，并“解构” “统治集团”（即左翼知识分子的作用）；最后，它还可以论述革命实践（即共产党员知识分子作用）。他在这里将知识分子的社会功能定义为社会粘合剂[soziales Bindemittel]（有机联系）。

As a social group, the intellectuals are related to their social environment, embedded in the noncontemporaneous development of society. The “traditional intellectuals” (for Gramsci, the “great intellectual,” Croce is a prime representative) work in the sense of social reproduction as it still determines relations in the south. They thus stabilize in the first instance the dominant relations of the great landowners. The left intellectuals in the (large) cities of the industrialized north, on the other hand, are organically linked to the emancipatory struggles of the working class.
作为社会群体，知识分子与社会环境相关，嵌入于社会非同时性发展之中。“传统知识分子”（对于葛兰西而言，“伟大知识分子”，克罗齐是其主要代表）的工作方式，在于社会再生产，它仍然决定着南方地区的社会关系。因此，他们首先稳定了大地主阶级的统治关系。另一方面，工业化北方（大）城市的左翼知识分子，则有机地联系着工人阶级的解放斗争。

The social function of intellectuals thus results from how they act upon social oppositions of interests. Here the empirical concept overlaps with the analytical one. “Organic intellectuals” are一in an analytical sense一the intellectuals involved in social reproduction (indispensable for it). The task of left intelligence is to disarticulate the ruling discursive structures that guarantee the reproduction of relations, that is, to undertake an educational work that rearticulates these discursive structures in the perspective of social transformation.42
知识分子的社会功能因此源于他们如何应对社会利益的冲突。此处经验概念与分析概念重叠。“有机知识分子”——从分析意义上讲——是指参与社会再生产（且对其至关重要）的知识分子。左翼知识分子的任务是解构保障关系再生产的统治性话语结构，也就是说，开展一种从社会变革角度重新构建这些话语结构的教育工作。

To a certain extent, the empirical composition of intellectuals forms the material basis for their social role, as Gramsci shows particularly clearly for the formal-universal European orientation of the “intellectuals of the south.” These intellectuals jump over the necessary critical development of common sense [Alltagsdenken] and channel its revolutionary potential into the reproduction of existing relations. In the same context Gramsci makes very clear how the heterogeneity of commonsense functions—for example, when he shows the collusion of the traditional peasant anticlericalism with actual control by the Catholic hierarchy.43
在一定程度上，知识分子的经验构成其社会角色的物质基础，正如葛兰西尤其清晰地展示了“南方知识分子”的正式普遍欧洲取向。这些知识分子跳过了常识[Alltagsdenken]必要的批判性发展，并将它的革命潜力导向现有关系的再生产。在同样的语境中，葛兰西非常清楚地阐明了常识的异质性功能——例如，当他展示了传统农民的反教权主义与天主教等级实际控制的勾结时。

These contradictions are amalgamated diffusely in concrete praxis, not least insignificantly precisely in a discursive praxis that occurs on the basis of the local forms of communication. The “shadows of the church” inscribed into the dialect then fulfill their regulative function of sieving experience.
这些矛盾在具体的实践中弥散地融合在一起，尤其是在以地方交流形式为基础的言说实践中。方言中铭刻的“教堂的阴影”随后发挥其规范功能，对经验进行筛选。

“Traditional intellectuals” like Croce therefore function as organic intellectuals, despite the fact that their role had been superannuated by the capitalist development of Italy, because they contribute to the reproduction of the bourgeois state in the sense of the noncontemporaneity of development in a “modern” way: the rebellious moments of the peasant “popular culture” is disarticulated by the organic intellectuals of the great landowners; a progressive politics requires their rearticulation, which applies “nationally” to the commonalities of the north Italian proletariat and the south Italian small farmers and workers (the islands, in particular Sardinia, belong in the way of thinking of the south). The role of intellectuals in an analytical sense is thus determined by their key function in the development of linguistic potential.
因此，像克罗齐这样的“传统知识分子”尽管意大利的资本主义发展已经使他们的角色过时，却仍然发挥着有机知识分子的作用，因为他们以一种“现代”方式，通过发展的不同步性，促进了资产阶级国家的再生产：大地主的有机知识分子瓦解了农民“大众文化”的反抗时刻；一种进步的政治需要重新构建这些时刻，将其“全国性”地应用于北意大利无产阶级和南意大利小农及工人的共同点（特别是撒丁岛，在思维方式上属于南方）。知识分子在分析意义上的作用，因此取决于他们在发展语言潜能中的关键功能。

By monopolizing descriptive language relations as articulated praxis, the traditional intellectual functions for the benefit of the reproduction of capitalist relations in the cultural apparatuses (Gramsci speaks in this context sarcastically of intellectuals as the “commissars” of the system). Such an intellectual helps a language representation to achieve social validity, based upon aesthetic virtuosity in dealing with the complex norms of the school language. For the majority of the population, however, these are founded in the obligatory school confrontation with the inferiority problems that were traumatic for them, and are the basis for the meritocratic consensus of social reproduction.44
通过垄断描述性语言关系作为体现的实践，传统知识分子功能服务于在文化机构中资本主义关系的再生产（葛兰西在此语境下讽刺性地将知识分子称为系统的“政治委员”）。这种知识分子帮助语言表征获得社会效力，基于在处理学校语言的复杂规范方面的审美技巧。然而，对于大多数人口而言，这些根植于他们必须面对的学校教育中与自卑相关的创伤性问题，并且是社会再生产的功利主义共识的基础。

An historical linguistic analysis that begins from Gramsci’s premises will therefore treat language not on the basis of its aesthetic appearance. It is aimed against the existence of a particular layer of professional purveyors of sense. Its goal is the reappropriation of intellectuals and thus also language by the producers themselves.45
从葛兰西的前提出发的历史语言学分析，因此不会以语言的审美表象为基础。它针对的是特定意义贩卖者的专业阶层的存在。其目标是生产者自身重新占有知识分子，以及由此也重新占有语言。

Linguistic Reflection and Political Intervention
语言反思与政治干预

Gramsci was no pure theorist; he wrote as a politician, as a “professional revolutionary,” as he described himself on numerous occasions. This consideration of intellectuals and language also responds to a practical-political problem: in the early writings, the problem of the organization of workers5 struggles on the left wing of the party; in prison, the problem of the analysis of the defeat of the workers5 movement by fascism and the mechanisms of social reproduction that fascism stabilized.
葛兰西并非纯粹的理论家；他以政治家的身份，以“职业革命家”的身份写作，正如他多次自我描述的那样。这种对知识分子和语言的考量也回应了一个实际的政治问题：在早期著作中，问题在于组织工人左翼党内的斗争；在狱中，问题在于分析工人运动被法西斯主义击败的原因以及法西斯主义所稳定化的社会再生产机制。

However, it was precisely fascism一or rather collusion with fascist power on a mass basis—that demanded a clarification of the connection of language and intellectuals: the corporative mechanisms of the fascist system built upon the limitation of social critique that were inscribed in the local language forms.46
然而，正是法西斯主义——或者更确切地说，大规模地与法西斯权力勾结——要求阐明语言与知识分子之间的联系：法西斯体制的企业机制建立在地方语言形式中固有的社会批判的限制之上。

Gramsci’s perspective is not that of antimodernist resentment, of antistatal revolts (which is nevertheless still noticeable in the young Gramsci). That makes him extraordinarily contemporary, not only due to the already-initially noted continuity of objective problems. In a confused discussion, however, Gramsci is now being reclaimed precisely by those who refer to positions “on the basis of the stomach." This is precisely what Pasolini (whose Scritti Corsari has enjoyed such success in Germany) does, for example, in a fascinating way (in Germany, at any rate). Pasolini articulates the revolts against the “americanization" of life, which he explicitly refers to as “fascism." As impressive as is his analysis of the expropriation of popular culture, for which he also reclaims explicitly Gramscian premises,47 so little is his gesture of revolt in the sense of Gramsci’s analytical project. What is ambivalently present in Gramsci’s early writings is unequivocal in Pasolini: the rebellious gesture stands against the externally determined homogenization of everyday language (noticeably, Croce’s opposition of the dominance of communicative and expressive language is present in Pasolini).48 In the position of retreat is the oral, as a natural state to a certain extent, as a barrier against writing, which for him necessarily refers to statai control. What is lost in this emotionally charged opposition is that which Gramsci had worked out in his continual confrontation with the contradictions of his own early position: that linguistic reflection should be related to the potentials of humans, to the possibilities of an educational work that leads to the liberation of labor and thus to the liberation of language.49 On the way to this, there is still much analytical work that needs to be done.
葛兰西的视角并非反现代主义的怨恨，也不是反国家主义的反抗（尽管在年轻的葛兰西身上仍可见到这种迹象）。这使得他极具当代性，不仅因为客观问题的持续性（正如先前已指出的那样）。然而，在一次混乱的讨论中，葛兰西如今正被那些援引“以胃为基础”立场的人们重新诠释。例如，帕索里尼（其《海盗文集》在德国如此成功）以一种引人入胜的方式（至少在德国是这样）做了类似的事情。帕索里尼阐述了对生活“美国化”的反抗，他明确将其称为“法西斯主义”。尽管他对大众文化的剥夺进行了令人印象深刻的分析，为此他也明确地借鉴了葛兰西的前提，但他的反抗姿态与葛兰西的分析项目相去甚远。葛兰西早期著作中存在的矛盾态度，在帕索里尼那里却非常明确：反抗姿态针对的是日常语言被外部决定的同质化（值得注意的是，克罗齐将沟通和表达语言的统治对立起来的观点，在帕索里尼的作品中有所体现）。48 撤退的位置是口语，在某种程度上是一种自然状态，作为一种抵御书面语的屏障，后者对他必然涉及状态控制。这种充满情感对抗的立场中所丢失的是葛兰西在其与自身早期立场的矛盾持续对抗中所阐述的：语言反思应与人类的潜能联系起来，与一种教育工作的可能性联系起来，该工作最终能解放劳动力，从而解放语言。49 在通往这一目标的道路上，仍有许多分析工作有待完成。

Notes 笔记

1. On the contemporary relevance of Gramsci, see Giorgio Baratta, “Gramsci befrien,” Das Argument, Heft 162 (1987): 236-49. In Italy, Gramsci has since become one of the standard references in linguistic-sociological discussion: cf. Tullio De Mauro, Storia Linguistica dell'Italia Unita, two vols. (Bari: Laterza, 1963; second edition 1976), and Lingua e Dialetti nella Cultura Italiana da Dante a Gramsci (Florence: Casa editrice G. D’Anna, 1980), or the extensive anthology of Maurizio Vitale, La Questione della Lingua (Palermo: Palumbo, 1978). In the German Democratic Republic [East Germany], Klaus Bochmann has now created the preconditions for linguistic work on Gramsci: on the one hand, with his selected volume 1984; on the other hand, with the organization of a conference on Gramsci in Leipzig in 1986 (see my conference report in Das Argument, Heft 164 (1987): 564). I am indebted to the contributions to this conference, particularly those of Jürgen Erfurt and Michael Grabek, for important stimuli for the following essay. I am also grateful to Michale Bommes for critical remarks on a first version of the manuscript.
1. 关于葛兰西的当代意义，参见乔治·巴拉塔，“葛兰西的友谊”，《论证》杂志，第 162 期（1987）：236-49 页。在意大利，葛兰西已成为语言社会学讨论的标准参考之一：参见图利奥·德·毛罗，《统一意大利的语言史》，两卷（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1963 年；第二版 1976 年），以及《从但丁到葛兰西的意大利文化中的语言和方言》（佛罗伦萨：G. D’Anna 出版社，1980 年），或马里奥·维塔莱的巨著《语言问题》（巴勒莫：帕伦博出版社，1978 年）。在民主德国[东德]，克劳斯·博赫曼为葛兰西的语言研究创造了先决条件：一方面，通过他 1984 年的选集；另一方面，通过 1986 年在莱比锡组织的葛兰西研讨会（见我在《论证》杂志第 164 期（1987）：564 页的会议报告）。我感谢该研讨会，特别是尤尔根·埃尔福特和迈克尔·格拉贝克的贡献，为本文提供了重要的启发。我还要感谢米歇尔·波姆斯对本文初稿的批评意见。

2. This is not the place to trace the history of political reflections on language, which is still to be written. In agreement regarding the structure of this argument are such opposed movements as, in Germany, the nationalism of “Turnvater” Jahn and the Burschenschaften; in Italy, Mazzini; in the Slavic world, Bakunin and others. Some references to the Marxist wing’s confrontation with these positions until the end of the Second International can be found in Utz Maas, Sprachpolitk und Politische Sprachwissenschaft (Frankfurt: Suhrkamp, 1979), 66-112.
2. 此处并非追溯政治对语言反思历史的场所，这项工作仍有待完成。关于本论证结构的共识，包括德国的“体操之父”雅恩和学生会民族主义，意大利的马志尼，以及斯拉夫世界的巴枯宁等人，这些彼此对立的思潮都达成了一致。关于马克思主义阵营直至第二国际末期与这些立场的冲突，可参阅乌兹·马斯著《语言政治与政治语言学》（法兰克福：苏尔坎普出版社，1979），第 66-112 页。

3. In the question of the self-determination of nations, central for political organization (above all in confrontation with the Jewish "Bund”)，Lenin differentiated between the national (to a certain extent congruent with the state) form of political organization of a party and the content of its politics, of the “international culture” (see Vladimir I. Lenin, “Critical Remarks on the National Question,” in Lenin Collected Works, vol. 20 (Moscow: Progress Publishers, various years), 33-51. Subsequently, this was turned into a dogma to a certain extent, which Stalin repeatedly developed: “national in form, but socialist (international) in content”——developed extensively, for example, in Joseph Stalin, “Political Report of the Central Committee to the Sixteenth Congress of the C.P.S.U. (B.), June 27, 1930,” in Works, vol. 12 (Moscow: Progress Publishers, 1949), 242-365.
3. 在民族自决问题上，列宁（尤其是在与犹太“邦德”的对抗中）将政治组织的民族形式（在一定程度上与国家相符）与其政治内容——“国际文化”——区分开来。（见列宁《论民族问题批判意见》，《列宁全集》第 20 卷，莫斯科：进步出版社，不同年份，第 33-51 页）。此后，这在一定程度上被转化为教条，斯大林反复加以发展：“形式上民族的，但内容上社会主义的（国际的）”——例如，在斯大林《致苏共十六大中央委员会的政治报告》（1930 年 6 月 27 日），《斯大林全集》第 12 卷，莫斯科：进步出版社，1949 年，第 242-365 页中得到了广泛阐述。

4. Franco Lo Piparo, Lingua, Intellettuali, Egemonia in Gramsci (Bari: Laterza, 1979), has reconstructed in detail Gramsci’s development as a linguist and the traces of his linguistic formation in later work. Extensive references here are therefore unnecessary. In the labor movement the obvious parallel is Engels, who, as an autodidact, reaped the harvest of the philology of his day in an extraordinarily capable manner: he applied his knowledge not only to the Plattdeutsch relations he knew (where his original linguistic-sociological considerations today are being rediscovered), but also in relation to the Irish, in order to undertake foundational studies for daily political interventions. The parallel of Engels and Gramsci would be an attractive object of investigation.
4. 法兰克·洛·皮帕罗（Franco Lo Piparo），《葛兰西的语言、知识分子和霸权》（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1979），详细重建了葛兰西作为语言学家的发展历程，以及其语言素养在后世著作中的痕迹。因此，此处无需进行大量的参考文献。在劳工运动中，显而易见的对应是恩格斯。作为自学成才者，他以非凡的能力收获了当时语言学的成果：他不仅应用自己对普鲁士低地德语（目前人们正在重新发现他最初的语言社会学思考）的了解，还在爱尔兰语方面进行研究，为日常政治干预奠定基础。恩格斯和葛兰西的比较研究将是一个吸引人的研究对象。

5. For a linguistic-sociological overview of the development of linguistic relations in Sardinia, see Eduardo Blasco Ferrer, Storia Linguistica della Sardegna (Tübingen: Niemeyer, 1984). In the workers5 movement, there is in this respect an informative parallel to Gramsci: Rosa Luxemburg, whose sensibility for linguistic-political problems is undoubtedly linked to her marginality as Pole in the political constellation of the time (see Maas, Sprachpolitik, 66-112).
5. 欲了解撒丁岛语言关系发展的语言社会学概述，请参阅爱德华多·布拉斯科·费雷尔（Eduardo Blasco Ferrer）的《撒丁岛语言史》（图宾根：尼迈耶，1984）。工人运动方面，在此方面，葛兰西（Gramsci）亦有相关的、值得参考的平行之处：罗莎·卢森堡（Rosa Luxemburg），其对语言政治问题的敏感性无疑与其作为当时政治星座中波兰人的边缘地位有关联（参见马斯（Maas）的《语言政策》，第 66-112 页）。

6. Antonio Gramsci, Letters from Prison, vol. 1, ed. Frank Rosengarten, trans. Raymond Rosenthal (New York: Columbia University Press, 1994), 83, hereafter LP1, and vol. 2, hereafter LP2. A list of abbreviations is on pages ix-x.
6. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中书简》，第 1 卷，弗兰克·罗森加特编，雷蒙德·罗森塔尔译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，1994），第 83 页，以下简称 LP1，及第 2 卷，以下简称 LP2。缩写列表见第 ix-x 页。

7. [Maas uses Alltagsdenken, literally meaning “everyday thinking,” as the German translation of Gramsci’s senso comune.]
7. [马斯使用“Alltagsdenken”，字面意思是“日常思维”，作为葛兰西的“普通民众的意识”的德语翻译。]

8. See Heinrich Menges, “Mundart in der Volksschule” in Encyklopädisches Handbuch der Pädagogik, vol. 5, second edition, ed. W. Rein (Langensalza: H. Beyer, 1906), 941-82; Rudolf Hildebrand, Vom deutschen Sprachunterricht in der Schule und von Deutscher Erziehung und Bildung Überhaupt (Berlin: Klinkhardt Verlag, 1867 [1947]); and Rudolf von Raumer, “Der Unterricht im Deutschen,” in Geschichte der Pädagogik, vol. 3/2, ed. Karl von Raumer (Stuttgart: Walter de Gruyter, 1852), 17-151.
8. 见海因里希·门格斯，“民众学校的方言”载《教育百科全书》第 5 卷，第二版，W. 莱因主编 (朗根萨尔察：H. 贝耶尔，1906)，第 941-82 页；鲁道夫·希尔德布兰德，《论学校德语教学及德国民众教育与培养概论》(柏林：克林克哈特出版社，1867 [1947])；以及鲁道夫·冯·劳默，“德语教学”，载《教育史》第 3/2 卷，卡尔·冯·劳默主编 (斯图加特：瓦尔特·德·格鲁伊特出版社，1852)，第 17-151 页。

9. See Graziado Isaia Ascoli, Scritti sulla Questione della Lingua, ed. C. Grassi (Turin: Einaudi 1975).
9. 见格拉齐亚多·伊萨亚·阿斯科利，《论语言问题之文集》，克里斯蒂娜·格拉西编辑 (都灵：艾纳迪出版社，1975)。

10. De Mauro, Storia Linguistica.
10. 德马罗，语言史。

11. On this late development, particularly in fascism and the volte-face of fascist language politics, see Gabriella Klein, La Politica Linguistica del Fascismo (Bologna: Il Mulino, 1986). In general, the pedagogical concept of Lombardo Radice was expressly oriented to Croce, who was also a central reference for Gramsci. The parallels between the linguistic politics of Italian and German fascism would be worth its own investigation, since the analogies highlighted by Klein need to be differentiated. In at least the first phase of stabilization of its domination, German fascism integrated at least the functionaries of the corresponding organizations successfully with policies that allowed the autochthonous language forms to be used.
11. 关于这一后期的发展，特别是法西斯主义及其语言政策的转变，请参阅加布里埃拉·克莱因的《法西斯主义的语言政策》（博洛尼亚：伊尔·穆利诺，1986）。总的来说，伦巴第·拉迪奇的教学理念明确地以克罗齐为导向，克罗齐也是葛兰西的重要参考人物。意大利和德国法西斯主义的语言政策之间的相似之处值得单独研究，因为克莱因强调的类比需要区分。至少在其统治初期稳定阶段，德国法西斯主义通过允许使用本土语言形式的政策，成功地整合了相应组织的至少部分官员。

12. Antonio Gramsci, “A Single Language and Esperanto,” in Selections from Cultural Writings, ed. D. Forgacs and G. Nowell-Smith, trans. W. Boelhower (Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1985), 26-31, here 28-29, hereafter SCW.
12. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，“一种单一语言与世界语”，载《文化著作选集》，D. Forgacs 和 G. Nowell-Smith 编，W. Boelhower 译（马萨诸塞州剑桥：哈佛大学出版社，1985），26-31 页，此处为 28-29 页，以下简称《文选》。

13. See Benedetto Croce, The Aesthetic as the Science of Expression and of the Linguistic in General, trans. Colin Lyas (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1992 [1902]).
13. 见 Benedetto Croce，《美学——作为一般语言学和表达的科学》，Colin Lyas 译（剑桥：剑桥大学出版社，1992 [1902]）。

14. SCW, 27. 14. SCW，27.

15. See Giansiro Ferrata and Nicolo Gallo, eds., 2000 Pagine di Gramsci, vol. 2 (Milan: Il Saggiatore, 1964), 161.
见 Giansiro Ferrata 和 Nicolo Gallo 编，2000 年《葛兰西文集》第 2 卷（米兰：Il Saggiatore，1964），第 161 页。

16. LP1, 372-74, and LP2, 19-21. See also the undated letter Ferrata and Gallo, 435.
见 LP1，372-74 页；LP2，19-21 页；另见 Ferrata 和 Gallo 的无日期信件，第 435 页。

17. LP1, 88-91. 17. LP1，88-91。

18. See the letter to Carlo, December 31, 1928, LP 1, 329-30.
18. 见 1928 年 12 月 31 日致卡洛的信，LP 1，329-330 页。

19. SCW, 29. 19. SCW，29。

20. LP, 89. 20. LP，89.

21. Antonio Gramsci, Scritti Giovanili, 1914-1918 (Turin: Einaudi, 1958), 81ff.
21. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《青年时期文集》，1914-1918（都灵：埃纳迪出版社，1958），第 81 页及以下。

22. It is notable that at the same time Ferdinand de Saussure characterized the contradictory dynamic of linguistic development with the same term: the tension between “the spirit of the church” (esprit du clocher), marked by the dialectal border, and the power of social intercourse tending toward the universalization of the form of intercourse. See Ferdinand De Saussure, Course in General Linguistics, trans. Wade Baskin (Glasgow: Collins, 1974), 205.
22. 值得注意的是，同时，费迪南·德·索绪尔用同一术语描述了语言发展的矛盾动态：方言边界所体现的“教会精神”（esprit du clocher）与趋向形式普遍化的社会交往力量之间的张力。参见费迪南·德·索绪尔，《普通语言学教程》，巴斯金译（格拉斯哥：柯林斯，1974），第 205 页。

23. On this discussion of phonography, Utz Mass, “Die Schrift ist ein Zeichen für das, was in dem Gesprochenen ist: Zur Frühgeschichte der sprachwissenschaftlichen Schriftauffassung,” in Kodikas/Code 9 (1986): 247-92, 281-83.
23. 关于音标学讨论，乌兹·马斯，“文字是言语的标记：语言学文字观早期史”，载《编码/代码》第 9 期（1986）：247-292，281-283。

24. SCW, 27-31. 24. SCW，27-31。

25. In his argumentation Gramsci notably agrees with contemporaneous discussion in Soviet linguistics that was similarly confronted by the problem of mass literacy and the unification of a national language. There is, however, no evidence that he had knowledge of the works of Voloshinov, Polivanov and others.
25. 格拉姆斯基在论证中明显同意同时期苏联语言学讨论，后者同样面临大众识字率问题和民族语言的统一。然而，没有证据表明他了解沃洛希诺夫、波利瓦诺夫等人的著作。

26. Gramsci, Scritti Giovanili, 81ff.
26. 格拉姆斯基，《青年著作》，第 81 页及以后。

27. Antonio Gramsci, Quaderni del Carcere, four volumes, ed. Valentino Gerratana (Turin: Einaudi, 1975), 1377, hereafter QC. Q11§12. [To facilitate locating passages in various translations and anthologies, we use the standard method of providing the notebook (Quaderno) number—in this case 11一followed by the section number, §. See the introduction, page 12, for discussion. We will indicate the English translation, if used; in this case, Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Quintin Hoare and Geoffrey Nowell Smith (New York: International Publishers, 1971), 325, hereafter SPN.]
27. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》，四卷，瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳编（都灵：埃纳迪出版社，1975），第 1377 页，以下简称 QC。Q11§12。[为方便在各种译本和选集中查找段落，我们采用标准方法，提供笔记本（Quaderno）编号——在本例中为 11——后跟节次号，§。请参阅导言，第 12 页，以了解讨论内容。我们将标注英文译本，如有使用；在本例中为安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记选编》，昆廷·霍尔和杰弗里·诺韦尔·史密斯译，编（纽约：国际出版公司，1971），第 325 页，以下简称 SPN。]

28. Gramsci continues in the indicated passage: “While it is not always possible to learn a number of foreign languages in order to put oneself in contact with other cultural lives, it is at least necessary to learn the national language properly. A great culture can be translated into the language of another great culture, that is to say a great national language with historic richness and complexity, and it can translate any other great culture and can be a worldwide means of expression. But a dialect cannot do this.” The accent lies here on the great一that is, universal culture一not on formal translatability, which naturally also exists between dialects, as is made clear by the usual multilingualism of peasant communities in multiethnic regions (here translatability consists to a certain extent in relation to the divided particularity of the way of life).
28. 格拉姆斯基在文中继续指出：“虽然并非总是能够学习多种外语以接触其他文化，但至少有必要熟练掌握本民族语言。伟大的文化能够被翻译成另一伟大文化的语言，也就是说，一种拥有丰富历史和复杂性的伟大民族语言，能够翻译任何其他伟大的文化，并成为全球表达的媒介。但方言却无法做到这一点。” 这里重点在于伟大的——即普世的文化——而非形式上的可翻译性，后者自然也存在于方言之间，正如多民族地区农民社区的通常多语种现象所表明的那样（此处可翻译性在一定程度上在于生活方式的分裂特殊性之间的关联）。

29. In this sense Gramsci is also consistent in practical questions of agitation: against any form of populism, he insists that agitation in fact must be uncompromising (and consequently also difficult). Related to the language of the workers, the argumentation must always be in advance of where they are in their thought or language; see “Culture and Class Struggle,” in SCW, 31-34; on the idea that linguistic work is educational work, see “The Problem of the School,” in SCW, 39-41.
29. 从这个意义上说，葛兰西在激进行动的实践问题上也保持一致：他反对任何形式的民粹主义，坚持激进行动必须毫不妥协（因此也必然是困难的）。 针对工人的语言，论证必须始终领先于他们思想或语言的现状；参见《文化与阶级斗争》（SCW，31-34）；关于语言工作是教育工作的观点，参见《学校问题》（SCW，39-41）。

30. Q12§1, SPN, 9. 30. Q12§1，SPN，9。

31. Q11§12, SPN, 323-25. 31. Q11§12，SPN，323-25。

32. Q8§204, QC, 1063. 32. Q8§204，QC，1063。

33. See the articles “The Instruments of Labor” and “The Factory Council,” in Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Political Writings 1910-1920, trans. John Matthews (Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1990), 162-66 and 260-64, hereafter SPW1. See also "L’opera di fabbrica,” in Antonio Gramsci, L'Ordine Nuovo 1919-1920 (Turin: Einaudi, 1954), 80-84. Gramsci sketches out here a “culture analysis” of labor, which implies a linguistic analysis一and which consequentially thus establishes educational work as a necessary component part of everyday revolutionary work.
33. 请参阅安东尼奥·葛兰西《政治著作选集 1910-1920》中“劳动的工具”和“工厂委员会”两篇文章，译者约翰·马修斯，（明尼苏达大学出版社，1990），第 162-166 页和 260-264 页，以下简称 SPW1。另见安东尼奥·葛兰西《新秩序》1919-1920 年（都灵：艾纳迪出版社，1954），第 80-84 页中的“工厂劳动”。葛兰西在此勾勒出对劳动的“文化分析”，这隐含着语言分析——并因此将教育工作确立为日常革命工作不可或缺的一部分。

34. Gramsci would certainly have approved of such an enterprise. As the often-ironic, selfsatirizing formulations show, his plan für ewig was distant from any fixing of a canonical text; see also his introductory note to Notebook 11, where he states that his notes were written with a running pen and would probably be radically changed upon further examination (QC, 1365), which surely regards not only citations from other sources. Above all, however, it corresponds to the methodical core established by Gramsci himself, to live Marxist thought, just as he established as exemplary for Lenin and the Bolsheviks who had made the October revolution against Marx’s Capital, as he provocatively wrote in 1918 (in “The Revolution against Capital；' in SPW1, 34-37).
34. 格拉姆斯奇无疑会赞同这样的事业。正如其常常充满讽刺和自我嘲讽的表述所显示的那样，他关于“永恒”的计划与任何规范文本的制定都相去甚远；另见他在笔记 11 的导言，他声明他的笔记是用速记笔记录的，并且在进一步检查后可能会被彻底修改（QC，1365），这无疑不仅涉及对其他来源的引述。然而，最重要的是，它符合格拉姆斯奇本人确立的方法论核心，即活学活用马克思主义思想，正如他以列宁和布尔什维克为例，他们曾对马克思的《资本论》发动了十月革命，正如他在 1918 年（在“反资本革命”一文中，SPW1，34-37）的挑衅性文字中所写的那样。

35. Here and on the following points see Utz Maas, “Als der Gesit der Gemeinschaft eine Sprache fand,” Opladen (1984): 195-201.
35. 关于以下论点，请参阅乌茨·马斯著，“当社群的面孔找到语言时”，奥普拉登（1984）：195-201。

36. SPW1, 263. 36. SPW1，263。

37. Q4§49, PN2, 210. With the keyword “Taylorism” (in certain respects synonymous with Fordism and Americanism), Gramsci analyzed later capitalist development (in opposition to his early expression close to Proletkult) as an ever-increasing appropriation of the organizing moments of labor by capital (cf. Notebook 22). It is at any rate notable that the same emphatic formulations about intellectuals occur in completely different contexts (and certainly without knowledge of Gramsci), namely in Victor Klemperer. He turned against the “nazistic” dumbing down of the intellect and reclaimed it for social rebuilding; in this he distinguished the analytically valued concept of intellectuals from the ascription of social status: “one can be a stone tapper and nevertheless at the same time an intellectual . . . much more common with us is the other limit case, that one is by profession the most learned intellectual worker, and nevertheless only a stone tapper and no intellectual' (Victor Klemperer, “Die Rolle der Intellektuellen in der Gesellschaft,' in Aufbau 2 (1946): 682-86, here 685).
37. Q4§49, PN2, 210.  使用“泰勒主义”（在某些方面与福特主义和美国主义同义）这一关键词，葛兰西分析了后来的资本主义发展（与他早期的接近于无产阶级文化运动的表达形成对比），认为资本日益掌控着劳动的组织要素（参见笔记 22）。值得注意的是，关于知识分子的强调性表述出现在完全不同的语境中（当然，也完全没有葛兰西的知识），例如维克多·克莱姆佩勒的作品。他反对“纳粹主义”对智力的愚弄，并将其重新用于社会重建；在这方面，他将分析意义上的知识分子概念与社会地位的归属区分开来：“一个人可以是石匠，同时也可以是知识分子……在我们这里，另一种极端情况更为常见，即一个人以最博学的知识分子劳动者的身份出现，但实际上却只是一个石匠，而不是知识分子”（维克多·克莱姆佩勒，“社会中的知识分子角色”，载《Aufbau》第 2 期（1946 年）：682-86，此处为 685 页）。

38. That is the vanishing point of the control of linguistic relations, but not however that of pregiven indoctrination, the manipulation by the establishment of ideas in people’s heads. See Maas, “Als der Gesit.”
38. 那是语言关系控制的消失点，但并非先验灌输的消失点，即通过在人们头脑中建立观念进行的操纵。见 Maas，“Als der Gesit”。

39. Such a distinction is already present in Gramsci’s most important point of reference, Ascoli, who does not regard single groups of people as the correlate for the social development of linguistic relations, but who speaks explicitly of the intellectual apparatus of society: “apparato intellettuale della nazione' (Ascoli, Scritti, 22).
39. 这种区分已经在葛兰西最重要的参考对象阿斯柯里那里存在。阿斯柯里并不将特定人群群体视为语言关系社会发展的对应物，而是明确谈论社会智识结构：“民族的智识结构”（阿斯柯里，《文集》，22 页）。

40. SWP2, 441-62. 40. SWP2，第 441-62 页。

41. SWP2, 458ff. 41. SWP2，458 页以下

42. Also here, Gramsci operates explicitly as a linguist. He enjoys transferring naive “popular etymologies” to intellectual opponents, for example, when they anxiously make a pub sign of the Albanians (skipetari) into a gathering place of “strikers' [scoperanti] (SPW2, 458). Above all, he makes clear here that the reference for language analysis lies in the articulated experiences, not in the linguistic form: thus he refers to the fact that the same song that Sardinian soldiers had sung before and after their deployment against striking Turin workers was charged with entirely different meanings due to their experiences in the confrontation (SPW2, 447ff).
42. 在这里，葛兰西明确地扮演着语言学家的角色。他乐于将朴素的“民俗词源学”应用于知识反对者，例如，当他们焦急地将阿尔巴尼亚人（skipetari）的招牌解读为“罢工者”[scoperanti]（SPW2, 458）的聚集地时。最重要的是，他在这里明确指出，语言分析的参照点在于具体的经验，而非语言形式本身：他提到，撒丁岛士兵在对抗都灵罢工工人之前和之后唱的同一首歌，由于他们在冲突中的经历，其含义截然不同（SPW2, 447ff）。

43. Antonio Gramsci, La costituzione del partito comunista 1923-1926 (Turin: Einaudi, 1971), 152-56.
43. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《共产党组织的建立》（1923-1926），（都灵：艾纳迪出版社，1971），第 152-156 页。

44. That is the core of Gramsci’s analysis of linguistic purism and its role in the obligatory popular school. The theme has been developed in Richard Sennett and Jonathan Cobb, The Hidden Injuries of Class (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1972).
44. 这就是葛兰西对语言纯洁主义及其在义务普及学校中的作用的分析核心。这一主题在理查德·森内特和乔纳森·科布的《阶级的隐伤》(剑桥：剑桥大学出版社，1972)一书中有所阐述。

45. Maurice Godelier, The Mental and the Material (London: Verso, 1996), undertakes the systematic attempt to comprehend organic intellectuals as a productive factor in social (re-)production一against the schematic differentiation in the dualisms of base/superstructure or praxis/ideology. The constitutive function of intellectuals is to be differentiated from its specific comprehensibility in the historical social forms of organization, particularly if this organizing knowledge/ability is monopolized by determinate social layers (thus, by intellectuals in the sense of a social stratification—for example, castes of priests). Godelier puts the accent on the real use-value of the thus monopolized intelligence for the masses, whose life-level is immediately linked to this organizing achievement. This use-value is the basis of legitimation for the privileged way of life of the (traditional) intellectuals—bought by the expropriation of the knowledge of the producers.
45. 莫里斯·戈德利尔在《精神与物质》(伦敦：Verso，1996)中系统地尝试将有机知识分子视为社会(再)生产的生产性因素——反对基础/上层建筑或实践/意识形态的二元对立模式。知识分子的构成性功能应区别于其在历史社会组织形式中的特定可理解性，特别是如果这种组织知识/能力被特定社会阶层垄断（例如，以祭司阶层为代表的知识分子）。戈德利尔强调这种被垄断的智慧对大众的实际使用价值，因为大众的生活水平与这种组织成就直接相关。这种使用价值是（传统）知识分子特权生活方式的合法性基础——通过剥夺生产者的知识而获得。

46. Italian fascism carried on the pro-dialect pedagogy until 1931. As mentioned, German fascism also understood itself as nurturing the “autochthonous” culture. In Germany, the change in cultural politics came about due to the pragmatic necessities of the strengthened centralism of the war economy. This is arguably similar to Italy, where the synchronization with the increase of German influence is surely not accidental. Gramsci’s analysis of the social function of rural intellectuals can be carried further. In Germany, it is striking that the functionaries who sought to nurture the dialects saw their field of efficacy, if it was related to the schools at all, in the high schools [Gymnasien]— not, however, in that place where working on and valorizing linguistic potentials articulated in dialect could actually count—that is, in the primary schools.
46. 意大利法西斯主义一直推行地方方言教育政策至 1931 年。如前所述，德国法西斯主义也将其自身定位为培育“本土”文化。在德国，文化政策的转变源于战时经济加强中央集权的务实需求。这与意大利的情况颇为相似，其与德国影响力增长的同步性无疑并非偶然。葛兰西对农村知识分子社会功能的分析可以进一步深入。在德国，引人注目的是，那些致力于培育地方方言的官员，如果与学校相关，其有效性领域在于中学——而非能够真正发挥作用，致力于发掘和提升方言中语言潜力的场所——即小学。

47. As he says, in a Gramscian sense [senso gramsciano], Pier Paolo Pasolini, Freibeuterschriften, trans. Thomas Eisenhardt (Berlin: Wagenbach, 1978), 227.
47. 如他所说，在葛兰西意义[senso gramsciano]上，皮耶罗·帕索里尼，《自由者文稿》，埃森哈特（Thomas Eisenhardt）译（柏林：瓦根巴赫出版社，1978），227 页。

48. Pier Paolo Pasolini, Ketzererfahrungen, trans. Reimar Klein (Munich: Hanser, 1979), 21.
48. 皮耶罗·帕索里尼，《异端经验》，莱马尔·克莱因译（慕尼黑：汉萨出版社，1979），21 页。

49. That doesn’t speak against Pasolini’s attempt to valorize dialects socially, as he undertook with his own poetry in dialect (for example, the cycle Nuova gioventù of 1975). It does however go against the romanticization of the dialect, which in itself-—that is, not as intellectual raw material of educational work—but with all that which is articulated in dialect is taken up positively (for example, the direct equation of dialect—life—revolution: see Pasolini Freibeutschriften, 229). Incidentally, Pasolini himself made clear his one-sidedness in comparison to Gramsci; in his cycle “Gramsci’s Ashes,” he says: “the scandal of contradicting myself, to be with you [Gramsci] and against you, with you in my heart, in light, against you in the darkness of the guts.” Additionally, Pasolini also gave an extraordinarily sensitive interpretation of Gramsci’s early works on linguistic questions, cf. his attempt at a “Marxist linguistics” (Pier Paolo Pasolini, Gramscis Asche [Munich: Piper, 1984], 51-77.
49. 这并不否定帕索里尼试图在社会上提升方言的价值，正如他在自己的方言诗歌（例如 1975 年的《新青年》诗集）中所作的那样。然而，它确实反对对方言的浪漫化，这本身——也就是说，并非作为教育工作中智力的原材料——而是将方言中所表达的一切都积极地接受（例如，将方言——生活——革命直接等同起来：参见帕索里尼《自由文集》，第 229 页）。顺便提一下，帕索里尼本人也清楚地表明了他与葛兰西的观点差异；在他的诗集“葛兰西的灰烬”中，他说：“自我矛盾的丑闻，与你同在[葛兰西]，却又与你为敌，心中与你同在，光明中与你同在，但在内心的黑暗中与你为敌。”此外，帕索里尼还对葛兰西早期关于语言问题的著作作出了极其敏锐的解读，参见他对“马克思主义语言学”的尝试（皮耶罗·帕索里尼，《葛兰西的灰烬》[慕尼黑：皮珀出版社，1984]，第 51-77 页）。

* Translation of “Der Sprachwissenschaftler Gramsci,” which originally appeared in Das Argument, Heft 167 (1988): 49-64, and republished in Utz Maas, Sprachpolitick und Politische Sprachwissenschaft (Frankfurt: Suhrkamp, 1989), 165-89. Reprinted with the kind permission of the publishing house. Translated by Peter Thomas.
格拉姆斯基的语言学家研究，最初发表于《论点》杂志 1988 年第 167 期（第 49-64 页），后收入乌茨·马斯著《语言政治与政治语言学》（法兰克福：苏尔坎普出版社，1989 年），第 165-189 页。经出版方授权转载。译者：彼得·托马斯。

6
Gramsci from One Century to Another
Interview with Edoardo Sanguineti by Giorgio Baratta*
格拉姆斯基：一个世纪到另一个世纪  ——  与埃多阿多·桑吉内蒂的访谈  （乔治·巴拉塔* 著）

This interview took place just prior to the International Gramsci Society conference in Naples in October 1997, “Gramsci from One Century to Another." Edoardo Sanguinetil notes that the current political and cultural situation demands positing again the question of “national-popular" but now within the overall tendency that, following Etienne Balibar, we may call “postnational." The claim for the “national-popular" in our postnational situation is not a contradiction: it is rather a sign of the very delicate condition informing the tension, already very strong in Gramsci, between “particular histories," the “southern question" and the “universal" dimension of human society.
此次访谈发生在 1997 年 10 月那不勒斯国际葛兰西协会会议“葛兰西：一个世纪到另一个世纪”之前。埃多阿多·桑吉内蒂指出，当前的政治和文化形势要求再次提出“民族-大众”的问题，但现在是在整体的“后民族”趋势下，我们根据埃蒂安·巴里巴尔的说法可以称之为“后民族”。在我们后民族的境况下，对“民族-大众”的诉求并非矛盾：这恰恰是反映了葛兰西作品中已非常强烈的紧张关系，即“特殊历史”、“南方问题”与人类社会“普遍”维度之间的微妙状态。

Dear Sanguineti, what is the relevance of the Marxian heritage and of communism in your inquiry on the question of Gramsci’s language and the role of language in his writings?
尊敬的 Sanguineti 先生，您研究葛兰西的语言及其在著作中的作用，马克思主义遗产和共产主义思想与您的研究有何关联？

Gramsci repeatedly posits the question of languages and asks himself if reaching a universal language is possible. Two things seem very clear to me. For Gramsci, the fundamental content of the philosophy of praxis and of historical materialism certainly means the end of, and the overcoming of, class struggles, and the advent of communism. This is not something we believe today, but Gramsci believed it. For him, according to this perspective, the very fundamental and essential point was, however, the unity of humankind. Gramsci meant it to be a cultural unity, in the sense that the day in which class perspective will come to an end, there will not be conflicting cultural multiplicities anymore. Human beings will collaborate within a unified framework and within what Marx used to talk about but cautiously without saying anything substantial—something that is an object of a dream. He knew what it was not, although he was cautious enough not to pretend to know what it was to be. Even Gramsci very cautiously and “in some way” tries to indicate “that thing” as unification and eventually—“in some way”一as the homologation of humankind. Gramsci observes that there exists a case of universal artificial language, namely, mathematics. Sciences have the advantage of prefiguring in some way the future linguistic unification of humankind. In mathematics all humans communicate: it is the only universal language. Moreover, taking as a starting point the primacy of humans’ unification as a real task, I think Gramsci would have answered the question “For what purpose do we do a revolution?” with “In order to universalize the human genre.”
葛兰西反复提出语言的问题，并质疑实现普遍语言是否可能。对我而言，两点非常明确。对于葛兰西来说，实践哲学和历史唯物主义的基本内容无疑意味着阶级斗争的终结和克服，以及共产主义的到来。如今我们不这样认为，但葛兰西却相信这一点。在他看来，从这个角度出发，最根本和最本质的点在于人类的统一。葛兰西指的是一种文化上的统一，也就是说，当阶级视角消失的那一天，再也不会有冲突的文化多样性。人类将在一个统一的框架内合作，并在马克思曾经谈及但谨慎地未作实质性阐述的——某种梦想的对象——中运作。他知道它是什么，尽管他谨慎地避免假装知道它是什么。甚至葛兰西也极其谨慎地，并“在某种程度上”试图将“那件事”指代为统一，并最终——“在某种程度上”——作为人类的同质化。 葛兰西观察到存在一种普遍的人工语言，即数学。科学在某种程度上预示着人类语言的未来统一。在数学中，所有人类都能沟通：它是唯一一种普遍语言。此外，以人类统一作为现实任务为出发点，我认为葛兰西会用“为了使人类普遍化”来回答“我们进行革命的目的是什么？”这个问题。”

Was not Gramsci using language in a very particular and pragmatic— in some sense Socratic—way?
葛兰西是否以一种非常特殊且实用的——在某种意义上是苏格拉底式的——方式使用语言？

Language is an instrument for interexchange, communication and, at the same time, for creating identities. Therefore, language has, on the one hand, an internal and cohesive function, and on the other, a communicative and very open use. If I were asked whether he assesses these two aspects of language as equivalent or if he has a different take on their roles, without a doubt, I would answer that Gramsci proposes an unbalanced view, sharply in favor of the communicative one. A parallel or cautious analogy could be drawn between how Giacomo Leopardi writes the entire Zibaldone and Gramsci writes the Notebooks.2 There is almost catastrophic evidence of a sort of tic or monomania. What is, in fact, reiterated the most in Gramsci’s Notebooks? I don’t mean what concepts or ideas are reiterated, but what linguistic modality appears most frequently? The question must be answered saying that Gramsci reiterates expressions like “so to say,” “in some sense,” “in a certain respect,” “if so we would like to say” and “for some aspect,” as a tic or almost as a lapsus. In other words, Gramsci never rests, never says “That’s it.”
语言是进行交流、沟通，同时也是创造身份的工具。因此，语言一方面具有内在的凝聚功能，另一方面具有沟通性和开放性。如果有人问我，他是否认为语言的这两个方面是等同的，或者他对它们的各自作用有不同的看法，毫无疑问，我会回答，葛兰西提出的是一种失衡的观点，强烈偏向于沟通性方面。我们可以做一个类似的，或谨慎的类比，来比较雅各布·莱波尔迪如何撰写整部《札记》，以及葛兰西如何撰写《狱中札记》。2 几乎有灾难性的证据表明，他有一种怪癖或偏执。事实上，葛兰西的《狱中札记》中反复出现的是什么？我的意思是，不是反复出现的概念或想法，而是哪种语言方式出现得最频繁？这个问题的答案必须是，葛兰西反复使用诸如“可以说”、“在某种意义上”、“在某种程度上”、“如果我们想这么说的话”以及“在某种程度上”之类的表达，如同一种怪癖或近乎失误。换句话说，葛兰西从不满足，从不轻易地说“就这样”。

Never. 永不

He had a truly obsessive idea about any fetishism or ideology conceived as false consciousness of words. Indeed, language is really always in danger of being overturned into false consciousness, because what is often lacking is precisely Gramsci’s obsessive caution, expressed through the various “in some sense,” “it may be said so.” To make words rigid, to take them as things is a major cause for troubles. Words are not things. They go through a perpetual transformation in which communication is always, in some way, precarious, namely exposed to misunderstanding, and full of consequences because to say is truly to do.
他对任何被视为词语虚假意识的迷恋或意识形态有着真正的痴迷想法。事实上，语言确实总是面临被颠覆为虚假意识的危险，因为常常缺少的是葛兰西那种通过各种“在某种意义上”、“可以说”表达出来的执著的谨慎。使词语僵化，将它们视为事物是造成麻烦的主要原因。词语并非事物。它们经历着持续不断的转化，其中沟通始终以某种方式是岌岌可危的，即容易产生误解，并且充满后果，因为说话的确是行动。

What is the role of the question of language in Gramsci’s thought?
葛兰西的思想中，语言问题扮演着什么角色？

After Lo Piparo’s book, the origin of the word “hegemony” became not the specific subject, but the emblem and symbol of Gramsci’s question on language. Where does the word “hegemony” come from? From Lenin or from Ascoli? This question became a standard debate. This is not to say that Lo Piparo is wrong if it is demonstrated that hegemony comes from Lenin and that Leninists are right. On this matter I should intervene almost for family reasons. I am the father of Federico [Sanguineti], who wrote and published a university thesis—Gramsci and Machiavelli—part of which was devoted to demonstrating, without arguing against Lo Piparo, that the concept of hegemony comes from Lenin, specifically documenting this through articles by Lenin that Gramsci published in L，Ordine Nuovo. Yet, at some point, if we connect this question to Gramsci’s idea of “translating,” we may ask ourselves if it is superfluous to question whether hegemony comes from Lenin or from Ascoli, although it has some relevance in terms of philology and documentation. On the contrary, we must stress how concepts coming from different worlds and from heterogeneous mental systems, “in some sense,” come to coincide, because Gramsci does not have any superstitions about words: the reason for this is in that—as it is the case of an honest linguist of our century—he purifies words from any magic or enchanting residue. A verbal coincidence must not immediately cause us to draw associations of the analogical kind, but can suggest—as [Lucien] Goldmann would have said—principles of homology, which mean something else: namely, something other than imaginative and suggestive similarities—that is, symmetries which are “in some way” structural. A given symmetry exists and can be fertile for further developments, but it does not allow just making two things overlap onto each other. In this case, we are dealing with elements that reinforce each other.
洛·皮帕罗的著作之后，“霸权”一词的起源不再是具体的研究对象，而是成为葛兰西关于语言问题的象征和符号。 “霸权”一词源于列宁还是阿斯科利？这个问题成为标准的争论焦点。这并非说，如果证明“霸权”源于列宁，列宁主义者是正确的，洛·皮帕罗就错了。关于这个问题，我几乎出于家庭原因需要介入。我是费德里科·桑吉内蒂的父亲，他撰写并发表了一篇大学论文——《葛兰西与马基雅维利》，其中一部分致力于论证，“霸权”的概念源于列宁，而非反驳洛·皮帕罗，并通过列宁在《新秩序》杂志上发表的文章具体论证了这一点。然而，如果我们将这个问题与葛兰西的“翻译”思想联系起来，我们或许会质疑，追究“霸权”源于列宁还是阿斯科利，是否显得多余，尽管在语言学和文献学方面具有一定的相关性。 相反，我们必须强调来自不同世界和不同思维体系的概念，在“某种意义上”如何趋同，因为葛兰西对词语没有迷信：其原因在于——正如我们这个世纪的诚实语言学家一样——他净化了词语中任何魔法或迷人的残留物。语言上的巧合不应立即导致我们产生类比性质的联想，而可以暗示——正如[路易·]戈德曼会说的——同源性原则，这意味着其他东西：即，不同于想象力和暗示性的相似性——也就是说，在“某种程度上”是结构性的对称性。给定的对称性存在，并可能对进一步发展带来益处，但它并不允许仅仅将两件事重叠在一起。在这种情况下，我们处理的是相互加强的要素。

Gramsci is a linguist, yes, but a linguist who is very conscious of what the question of language means; as one of his famous propositions says, language is immediately connected to other questions. Which ones? Gramsci himself does partly provide some of them, but, perhaps, it could be said that the question of language is somewhat connected to all other questions. If so, the question of language is the one issue connected to all the other ones, this means that it is right to start from it.
葛兰西是一位语言学家，是的，但是一位非常清楚语言问题含义的语言学家；正如他的一句名言所说，语言与其他问题紧密相连。哪些问题？葛兰西本人或多或少地提供了一些，但或许可以说，语言问题与所有其他问题多少都有关联。如果如此，语言问题就是与所有其他问题相连的那个问题，这意味着从它开始是正确的。

And where do we get with this?
我们从这里走到哪里？

We get to one of the principal theories of culture, in a strong sense of this word, conceived as a global attempt to grasp the concrete historical-social existence of humans as it appears in light of historical materialism. What Gramsci is interested in is intellectual and moral reform. This cultural reform means reform of the concrete way humans exist. This is what Gramsci aims to achieve when he claims that every language question is connected, internally, not externally, to other questions.
我们触及到文化的主要理论之一，在此意义上，它被理解为一种全球性的尝试，力图把握人类具体的历时性社会存在，正如历史唯物主义所展现的那样。葛兰西感兴趣的是思想和道德的改革。这种文化改革意味着对人类具体存在方式的改革。葛兰西在声称每个语言问题都与其他问题内在而非外在联系时，正是致力于实现这一点。

This claim coincides therefore with the shift to Gramsci’s idea of a nexus of problems. This is at the base of the apparently unstructured structure of the Notebooks when they are compared to certain ideals of how a work should be constructed. He stresses immediately that it is not possible to shift continuously from one thing to another. The day in which we succeed in truly reconstructing the drafts of the Notebooks—including all of Gramsci’s annotations, the exchanges back and forth between notebooks, the circularities, the stratifications (precisely the same way people have begun to approach Leopardi’s Zibaldone)—and seeing how they are sedimented, we will also have a philological confirmation of Gramsci’s method (in the narrowest and most rigorous sense of the term: philological).
因此，这一论断与葛兰西将问题联系起来的想法相符。这构成了《狱中札记》在与某些关于作品结构的理想进行比较时，其表面上无结构结构的基础。他立即强调，不可能持续地从一件事转向另一件事。当我们成功地真正重建《狱中札记》的草稿——包括葛兰西的所有批注、笔记本间的来往交流、循环往复、分层结构（正如人们开始研究莱波尔迪的《札记》那样）——并了解它们是如何沉淀下来的，我们也将获得葛兰西方法的文献学证实（在最狭义和最严谨的意义上：文献学）。

Notes 笔记

1. Edoardo Sanguineti is a poet, writer, scholar and translator, one of the major intellectuals in Italy today. He was born in Genova, on December 9, 1930. His uncle, the musician and musicologist Luigi Cocchi, met Gobetti and Gramsci, and collaborated with the magazine L'Ordine Nuovo. Sanguineti was a member of the neo-vanguard group “Gruppo 63,” whose intellectuals were inspired by Marxism and structuralism and meant to experiment with new forms of expression breaking the traditional literary and rhetorical schemes.
1. 爱德华多·桑吉内蒂是一位诗人、作家、学者和翻译家，是当今意大利的主要知识分子之一。他于 1930 年 12 月 9 日出生于热那亚。他的叔叔，音乐家和音乐学家路易吉·科奇，曾与戈贝蒂和葛兰西会面，并与杂志《新秩序》合作。桑吉内蒂是“63 年组”新先锋派成员，该小组的知识分子受马克思主义和结构主义的启发，旨在尝试新的表达形式，打破传统的文学和修辞模式。

2. [Giacomo Leopardi (Recanati 1798-Naples 1837) was one of the most important poets, writers and philosophers in Italy. The Zibaldone is a massive 4,526 pages, written between 1817 and 1832, in which Leopardi would write notes, observations, thoughts amd memories, mainly concerning philosophical, literary, linguistic and political topics. The Zibaldone as well as the Prison Notebooks were not conceived as books. Sanguineti notes that there can be established an analogy both and in the way Leopardi's Zibaldone and Gramsci’s Prison Notebooks were written and in the cautious attitude the two authors show in dealing with the several matters they think and write about.]
2. [雅各布·莱奥帕尔迪（雷坎纳特 1798-那不勒斯 1837）是意大利最重要的诗人、作家和哲学家之一。  《札记》是一部浩大的著作，长达 4526 页，创作于 1817 年至 1832 年，其中莱奥帕尔迪记录了笔记、观察、思想和记忆，主要涉及哲学、文学、语言学和政治等主题。《札记》以及《狱中札记》并非旨在作为书籍出版。桑吉内蒂指出，莱奥帕尔迪的《札记》与葛兰西的《狱中札记》在写作方式和两位作者处理所思考和书写主题时的谨慎态度上，都存在着类比关系。]

* Translated by Rocco Lacorte with assistance by Peter Ives.
由罗科·拉科尔特翻译，彼得·艾夫斯协助。

II
Language, Translation, Politics and Culture
7
Translation and Translatability: Renewal of the Marxist Paradigm
二 语言、翻译、政治与文化 7 翻译与可译性：马克思主义范式的更新

Derek Boothman* 德雷克·布斯曼*

See Marx's analysis in the Holy Family where it turns out that Jacobin phraseology corresponded perfectly to the formulas of classical German philosophy.
参见《神圣家族》中马克思的分析，其中雅各宾派措辞与古典德国哲学的公式完美契合。

Antonio Gramsci1 安东尼奥·葛兰西

If Herr Edgar compares French equality with German “self consciousness； for an instant he will see that the latter principle expresses in German, i.e. in abstract thought, what the former says in French, that is, in the in the language of politics, and of thoughtful self-observation.
如果埃德加先生将法国平等与德国的“自我意识”进行比较，片刻之间他就会发现，后者在德语中，即在抽象思维中表达的，正是前者在法语中，即在政治语言和深思熟虑的自我观察的语言中表达的。

Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels2
卡尔·马克思和弗里德里希·恩格斯

To claim that the question of translatability and translation are an important part of Gramsci’s prison reflections may seem at first sight strange and even exaggerated. Wolf Haug, editor and chief translator of the German edition of Gramsci’s Prison Notebooks, has, however, very shrewdly observed that “Gramsci’s concept of ‘translation5 and ‘translatability’ leads into the very center of his conceptual network."3 This chapter will be devoted to analyzing the development of the concept in the Notebooks and indicate why the subject is a key one for Gramsci and for the renewal of Marxism and progressive thought in general.
声称翻译的可能性和翻译本身是葛兰西狱中札记重要组成部分，乍看之下可能显得奇怪甚至夸张。然而，葛兰西狱中札记德文版编辑兼首席翻译沃尔夫·豪格却敏锐地指出：“葛兰西的‘翻译’和‘可翻译性’概念深入其概念网络的核心。”本章将致力于分析该概念在札记中的发展，并说明为何该主题对葛兰西以及马克思主义和进步思想的革新至关重要。

The relatively few pages of the prison writings in the Notebooks that Gramsci dedicates explicitly to translatability are, paradoxically, among those that have given most problems to the translator. The present writer is not alone among translators of Gramsci in having experienced these difficulties. the very first translator of a selection of the Notebooks, Carl Marzani, went so far as to deny that Gramsci’s use of the term “translate” had a great deal to do with what translators do in practice. For Marzani, Gramsci’s concept of “translate” is near to that of “to transpose, to find correspondence or differentiations among the 'idioms' of various countries,” where for Marzani “idioms” are “the cultural ensemble, the ways of thinking and acting in a country at a given time.”4 All this is true, but what Gramsci meant by translatability and translation goes further and deeper than this and it is that “something extra” which is important for understanding why translatability is a key concept. We shall examine here why there have been difficulties in understanding what Gramsci was getting at in his notes on the “translatability of scientific and philosophical languages,” as he says, or to put it in other words, the theoretical possibility and the practice of translating not only between different natural languages but also between different paradigms, or discourses, to use a term that has become fashionable, and therefore be able to update the Marxist paradigm itself.
葛兰西在《笔记》中专门探讨翻译可译性的篇幅相对较少，但却是翻译者最头疼的部分。笔者并非唯一在翻译葛兰西著作时遇到困难的译者。葛兰西笔记选集的首位译者卡尔·马尔扎尼甚至否认葛兰西的“翻译”概念与实际翻译工作有很大关联。在他看来，葛兰西的“翻译”接近于“转换、在不同国家的‘习语’之间寻找对应或差异”，这里的“习语”指“一个特定时期一个国家的文化整体、思维和行为方式”。4 虽然这些说法没错，但葛兰西对可译性和翻译的理解，远比这更深更广，而正是这种“额外的东西”对于理解为什么可译性是一个关键概念至关重要。 我们将在这里考察为什么人们在理解葛兰西关于“科学和哲学语言的可翻译性”的笔记（他这么说）中想要表达的内容时遇到了困难，或者换句话说，不仅在不同自然语言之间，还在不同范式或话语之间（使用一个流行的术语）进行翻译的理论可能性和实践，从而能够更新马克思主义范式本身。

The First Three Paragraphs of Notebook 11, Section V
请提供 Notebook 11, Section V 的前三段文字

Gramsci devotes the fifth section of Notebook 11, a notebook on philosophical problems and one of the crucial “monographic” notebooks, to giving final and definitive form, insofar as things could be definitive for him, to the notes on translatability. In this context it should be noted, of course, that “scientific” is not to be taken in the very narrow sense of the so-called exact sciences, as is often the case in the English language, but in the broader sense that includes the social and “human” sciences.
葛兰西在第十一本笔记（关于哲学问题的笔记，也是关键的“专论”笔记）的第五部分，致力于对可翻译性笔记进行最终和确定的阐述，就他而言，这算是最终和确定的形式。当然，在此语境下，“科学”不应被狭隘地理解为英文中所谓的“精确科学”，而是包含社会科学和“人文”科学在内更广义的概念。

There is an explicit comment in Notebook 10 on the close connection between his concept of translatability, explained in Notebook 11, and the writings contained in Notebook 10, almost exclusively devoted to the philosophy of Benedetto Croce, the dominant figure in Italian idealist philosophy in the first half of the twentieth century. Very near the beginning of the second part of Notebook 10 under the heading “The translatability of scientific and philosophical languages,” Gramsci states that “the notes written under this heading are in fact to be brought together in the general section on the relationship between speculative philosophies and the philosophy of praxis.”5 He thus makes it very clear indeed that he sees the possibility of translating the one into the terms of the other, and an important part of the polemic with Croce is in fact Gramsci’s critique and then translation of Crocean concepts, purged of their idealist content, into his own philosophically realist and materialist paradigm. It is important to know how Gramsci reached this position, and we shall here attempt a reconstruction of the background to this operation, with passing mention of important similar approaches developed since Gramsci’s time and, at the end and for the sake of illustrative comparison, a couple of examples from non-Gramscian sources of translation between paradigms in the social sciences.
第 10 本笔记中明确提到他关于可译性的概念（见第 11 本笔记）与该笔记中几乎完全致力于二十世纪前半叶意大利唯心主义哲学的代表人物贝内德托·克罗齐著作之间的密切联系。在第 10 本笔记第二部分开头，标题为“科学和哲学语言的可译性”的部分，葛兰西指出，“本节下的笔记实际上应归入关于思辨哲学与实践哲学之间关系的总论。”5  由此，他非常明确地表明了将一种哲学概念转换为另一种哲学概念的可能性，而与克罗齐的论战中，葛兰西的重要部分工作实际上是对克罗齐概念的批判性解读，并将其清除理想主义内容后，翻译成他自身哲学现实主义和唯物主义的范式。 了解葛兰西如何达到这一立场至关重要，我们将在此尝试重构这一行动的背景，并简要提及自葛兰西时代以来发展出的重要类似方法，最后，为了进行说明性比较，将列举几个来自社会科学非葛兰西派来源的范式转换翻译的例子。

By way of “preface” to the three key paragraphs on translatability, Gramsci cites as his starting point Lenin’s observation at the Fourth Congress of the Comintern in 1922 (referring back to resolutions approved at the previous year’s Third Congress: “Vilich [Lenin], in dealing with organizational questions, wrote and said (more or less) this: we have not been able to ‘translate5 our language into those of Europe.”6 Lenin went on to say, in a comment not recalled by Gramsci, “we have not learnt how to present our Russian experience to foreigners.”7 In Gramsci’s note on Lenin, we see the nature of the objections raised by Marzani一namely, that “translate” seems used in a broad and metaphorical sense as compared with the act of re-expressing concepts in another natural language, and the word “language” itself is used to indicate the culture of a given country. It is, however, to be noted that for Gramsci language and culture are always very closely intertwined, a national language being the expression of a national culture, and for him the two become near-synonyms.
为了对关于可翻译性的三个关键段落进行“前言”，葛兰西以 1922 年共产国际第四次代表大会列宁的观察为出发点（参考前一年第三次代表大会批准的决议）：“在处理组织问题时，列宁写道并说道（或多或少）这样：我们未能将我们的语言‘翻译’成欧洲的语言。”列宁接着说，在葛兰西没有回忆的评论中，“我们还没有学会如何向外国人呈现我们的俄罗斯经验。”在葛兰西关于列宁的笔记中，我们看到了马尔扎尼提出的异议的性质——即“翻译”似乎在广义和比喻意义上使用，与在另一种自然语言中重述概念的行为相比，以及“语言”一词本身用于表示特定国家的文化。然而，值得注意的是，对于葛兰西来说，语言和文化总是密切相关的，民族语言是民族文化的表达，而且对他来说，两者几乎是同义词。

After the prefatory comment on Lenin in Q11§46, the argument contained in Q11§48 is substantially recast as compared with the first draft (Q4§42, October 1930), which is probably the reason why Gramsci introduces an intervening text (Q11§47) by way of defining his aims.8 Gramsci asks in Q11§47 whether “the mutual translatability of the various philosophical and scientific languages is a ‘critical5 element that belongs to every conception of the world, or whether it belongs (in an organic way) only to the philosophy of praxis, being appropriable only in part by other philosophies.” This then acts as a prelude to the conclusion reached in Q11§49, with the intervening long paragraph Q11§48 carrying the main thrust of the argument.9 We shall now try to reconstruct the background to these paragraphs on translatability before going back to illustrate Gramsci’s solution to the problem he poses.
在 Q11§46 对列宁的引言之后，Q11§48 中所包含的论证与第一稿（Q4§42，1930 年 10 月）相比有较大改动，这可能是葛兰西插入中间段落（Q11§47）以界定其目标的原因。8 葛兰西在 Q11§47 中问道：“各种哲学和科学语言的相互翻译是否构成‘批判性’要素，属于每一种世界观，抑或（以有机的方式）仅属于实践哲学，只能被其他哲学部分地吸收？” 这之后便引出了 Q11§49 的结论，中间较长的段落 Q11§48 则承载着论证的主旨。9 我们现在将尝试重构关于可翻译性的背景，然后再回到说明葛兰西对所提出的问题的解答。

Translatability of Phraseology or of Languages?
短语的可翻译性，还是语言的可翻译性？

Gramsci first mentions translation between paradigms in the very first notebook: in Q1§44 we read, in regard to Giuseppe Ferrari, one of the main, but, as Gramsci observes, “ignored” agrarian experts of the Action Party in nineteenth-century Italy, that he “was not able to translate ‘French’ into ‘Italian,’” not of course as national languages but as national realities, as different ideological discourses.10 Then in the same paragraph, Q1§44, but several pages further on, Gramsci for the first time cites Marx in the context of what he goes on to develop as his concept of translatability, noting that, for Marx, “Jacobin phraseology” corresponded to the formulas of classical German philosophy (February 1930). In the rewritten version of 1934, in Notebook 19, he speaks this time of Marx’s analysis of “Jacobin language” and “Hegel’s admission, when he places as parallel and reciprocally translatable the juridico-political language of the Jacobins and the concepts of classical German philosophy.”11 The salient points to note are that the earlier phraseology becomes, four years later, Jacobin language (linguaggio) and that while, in the first draft, their phraseology “corresponded perfectly” to the formulas of classical German philosophy, in the C-text says explicitly that they are “parallel and reciprocally translatable." In these examples and in others discussed here Gramsci uses the word “language” (linguaggio, the Italian term for a natural language being, instead of lingua) in the sense of what, after Thomas Kuhn, one of the most authoritative late twentieth-century historians and philosophers of science and someone to whom we shall return later on, may be defined as a paradigmatic discourse or, simply, a paradigm.
葛兰西在第一本笔记中首次提及范式间的翻译：在 Q1§44 中，关于朱塞佩·法拉利（Giuseppe Ferrari），这位 19 世纪意大利行动党的主要农业专家之一，但正如葛兰西所观察到的那样，“被忽视”，他“未能将‘法国’翻译成‘意大利’”，当然不是作为民族语言，而是作为不同的意识形态话语的民族现实。10 然后在同一节 Q1§44，但几页之后，葛兰西首次在与他后来发展出的翻译可能性概念相关的语境中引用了马克思，他指出，对于马克思来说，“雅各宾式措辞”对应于古典德国哲学的公式（1930 年 2 月）。在 1934 年重写版本中，在第 19 本笔记中，他这次谈到马克思对“雅各宾语言”的分析，以及“当他将雅各宾的法律政治语言与古典德国哲学的概念并列且相互可译时，黑格尔作出的承认”。11 需要注意的关键点是，四年后，早期措辞变成了雅各宾语言（linguaggio），并且，虽然在第一稿中，他们的措辞与古典德国哲学的公式“完全一致”，但在 C 文本中明确指出，它们是“平行且相互可翻译的”。在本文讨论的这些例子和其他例子中，葛兰西使用“语言”（linguaggio，意大利语中自然语言的术语，而不是 lingua）一词，其含义是，根据托马斯·库恩（Thomas Kuhn），一位最权威的 20 世纪后期科学史和科学哲学家，以及我们稍后将再次提及的人，可以定义为范式性话语或简单地说，范式。

In the other pair of texts which have already been mentioned, the C-text Q11§48 and its corresponding A-text, Q4§42, the chronologically earlier one begins somewhat peremptorily with the assertion that Marx shows or demonstrates that “the French political language used by Proudhon corresponds to and can be translated into the language of classical German philosophy.”12 Somewhat similarly in Q3§48 (June-July 1930), Gramsci observes that for Marx “the political formulas of the French Revolution are reducible to the principles of classical German philosophy.”13 In the later C-text version of Q11§48, instead of the "show” or "demonstrate” of Q4§42, Gramsci uses the verb afferma (to "claim” or "assert”)，while the rest remains essentially unaltered.14 It thus appears that what was accepted in the first draft as a demonstration comes over in the later, more authoritative, C- text of Notebook 11 more as a thesis on translatability that has to be proved. Probably in one way the substance does not change much but, when he comes to group together the various C-texts on translatability, he seems to be wanting to give greater rigor to his argument, proceeding logically one step after the other rather than with simple affirmations. In this particular case, as compared with its A-text, Q11§48 shows greater care and is more refined linguistically, and at the same time the claims are more cautious and more dubitative in nature. In the A-text, for example, the statement about the correspondence of the Jacobins and classical German philosophy "seemed” to Gramsci "very important for understanding the innermost value of historical materialism,” while in the C-text, "very important” remains to describe the correspondence and translation which existed between the two national paradigmatic discourses and which served, more simply as compared with the A-text, "for understanding certain aspects of the philosophy of praxis.”15 The first version is polemical above all with Croceanism, while the second one contains a criticism of “mechanistic abstractions,” presumably having in mind the Bukharin's Marxism, the target of Gramsci's critique in an earlier part of the same Notebook 11. Gramsci then adds a reflection regarding the possibility that this "critical principle” of translatability can be juxtaposed with "analogous statements”一in other words, whether it could be generalized further.
在先前已提及的另一对文本中，C 文本 Q11§48 及其对应的 A 文本 Q4§42，时间上更早的文本以某种命令式的语气断言，马克思表明或证明“蒲鲁东所使用的法国政治语言对应于并可以翻译成古典德国哲学的语言”。12  类似地，在 Q3§48（1930 年 6 月至 7 月），葛兰西指出，对于马克思而言，“法国大革命的政治公式可以归结为古典德国哲学的原则”。13  在 Q11§48 的后期 C 文本版本中，葛兰西用“断言”（afferma）代替了 Q4§42 中的“表明”或“证明”，其余部分基本保持不变。14  因此，看来，在初稿中被接受为一种证明的内容，在后期、更权威的第 11 本笔记 C 文本中，更像是一个需要证明的可翻译性论题。 或许从某种意义上说，内容并没有太大变化，但他将各种关于可译性的 C 文本汇集在一起时，似乎是想使论证更加严谨，循序渐进地进行逻辑推演，而不是简单地肯定。就本例而言，与 A 文本相比，Q11§48 更加注重细节，语言也更加精炼，同时论断也更加谨慎和怀疑。例如，在 A 文本中，关于雅各宾派与古典德国哲学相对应的论述，在葛兰西看来“非常重要”，用于理解历史唯物主义的内在价值；而在 C 文本中，“非常重要”仍然用来描述两种国家范式话语之间的对应和翻译，并更简单地服务于“理解实践哲学的某些方面”。15. 第一个版本尤其具有争议性，针对的是克罗齐主义；第二个版本则包含对“机械性抽象”的批判，据推测，这是针对布哈林的马克思主义，后者是葛兰西在同一笔记本（11）的早期部分所批判的目标。葛兰西随后补充了一点思考，即这种“翻译的批判原则”能否与“类似的陈述”并列——换句话说，它是否可以进一步推广。

At this point, he seems to distinguish between two forms of translatability, a first and more restricted type which, however, still connects up with the same set or series as the examples discussed by Marx, which represent the second, more general, form of translatability. The first type, "very limited” in its scope, refers to the "particular languages of different scientific personalities”； although "language” (once again linguaggio) is a term used in the first draft, this particular comment is present only in the second draft and is perhaps indicative of a greater attention and recognition in the later draft to the implications of technical languages as such. In the more cautious wording of the C-text, Gramsci asks himself if a translation of technical languages is not a step toward “the vaster and deeper problem implicit in the assertion contained in the Holy Family” of Marx. (There is a much more peremptory affirmation in the first draft that the more limited type of translation “belongs” to the same set as Marx’s more general propositions.)
此时，他似乎区分了两种翻译可能性，一种更受限制的最初类型，然而，它仍然与马克思讨论过的例子所代表的第二种更普遍的翻译可能性相联系。第一种类型，其范围“非常有限”，指的是“不同科学人物的特定语言”；尽管“语言”（再次是 linguaggio）一词出现在第一稿中，但这一特定评论仅出现在第二稿中，这或许表明，后一稿更加关注和认可技术语言本身的含义。在 C 文本更谨慎的措辞中，葛兰西自问，技术语言的翻译是否并非朝着马克思《神圣家族》中所包含的断言隐含的“更宏大、更深刻的问题”迈进了一步。（第一稿中，对更有限的翻译类型“属于”与马克思更普遍命题相同集合的断言则更为武断。）

The differences between Gramsci’s A- and C-texts are often subtle, and sometimes subject to reconsideration, and not always linear in development and unambiguous. One factor that seems to have influenced Gramsci between the earlier and later versions of this is his reasoning on the language of Machiavelli, someone for whose intellect and paradigmatic discourse he had the highest respect and took very seriously. This comes over in a number of places, perhaps first of all in Q5§127, a B-text not copied and revised elsewhere, and written only a matter of weeks after Q4§42. In this paragraph of Notebook 5, Gramsci observes that “if one had to translate the notion ‘Prince’ as it is used in Machiavelli’s book into modern political language,” a series of distinctions would have to be made, among whose possibilities “‘Prince’ could be translated in modern terms as ‘political party’” if one were dealing with the establishment of a new type of state.16 The notion of translation appears here as that of a single term and not yet as a fully fledged question of the language of discourse.
葛兰西的 A 文本和 C 文本差异常常细微，有时需要重新审视，发展过程并非总是线性的且含义并非明确。一个似乎影响葛兰西早期和后期版本的原因是他对马基雅维利语言的理解，他对马基雅维利的智力与范式性话语极度推崇，并非常重视。这一点在多处体现，或许首先体现在 Q5§127，这是一份 B 文本，未在其他地方抄写和修订，且写作时间仅比 Q4§42 晚几周。在笔记 5 的这一段中，葛兰西指出，“如果必须将马基雅维利著作中‘王子’的概念翻译成现代政治语言”，就需要做出一系列区分，其中一种可能性是，“‘王子’在现代语境下可以翻译为‘政党’”，如果涉及建立新型国家。16 这里的翻译概念体现为单一术语，而非成熟的话语语言问题。

Jumping forward to what seems to be the next occasion that Gramsci returns to this subject of Machiavelli and translation, we see that, in a letter to his sister-in-law, Tania, of March 14, 1932, and therefore apparently about six months before Q11§48, he asks whether Machiavelli had not
向前跳跃到葛兰西再次谈及马基雅维利和翻译的下一个似乎是合适的场合，我们看到，在一封 1932 年 3 月 14 日写给其弟媳塔妮娅的信中，因此显然大约在 Q11§48 之前六个月，他询问马基雅维利是否没有

expressed in political language what the mercantilists said in terms of economic policy. Or could one even go as far as to maintain that in Machiavelli’s political language . . . there appears the first germ of a physiocratic conception of the State and that therefore ... he might be considered a precursor of the Jacobins?17
用政治语言表达重商主义者在经济政策上的主张。或者，甚至可以认为，在马基雅维利的政治语言中……出现了重农学派国家观的最初萌芽，因此……他可以被视为雅各宾派的先驱？

Only just a few weeks after this letter to Tania, again relying on Francioni’s dating of the various parts of the Notebooks, Gramsci wrote another paragraph on Machiavelli (Q8§162, April 1932), in which he claims that if one demonstrates that Machiavelli “aimed at creating links between city and countryside,” such as to
仅仅几周之后，再次依靠弗朗西奥尼对《笔记》各部分的日期考证，葛兰西又写了一段关于马基雅维利的文字（Q8§162，1932 年 4 月），他在其中声称，如果有人证明马基雅维利“旨在建立城市与乡村之间的联系”，例如

incorporate the rural classes into the State, one will also have shown that, implicitly, Machiavelli had in theory overcome the mercantilist stage and already had some traits of a “physiocratic” nature—that he was thinking, in other words, of a politico-social environment which is the same as that presupposed by classical economy.18
将农村阶级纳入国家体制，也隐含地表明马基雅维利在理论上已经超越了重商主义阶段，并具备了一些“重农学派”的特征——换言之，他思考的是一种与古典经济学预设的政治社会环境相同的环境。18

This time the question is no longer just a terminological one, but involves an entire theoretical discourse that Gramsci seems to become fully aware of only in the spring of 1932. Indeed, only a few months earlier, at the end of 1931, he discussed in Q8§78 the economic implications of the political theories of Machiavelli without considering the concept of translatability, while in the C-text version (Q13§13, probably the earlier part of the period mid-1932 to 1934) he asks himself whether “Machiavelli’s essentially political language can be translated into economic terms, and to which economic system it could be reduced.”19
这一次问题不再仅仅是术语上的，而是涉及到一个完整的理论论述，葛兰西似乎只有在 1932 年春天才完全意识到。事实上，就在几个月前，1931 年末，他在 Q8§78 中讨论了马基雅维利政治理论的经济含义，却未考虑可翻译性概念；而在 C 文本版本（Q13§13，可能为 1932 年中期至 1934 年这段时期较早的部分）中，他则自问“马基雅维利的本质上是政治的语言能否被翻译成经济术语，以及它能够被简化成哪种经济体系”。

Be this as it may, it is in the passages quoted from the letter to Tania and from the paragraph Q8§162 on Machiavelli as an economist that one sees Gramsci beginning to ask himself what really lies behind the concept of the translatability of languages—that is, of paradigmatic discourses. It is not a question of merely translating terms and concepts belonging to the same subject matter, but first of all recognizing that two different subjects, political theory and economics, can have fundamentally equivalent postulates, can be mutually comparable and in consequence can be reciprocally translatable, due consideration being given to the different eras and events of the countries considered. We are here, it appears, at a halfway house, between a narrower view of translation and the more general one.
尽管如此，在引自致塔尼娅的信件和马基雅维利作为经济学家的 Q8§162 段落中，我们看到葛兰西开始思考语言可译性（即范式话语）背后真正隐藏着什么。这并非仅仅翻译属于同一主题的术语和概念的问题，而是首先认识到，政治理论和经济学这两个不同的学科可以拥有根本上等价的前提，可以相互比较，因此在考虑不同国家和事件的时代背景下可以相互翻译。看来，我们在这里处于一种过渡阶段，介于狭义的翻译观和更广义的翻译观之间。

The comments cited here on the economic implications of Machiavelli’s political language were written in a two-year period from autumn 1930 through mid-1932. These paragraphs, which also contain comments on the views of the liberal economist, Luigi Einaudi, on translation problems of the paradigms of experts working in the same field, offer a key to a clearer understanding of the reasons that induced Gramsci to introduce into his C-text, Q11§48, modifications as compared with the earlier A-text, Q4§42. In the later version Gramsci seems to attach more weight and credence to Einaudi’s words, cited in both these paragraphs, on the ability of the pragmatist philosopher and mathematician, Giovanni Vailati, to translate any theory whatsoever from the language of geometry to that of algebra, from the language of hedonism to that of Kantian ethics, from the pure normative terminology of economics into the applied perceptive one.20
本文引用的关于马基雅维利政治语言经济影响的评论，撰写于 1930 年秋季至 1932 年中期两年间。这些段落，同时包含对自由经济学家路易吉·埃纳乌迪关于同一领域专家范式翻译问题的观点的评论，为更清晰地理解葛兰西为何在其 C 文本 Q11§48 中，相较于早期的 A 文本 Q4§42，进行修改提供了关键。在后来的版本中，葛兰西似乎更重视和相信这两段中引用的埃纳乌迪的话，即实用主义哲学家兼数学家乔瓦尼·瓦拉蒂能够将任何理论从几何语言翻译到代数语言，从享乐主义语言翻译到康德伦理学语言，从经济学的纯粹规范术语翻译到应用的感知术语。

In the first version Gramsci limits himself to the comment that “two individuals produced by the same basic culture believe that their opinions differ simply because they use different terminologies,,; the second text reads “two ‘scientists5 who owe their cultural formation to the same background think they are upholding different 'truths' just because they employ a different scientific language；'21 The emphasis is added here in the two quotes to bring home the difference: the earlier “terminology” becomes a full-blown “language” in the later draft. It is indeed true that these languages may be limited, as Gramsci says, to different “scientific personalities” and questions of personal or group “jargon” may be involved but, as he goes on to say immediately afterward, between two scientists who use different languages, “we do not say that there is not a difference between them nor that this difference is not without significance,” an acknowledgement that is not to be found in the A-text. And, for further confirmation of this change in perspective, one may recall the similar difference between the A-text (Q1§44, dating February-March 1930) and its corresponding C-text (Q19§24, dating from 1934) where “Jacobin phraseology” becomes the “juridico-political language of the Jacobins.”22
在第一版中，葛兰西仅限于评论说，“由同一基本文化生产的两个人认为，他们的观点仅仅是因为他们使用了不同的术语而不同”；第二版写道，“两位‘科学家’由于拥有相同的文化背景而形成，他们认为自己正在维护不同的‘真理’，仅仅是因为他们使用了不同的科学语言”；21 这里在引号中添加了强调，以突出差异：早期的“术语”在后来的草稿中变成了一个完整的“语言”。的确，正如葛兰西所说，这些语言可能仅限于不同的“科学人格”，并且可能涉及个人或群体“行话”的问题，但是，正如他随后立即所说，在使用不同语言的两位科学家之间，“我们并非说他们之间没有区别，也并非说这种区别毫无意义”，这种承认在 A 文本中找不到。 为了进一步证实这种视角的转变，可以回想一下 A 文本（Q1§44，日期为 1930 年 2-3 月）与其对应的 C 文本（Q19§24，日期为 1934 年）之间的类似差异，其中“雅各宾式措辞”变成了“雅各宾派的法律政治语言”。22

This recognition of the real difference between discourses passes through the type of reasoning that we have seen in the extracts from the paragraphs on Machiavelli at the same time as taking account of the seriousness of a scholar such as Vailati, treated in the Notebooks with far greater respect than other Italian pragmatists.
这种对话语之间真正差异的识别，需要同时运用我们在马基雅维利段落摘录中看到的推理方式，并考虑到像瓦拉蒂这样学者（在笔记中比其他意大利实用主义者受到的尊重程度更高）的严谨性。

Yet further evidence of a change in perspective comes from another difference in the wording used. Again comparing paragraphs 4§42 and 11§48, the earlier draft reads that, for the historian, two national cultures
然而，视角转变的进一步证据来自措辞上的另一差异。再次比较第 4 段第 42 行和第 11 段第 48 行，早期草稿写道，对于历史学家而言，两种国家文化

are interchangeable: each one is reducible to the other; they are mutually translatable. This “translatability'' is not perfect in all details (including important ones); but “deep down” it is.23
它们是可互换的：每一个都可以化约为另一个；它们是相互可翻译的。这种“可翻译性”并非在所有细节（包括重要细节）上都完美；但“根本上”是如此。

While in the more authoritative second draft, it is the word “perfect” that is put in inverted commas by Gramsci while those around the word “translatable” disappear. As a hypothesis, it seems in the 1930 A-text that Gramsci judges the translatability of two cultures as metaphorical, when compared with the similar operation between two natural languages, whereas in the C-text, there is full recognition of the reciprocal translatability between civilizations, of their reducibility of one to the other. It has to be emphasized however that this is a hypothesis and other paragraphs may suggest otherwise, as in Q1§44 and its rewritten version found in Q19§24, where the term "translating” is in inverted commas in the later draft but not the earlier one, which instead have the names "French” and "Italian” in inverted commas while "translate” is without them.24 One has here to take account of the fact that "French” and "Italian” are used in both these extracts not as the names of natural languages but of national realities and experiences. In the later C-text version, the verb "translate,” written between inverted commas, seems to indicate a double process: the culture of one nation is expressed in the national language which, in its turn, is the object of translation into another language, the material mode which expresses the culture of the second nation.
虽然在权威性更高的第二稿中，葛兰西用引号标注了“完美”一词，而“可翻译性”一词周围的词语则消失了。作为一种假设，在 1930 年的 A 文本中，葛兰西似乎将两种文化的可翻译性视为一种隐喻，与两种自然语言之间的类似操作相比；而在 C 文本中，则完全承认了文明之间的相互可翻译性，承认一种文明可以还原为另一种文明。然而，必须强调，这仅仅是一个假设，其他段落可能会有不同的暗示，例如 Q1§44 及其在 Q19§24 中的重写版本，其中后一稿中“翻译”一词用引号标注，而前一稿则没有，前一稿中则用引号标注了“法语”和“意大利语”，而“翻译”一词则没有。24 这里必须考虑到，“法语”和“意大利语”在这两个摘录中并非用作自然语言的名称，而是用作民族现实和经验的名称。 在后来的 C 文本版本中，“翻译”一词（用引号标注）似乎暗示了一个双重过程：一个国家的文化以其民族语言表达，而这种民族语言反过来又成为翻译成另一种语言的对象，这种媒介物表达了第二个国家的文化。

Translatability in a General Sense and in a Limited Sense
广义与狭义上的可译性

Translatability in a general sense, as observed above, corresponds to the possibility suggested by Marx of translating between two national cultures 一that is, the ways, at first sight apparently disparate and unconnected, in which national cultures may express fundamentally the same concepts. To the two national cultures, French and German mentioned up to now, in Q10II§9 Gramsci, following Lenin’s Three Sources and Component Parts of Marxism, adds the third one of English political economy:
一般而言，正如上文所述，翻译能力对应于马克思提出的在两种民族文化之间进行翻译的可能性——即乍一看看似迥异且毫无关联的民族文化，却可能表达根本相同的概念的方式。在之前提到的法语和德语两种民族文化之外，葛兰西在《Q10II§9》中，追随列宁的《马克思主义的三大来源和构成要素》，又增加了英国政治经济学这一第三种。

one of the most interesting and fecund subjects for research yet to be carried out concerns the relationship between German philosophy, French politics and English classical economy. One could say in a sense that the philosophy of praxis equals Hegel plus David Ricardo.25
尚待开展研究的，最有趣且富有成果的课题之一，是德国哲学、法国政治与英国古典经济学之间的关系。从某种意义上说，实践哲学等于黑格尔加戴维·李嘉图。

A similar position to this one that brings English classical economy onto the scene is expressed in the letter to Tania of May 30, 1932, in which Gramsci asks a question not really to her but for her to pass on to the great economist who was his main intellectual and financial supporter in the prison years, Piero Sraffa, in Cambridge: did Ricardo have, Gramsci wonders, an importance for the history of philosophy, contributing to directing Marx and Engels “towards surmounting Hegelian philosophy and to the construction of their new historicism, purged of all traces of speculative logic”？26 Among the problems to be studied, Gramsci then goes on to list in the paragraph here cited from the Notebooks those of establishing “the connection of Ricardo with Hegel and Robespierre” and “how the philosophy of praxis has arrived, from the synthesis of the three living currents to the new conception of immanence.” He makes a generalization of the same theme in Q11§65, where he states that the three activities of philosophy, politics and economics are “the necessary constituent elements of the same conception of the world” and there must therefore be a “convertibility from one to the others and a reciprocal translation into the specific language proper to each constituent element.”27
类似的将英国古典经济学引入视野的观点，体现在 1932 年 5 月 30 日致塔尼亚的信中。在信中，葛兰西并非直接询问塔尼亚，而是让她转告其在狱中主要的精神和经济支持者、剑桥的皮耶罗·斯拉法——这位伟大的经济学家：里卡多，葛兰西想知道，在哲学史中是否具有重要意义，促使马克思和恩格斯“超越黑格尔哲学，构建其新的历史主义，清除所有思辨逻辑的痕迹”？26  葛兰西随后在引用的笔记中列举了需要研究的问题，包括“里卡多与黑格尔和罗伯斯庇尔之间的联系”以及“实践哲学如何从三种活生生的思潮的综合中，抵达对内在性的新理解”。他在 Q11§65 中对同一主题进行了概括，指出哲学、政治和经济这三项活动是“同一世界观的必要构成要素”，因此必须存在“从一种活动到另一种活动的转化，以及相互翻译成每种构成要素特有的特定语言”。27

The more “limited” form of translatability, moreover, consists in translating within one discipline the language used by one theorist into that of another, where once again it must be recalled that “language” (linguaggio—i.e., a technical discourse) in contexts of this kind may be substituted by “paradigm.” These are examples of the translatability Gramsci has in mind when he gives Q11§48 the heading Giovanni Vailati and the Translatability of Scientific Languages. During the 1920s, there is a striking example probably not known to Gramsci. Quantum mechanics, then a newborn branch of physics, gave rise to the two different formulations, wave mechanics and matrix mechanics, which both described, in different formal mathematical languages, the same reality. After some controversy and acrimony over physical and also fundamentally aesthetic questions, in 1926 Erwin Schrödinger, the physicist after whom the wave equation is named, proved them to be alternative forms of the same theory.
更“有限”的翻译性，在于在一个学科内将某一理论家的语言翻译成另一理论家的语言，其中必须再次指出，“语言”（linguaggio——即一种技术性话语）在类似语境中可以用“范式”替代。这些例子是葛兰西在为 Q11§48 题为“乔凡尼·瓦拉蒂和科学语言的翻译性”时所考虑的翻译性。20 世纪 20 年代，可能葛兰西并不知晓的一个显著例子是：量子力学，当时还是一门新兴的物理分支，产生了两种不同的表述，波动力学和矩阵力学，它们都用不同的形式数学语言描述了同一现实。经过一番关于物理学以及根本上关于美学的争论和尖锐冲突之后，1926 年，以其名字命名的薛定谔方程的物理学家埃尔温·薛定谔证明了它们是同一理论的不同形式。

Returning to the examples that Gramsci takes from Luigi Einaudi’s discussion of Vailati, in a B-text (Q10II§20, June 1932) devoted to economic questions rather than translatability, Gramsci observes that these examples are very similar to one discussed by Engels in his preface to the third volume of Marx’s Capital. The “vulgar economist” Wilhelm Lexis arrives in Engels’s view at an explanation of the profits of capital that “amounts in practice to the same thing as the Marxian theory of surplus value . . . this theory is merely a paraphrase (Umschriebung) of the Marxian.”28 The paraphrase (or transcription) adds weight to what Gramsci
回到葛兰西从路易吉·埃纳乌迪对瓦拉蒂的讨论中引用的例子，在一篇关于经济问题的 B 文本（Q10II§20，1932 年 6 月），葛兰西观察到这些例子与恩格斯在其《马克思资本论》第三卷序言中讨论的例子非常相似。恩格斯看来，“庸俗经济学家”威廉·莱希斯对资本利润的解释“实际上与马克思的剩余价值理论相同……这一理论仅仅是对马克思理论的改写（Umschriebung）。”28  这种改写（或转述）增加了葛兰西

maintains regarding translation between technical discourses or languages: both “orthodox economics” and “critical economy” (as Gramsci calls Marxist economics here) deal with the same problems, and one has to demonstrate that “the critical solution is the superior one." In this paragraph, too, Vailati’s work is referred to when Gramsci comments that, in recognizing the validity of Vailati’s work, Einaudi “implicitly admits the mutual translatability of these languages," a reciprocity that, however, does not mean that two languages are symmetrical and may be used indifferently.29
关于技术性话语或语言之间的翻译，本文保持以下观点：无论是“正统经济学”还是“批判经济学”（此处葛兰西称之为马克思主义经济学），都处理同样的问题，并且必须证明“批判性解决方案是更优的”。 在该段中，当葛兰西评论说，在承认瓦拉蒂著作的有效性时，埃纳乌迪“暗含地承认了这些语言的相互可译性”，这种互惠性，然而，并不意味着两种语言是对称的，可以互换使用。

The concept of asymmetry is assumed as an axiom by Gramsci when, in the above-mentioned paragraph Q10II6iv of May 1932, he claims that speculative philosophies are reducible to the philosophy of praxis as a political moment which the latter “explains 'politically,''?。the element of asymmetry clearly giving precedence to the philosophy of praxis as compared with other rival philosophical approaches. This comes out strongly in the main group of paragraphs on the subject of translatability. The paragraphs pose the question of “whether the mutual translatability of the various philosophical and scientific languages is a 'critical' element that belongs to every concept of the world or whether it belongs (in an organic way) only to the philosophy of praxis.” The conclusion is expressed in different words from those of Q10II§6iv, just a few months previously, but the substance seems the same. As Gramsci states in 11§47, “it seems that one may in fact say that only in the philosophy of praxis is the 'translation' organic and thoroughgoing."31 However, this time, before arriving at his conclusion Gramsci offers an explanation: in order for there to be translatability between two civilizations, a given expression must correspond to an earlier stage of the civilization that translates it; alternatively, the two civilizations must be at a more or less similar level of development and in this case the languages, while different, such as classical economy, philosophy and politics, must reflect the same basic processes that characterize their respective national societies. In the argument contained in this particular paragraph, translation from a less to a more advanced society is excluded. The reason for this is fairly obvious: the concepts used in, say, a neolithic society can be understood, even though with great difficulty, by a more “advanced” society, but it would undoubtedly be far more difficult, for example, to explain to a neolithic hunter the nature of quantum mechanics.
葛兰西在 1932 年 5 月上述段落 Q10II6iv 中，宣称思辨哲学可简化为实践哲学，后者“政治上”地加以解释，即假设了非对称性这一公理。这种非对称性明显地将实践哲学置于其他竞争性哲学方法之上。关于可翻译性的主要段落也强烈地体现了这一点。这些段落提出了这样一个问题：“各种哲学和科学语言的相互可翻译性是否是一个‘批判性’要素，属于每一个世界观，或者它（以有机的方式）仅仅属于实践哲学？” 结论用与几个月前 Q10II§6iv 不同的措辞表达，但实质似乎相同。正如葛兰西在 11§47 中所述：“事实上，似乎只能说，只有在实践哲学中，‘翻译’才是有机且彻底的。”31 然而，这一次，在得出结论之前，葛兰西提供了一个解释：为了实现两种文明之间的可译性，一个给定的表达必须对应于翻译它的文明的早期阶段；或者，两种文明必须处于大致相同的进步水平，在这种情况下，语言虽然不同，例如古典经济学、哲学和政治学，必须反映其各自民族社会所具有的相同基本过程。在这个特定段落中包含的论证排除了从较不发达社会到较发达社会的翻译。原因相当明显：新石器时代社会使用的概念，即使理解起来非常困难，也能被更“先进”的社会理解，但例如，要向一个新石器时代的猎人解释量子力学，无疑会困难得多。

A less extreme example which may be read in the context of translatability is contained in a note Q9§52 (June 1932) which has been almost entirely ignored. After an explanatory introduction Gramsci observes that
一个不太极端的例子，可以从翻译可能性角度解读，包含在札记 Q9§52（1932 年 6 月）中，该札记几乎完全被忽略。在解释性导言之后，葛兰西指出

two men whose thought is fundamentally identical, but who have lived separate from each other and in very different conditions, end up by having great difficulty in understanding each other, thus creating the need for a period of work in common that is necessary for retuning themselves to the same note. If this necessity is not understand one runs the banal risk of indulging in useless polemics, on merely “verbal” questions when much more important issues are at stake.
思想根基相同，却因各自独立生活于迥异环境的两人，最终难以相互理解，因此需要一段共同工作时期，以重新调整到同一频率。若未能理解此必要性，则会陷入毫无意义的论战，纠缠于纯粹的“文字”之争，而忽略更重要的议题。

As observed in the introduction to Gramsci’s paragraph, when two or more people do not understand each other, it is not (only) the lexis that divides them but rather their different experience, or form of life, to use a Wittgensteinian term.
正如在葛兰西段落导论中所观察到的，当两个人或更多人彼此不理解时，并非（仅仅）词汇将他们分开，而是他们不同的经验，或者用维特根斯坦的术语来说，不同的生活方式。

On this subject of translation between radically different communities an article by two British researchers, Len Doyal and Roger Harris, is of interest. In his Word and Object, W. V. O. Quine posed the question of how two people belonging to radically different societies could fully understand each other. The solution offered by Doyle and Harris is that language acquires its purchase on reality through its involvement and its intimate link with practical activities, and that the most important of these activities (i.e., those which involve the production and reproduction of life) by their very nature “possess a measure of intelligibility in and of themselves,” which is equivalent to saying that understanding takes place through human praxis, through labor in common.32 Certain idealist philosophers arrive at a similar conclusion, as for example Ernst Cassirer, who agrees with Humboldfs position that the reason that people understand one another is to be sought in the fact that
关于在截然不同的社群之间进行翻译的主题，两位英国研究者 Len Doyal 和 Roger Harris 的文章值得关注。在 W. V. O. 奎因的《词与对象》中，他提出了两个来自截然不同社会的人如何才能完全理解彼此的问题。Doyal 和 Harris 提出的解决方案是，语言通过其参与和与实践活动密切的联系而获得其与现实的联系，而这些活动中最重要者（即那些涉及生命生产和再生产的活动）由于其本质就“自身具有某种程度的可理解性”，这等同于说理解发生于人类实践，即共同的劳动之中。32 某些理想主义哲学家得出了类似的结论，例如恩斯特·卡西尔，他同意洪堡的观点，即人们相互理解的原因在于人们的理解力植根于

by touching the same link in each other’s sense perception and concepts, by striking the same key in each other’s spiritual instrument. . . . When . . . the link in the chain, the key of the instrument is touched in this way, the whole organism vibrates and the concept that springs from the soul stands in harmony with everything surrounding the individual link, even at a great distance from it.33
通过触碰彼此感觉和概念中的相同链接，通过在彼此的精神乐器上敲击相同的音符……当……链条中的链接、乐器的音符以这种方式被触碰时，整个有机体都会产生共振，而从灵魂中涌现的概念与个体链接周围的一切都和谐一致，即使距离很远。

It is clear that Gramsci reaches similar conclusions to those of Doyle and Harris in Q11§49, where, among other things, he states that “two fundamentally similar structures have ‘equivalent5 superstructures and are mutually translatable whatever their particular national language."34
很明显，葛兰西在 Q11§49 中得出了与道尔和哈里斯相似的结论，其中，他指出“两种根本相似的结构拥有‘等价’的上层建筑，并且无论其具体的民族语言如何，都是相互可翻译的。”

It should however be noted that this quotation contains differences as compared with its A-text, Q8§208 (February-March 1932), which turn out to be substantial toward the end of the C-text, where Gramsci attaches the “tranquil theory” of Kant to the moderates of the Risorgimento. In an “orthodox” vision of translation, the reference to the Risorgimento might be considered a side issue, but here it is not. For Gramsci, this stems directly from his concept of translatability and is an example of it. As he writes in this paragraph, the influence of classical German philosophy made itself felt in Italy through the moderates but, as he specifies elsewhere, it was not just the moderates who attempted to give a national interpretation of the movements in France and Germany. There is a certain ambiguity and lack of clarity in his comment in Q10II§41x (late summer-autumn 1932) to the effect that between Croce-Gentile and Hegel a linking tradition Vico-Spaventa-(Gioberti) was formed, in other words the translation of Hegel was made to pass through these thinkers. It is not clear why here Gramsci puts Gioberti’s name in brackets. It would seem that Gramsci had some doubts about him, which are also indicated by the fact that there is no mention of him in the first draft (Q4§56, November 1930) of this note and, a few pages after the C-text (Q10II§41xiv), he is still considered as fundamentally a moderate who tempered conservatism and innovation. On the other hand, Gramsci clearly acknowledges Gioberti’s post-1848 Jacobinism and in fact says so explicitly in the conclusion to Q17§9 (August-September 1933) where, in commenting on Gioberti’s volume Rinnovamento (Renewal), Gramsci recognizes that Gioberti “shows himself to be genuine Jacobin, at least in theory.”35 Gramsci notes that Gioberti himself was fully aware that in both France and Germany the same result had been reached by different means (Q17§18iii, September 1933) and, to quote his words on this: "Gioberti’s note is of interest where he says that classical German philosophy and French materialism are the same thing in a different language.”36 Expressing this in other words, Gioberti was aware of the translatability of German and French philosophical languages and himself managed to effect a translation into Italian through what Gramsci calls an “extract from the history of philosophy,” a part of the legacy of Hegel and of the progressive current in France.
然而，需要注意的是，该引文与 A 文本 Q8§208（1932 年 2-3 月）相比存在差异，在 C 文本结尾部分，这些差异变得相当显著，其中葛兰西将康德的“平静理论”与复兴运动的温和派联系起来。在一种“正统”的翻译观中，对复兴运动的提及或许可以被视为次要问题，但在本文中并非如此。对葛兰西而言，这直接源于他对可译性的概念，并以此为例。正如他在该段中所写，古典德国哲学的影响通过温和派在意大利显现出来，但他另有论述，并非只有温和派试图对法国和德国的运动进行民族解读。他在 Q10II§41x（1932 年夏末-秋季）的评论中存在一定歧义和缺乏清晰性，即在克罗齐-詹蒂莱和黑格尔之间形成了一条维科-斯帕文塔-(乔贝蒂)的传承，换言之，黑格尔被翻译的途径是通过这些思想家。目前尚不清楚葛兰西为何在此处将乔贝蒂的名字括号起来。 似乎葛兰西对他的看法有所怀疑，这一点从该笔记的初稿（Q4§56，1930 年 11 月）中未提及他这一点，以及在 C 文本（Q10II§41xiv）几页之后，他仍然被视为本质上是一位温和派，调和保守主义和革新。另一方面，葛兰西明确承认乔贝蒂 1848 年后的雅各宾主义，事实上，他在 Q17§9（1933 年 8-9 月）的结论中明确指出这一点，评论乔贝蒂的著作《更新》，葛兰西承认乔贝蒂“至少在理论上表现出真正的雅各宾主义”。35 葛兰西指出，乔贝蒂本人完全意识到，法国和德国都通过不同的途径达到了同样的结果（Q17§18iii，1933 年 9 月），并引用他的话：“乔贝蒂的笔记很有趣，他在其中提到古典德国哲学和法国唯物主义在不同的语言中是同一件事。”换句话说，乔伯提意识到德法哲学语言的可翻译性，并且通过葛兰西所说的“哲学史的萃取”，即黑格尔遗产以及法国进步潮流的一部分，成功地将其翻译成意大利语。

“Translating” and "Translatability”
“翻译”和“可译性”

At this point, it is of use to look at the way in which the words "translate” and "translatability” are used in other paragraphs of Gramsci’s notebooks, so as then to be able to sketch out a model of his notion of translatability. We shall refer most of all to Notebook 10 and its corresponding A-texts, following in general the chronological order of the C-texts, with other notes being cited afterward.
此时，考察葛兰西手稿其他段落中“翻译”和“可翻译性”的用法，有助于勾勒出他关于可翻译性的概念模型。我们将主要参考手稿 10 及其对应的 A 文本，大体按照 C 文本的时间顺序，之后再引用其他笔记。

Croce and Religion (Q10I§5, May-June 1932)
克罗齐与宗教 (Q10I§5, 1932 年 5-6 月)

At the start of this paragraph Gramsci defines Croce’s conception of religion and "faith”：
本段开头，葛兰西定义了克罗齐对宗教和“信仰”的理解：

For Croce ... every philosophy, that is to say every conception of the world, in so far as it has become a "faith,” i.e., is considered not as a theoretical activity (the creation of new thought) but as a spur to action (concrete ethico-political action, the creation of new history), is therefore a religion.37
对于克罗齐而言，……任何哲学，也就是说，任何世界观，只要它已经成为一种“信仰”，即被视为并非一种理论活动（创造新的思想），而是行动的刺激（具体的伦理政治行动，创造新的历史），因此就是一种宗教。

Before going on to indicate how this might be translated, “one cannot but emphasize that a faith that cannot be translated into 'popular' terms shows for this very reason that it is characteristic of a given social group.”38
在进一步说明如何翻译之前，必须强调，一种无法用“大众化”术语翻译的信仰，正因为如此，才体现了它属于特定社会群体的特征。

Here the act of translation is from the specialized discourse of a restricted group or class to a more general one comprehensible to the people as a whole. This is a type of translation for which elsewhere he praises the activity of Martin Luther in popularizing the teachings of the Christian Bible. In Luther's case, this involved as an essential step the translation of sacred texts from natural languages in which they were passed down (Hebrew, Greek and Latin) to the one actually spoken by the common people in sixteenth-century Germany. In this paragraph of Gramsci's, the action is not the operation carried out between natural languages, but the aspect of making a culture widely accessible. As he wrote in a letter to Tania of December 1, 1930, for the great popular masses the religious
此处翻译行为是从一个受限群体或阶层的专业话语转向更广阔的、为大众所理解的普通话语。这是一种翻译类型，他曾在其他地方赞扬马丁·路德推广基督教圣经教义的行为。在路德的案例中，这包括一个关键步骤，即把圣经文本从其传承的自然语言（希伯来语、希腊语和拉丁语）翻译成十六世纪德国普通民众实际使用的语言。在葛兰西的这段文字中，行动并非自然语言之间的操作，而是使文化普及化的方面。正如他在 1930 年 12 月 1 日写给塔妮娅的信中所言，对于广大的民众而言，宗教

Reformation at first assumed “coarse and even superstitious forms,” but at the same time its aspect of moral and intellectual renewal represented “the beginning of all modern philosophy and civilization”39 and the philosophy of praxis for him had the equivalent task in modern times.
宗教改革最初呈现出“粗糙甚至迷信的形式”，但同时其道德和知识更新的面向代表着“所有现代哲学和文明的开端”39，而他眼中的实践哲学在现代时代承担着相似的任务。

Definition of the Concept of Ethico-political History (Q10I§7, May-June 1932)
伦理政治史概念的定义 (Q10I§7, 1932 年 5-6 月)

Again in a C-text where there is no equivalent to these words in a previous draft, Gramsci observes that a question to resolve is that
在一段 C 文本中，由于先前草稿中没有等效词语，葛兰西观察到需要解决的问题是

of translating speculative language into historicist language, i.e. of seeing whether this speculative language has a concrete instrumental value, superior to previous instrumental values.40
将推测性语言翻译成历史主义语言，即考察这种推测性语言是否具有超越以往工具价值的具体工具价值。

This represents one very clear indication of what he intended by what we have termed “interparadigmatic translation." There are terms which with very little or with no modification may be used in different paradigms because they correspond to reality as the human species understands it, irrespective of class, gender and so forth. This is what Gramsci means by an “instrumental value," corresponding to a “bare objective notion" around which there is however always some “system of hypotheses which go beyond the mere objective fact" (Q11§38),41 but where this is judged to be a minimum in the case of “instrumental values" (more common in the exact than in the human sciences, of course). What makes the translatability of a philosophical paradigm more arduous lies in its more marked ideological content.
这代表着他所意指的“范式间翻译”的一个非常明显的指示。有些术语，几乎无需或根本无需修改，就可以在不同的范式中使用，因为它们对应于人类物种（无论阶级、性别等等）对其理解的现实。这就是葛兰西所说的“工具价值”，对应于一个“纯粹客观的概念”，尽管围绕着它总是存在一些“超越纯粹客观事实的假设系统”（Q11§38），41 但在“工具价值”的情况下，这种判断被认为是最低限度的（当然，在精确科学中比在人文科学中更常见）。一个哲学范式的可翻译性之所以更难，在于其更明显的意识形态内容。

Croce and the Philosophy of Praxis (Q10I§11, May-June 1932)
克罗齐与实践哲学 (Q10I§11, 1932 年 5-6 月)

In this B-text, we have the demonstration that Gramsci thought translatability was possible in both directions between rival paradigms:
在这篇 B 文中，我们展示了葛兰西认为在对立范式之间双向翻译是可能的

just as the philosophy of praxis was the translation of Hegelianism into historicist language, so Croce’s philosophy is to a quite notable extent the retranslation into speculative language of the realist historicism of the philosophy of praxis.42
正如实践哲学是黑格尔主义的史学语言翻译，克罗齐的哲学在相当程度上是对实践哲学的现实主义历史主义的思辨语言的再翻译。

At this stage, only weeks before he gave final form to his notes on translatability, there is no explicit comment about any asymmetry involved in translating between one type of paradigm and another. But he perhaps gives a foretaste of this when he writes, with reference to whether Crocean philosophy in Italy could “offer the premise for a renewal of the philosophy of praxis in our times,” that it is “worthwhile looking afresh at the position and putting it forward in a critically more developed form." In other words he considers that a “revised" and updated translation of Croce into the philosophy of praxis is necessary, adapting Crocean philosophy like Hegel’s was by “the first theorists of the philosophy of praxis"一that is, Marx and Engels.
在此阶段，在他最终定稿关于可译性的笔记的前几周，尚无关于不同范式间翻译中任何不对称性的明确评论。但他或许在谈到克罗齐意大利哲学是否能“为我们时代哲学实践的复兴提供前提”时，就预示了这一点，他写道，值得“重新审视这一立场，并以批判性更发达的形式提出它”。换言之，他认为，需要对克罗齐进行一次“修改”和更新的翻译，使其融入哲学实践，就像黑格尔哲学一样，由“哲学实践的第一批理论家”——即马克思和恩格斯——进行改造。

The Nexus between Philosophy, Religion, Ideology (Q10II§31i, June-August 1932)
哲学、宗教、意识形态的交汇点（Q10II§31i，1932 年 6-8 月）

Certain subjects alluded to in Q10I§11 are now taken up again, such as what it means to be the “heirs of classical German philosophy":
Q10I§11 中提及的某些主题现在再次被探讨，例如何谓“古典德国哲学的继承者”

from speculative philosophy a “concrete and historical" philosophy, the philosophy of praxis, had been arrived at, whereas Croce has translated the progressive acquisitions of the philosophy of praxis back into speculative language, and in this retranslation lies the best of his thought.43
从思辨哲学出发，已经到达了“具体而历史的”实践哲学，而克罗齐则将实践哲学的进步成果翻译回思辨语言，而这种再翻译正是其思想的精华所在。

If the heirs of the tradition of classical German philosophy are the modern workers’ movement, this for Croce meant the negation of philosophy, while for Gramsci the “heir continues the work of the predecessor, but does so in practice, deducing an active will that attempts to transform the world." For Engels, Gramsci says, “history is practice (experiment, industry); for Croce history is still a speculative concept."44 The identity of history and philosophy in Croce is his way of presenting the problem posed in the Theses on Feuerbach; in other words, Croce has here interpreted in a different way and retranslated the Theses on Feuerbach into his own speculative language.
如果古典德国哲学传统的继承者是现代工人运动，那么对克罗齐而言，这意味着哲学的否定；而对于葛兰西而言，“继承者继续前人的工作，但在实践中这样做，推导出一种试图改变世界的积极意志”。葛兰西说，对恩格斯而言，“历史是实践（实验、产业）；而对克罗齐而言，历史仍然是一个思辨的概念”。44 克罗齐将历史与哲学的同一性作为呈现《关于费尔巴哈的提纲》中所提出的问题的途径；换言之，克罗齐在此以不同的方式诠释并将其重新翻译成他自己的思辨语言。

Religion, Philosophy, Politics (Q10II§41i, August 1932)
宗教、哲学、政治 (Q10II§41i, 1932 年 8 月)

Again here we have an example of translation within the same paradigmatic discourse (a “limited" rather than more general form of translatability), once again dealing with the forms that the philosophy of praxis has to assume in order to be assimilated by a mass public.
这里再次提供了一个同一范式话语（一种“有限的”而非更一般的可译性形式）内翻译的例子，再次探讨了实践哲学为了被大众接受而必须采取的形式。

Just as popular Catholicism can be translated into the terms of paganism, or religions that, because of the superstitions and witchcraft by which they are or were dominated, are inferior to catholicism, so this inferior quality philosophy of praxis can be translated into “theological” or transcendental terms, i.e., those of pre-Kantian and pre-Cartesian terms.45
正如流行的天主教可以被翻译成异教的术语，或者那些由于迷信和巫术而受支配，且劣于天主教的宗教，同样，这种劣质的实践哲学也可以被翻译成“神学”或超越论的术语，即康德和笛卡尔之前的术语。

The last words are a reference to the criticism made of historical materialism by Croce at the Oxford Philosophy Congress of 1930, in polemic with the Soviet delegate and People’s Commissar Anatoly Lunacharsky. While Gramsci wrote in the letter, already cited above, to Tania of December 1, 1930, that Croce was of the opinion that the whole of “historical materialism marks a return to the old . . . medieval theologism, to pre-Kantian and pre-Cartesian philosophy,”46 in the paragraph of the Notebooks discussed here, his response to Croce is that this so-called return was not historical materialism itself but an “inferior quality” though historically necessary translation of it carried out in order to spread its doctrines.
最后一段话是对 1930 年牛津哲学大会上克罗齐对历史唯物主义的批评的回应，当时他与苏联代表、人民委员阿纳托利·卢纳察尔斯基针锋相对。虽然葛兰西在 1930 年 12 月 1 日给塔尼亚的信中（如上文所引）写道，克罗齐认为整个“历史唯物主义标志着回归旧的……中世纪神学，回归康德和笛卡尔之前的哲学”，但在本文讨论的《笔记》段落中，他对克罗齐的回应是，这种所谓的回归并非历史唯物主义本身，而是一种“低劣品质”但就传播其学说而言在历史上却不可或缺的翻译。

Gramsci makes use of a similar argument regarding the popularization of historical materialism, in Q8§226, repeated and slightly amplified in Q10I§13, note 3, where he quotes the words of the medieval humanist Alberti in his observation:
葛兰西在 Q8§226 中使用了类似的论证，论及历史唯物主义的普及，并在 Q10I§13，注 3 中重复并略微扩展了该论证，其中他引用了中世纪人文主义者阿尔贝蒂的言论：

Speculative history and the need to use less sophisticated instruments. Leon Battista Alberti wrote of the mathematicians: “They measure the shapes and forms of things in the mind alone and divorced entirely from matter. We, on the other hand, who wish to talk of things that are visible, will express ourselves in cruder terms.”47
推测史与使用较简陋工具的必要性。莱昂纳多·达·芬奇写道，数学家们“只在精神世界里衡量事物的形状和形式，完全脱离物质。而我们，那些想要谈论可见之物的，则会用更粗糙的语言表达。”

It is necessary to express oneself in very precise and refined terms, but it is also necessary to use another type of language in order to explain what one means to an audience that has to struggle to master certain types of discourse. It is perhaps not out of place to quote the words of Wittgenstein in a similar context dealing not with popularization but with the nature of language itself:
有必要用非常精确和精炼的术语表达自己，但也需要使用另一种语言来向必须努力掌握特定类型话语的受众解释自己的意思。或许在类似的语境中引用维特根斯坦的话并不为过，他讨论的不是普及，而是语言的本质本身：

The more narrowly we examine actual language, the sharper becomes the conflict between it and our requirements.... The conflict becomes intolerable, the requirement is now in danger of
我们越仔细地考察实际语言，它与我们的要求之间的冲突就越尖锐……冲突变得无法容忍，要求现在正处于危险之中。

becoming empty. We have got onto slippery ice where there is no friction and so in a certain sense the conditions are ideal, but also, because of that we are unable to walk. We want to walk, so we need friction. Back to the rough ground.48
变得空虚。我们已经踏上没有摩擦力的滑冰，因此在某种意义上条件是理想的，但正因为如此，我们无法行走。我们想要行走，所以我们需要摩擦力。回到粗糙的地面。

For Wittgenstein, language itself is imprecise, so the problems of popularization are also inherent in any type of language, which seems to reduce the problem of translation from high to popular culture to one merely of a degree of difference between them rather than a qualitative, insuperable gulf.
对于维特根斯坦而言，语言本身是不精确的，因此普及化的问题也内在于任何类型的语言中，这似乎将翻译问题从高雅文化到通俗文化简化为两者之间程度的差异，而非一种质的、不可逾越的鸿沟。

Croce’s Speech at the Oxford Philosophical Congress (Q7§1, November 1930)
克罗齐在牛津哲学大会上的演讲 (Q7§1, 1930 年 11 月)

Gramsci deals up the question of Croce’s speech at Oxford not just in Notebook 10 but also in the earlier Notebook 7, whose very first paragraph takes up the question of translatability.
葛兰西不仅在札记 10，还在早期的札记 7 中讨论了克罗齐在牛津的演讲，其第一段就探讨了翻译的可译性问题。

The translation of the terms of one philosophical into the terms of another philosophical system, just like the translation of the language of one economist into the language of another economist, has limits, and these limits are determined by the fundamental nature of philosophical systems or of economic systems. In other words, such translation is possible within traditional philosophy, whereas it is not possible to translate traditional philosophy into terms of historical materialism or vice versa.49
一种哲学体系的术语翻译成另一种哲学体系的术语，就像一个经济学家的语言翻译成另一个经济学家的语言一样，是有局限性的，这些局限性由哲学体系或经济体系的根本性质决定。换句话说，这种翻译在传统哲学内部是可能的，但无法将传统哲学翻译成历史唯物主义的术语，反之亦然。

Here Gramsci is very close to saying that some of the limits on translatability stem from the nature of language [lingua, or langue for Sassure] itself, and are certainly due to the nature of the various systems that are expressed in a given language [linguaggio, which in Gramsci is not used in really the same sense as Saussure’s langage].
这里葛兰西非常接近于说，翻译的某些限制源于语言（或萨苏尔所说的语言）的本质本身，并且无疑源于一种特定语言所表达的各种系统的性质（在葛兰西那里，语言一词的使用并非与萨苏尔的语言一词完全相同）。

He then goes on to say that
他接着说

the principle of mutual translatability is an inherent “critical” element of historical materialism, inasmuch as it presupposes or postulates that a given stage of civilization has a “basically identical” cultural and philosophical expression, even though the language [linguaggio] of the expression varies depending on the particular tradition of each “nation” or each philosophical system.50
相互可译性原则乃历史唯物主义固有的“批判性”要素，因为其预设或假定特定文明阶段具有“基本相同”的文化和哲学表达，尽管表达的语言因各个“民族”或哲学体系的特定传统而异。

This formulation is then repeated in Q11§47, for which Q7§1 serves as an A-text, just as it is also the A-text of Q10II§41i, discussed in the immediately preceding section to this one.51 More or less at this point, the texts of Q7§1 and Q11§47 begin to diverge, and it is solely in the later text that we read:
此公式随后在 Q11§47 中重复出现，其中 Q7§1 作为 A 文本，如同其也是 Q10II§41i 的 A 文本，正如前文所述。51 差不多在这个点上，Q7§1 和 Q11§47 的文本开始出现差异，并且仅在后文中我们读到：

it is to be seen whether translatability is possible between expressions of different stages of civilization, in so far as each of these stages is a moment of the development of another, one thus mutually integrating the other, or whether a given expression may be translated using the terms of a previous stage of the same civilization, a previous stage which however is more comprehensible than the given language, etc.52
要考察不同文明阶段的表达之间是否存在可译性，因为每个阶段都是另一个发展阶段的瞬间，相互融合，抑或某个表达能否使用同一文明先前阶段的术语进行翻译，而该先前阶段比给定语言更易理解等等。

The Gramscian Model of Translatability
葛兰西翻译可能性模型

Gramsci’s concept of translatability has as one of its origins the ideas that started to circulate in the 1790s, and were then taken up by Marx, about the equivalence of what, on the surface, seemed to be two separate national discourses in France and Germany. But the equation formulated by Gramsci is more articulated than the simple equivalence between two languages or national cultural discourses. His model involves the intervention of another factor that he maintains is essential for making one national culture translatable in the terms of another—namely, the similarity between the structures themselves ("structures” or "bases” in the Marxist sense) of two or more societies dealt with, either a current similarity or a similarity between the present stage of development of one society and a past one of another one. The interposition of the structural aspect of a society mediates, and maybe complicates, the task of translation between two or more societies. As he notes in Q11§48, "translatability is not 'perfect' in every respect, even in important ones (but what language is exactly translatable into another? what single word is exactly translatable into another language?) but it is so in its 'basic' essentials.”53 Bearing this in mind, and taking account of the "vertical nature” of Marx's structure-superstructure metaphor, a simple model of how Gramsci envisages the process of translation may be illustrated by figure 7.1, below
葛兰西的翻译可能性概念源于 1790 年代开始流传，并被马克思接受的思想，即表面上看似截然不同的法国和德国民族话语的等同性。但葛兰西的等式比语言或民族文化话语的简单等同更为细致。他的模型包含另一个因素，他认为这是使一个民族文化在另一民族文化语境下可翻译的关键——即所涉及的两个或多个社会的结构（在马克思主义意义上的“结构”或“基础”）的相似性，无论是当前的相似性，还是一个社会当前发展阶段与另一个社会过去发展阶段的相似性。社会结构层面介入，或许使不同社会间的翻译任务更加复杂。正如他在 Q11§48 中所指出的，“翻译并非在所有方面（甚至重要方面）都‘完美’，（但哪种语言能够完全翻译成另一种语言？哪个单字能够完全翻译成另一种语言？）”) 但其“基本”要素确实如此。53  考虑到马克思的结构—上层建筑隐喻的“垂直性”，我们可以用图 7 来说明葛兰西设想翻译过程的简单模型。Please provide the source text (1, below)

In this model, translation between two natural languages is not a direct process carried out by going "horizontally” from natural language 1 to natural language 2, by transferring words from one to the other, as may be inferred etymologically from the Latin verb whose "literal” meaning for us is "to carry across” (trans-/ate or trans-fer, from the irregular verb "to carry” whose parts are: fero, ferre, tuli, latum). A model was current in the 1970s in which Eugene A. Nida and C. R. Taber, biblical scholars and authors of an authoritative early modern study of translation theory and practice, suggested figure 7.2.54
在这个模型中，两种自然语言之间的翻译并非通过“水平”地从自然语言 1 直接转移到自然语言 2，将单词从一种语言转移到另一种语言的过程，正如从其拉丁动词的词源意义“横跨” (trans-/ate 或 trans-fer，来自不规则动词“携带”其部分为：fero, ferre, tuli, latum) 所推断的那样。20 世纪 70 年代曾流行一种模型，其中尤金·A·尼达和 C.R. 塔伯，两位圣经学者和权威早期现代翻译理论与实践研究的作者，提出了图 7.2.54。

To their great credit, Nida and Taber recognize that the “transfer” process between the intermediate stages X and Y involves not merely linguistic but the all-important question of cultural reinterpretation. One of their striking examples of this is how to translate the expression “lamb of God” into a culture like that of the Inuit of the Arctic and semi-Arctic regions, where a lamb is a rare and exotic and, perhaps until recently, an unknown animal. The “seal of God,” having some of the same ritualistic overtones, is their ingenious translation equivalent.
值得称赞的是，尼达和泰伯认识到，中间阶段 X 和 Y 之间的“转换”过程不仅涉及语言，更重要的是文化重新诠释的问题。他们对此的一个突出例子是如何将“上帝的羔羊”这一表达翻译到北极和亚北极地区因纽特人的文化中，在那里，羔羊是一种稀有、奇特且可能直到最近才被认识的动物。“上帝的封印”具有类似的仪式色彩，是他们巧妙的翻译等价物。

In his Marxist approach Gramsci regards translation as an act in which, from the propositions expressed in natural language 1, one descends through the appropriate levels of the superstructure to the "base” or “structure” of a society that has or has in the past had a "fundamentally similar” structure, in order then to carry out the reverse, ascending, procedure to arrive at the “surface” constituted by natural language 2. It is when one gives due consideration to this question, an approach that is consistent with Nida and Taber’s, that one explains the process in material, and, indeed, materialist, terms.
在葛兰西的马克思主义方法中，翻译被视为一种行为，即从自然语言 1 中表达的命题出发，通过上层建筑的适当层次下降到一个具有或曾经具有“根本相似”结构的社会“基础”或“结构”，然后执行相反的上升过程，到达由自然语言 2 构成的“表面”。 正是当人们认真考虑这个问题时，一种与尼达和泰伯的方法相一致的方法，才能够用物质的，甚至唯物主义的术语来解释这一过程。

In the normal sense of the term “translation,” a process that illustrates quite neatly our model derived from Gramsci is provided by the classical analysis of the Melanesian language and customs of the Trobriand Islands (N.E. New Guinea) carried out in the 1920s by the linguist-anthropologist Bronislaw Malinowski. In a conversation of a friendly nature (interpersonal, or “phatic,” to use the technical term introduced by Malinowski) words serve among the islanders to reinforce the links necessary for ensuring successful fishing and thus to ensure the production of the material conditions for life: language as used here is a “mode of action” to quote Malinowski.55 The “surface” linguistic level is intimately linked with the “structural” level of their society, that is, with the social relations of production. If we can say that there is complete interpersonal understanding among the islanders, or among members of another community, one cannot (always or perhaps even often) say the same about the community and an outsider. There exist problems in translating into another language the phatic conversation of the islanders. A “horizontal” passage from Melanesian to, say, English is clearly inadequate and in order to be more real (even if not “perfect,” to use Gramsci’s description) the translation and understanding must pass through the intermediate stages of a model such as that proposed on the basis of Gramsci’s translatability notes.
在“翻译”的通常意义上，葛兰西派生模型的精妙之处，通过 20 世纪 20 年代语言人类学家布罗尼斯瓦夫·马林诺夫斯基对特罗布里安群岛（新几内亚东北部）梅拉尼西亚语言和习俗的经典分析得以体现。在一次友好的交谈（人际的，或使用马林诺夫斯基引进的技术术语“语用”）中，岛民们使用语言来加强确保捕鱼成功的必要联系，从而确保维持生活的物质条件：在这里使用的语言是一种“行动方式”，引述马林诺夫斯基。55 “表面”语言层面与他们社会的“结构”层面，即生产社会关系，密切相关。如果我们能说岛民之间或其他社群成员之间存在完全的人际理解，那么（并非总是，甚至可能常常）我们不能对社群与局外人作出同样的判断。将岛民的语用交谈翻译成另一种语言存在问题。 从美拉尼西亚语到英语的“水平”翻译显然是不充分的，为了更真实（即使不是“完美”，用葛兰西的话来说），翻译和理解必须经过像葛兰西的可翻译性笔记基础上提出的模型那样的中间阶段。

The model suggested here as a first summary interpretation of Gramsci’s position involves different national cultures but does not fully take into account any mutual relationship and influence of one on another. Some time after the set of notes in paragraphs 46-49 of Notebook 11, he returns to the subject in Q11§65 (written between the end of 1932 and the beginning of 1933), a paragraph headed “Philosophy-politics-economics,” and having few significant modifications as compared with its A-text (Q4§46, October
本文提出的对葛兰西立场的初步总结性解读，考虑了不同的民族文化，但并未充分考虑彼此间的相互关系和影响。在笔记 11 的 46-49 段落之后，他于 Q11§65（1932 年末至 1933 年初撰写），即题为“哲学-政治-经济”的段落中再次提及该主题，与 A 文本（Q4§46，10 月）相比，修改较少。

November 1930). Both these paragraphs refer explicitly to what is contained in other ones on translatability (Q4§42 and the later paragraph to the series Q11, paragraphs 46-49). In the later, more developed, note of Q11§65, Gramsci observes that if the three activities of the heading are
(1930 年 11 月)。这两个段落都明确地指出了其他关于可翻译性的内容（Q4§42 以及后文段落到系列 Q11，第 46-49 段）。在后来的、更详尽的 Q11§65 注释中，葛兰西观察到，如果标题中的三个活动

the necessary constituent elements of the same conception of the world, there must necessarily be, in their theoretical principles, a convertibility from one to the others and a reciprocal translation into the specific language proper to each constituent element. Any one is implicit in the others, and the three together form a homogeneous circle.56
同一世界观的必要构成要素，其理论原则中必然存在着一种要素间的可转换性，以及一种相互翻译为各自特有语言的能力。任何一个要素都隐含在其他要素之中，并且三者共同构成一个同质的循环。

A further comment may be added to this observation, found in Q10II§9. In this paragraph of Q10, in order to explain precisely how the three “movements” or “moments” lie at the origin of the philosophy of praxis, Gramsci asks whether “each of these three movements has contributed respectively to the elaboration of the philosophy, the economics and the politics of the philosophy of praxis” or whether, instead it is the case
可对 Q10II§9 中的观察再作补充说明。在 Q10 的这一段落中，为了精确解释这三个“运动”或“时刻”如何构成实践哲学的起源，葛兰西询问：“这三个运动各自分别促进了实践哲学的哲学、经济学和政治学的发展”抑或“它们并非如此”。

that the philosophy of praxis has synthesized the three movements, that is, the entire culture of the age, and that in the new synthesis, whichever moment one is examining, the theoretical, the economic, or the political, one will find each of the three movements present as a preparatory “moment”？ this is what seems to me to be the case. And it seems to me that the unitary moment of synthesis is to be identified in the new concept of immanence.57
实践哲学将三个运动，即时代整个文化，综合起来。在新综合中，无论考察理论、经济还是政治层面，都会发现这三个运动都作为准备阶段的“环节”存在。在我看来，情况就是这样。在我看来，新的内在性概念就是这种综合的统一环节。

Q10II§9 continues by noting that it is the discovery by Ricardo of the “formal logical principle of the ‘law of tendency’” that implies a new conception of necessity and of freedom. It is then the philosophy of praxis, in carrying out a translation has also “universalized Ricardo’s discoveries .. .drawing from them, in an original form, a new conception of the world.”58 This, in Gramsci’s view, guarantees Ricardo a position in the history of philosophy, a position that, without this explanatory background, left Sraffa less than convinced.
Q10II§9 继续指出，是里卡多发现了“‘趋势规律’的形式逻辑原则”，这暗示了对必然性和自由的新理解。然后，实践哲学在进行翻译时，也“普遍化了里卡多的发现……以一种原创的形式，从中引申出对世界的全新理解”。58  从葛兰西的观点来看，这保证了里卡多在哲学史上的地位，而没有这个解释背景，则使斯拉法不太信服。

The reconstruction and explanation offered here lies, in my view, at the basis of the “homogeneous circle” that, applied to translatability, gives rise to a more complex model than that illustrated in figure 7.1 and is here illustrated diagrammatically in figure 7.3, where, purely for reasons of simplicity, the arcs of circles have been substituted by the straight lines of the triangles.
我看来，这里提出的重建和解释构成了“同质圆”的基础。当应用于可翻译性时，它产生了一个比图 7.1 所示更复杂的模型，并在图 7.3 中以图表形式进行了说明。图中，为了简单起见，圆弧被三角形的直线所替代。

A scheme such as that of figure 7.3 allows the passage from the structure, using Marx’s metaphor, to the language (linguaggio, paradigmatic discourse) characteristic of a given national culture (German classical philosophy, French politics, English classical economy) and then to the corresponding natural language (lingua), here German, French and English. The possible paths of reciprocal interactions are shown by two-way arrows, in other words between discourses [linguaggi] either between the respective structures for two or more nations, or between the structure and respective discourses that “depend” on or "belong” to each particular structure. Furthermore, a philosophy like the philosophy of praxis has links, which it explicitly recognizes, both with the different structures and with what in the diagram is called the “paradigm or national cultural discourse” and, in theory, is able to explain them and incorporate them into its discourse一that is, translate them (Q10II§9).59
图 7.3 所示的方案允许从结构（使用马克思的比喻）过渡到特定民族文化（德国古典哲学、法国政治、英国古典经济学）的语言（范式话语）,进而到相应的自然语言（语言），此处为德语、法语和英语。双向箭头显示可能的相互作用路径，也就是说，话语 [语言] 之间，或者两个或多个国家的各自结构之间，或者结构与其“依赖”或“属于”特定结构的话语之间。此外，像实践哲学这样的哲学，明确承认其与不同结构以及图表中所称的“范式或民族文化话语”之间的联系，理论上能够解释并将其纳入其话语中——也就是说，将它们翻译过来（Q10II§9）。59

The type of model outlined here on the basis of Gramsci’s writings in the Notebooks on translatability helps explain at a theoretical level why, between two or more natural languages, or in the development in time of just one language,
本文基于葛兰西《狱中札记》中关于可译性的论述，勾勒出的模型类型有助于从理论层面解释，为什么在两种或多种自然语言之间，或者单一语言的时间发展中，

in translations . . . there is never identity between the terms of the languages being compared, or at least that what identity there seems to be at the beginning of the exercise (Italian "rosa” = Latin "rosa”)becomes increasingly more complicated as the “apprenticeship” progresses, moves increasingly away from the mathematical scheme and arrives at a historical judgement or a judgement of taste.60
在翻译中……比较的语言之间，词语永远没有完全相同的对应关系，或者至少，一开始看似存在的等同关系（意大利语“rosa” = 拉丁语“rosa”），随着“学习”的进展，会变得越来越复杂，越来越偏离数学模式，最终达到对历史的判断或审美判断。

The first draft has almost identical wording except for the ending, where it reads “it reaches the historical or psychological level in which nuances, ‘unique and individual5 expressiveness prevail” (Q1§153, May 1930).61
第一稿的措辞几乎完全相同，只是结尾不同，写着“它达到历史或心理的层面，其中细微的、‘独特而个体化的’表达占主导地位”（Q1§153，1930 年 5 月）。

It should come as no surprise that, in a volume that Gramsci had in prison, Science at the Cross Roads,62 with its celebrated一or perhaps notorious一essay “Theory and Practice from the Standpoint of Historical Materialism,” attacked by Gramsci in Notebook 11, part II, the Soviet delegates to the London congress on the history of science and technology developed their analysis of the social roots of science, thereby providing a link between the structure of a society and the scientific theories and, going up in the scale of abstraction, the discourses-languages on whose terrain they are born. In the example of the more limited type of translation, that between scientific languages, Gramsci suggests that the translation that the philosophy of praxis makes when it translates other philosophies into its own terms is more thoroughgoing and complete ("organic”)，while in the opposite direction the translation is defective and incomplete.
毫不奇怪，在葛兰西狱中阅读的《科学与交叉路口》一书中，其著名的——或者说臭名昭著的——文章“从历史唯物主义的立场看理论与实践”，在葛兰西的第 11 本笔记本第二部分遭到批判。苏联代表团在伦敦科学技术史大会上，发展了他们对科学社会根源的分析，从而建立了社会结构与科学理论之间的联系，并进一步抽象到科学产生的语境——语言。在更有限类型的翻译，即科学语言之间的翻译中，葛兰西指出，实践哲学在将其他哲学翻译成自身术语时所进行的翻译，更加彻底和完整（“有机”），而反方向的翻译则存在缺陷和不完整。

For languages in the sense of paradigmatic discourses that are contemporaneous with each other, there can exist what the philosopher of language Ferruccio Rossi-Landi calls a “homology” (i.e., not simply a similarity but a correspondence between two manifestations that springs from the fact that they have their roots in an essence common to both of them).63 One may think here of recent examples such as the various guises adopted by modernism, postmodernism and minimalism in the various countries where they have held sway. Gramsci uses to affect the nearidentical argument that structures of society at similar stages of development give rise to different “manifestations,” in his case cultural discourses that are characteristic, each of its own national society. For two or more such paradigms, which may exist in different eras or in the same one, and which attempt to explain the same phenomena, in Gramsci’s view, the often radical reinterpretation of concepts, conducting them to the same “essence” (to use Rossi-Landi’s metaphor) or “base/structure” (to use Marx’s) makes these paradigms in the human and social sciences translatable.
对于同时存在的范式性话语（语言），语言哲学家费鲁乔·罗西-兰迪称之为“同质性”（即，并非仅仅相似，而是源于两者共同本质的两种表现形式之间的对应关系）。63 可以想到的例子包括现代主义、后现代主义和极简主义在不同国家所呈现的各种形态。葛兰西也使用了类似的论证，认为处于相似发展阶段的社会结构会产生不同的“表现形式”，在他的案例中，是各自民族社会特有的文化话语。对于两个或更多这样的范式，它们可能存在于不同的时代或同一个时代，并试图解释相同的现象，葛兰西认为，对概念进行经常性的根本性重新诠释，将它们引导到相同的“本质”（使用罗西-兰迪的隐喻）或“基础/结构”（使用马克思的术语），使得这些人类和社会科学范式具有可翻译性。

This stance, it ought to be noted, is different from the early work of Thomas Kuhn, when, in putting the emphasis on the incommensurability of paradigms in the physical and exact sciences, he almost always denied that translatability was possible in these fields.64 From the mid-1970s onward, however, Kuhn modified this initial position, in part by reconsidering his initially stark and almost absolutistic concept of paradigm. In an essay of 1974, “Second Thoughts on Paradigms,” he recognizes that competing schools, typical of the social sciences, all possess paradigms and that their work is not, as he thought in his seminal 1962 Structure of Scientific Revolutions, merely a sign of a pre-paradigmatic phase.65 From there it is but a short step to recognize that translatability is possible between such paradigms and a couple of years later, in his 1976 essay, “Theory Change as Structure Change,” we find him saying that “comparing theories becomes in part a problem of translation." In such activity “translation always and necessarily involves imperfection and compromise” and that the translator has to “repeatedly shift the choice of word and phrase” to capture the aspect of the original that s/he has to preserve at a given moment. Kuhn continues, in almost Gramscian language, by saying that it is upon compromises of this sort that “the translation of one theory into the language of another depends,"66 thereby explicitly recognizing the existence of translatability between theories. Thus, although he did not know of Gramsci, or at least of this aspect of Gramsci’s work, these two major figures in part converged in their lines of analysis and their judgments on translatability. Tullio De Mauro, one of Italy’s most distinguished linguists, takes the argument one stage further by noting that the greater the degree of internal reducibility (to axioms, etc.) of a science (i.e., the nearer we get to the “hard" sciences), “the more difficult it is to render its phrases in a less reducible field of knowledge." He then goes on to state explicitly that the cultural and political science fields, that is, the ones that most involved Gramsci’s reflections, are sciences at the opposite end of the spectrum to the “hard” sciences.67 In consequence, not only their phrases but also their technical terms are more easily translatable from the scientific language of one school into that of another.
需要注意的是，这种立场与托马斯·库恩早期著作有所不同。早期，他强调物理和精确科学范式的不兼容性，几乎总是否认这些领域的可翻译性。64 但是，从 20 世纪 70 年代中期开始，库恩修改了这一最初立场，部分原因在于重新思考了他最初严厉且近乎绝对的范式概念。1974 年一篇名为“关于范式的第二想法”的文章中，他认识到，社会科学中常见的不同学派也都拥有范式，并且他们的工作并非如他在 1962 年的《科学革命的结构》一书中所认为的那样，仅仅是范式前阶段的标志。65 从那里，承认不同范式之间存在可翻译性只是很小的一步，在两年后的 1976 年文章“理论变化作为结构变化”中，他指出，“比较理论在一定程度上成为一个翻译问题”。在这样的活动中，“翻译总是且必然地包含不完美和妥协”，译者必须“反复调整词语和短语的选择”以捕捉在特定时刻必须保留的原文方面。库恩继续说道，几乎用葛兰西的语言，指出正是这种妥协才使得“一种理论翻译成另一种理论的语言成为可能”，66 从而明确地承认了理论之间的可翻译性。因此，尽管他不知道葛兰西，或者至少不知道葛兰西著作的这一方面，但这两位主要的思想家在他们的分析思路和对可翻译性的判断上在一定程度上趋同。意大利最杰出的语言学家之一图利奥·德·毛罗将论证推进了一步，他指出，科学的内部可约化程度（到公理等）越高（即我们越接近“硬”科学），就“越难以将其短语翻译成一个更不可约化的知识领域”。他接着明确指出，文化和政治科学领域，也就是最能体现葛兰西思考的领域，与“硬”科学处于完全不同的极端。67 因此，不仅它们的措辞，而且它们的专业术语，也更容易从一个学派的科学语言翻译到另一个学派。

Some Implications of Gramsci on Translatability: Concluding Remarks
葛兰西对翻译可译性的某些启示：结语

The British linguist Raymond Firth commented that “wherever and whenever we enter into the speech of someone else, or of our own past, we are really translating.''68 In terms argued in more detail by Emilio Betti the discourse of other people is “accepted as an exhortation,' to use one’s own world knowledge to “retranslate and re-express' with one’s own “mental categories the idea [the discourse] gives rise to”一in other words, when one listens to the words of another person, one is in actual fact translating into the schemes of one’s own world the concepts that belong to the schema of the other person.69 In this sense we are carrying out that type of fundamental translation which may be called zero-level or zero-degree, which Gramsci follows up with what he defines as a “first degree' of translatability, which is not between natural languages as such but between, at first, what he considers as merely different terminologies (Q4§42), then, after reasoning on both Machiavelli (see Q8§162 in particular, and also the letter to Tania of December 1, 1932) and the Italian pragmatist Giovanni Vailati, realizes is actually between scientific languages or discourses. The various schools of thought attempt to describe the same reality not only through different terminologies but different scientific languages, as he notes in the definitive C-text, Q11§48.
英国语言学家雷蒙德·弗斯评论道：“无论何时何地，我们进入他人的言语或我们过去的言语，实际上都在进行翻译。”68  埃米利奥·贝蒂更详细地论证了这一点，认为他人的话语“被视为一种劝诫”，要求人们运用自身的世界知识“重新翻译和重新表达”这些话语所产生的观念，用自己的“思维范畴”来表达——换句话说，当我们倾听他人的话语时，实际上是在将属于他人思维模式的概念翻译成我们自身世界观的范畴。69  从这个意义上说，我们正在进行一种可以称之为零级或零度的基本翻译，葛兰西在此基础上提出了他所定义的“一级”可翻译性，它并非发生在自然语言之间，而首先发生在不同术语之间（Q4§42），然后，通过对马基雅维利（特别是 Q8§162，以及 1932 年 12 月 1 日的致塔尼亚信函）和意大利实用主义者乔凡尼·瓦拉蒂的思考，他意识到这实际上发生在科学语言或话语之间。 各种学派试图描述同一现实，不仅使用不同的术语，而且使用不同的科学语言，正如他在权威的 C 文本 Q11§48 中所指出的那样。

There is a high degree of abstraction in Gramsci’s translatability notes but, at the same time, he also “descends' to the practical level, as one sees from the comments above taken from Q1§153 and Q16§21. Figure 7.1 is an attempt to show that the passage from one language to another, here in the sense of natural languages, cannot be a direct passage from one to the other but is instead mediated, to a greater or lesser extent as the case may be, by the nature of the societies, both in their structures and in the superstructures arising on them in the various societies and which characterize the discourses of each of these societies. This seems to represent the next level up for Gramsci in the degree of complexity of translatability.
葛兰西的翻译性笔记具有高度的抽象性，但同时，正如从 Q1§153 和 Q16§21 中引用的评论所示，他也“下降”到实践层面。图 7.1 试图表明，从一种语言到另一种语言的转换（此处指自然语言）并非直接的转换，而是更大或更小的程度上，由社会性质（包括其结构以及在其上产生的各种社会的上层建筑）所介导的，这些社会性质特征了每种社会的论述。这似乎代表了葛兰西在翻译可行性复杂程度上的下一个层次。

But then, in the eleventh notebook in particular, he takes a big step forward. He realizes the full potential of what Marx had said in the Holy Family about classical German philosophy and French political practice expressing fundamentally the same processes, and to these discourses he adds from Lenin the third element, that of English classical economy in the figure of Ricardo. Starting from Marx’s metaphor of structure (base) and superstructure, he realizes that these three discourses reflect in some way deeper-lying processes at work within their respective societies and that, given that the societies are basically the same stage of economic and social development (i.e., they have “fundamentally similar structures”)，their superstructures are “equivalent,” and thus these superstructures, including most of all here the discourses that characterize them, “are mutually translatable whatever their particular national language” (Q11§49). Hence we arrive at the most abstract degree or level of translatability, which figure 7.3 attempts to summarize diagrammatically.
但是，尤其是在第十一本笔记本中，他迈出了重要一步。他意识到马克思在《神圣家族》中关于古典德国哲学和法国政治实践从根本上表达相同过程的论述的全部潜力，并且他从列宁那里补充了第三个要素，即以李嘉图为代表的英国古典经济学。从马克思的结构（基础）与上层建筑的隐喻出发，他意识到这三个话语在某种程度上反映了其各自社会内部运作的更深层次的过程，并且鉴于这些社会基本上处于相同的经济和社会发展阶段（即，它们具有“根本类似的结构”），其上层建筑是“等价的”，因此这些上层建筑，特别是其中体现它们的那些话语，“无论其具体的民族语言如何，都是可以相互翻译的”（Q11§49）。因此，我们到达了翻译能力的最抽象程度或水平，图 7.3 试图用图表总结。

In Notebook 11 Gramsci clarifies and makes explicit his concepts of translatability between different technical languages (linguaggi) or paradigms, but then he applies this method of his in practice elsewhere in the Notebooks. Nowhere is this more apparent than in the "twin” notebook to Q11一namely, Q10一on the philosophy of Benedetto Croce, in regard to various aspects of Croce’s philosophical and historical paradigms (the term paradigma is used explicitly by Gramsci in this respect). But it is not just an exercise carried out with Croce’s discourse. It is also the technique Gramsci applies for the examination, critique and incorporation一in other words, the translation一of important concepts from the discourses of thinkers such as Piero Gobetti, the Turinese left liberal who was editor of La Rivoluzione Liberale and a collaborator on Gramsci’s review, L，Ordine Nuovo, Edgar Quinet, historian of the French Revolution, Vincenzo Cuoco, Neapolitan patriot and others.
在第 11 笔记本中，葛兰西阐明并明确了他关于不同技术语言（linguaggi）或范式之间可翻译性的概念，但他之后在笔记本的其他部分实践了这种方法。这种方法在与 Q11“孪生”的笔记本——即 Q10——中，关于贝内代托·克罗齐的哲学，以及克罗齐的哲学和历史范式（葛兰西在此明确使用了“范式”一词）的各个方面，体现得最为明显。但这不仅仅是针对克罗齐的论述进行的练习。葛兰西也运用这种方法来考察、批判和吸收——换句话说，翻译——来自诸如皮耶罗·戈贝蒂（都灵左翼自由主义者，曾是《自由革命》杂志的编辑，也是葛兰西的评论杂志《新秩序》的合作者）、埃德加·基内（法国大革命史学家）、文森佐·库科（那不勒斯爱国者）等思想家的重要概念。

Lest it be thought that this process is limited to Gramsci, and thus as sort of “quirk,” it may be pointed out that similar processes were being carried out in the intellectual ferment of the same years. Heidegger's reworking in Being and Time of key concepts of Lukacs's History and Class Consciousness was analyzed explicitly in the 1960s as a problem of translation from one paradigm to another by Lucien Goldmann.70 More recently, Richard Wolin has written in similar terms of this same relationship. The young Marcuse who, it may be remembered, was a pupil of Heidegger, carried out a similar operation by reinterpreting certain concepts of the latter's discourse and in effect translating the reinterpreted forms into his Marxist discourse, in order to arrive, according to Wolin, at what some would call a “Heideggerian Marxist” position.71
免得有人认为这一过程仅限于葛兰西，因而只是某种“怪癖”，可以指出，在同一年代的知识界思潮中，类似的过程也在进行。卢西安·高尔曼（Lucien Goldmann）在 20 世纪 60 年代明确分析了海德格尔在《存在与时间》中对卢卡奇《历史与阶级意识》中关键概念的重新阐释，将其视为一种从一个范式到另一个范式的翻译问题。70 近期，理查德·沃林（Richard Wolin）也以类似的术语描述了这种关系。年轻的马尔库塞，值得记住的是，他是海德格尔的弟子，通过重新诠释海德格尔某些论述的概念，并将其重新诠释的形式翻译成他的马克思主义话语，从而达到，根据沃林的说法，一些人会称之为“海德格尔式马克思主义”的立场。71

In Q7§33 Gramsci observes that “at the advent of a regulated society,” when “political society” with its aspect of dominance is superseded, Marx’s conception of the world will also be superseded. In other words, this means that some future philosophies will be able to “translate” not only other philosophies of the past but also the current-day philosophy of praxis in order to incorporate them into a higher synthesis. Both the incorporation of concepts from outside Marxism and this prediction of the supersession of Marx’s conception of the world are examples of what Carl Marzani rightly said was “The Open Marxism of Antonio Gramsci,” the title of his selection from the Notebooks. And it should also be stated explicitly that this open aspect makes Gramsci’s Marxism qualitatively different from any conception of Marxism as a closed system, and specifically much of the system that in the Soviet Union and elsewhere in the countries of "real” or “actually existing” socialism went under the name of Marxism-Leninism.
在 Q7§33 中，葛兰西指出，“在规范社会到来之际”，当具有支配性质的“政治社会”被取代时，马克思的世界观也将被取代。换言之，这意味着未来的某些哲学能够“翻译”不仅是过去的其他哲学，而且是当今的实践哲学，以便将它们纳入更高的综合体。将马克思主义以外的概念纳入以及对马克思世界观的超越预测，都是卡尔·马尔扎尼正确指出的“安东尼奥·葛兰西的开放马克思主义”的例证，这是他从《笔记》中选集的标题。并且还应该明确指出，这种开放性使得葛兰西的马克思主义在本质上不同于任何将马克思主义视为封闭体系的理解，特别是苏联及其他“实际存在的”社会主义国家中以马克思列宁主义之名出现的许多体系。

Summing up in a sentence a wider significance of Gramsci’s work on translatability, it may be seen that in his overall approach, he was far in advance of his times and heralded the ideas sketched out by a philosopher of science of the stature of Thomas Kuhn, at the same time that he was also a forerunner, without the experts in the field being aware of it, of the important so-called cultural turn in translation studies that took place internationally in the 1980s.
简而言之，葛兰西关于可译性的著作具有更广泛的意义，在于其整体方法远远超前于时代，预示了像托马斯·库恩这样杰出科学哲学家的思想，同时，他也未被该领域专家所知，是 20 世纪 80 年代国际翻译研究中所谓的“文化转向”的重要先驱。

Notes 笔记

1. Antonio Gramsci, Prison Notebooks, vol. 1, trans. and ed. Joseph Buttigieg (New York: Columbia University Press), 147, hereafter PN1. [There is a list of abbreviations on pages ix-x. To facilitate locating passages in various translations and anthologies, we use the standard method of providing the notebook (Quaderno) number—in this case 1——followed by the section number, §. See the introduction, page 12, for discussion. We will indicate the English translation, if used.]
1. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》，第一卷，约瑟夫·巴蒂吉耶译，乔瑟夫·巴蒂吉耶编（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社），147 页，以下简称 PN1。[附录页 ix-x 列有缩写词表。为方便在各种译本和文集中查找段落，我们采用标准方法，提供笔记本（Quaderno）编号——在本例中为 1——后跟章节编号，§。请参阅导言第 12 页以了解讨论内容。我们将标明所使用的英文译本。]

2. Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, The Holy Family, in Collected Works, vol. IV, trans. Richard Dixon and Clemens Dutt (London: Lawrence & Wishart, 1975), 5-211, here 39.
2. 卡尔·马克思和弗里德里希·恩格斯，《神圣家族》，载《马克思恩格斯全集》第四卷，理查德·迪克森和克莱门斯·杜特译（伦敦：劳伦斯与维沙特出版社，1975），第 5-211 页，此处为第 39 页。

3. Wolfgang Fritz Haug, personal communication, March 22, 2006.
3. 海格·弗里茨·豪，个人通信，2006 年 3 月 22 日。

4. Carl Marzani, “Preface” to Antonio Gramsci, The Open Marxism of Antonio Gramsci, ed. and trans. Carl Marzani (New York: Cameron Associates, 1957), 59.
4. 卡尔·马尔扎尼，《安东尼奥·葛兰西：葛兰西的开放马克思主义》前言，卡尔·马尔扎尼编著，译（纽约：卡梅隆协会，1957），第 59 页。

5. Q10II§6iv, Antonio Gramsci, Further Selections from the Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Derek Boothman (Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1995), 306, hereafter cited as FSPN.
5. Q10II§6iv，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》节选，德雷克·布斯曼编著，译者德雷克·布斯曼（明尼阿波利斯：明尼苏达大学出版社，1995），第 306 页，以下简称《狱记》。

6. Q11§46, FSPN, 306. The words of this definitive C-text, written like the other paragraphs on translatability of section V of Notebook 11 in the late summer or autumn 1932, are to all intents and purposes the same as those of the first draft A-text, Q7§2, dating to November 1930; all dates quoted here that regard the Notebooks are taken from the chronological analysis, Gianni Francioni, L'officina gramsciana (Naples: Bibliopolis, 1984), 140-46.
6. Q11§46，FSPN，306。这段确定的 C 文本，其措辞与笔记本 11 卷第五部分关于可翻译性的其他段落一样，写于 1932 年夏末或秋季；其内容实质上与 1930 年 11 月撰写的初稿 A 文本 Q7§2 相同；本文中引用的所有关于笔记本的日期均来自吉安尼·弗朗西奥尼的《葛兰西工作室》（那不勒斯：Bibliopolis，1984），第 140-146 页中的年代分析。

7. Vladimir Lenin, Collected Works, vol. XXXIII (London: Lawrence and Wishart, 1966), 430-31.
7. 列宁全集，第 XXXIII 卷（伦敦：劳伦斯和维沙特，1966 年），第 430-431 页。

8. Q11§47 is listed as a B-text (i.e., one for which there is no previous first draft), but it is actually a C-text, for which see below, QC, 1468.
8. Q11§47 被列为 B 类文本（即，没有先前初稿的文本），但实际上是 C 类文本，见下文 QC 1468。

9. FSPN, 306-13. 9. FSPN，306-13。

10. PN1, 140. PN1，140。

11. Q19§24, SPN, 78. 11. Q19§24，SPN，78。

12. Antonio Gramsci, Prison Notebooks, vol. 2, ed. and trans. Joseph Buttigieg (New York: Columbia University Press, 1996), 191, hereafter cited as PN2.
12. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》第二卷，约瑟夫·巴蒂吉耶编辑并翻译 (纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，1996)，第 191 页，以下简称《狱札》第二卷。

13. PN2, 51. 13. PN2，51。

14. FSPN, 307. 14. FSPN，307。

15. In the absence of a verb in the C-text, the expression “seemed to me” of the A-text is replaced editorially in the critical edition of the Notebooks, QC, simply by "is,” an interpolation repeated in the translation by the current writer, who at the time was not aware of these subtleties. FSPN, 307.
15.  C-文本中缺少动词，A-文本中的“在我看来”在《笔记》的批判性版本（QC）中被编辑为简单的“是”，该插补在当前译者的译文中重复出现，当时译者并未意识到这些细微差别。FSPN，307。

16. PN2, 382. 16. PN2，382。

17. Antonio Gramsci, Letters from Prison, two volumes, ed. Frank Rosengarten, trans. Raymond Rosenthal (New York: Columbia University Press), 150-51, hereafter cited as LP2 for volume 2, and LP1 for volume 1. Here the translation is amended to substitute “economic policy” [politica economica] for the mistaken “political economy.”
17. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中书简》，两卷，弗兰克·罗森加特编，雷蒙德·罗森塔尔译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社），第 150-151 页，以下分别以 LP2（卷二）和 LP1（卷一）标注。此处将“政治经济学”改为“经济政策”。

18. FSPN, 164. 18. FSPN，164.

19. Antonio Gramsci, Selections from the Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Quintin Hoare and Geoffrey Nowell Smith (New York: International Publishers, 1971), 143, hereafter cited as SPN.
19. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》节选，昆廷·霍尔和杰弗里·诺韦尔·史密斯译，纽约：国际出版社，1971 年，第 143 页，以下简称《狱记》。

20. See FSPN, 306, and PN2, 191.
见 FSPN，第 306 页，及 PN2，第 191 页。

21. FSPN, 308, by “scientists” [scienzati], Gramsci means two scholars in general.
21. FSPN，308，由“科学家”（scienzati）指代，葛兰西意指两位学者。

22. PN1, 147, and SPN, 78.
22. PN1, 147，和 SPN, 78。

23. PN2, 192. 23. PN2，192。

24. PN1, 140, and SPN, 65.
PN1，140，和 SPN，65。

25. SPN, 400. 25. SPN，400。

26. LP2, 178. 26. LP2，178。

27. SPN, 403, autumn 1932 or very beginning of 1933.
27. SPN，403，1932 年秋季或 1933 年初。

28. Friedrich Engels, “Preface” to Karl Marx, Capital, Vol. III (London: Lawrence & Wishart, 1967), 10.
28.弗里德里希·恩格斯，《资本论》第三卷（伦敦：劳伦斯与威舍特，1967 年）“前言”，第 10 页。

29. FSPN, 184. 29. FSPN，184。

30. FSPN, 306. 30. FSPN，306。

31. FSPN, 307. 31. FSPN，307。

32. Len Doyal and Roger Harris, “The Practical Foundations of Human Understanding,” New Left Review I, 139 (1983): 59-78, here 78.
32. 莱恩·多伊尔和罗杰·哈里斯，“人类理解的实践基础”，《新左评论》第 139 期（1983）：59-78，此处为 78 页。

33. As quoted from Humboldt in Ernst Cassirer, The Philosophy of Symbolic Forms, Volume 1: Language, trans. Ralph Manheim (New Haven, Conn.: Yale University Press, 1953), 160.
引自洪堡，载于恩斯特·卡西尔，《象征形式的哲学》，第一卷：《语言》，拉尔夫·曼海姆译（康涅狄格州纽黑文：耶鲁大学出版社，1953），第 160 页。

34. FSPN, 312. 34. FSPN，312。

35. Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Cultural Writings, ed. David Forgacs, trans. William Boelhower (Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1985), 248, hereafter cited as SCW.
35. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《文化著作选集》，戴维·福格卡斯编，威廉·博尔霍韦尔译 (剑桥，马萨诸塞州：哈佛大学出版社，1985)，248 页，以下简称《文选》。

36. FSPN, 313, emphasis added.
36. FSPN，313，强调。

37. FSPN, 338. 37. FSPN，338。

38. FSPN, 339. 38. FSPN，339。

39. LP1, 365. 39. LP1，365。

40. FSPN, 344. 40. FSPN，344。

41. FSPN, 293. 41. FSPN，293。

42. FSPN, 355. 42. FSPN，355。

43. FSPN, 385. 43. FSPN，385。

44. FSPN, 385. 44. FSPN，385。

45. FSPN, 403. 45. FSPN，403.

46. LP1, 364. 46. LP1，364。

47. FSPN, 358. 47. FSPN，358。

48. Ludwig Wittgenstein, Philosophical Investigations, trans. G. E. M. Anscombe, ed. G. E. M. Anscombe and Rhush Rees (Oxford: Blackwell, 1953), §107.
48. 路德维希·维特根斯坦，《哲学研究》，G. E. M. 安斯康姆译，G. E. M. 安斯康姆和 Rhush Rees 编（牛津：布莱克韦尔，1953），§107。

49. Antonio Gramsci, Prison Notebooks, vol. 3, ed. and trans. Joseph Buttigieg (New York: Columbia University Press, 2007), 153, hereafter cited as PN3.
49. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》，卷 3，约瑟夫·巴蒂吉耶著译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，2007），第 153 页，以下简称 PN3。

50. PN3, 153. 50. PN3，153。

51. This correspondence is not stated in the critical edition of the Notebooks, but was accepted by its editor, Valentino Gerratana, in conversation with the Gramscian scholar Fabio Frosini; oral confirmation of this came during a session of the Seminario Gramsciano of the IGS Italia when the subject matter of this chapter was first presented in February 2003.
51. 此信件未载于《笔记》的批判性版本，但已获该书编辑者瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳在与葛兰西学者法比奥·弗罗西尼的对话中认可；在 2003 年 2 月该章节主题首次在 IGS 意大利葛兰西研讨会上提出时，得到了口头确认。

52. FSPN, 307, translation altered to give the more precise term "translatability'' instead of “one can translate.'
52. FSPN，307，翻译修改为更精确的术语“可翻译性”，而非“可以翻译”。

53. FSPN, 309. 53. FSPN，309。

54. Eugene Nida and C. R. Taber, The Theory and Practice of Translation (Leiden: Brill, 1974), 33.
54. 尤金·尼达和 C.R.塔伯，《翻译的理论与实践》(莱顿：布里尔出版社，1974)，第 33 页。

55. C. K. Ogden and I. A. Richards, The Meaning of Meaning (London: Kegan Paul, Trench, Trubner, 1946), 315.
55. C. K. 奥格登和 I. A. 理查兹，《意义的意义》(伦敦：凯根·保罗、特伦奇、特鲁布纳，1946)，315 页。

56. SPN, 403. 56. SPN，403。

57. SPN, 399-400. 57. SPN，399-400。

58. SPN, 401. 58. SPN，401。

59. SPN, 399-400. 59. SPN，399-400。

60. Q16§21, after February 1934; SCW, 384-85, translation altered.
60. Q16§21，1934 年 2 月之后；SCW，384-85 页，译文经修改。

61. PN1, 233. 61. PN1，233。

62. Nikolai Bukharin, Science at the Cross Roads: Papers Presented to the International Congress of the History of science and Technology by the Delegates of the U.S.S.R. (London: Kniga, 1931).
62. 布哈林，《科学在十字路口：苏联代表团提交给国际科学技术史大会的论文》（伦敦：Kniga 出版社，1931 年）。

63. Ferruccio Rossi-Landi, Semiotica ed Ideologia, second edition (Milan: Bompiani, 1994), 249-51.
63. 罗西-兰迪（Ferruccio Rossi-Landi），《符号学与意识形态》（第二版），（米兰：Bompiani 出版社，1994），第 249-251 页。

64. Thomas Kuhn, The Structure of Scientific Revolutions (Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1962), 129-30.
64. 托马斯·库恩，《科学革命的结构》（芝加哥：芝加哥大学出版社，1962），第 129-130 页。

65. Thomas Kuhn, The Essential Tension. Selected Studies in Scientific Tradition and Change (Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1977), 295n.4.
65. 托马斯·库恩，《根本张力》。科学传统与变迁中的选集研究 (芝加哥：芝加哥大学出版社，1977)，295 页注 4。

66. Thomas Kuhn, The Road since Structure: Philosophical Essays 1970-1993, ed. James Conant and John Haugeland (Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 2000), 189-90.
66. 托马斯·库恩，《结构之后之路：1970-1993 年哲学随笔》，詹姆斯·科南特和约翰·豪格兰德编（芝加哥：芝加哥大学出版社，2000），第 189-190 页。

67.  Tullio De Mauro, “Linguaggi scientifici,' in Studi sul Trattamento Linguistico dell'informazione Scientifico, ed. Tullio De Mauro (Rome: Bulzoni, 1994), 309-25, here 317.
67. 德·马乌罗（Tullio De Mauro），“科学语言”，载于德·马乌罗（Tullio De Mauro）编，《科学信息语言处理研究》（罗马：Bulzoni 出版社，1994），第 309-325 页，此处为第 317 页。

68. Raymond Firth, “Linguistic Analysis and Translation,' in Selected Papers of J. R.
68. 雷蒙德·弗斯，“语言分析与翻译”，载于 J. R. 的论文选集

Firth 1952-59, ed. F. R. Palmer (London: Longman, 1968), 77.
Firth 1952-59，帕尔默（F. R. Palmer）编（伦敦：朗文，1968），第 77 页。

69. Emilio Betti, “Di una teoria generale dell'interpretazione," in Diritto e Potere—Il problema dell'interpretazione e dell'applicazione del diritto, vol. I, ed. R. Orecchia (Milan: Giuffrè, 1966), 53-54.
69. 艾米利奥·贝蒂，“关于解释的一般理论”，载于《法与权力——法律解释与适用问题》，第一卷，奥雷基亚（R. Orecchia）编， (米兰：吉乌弗雷出版社，1966)，第 53-54 页。

70. Lucien Goldmann, Lukacs and Heidegger, trans. William Q. Boelhower (London: Routledge and Kegan Paul, 1977), 10-13 and 27.
70. 路易·戈德曼，《卢卡奇与海德格尔》，威廉·Q·博尔霍韦尔译（伦敦：罗特列奇和凯根·保罗，1977），第 10-13 页及第 27 页。

71. Richard Wolin, Heidegger's Children (Princeton, N.J.: Princeton University Press, 2003), 135.
71. 理查德·沃林，《海德格尔的后代》(普林斯顿，新泽西州：普林斯顿大学出版社，2003)，135 页。

* This chapter is a modified version of the second chapter of Traducibilità e Processi Traduttivi. Un caso: A^. Gramsci linguista (Perugia: Guerra edizioni, 2004), and of the last chapter “Traduzione e traducibilità" of the collectively authored volume Le Parole di Gramsci (Rome: Carocci, 2004), of the regular “Seminario Gramsciano" of the Italian Section of the International Gramsci Society, with additional comments included from papers read at the XII Congress of the Italian Society for the Philosophy of Language (“Tradurre e comprendere: Pluralità di lingue e di culture," Piano di Sorrento, September 2005) and at the 120th Congress of the Modern Language Association (Philadelphia 2004), the full text of which is to be published in the review Italian Culture. Work from the end of 2004 has been supported by a research grant dealing with “translation as the locus of encounter and of conflict," awarded jointly by the University of Bologna and the University's Department of Interdisciplinary Studies on Translation, Languages and Culture (SITLeC).
本章是《翻译可能性和翻译过程：一个案例：葛兰西作为语言学家》（佩鲁贾：格拉战争出版社，2004）第二章的修改版，以及合著的《葛兰西的言语》（罗马：卡罗奇出版社，2004）中最后一章“翻译与翻译可能性”的修改版，并包含了意大利国际葛兰西学会分会“葛兰西研讨会”的额外评论，以及在意大利语言哲学学会第十二届大会（“翻译与理解：语言和文化的差异性”，索伦托，2005 年 9 月）和美国现代语言协会第 120 届大会（费城，2004）上所作论文的补充评论，其全文将在《意大利文化》杂志上发表。2004 年末的研究工作得到了博洛尼亚大学和该大学跨学科翻译、语言和文化研究中心（SITLeC）联合颁发的“翻译作为相遇和冲突场所”研究基金的支持。

uiflc-ncd int*?liicc*?nkstcta poiad i£ rn nab fai ctiltni』di smu r 沁
uiflc-ncd int*?liicc*?nkstcta poiad i£ rn nab fai ctiltni』di smu r 沁
  
无法翻译。原文包含大量无法识别的字符和符号

fe.p. Heudi pìliiE fe.p. Heudi pìliiE
Translated Text:  fe.p. 赫迪皮利伊


Ijwcrtcd jntn rlx cojircxr or cnturaJ di 抢ui'沁 14.a. GarniLn pliil 腕叩1巴 m 市柏"li上血!£|101 ecummi肖
请提供正确的英文文本。  提供的文本包含无法识别的字符。


G'r.- li nsec ot sncic caonninic
格林利神经细胞通讯


Ecp'Yakjii of M^cin rccnnniic
M^cin rccnnniic 的 Ecp'Yakjii


Figure 7.1. A Simplified Model of the Translation Steps between Two Natural Languages
图 7.1. 两种自然语言之间翻译步骤的简化模型

Figure 7.2. Nida and Taber’s Model of the Translation Process
图 7.2.  尼达和泰伯的翻译过程模型

Sourer, text in r4atiu：il
源文本 r4atiu：il  的翻译：
无法翻译。  源文本包含无法识别的字符或格式

Lantiuajie ] 兰蒂乌阿杰


'iLWjict text LLiüNatuial Lanqua# 2
iLWjict 文本 LLiüNatuial Lanqua# 2


m皿rd Linien邮 1 m 皿 rd Linien 邮 1
Translated Text: m 皿 rd Linien 邮 1



MmLi.rm'i in nJ. i*. I El pi..!x i.il
MmLi.rm'i in nJ. i*. I El pi..!x i.il
(Unable to translate. The source text appears to be gibberish or a code that is not readily understandable.)

'iUi ■»； iUi ■»；
翻译文本：

•MW 馈T「i*r| •MW 馈 T「i*r|
无法翻译。  请提供更多上下文

^..liullbik, fhiV 仅 HK、C%Ttniir
无法翻译。源文本包含非标准字符。

4rO靖叩*"・1


i" i 「B pirjjiyni arm Limi riiiir-J ■Jkrij 「ur e=t i_:k 七Armi I .■ iri\:'. il E '
无法翻译。源文本包含大量无法识别的字符。



知"I


iKi 匚 l jIIH'JI
iKi 匚 l jIIH'JI  (无法翻译，请提供更多上下文。)

miXUW.心 EiHptJ miXUW.心 EiHptJ
翻译结果：
miXUW.心 EiHptJ

I "rij lir I p』l i.irdl ry.TUni-,
我“rij lir I p』l i.irdl ry.TUni-


* atuifaL 1 .g售ug 2
无法提供翻译。输入文本格式不符合预期。

Figure 7.3. The Gramscian Model of Translation between Paradigms and Cultural Discourses
图 7.3. 格拉姆斯基范式下的范式与文化话语之间的翻译模型

8
Aunt Alene on Her Bicycle:
Antonio Gramsci as Translator from German and as Translation Theorist
Lucia Borghese*
8 阿莱妮阿姨的自行车：安东尼奥·葛兰西作为德语翻译者和翻译理论家  路易莎·博尔格塞*

A skilled translator should be able not only to translate literally but also to translate the conceptual terms of a national culture into the terms of another national culture, that is, such a translator should have a critical knowledge of two civilizations and be able to acquaint one with the other by using the historically determined language of the civilization to which he supplies the informative material.
一位优秀的翻译者不仅应具备逐字逐句的翻译能力，还应能够将一个国家文化的概念性词汇翻译成另一个国家文化的词汇，也就是说，这样的翻译者应具备对两种文明的批判性理解，并能够通过使用该文明的历史性语言来使一方了解另一方，从而提供信息资料。

Antonio Gramsci1 安东尼奥·葛兰西

Antonio Gramsci wrote this letter to his wife Julca in September 1932 to encourage her to work in the field of translation, an activity which Gramsci himself had pursued for three years while jailed in Turi, believing—in his own words—that we should commit “all our forces” to translation. Gramsci’s experience as a translator lasted from 1929 to the early part of 1932. Subsequently, in his letter to Julca, he formulated his idea of translation as deeply rooted in his overall political and philosophical theory, most maturely expressed in the Prison Notebooks. As we shall see, this proposition was sometimes applied by Gramsci himself, and it is a corollary to the fundamental and universal proposition that he had deduced from the Marxian theory: in fact, Gramsci considered Marx’s theory to be indispensable to the historiographical methodology of historical materialism, according to which “two fundamentally similar structures have ‘equivalent5 superstructures, whatever the particular national language.”2
1932 年 9 月，安东尼奥·葛兰西写信给妻子朱尔卡，鼓励她在翻译领域工作。葛兰西本人在图里监狱服刑期间从事翻译工作三年，他坚信我们应该“竭尽全力”投入翻译工作。葛兰西的翻译经历持续了从 1929 年到 1932 年初。随后，他在写给朱尔卡的信中，将翻译理念与他的整体政治和哲学理论紧密联系起来，在《狱中札记》中得到了最成熟的表达。正如我们将会看到的，葛兰西本人有时也会运用这一主张，它与他从马克思主义理论中推导出的基本普遍命题相对应：事实上，葛兰西认为马克思的理论对于历史唯物主义的历史学方法论至关重要，根据这一理论，“无论具体民族语言如何，两种根本相似的结构都拥有‘等价的’上层建筑。”

In other words, Gramsci relied on Marx’s by-now classical “distillation of the French political terms ... into the language of German philosophy,”3 in arguing that in the international sphere:
换言之，葛兰西依赖马克思对法国政治术语的“提炼……转化为德国哲学语言”3，在论述国际领域时：

two national cultures, the expressions of two fundamentally similar civilizations . . . for the historian . . . can be mutually translatable, the one reducible to the other. Certainly, this translatability is not “perfect” in every respect, even in important ones (but what language is perfectly translatable into another language? what single word is exactly translatable into another language?) but it is so in its “basic” essentials.4
两种国家文化，表达着两种根本相似的文明……对于历史学家……它们是相互可翻译的，一种可以简化为另一种。当然，这种可翻译性并非在所有方面，甚至在重要方面都是“完美的”（但哪种语言能够完美地翻译成另一种语言？哪一个单字能够完全翻译成另一个单字？）但它在“基本”方面是如此。

The principle that the superstructures, or cultures, are mutually translatable implies a judgment of historical value: according to Gramsci, this is a critical element of the philosophy of praxis—it is, in fact, a primary assumption that Gramsci claims for the philosophy of praxis, and is confirmation of its anti-dogmatic nature. Testimony to this is Gramsci’s purpose, as stated even as far back as the Ordine nuovo period—namely, to “translate into Italian historical language” the postulates of international communism.5 This approach reflects Gramsci’s refusal of a “mathematical” scheme—in the sense of a rigid and abstract one—in his political theses and actions and, consequently, his need to find a “historical and psychological” schema to express them in a concrete and flexible way. Translation thus becomes a necessary criterion of mediation between two cultures, or conceptions of the world, which can critically mediate between the multiple and ever-changing faces of reality, and protect against all kinds of “metaphysical” rigid thinking: translation allows us to prevent contingent truths from being considered absolute and becoming fossilized as ideologies. In a certain sense, then, the concept of translation gives us a measure of Gramsci’s “absolute historicism.”
上层建筑或文化相互可翻译的原则，蕴含着对历史价值的判断：根据葛兰西的观点，这是实践哲学的关键要素——事实上，这是葛兰西为实践哲学提出的首要假设，并证实了其反教条的本质。其证据在于，葛兰西早在《新秩序》时期就已阐述的意图——即“将国际共产主义的信条翻译成意大利的历史语言”。这种方法反映了葛兰西在政治论断和行动中拒绝“数学”模式——就其僵化和抽象的意义而言——并因此需要找到一种“历史和心理”模式，以具体而灵活的方式表达它们。翻译因此成为两种文化或世界观之间必要的调解标准，能够批判性地调解现实的多种多样的和不断变化的面貌，并防止各种“形而上学”的僵化思维：翻译使我们能够防止偶然的真理被视为绝对真理并被僵化为意识形态。 某种意义上，翻译的概念为我们衡量葛兰西的“绝对历史主义”提供了一种尺度。”

The methodology used by Gramsci to translate Lenin’s political works by adapting them to the specific situation of Italy was also applied, with pedagogical intent, to literature. Implicitly Gramsci recognizes that language—as a social microcosm—is the vehicle of a conception of the world entrusted to the word as metaphor in a perennial, almost Heraclitean, state of becoming.
葛兰西将列宁的政治著作改编以适应意大利具体国情的方法，也以教学意图应用于文学。葛兰西暗含地承认，语言——作为社会的缩影——是世界观的载体，而这种世界观寄托于作为隐喻的文字，处于一种永恒的、近乎赫拉克利特的生成状态。

Gramsci first and foremost wanted to be a translator: with his theoretical and practical work, he laid the foundations for an idea of communism not as an imported product different in form from the political and social reality that it aimed to modify, but having the same form, and being viable due to its being an original “translation." Furthermore, although translation seems so different from the subjects that he tackled in his most mature work, Gramsci proved to be a translator in the real sense of the term. Besides translating a number of narrative texts from the Russian, Gramsci also translated several philological and literary texts from German: a compendium of linguistics by Franz Nikolaus Finck, part of a collection of Goethe’s poems and prose writings, the first year of the conversations between Goethe and Eckermann, a series of articles on American and French literature, an anthology of writings by Marx and nearly a couple of dozen of the Brothers Grimm’s fairy tales.
葛兰西首先是一位翻译家：通过他的理论和实践工作，他为共产主义思想奠定了基础，这种共产主义并非一种与它旨在改变的政治和社会现实形式不同的舶来品，而是具有相同形式，并且由于其为一种原创的“翻译”而具有可行性。此外，尽管翻译似乎与他在最成熟著作中处理的主题大相径庭，但葛兰西却以真正的意义上证明了自己是一位翻译家。除了翻译一些来自俄文的叙事文本外，葛兰西还翻译了多部来自德文的语言学和文学文本：弗朗茨·尼古拉·芬克的语言学著作汇编，歌德诗歌和散文作品集的一部分，歌德与艾克曼对话的第一年，关于美国和法国文学的文章系列，马克思著作选集，以及格林兄弟童话故事近二十篇。

These translations are still unpublished6 for no justified reason: an exception is an anthology of Gramsci’s writings entitled Favole di libertà [Tales of Freedom],? which includes what is claimed to be Gramsci’s translation of some of the Grimms’ fairy tales. However, this version is the result of a blatant manipulation of Gramsci’s manuscripts, which in our opinion one cannot yet consider to be published. An analysis of these neglected manuscripts with the aim of clarifying their subjects, putting them in chronological order, understanding their purpose and defining their inherent characteristics, will demonstrate that this alleged “minor work” is actually rich in meaning and goes beyond mere erudite curiosity.
这些翻译至今仍未出版，没有正当理由：例外的是一篇名为《自由的寓言》（Favole di libertà）的葛兰西文集，其中包含据称是葛兰西翻译的格林童话的部分内容。然而，这个版本是葛兰西手稿的明目张胆篡改结果，我们认为这还不能算作已出版物。对这些被忽视的手稿进行分析，旨在阐明其主题，使其按时间顺序排列，理解其目的并界定其内在特征，这将表明这所谓的“小作品”实际上意义丰富，远超简单的学术好奇。

The Issue of Gramsci’s Manuscripts
葛兰西手稿问题

The exclusion of Gramsci’s translation notebooks (A, B, C, D and part of Notebooks 7 and 9) from the various editions of his work may be indirectly traced back not only to the unsystematic way in which they were published, but also to editorial policies which, in reflecting the various phases of the political and cultural landscape of the Italian left, influenced distribution of the work in the postwar era. After the initial publication, with somewhat dubious selection criteria, of both the early and the mature writings, subsequent additions8 became necessary when from time to time there appeared in newspapers or reviews unpublished works, whose attribution to Gramsci was sometimes doubtful or controversial. The selection was wideranging, but fragmentary and incomplete: not only did this lead some commentators to hazardous conclusions and instrumental distortions of Gramsci, but it also rekindled and legitimated the old debate about the fragmentariness of Gramsci’s prison writings, first raised by Benedetto Croce when he observed that the Notebooks did not contain “that kind of synthesis whereby thought separates, combines and integrates in a coherent whole.”9
葛兰西的翻译手稿（A、B、C、D 以及部分第 7 和第 9 本手稿）未被其著作各个版本收录，其原因不仅可以间接追溯到手稿出版方式的非系统性，还在于编辑方针。这些方针反映了意大利左翼在政治和文化景观上的不同阶段，并影响了战后时期该著作的传播。在最初出版早期和成熟著作时，其选择标准多少有些可疑，之后，当报纸或评论刊登未发表的葛兰西作品时，需要补充新的内容。这些作品的葛兰西署名有时存在疑问或争议。虽然选择范围广泛，但这些内容零散且不完整；这不仅导致一些评论员得出草率的结论并对葛兰西的思想进行工具化歪曲，也重新引发并合理化了关于葛兰西狱中著作零散性的旧论辩。最初，当贝内代托·克罗齐观察到手稿中缺乏“思想分离、结合和整合为一个连贯整体”的那种综合时，就提出了这一问题。

Only very recently has a systematic reorganization of Gramsci’s work begun, and materials have been integrated, put in chronological order and provided with the necessary critical commentary. Before that, Gramsci’s works were seen as lacking a systematic “mechanical exteriority,” although they did have their own “inner coherence.”10 This work was started by Giulio Einaudi in 1975 with the critical edition of the Prison Notebooks edited by Valentino Gerratana, and is still continuing today with the unabridged publication of Gramsci’s early writings.11
格拉姆斯基的著作只有最近才开始系统地整理，将材料整合、按时间顺序排列并提供必要的批判性评论。在此之前，格拉姆斯基的作品被视为缺乏系统的“机械外在性”，尽管它们自身具有“内在的连贯性”。10  这项工作始于 1975 年，由朱利奥·埃纳乌迪（Giulio Einaudi）主编的《狱中札记》批判性版本，并由瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳（Valentino Gerratana）编辑，至今仍在继续，包括格拉姆斯基早期著作的未删节出版。11

Yet the critical edition of the Notebooks is also incomplete, as it includes only twenty-nine notebooks (two of which are abridged) out of thirty-three that were written by Gramsci. The missing parts include Gramsci’s “translation exercises,” which according to the editor were supposed to have a predominantly “therapeutic” function, while the author reflected on and organized the ideas that he would then go on to develop. It is therefore clear that the issue of how to organize Gramsci’s writings was tackled from the very beginning, but was put aside due to a misplaced functionalist attitude (the introduction reads “they would make an already hefty edition unnecessarily heavier”) when it was decided that the excluded writings were “clearly beyond the work plan that Gramsci set himself.”12 However, a simple comparison between Gramsci’s translations and the originals—an entirely respectable endeavor for a critical edition—would have revealed the contrary. Even the critical edition only offered, with some inaccuracies, a description of the excluded parts, but did include several examples taken from Marx’s writings that were judged to be “more directly connected with the issues dealt with in the Notebooks." The exclusion was explained— perhaps too casually—by remarking that those sections of the Notebooks did not “go beyond the immediate purpose that they were intended to serve.”13
然而，《笔记》的批判性版本亦不完整，它只收录了格拉姆斯基所著三十三本日记中的二十九本（其中两本为节选）。缺失的部分包括格拉姆斯基的“翻译练习”，据编辑称，这些练习主要具有“治疗性”功能，作者在其中反思和整理了他之后将要阐述的想法。因此，如何组织格拉姆斯基的著作这个问题从一开始就被提及，但由于一种错误的功能主义态度（导言中写道“它们会使原本厚重的版本变得不必要地更重”），在决定将被排除的著作“明显超出格拉姆斯基给自己制定的工作计划”时，这个问题被搁置一旁。然而，对格拉姆斯基的翻译与原文的简单比较——对于批判性版本来说，这是一项完全值得尊敬的工作——本会揭示相反的结果。 即使是批判性版本，也仅以一些不准确之处描述了被排除的部分，但确实包含了从马克思著作中摘录的一些例子，这些例子被认为与“笔记本”中讨论的问题“更直接相关”。对这些排除部分的解释——或许过于随意——是指出笔记本的那些部分没有“超出其最初的目的”。13

Venturing into unexplored territory is always a daunting and difficult challenge, especially if the final decision is to eliminate some parts of a work and leave the remaining ones to express an organic thought. In this case the risk was that of undermining the very premises on which a critical edition is based by sanctioning—unintentionally, of course—the fragmentary character of the Notebooks rather than transcending it. It is indeed our belief that only by publishing the work in its entirety can its inner coherence be guaranteed, thereby allowing readers to explore the genesis and original articulation of Gramsci’s thought.
探索未知领域始终是艰巨的挑战，尤其当最终决定删除部分内容，只保留部分内容以表达有机思想时。在这种情况下，风险在于，通过（当然，是不经意的）认可笔记的零碎性质而非超越它，从而损害批判性版本的基础前提。我们确实相信，只有通过完整出版作品，才能保证其内在的连贯性，从而使读者能够探索葛兰西思想的起源和最初表达方式。

It is reasonable to contend that Gramsci’s translations are not exempt from errors and inaccuracies, and that, due to their being work in progress (all texts are first drafts, often not reread),14 they are far below the optimum required for publication. However, an essential hallmark of Gramsci’s entire prison writings is their provisional and incomplete nature, since they represent an unsystematic collection not originally thought of for publication, at least not in the form in which we know them (Gramsci himself once observed that posthumous editions of unpublished works require considerable care). And, indeed, for a correct interpretation of the Notebooks, one cannot avoid reconstructing their chronology, and even less, their structure in its entirety.
可以合理地认为，葛兰西的译文并非没有错误和不准确之处，并且由于它们处于创作过程中（所有文本都是初稿，通常没有重读），14 它们远低于出版所需的最佳水平。然而，葛兰西所有狱中著作的一个重要特征是其临时性和不完整性，因为它们代表了一份并非最初打算出版的非系统性汇编，至少不是以我们现在所知的形式（葛兰西本人曾指出，未发表作品的遗著出版需要相当的谨慎）。事实上，为了正确解读这些笔记，我们无法避免重建其时间顺序，更不用说其完整的结构了。

Nevertheless, it would be senseless to argue that these heterogeneous versions have an independent value and an intrinsically organic character. This would be like considering a cut-off limb as independent of the body that it belongs to, asking it to do things that only the whole can do. Gramsci’s translations are documentary evidence of the methodical study of languages that had begun in his youth, an interest that he had cultivated at university when he attended Arturo Farinelli’s lectures on German classical and Romantic literature,15 and Matteo Bartoli’s linguistics course.16 As such, Gramsci’s translations are directly connected with the themes dealt with in the Notebooks, and in many ways they bridge the gap between past and present, between Gramsci, culture-hungry at the beginning of his journalistic career in Turin, and Gramsci as a Marxist theoretician of “disinterested” reflection.
然而，认为这些异质版本具有独立价值和内在的整体性，是毫无意义的。这就好比将截肢的肢体视为独立于其所属身体的存在，要求它去做只有整体才能完成的事情。葛兰西的翻译是其青年时期就开始的语言系统研究的有力佐证，这种兴趣源于他在都灵大学期间，聆听了阿图罗·法里内利教授关于德语古典和浪漫主义文学的讲座，以及马特奥·巴尔托利教授的语言学课程。因此，葛兰西的翻译与《狱中札记》中的主题直接相关，在很多方面，它们架起了过去与现在、葛兰西作为都灵时期渴望文化的新闻工作者与葛兰西作为马克思主义“无私”反思理论家的桥梁。

In 1932, now an expert due to his prison segregation, Gramsci wrote a letter to his wife—who had remained “on the margins of life’s flow” for several years—to encourage her to resume the study of music, a fundamental part of her education. This would allow her to relive her past with greater critical consciousness, since “it often happens that when returning to our past experiences, with all the wealth of hindsight, we do make important discoveries.”17 Might it be that Gramsci—as an erstwhile student of linguistics—followed a similar path with his translations?
1932 年，由于监狱隔离，格拉姆斯基已成为专家，他写信给妻子——多年来一直“生活于边缘”——鼓励她恢复音乐学习，这是她教育的重要组成部分。这将使她以更强的批判性意识重温过去，因为“当我们带着丰富的后见之明回到过去经历时，常常会做出重要的发现。”17  格拉姆斯基作为一名语言学领域的旧日学生，是否也遵循了类似的翻译路径？

These translations of his cast a bridge between his university apprenticeship and pre-Marxist period, but also anticipate issues and concepts that were developed at a later date. It is therefore necessary to take the translations into account when we analyze Gramsci’s writings in an overall perspective, as recommended by Gerratana when he wrote that “[e]verything that made Gramsci the man that he was, from the ways in which he was moulded and his development, relives in the Notebooks, and it is in this reliving that it can be judged, examined in detail and developed.”18
他的这些译作架起了他大学学徒时期与马克思主义前时期之间的桥梁，同时也预示了后来发展出的问题和概念。因此，在分析葛兰西的著作时，有必要将这些译作纳入考量，正如葛拉塔纳所建议的那样：“葛兰西之所以成为他，从他被塑造的方式和他的发展，都重现在《笔记》中，正是在这种重现中，它才能被评判、详细考察和发展。”

If we follow this course, it soon becomes clear that the excluded texts do contribute to an enrichment of Gramsci as a thinker and as a man, revealing indeed entirely new facets of his thought. Not only do they clarify his preferences and interests, but they also complement his linguistic theory and pedagogical concepts. His translations should therefore be considered to be in an “organic” relationship with the rest of the Notebooks, since they fall within the realm of his overall social theory, especially where the translation of the Grimms’ tales is concerned. The chronology allows us to view Gramsci’s translations as following a path from the simple to the complex, from mere “exercise” to a conscious design, and from philology to political pedagogy.
如果我们沿着这条思路走下去，很快就会发现被排除的文本确实丰富了葛兰西作为思想家和人的内涵，揭示了他思想的全新方面。它们不仅阐明了他的偏好和兴趣，还在语言理论和教育理念方面补充了他的思想。因此，他的译作应该被视为与《笔记》其他部分存在“有机”联系，因为它们属于他整体社会理论的范畴，尤其是在对格林童话的翻译方面。时间顺序使我们能够将葛兰西的翻译视为从简单到复杂、从简单的“练习”到有意识的设计、从语言学到政治教育的演变过程。

The Chronology of Gramsci’s Translations
葛兰西译著年表

Gramsci’s translations are generally assigned to the 1929-1931 period and can be dated and ordered chronologically approximately, despite the objective difficulty that all have found in dating the prison writings, due to his having worked simultaneously on different notebooks, and completed them at different stages. However, an understanding of the order in which different sections were written一based on an orthographic analysis, a comparison with the Letters, and an analysis of grammar and style—may provide further insight into the chronology of other entries in the Notebooks, the dates of which are still uncertain.19
葛兰西的译作通常被归入 1929-1931 年期间，尽管由于他同时撰写不同的笔记本，并在不同阶段完成它们，所有研究者都发现日期确定存在客观困难，但仍可大致按时间顺序进行排序和日期标注。然而，对不同章节的写作顺序的理解——基于正字法分析、与书信的比较以及语法和风格分析——可以进一步深入了解其他日期仍不确定的笔记本条目的时间顺序。19

Notebook A contains the translation of a special issue of Literarische Welt (October 14, 1927) on American literature, and several articles on Zola which had appeared in the same weekly journal on September 30, 192720; following on with no interruption in the writing, the subsequent parts of this notebook contain fifteen tales of the Brothers Grimm,21 numbered progressively by Gramsci himself, thus seeming to confirm the hypothesis that the order of presentation of these writings reflect their chronology.
笔记本 A 包含《文学世界》（1927 年 10 月 14 日）关于美国文学的专刊翻译，以及该周刊（1927 年 9 月 30 日）上发表的几篇关于左拉的文章；接下来的部分，在写作过程中没有中断，包含格林兄弟的十五个故事，由葛兰西本人依次编号，从而似乎证实了这些作品呈现顺序反映其创作年代的假设。

Notebook B contains, in order, the next tales of the Grimms (eight complete and one unfinished), the rough copy of a letter to Julca—which can be dated between November 14 and 23, 193122—and the first part of a short volume on linguistics by F. N. Finck, Die Sprachstämme des Erdkreises [The Linguistic Families of the World] (Teubner: Leipzig-Berlin, 1923). In fact, only part of Notebook B (as concerns the remaining tales, which are numbered consecutively) was written after Notebook A, as appears from the translation of Finck’s essay, which adopts a particular stylistic trait typical of Gramsci’s pre-prison writings, as reported by Gerratana (letter "t” being written with a long oblique stroke across it)23; therefore, this translation should not be accepted to be only antecedent to the preceding tales in Notebook B, but also earlier than the entire Notebook A, where this stylistic trait is not used. What certainly comes after the tales is the letter to Julca, which begins on the sixth (!) line of the reverse side of sheet 23, after an interrupted letter, from which it is separated with a line drawn in pen.24
笔记本 B 依次包含格林兄弟的后续故事（八个完整和一个未完成），一封写给 Julca 的草稿信件（可追溯至 1931 年 11 月 14 日至 23 日）以及 F.N.芬克关于语言学的短册的第一部分，即《地球语言语系》（Teubner 出版，莱比锡-柏林，1923 年）。事实上，只有笔记本 B 的部分内容（关于剩余连续编号的故事）是在笔记本 A 之后撰写的，这从芬克文章的翻译中可以看出，该翻译采用了葛拉塔纳所报告的葛兰西狱前著作中的一种特定风格特征（“t”字母被写成带有长斜线的形式）23；因此，这种翻译不仅应被视为早于笔记本 B 中前述故事，而且还应早于整个笔记本 A，因为笔记本 A 中没有使用这种风格特征。可以肯定的是，写给 Julca 的信件位于故事之后，它从第 23 页背面第六行（！）开始，在一段中断的信件之后，并用笔划线将其与中断的信件隔开 24。

Notebook C begins with a series of English exercises,25 and the rest of Finck’s text, which is translated in its entirety with the same stylistic traits described above. Subsequently, the even pages contain a series of poems by Goethe26: based on the frequency of the letter "t” written with a stroke across, these translations may be contemporary with the first part of the translation of Finck. On the odd pages, instead, the poems alternate with the first year of Gespräche mit Eckermann [Conversations with Eckermann], where his previously used spelling conventions, with double consonants, appear only occasionally.27 The two groups of writings, on and by Goethe, were produced at different times, as appears not only from the form of the letter "t” and from the more recent spelling conventions in the Gespräche, but also from the order of presentation of the texts in the Notebooks: although the translations of Goethe’s poems alternate with the writings on Goethe, the former are obviously earlier. It should also be noted that the second part of Finck’s translation, which follows on the first part contained in Notebook B, was written before the translation of the Gespräche. In fact, Notebook C, distinguished by the more or less marked presence of the characteristic form of the letter "t,” must predate Notebook A, where the old style has disappeared completely; however, Notebook C is more recent than the first part of Finck’s translation, and comes after the continuation of the Grimms’ tales contained in Notebook B.
笔记本 C 以一系列英文练习开始，25 随后是芬克的全部文本，翻译时保留了上述风格特征。偶数页包含歌德的诗歌系列 26：根据“t”字母的笔画频率，这些翻译可能与芬克翻译的第一部分同时期。奇数页则交替出现与埃克曼对话录[与埃克曼谈话]的第一年，其中他之前使用的双辅音拼写规则仅偶尔出现。27 歌德的作品，即翻译和原著，创作时间不同，这不仅从“t”字母的书写形式和对话录中较新的拼写规则可以看出，还在于笔记本中文本的呈现顺序：尽管歌德诗歌的翻译与歌德的著作交替出现，但前者显然更早。还应注意，芬克翻译的第二部分，紧随笔记本 B 中第一部分之后，其创作时间早于对话录的翻译。 事实上，以或多或少明显的“t”字母特征形式为标志的笔记本 C，必然早于笔记本 A，后者已完全消失这种旧式风格；然而，笔记本 C 比芬克翻译的第一部分更晚，且位于格林童话续篇（收录于笔记本 B）之后。

Notebook 7 contains an almost-complete translation of an anthology of Marx’s writings, Lohnarbeit und Kapital,28 although the passages appear in a different order from the original: the increased rarity of stroked "t”s (which now appear only occasionally when the consonant is doubled) suggests that this notebook should be more recent than the translations of Finck and those of Goethe’s poetry, and almost certainly more recent than the Gespräche, but it should predate Notebook A, where there are no characteristically stroked "t”s, and also predate the parts of Notebook B which represent a continuation of Notebook A (the tales and the rough copy).
笔记本 7 包含了马克思著作选集《雇佣劳动与资本》的几乎完整译本，28 尽管段落顺序与原文不同：笔画“t”的出现频率降低（现在只有辅音重复时偶尔出现）表明，该笔记本应晚于芬克的译本和歌德诗歌的译本，几乎肯定晚于《谈话录》，但应早于笔记本 A，后者没有特征性的笔画“t”；也应早于笔记本 B 的部分，后者是笔记本 A 的延续（故事和草稿）。

Gramsci’s translations from German29 may therefore be ordered as follows:
因此，葛兰西从德语的译作 29 可以按如下顺序排列：

1. Notebook B: Finck, first part (sheets 23r-100v).30
1. 笔记本 B：芬克，第一部分（第 23 页-100 页）。30

2. Notebook C: Goethe’s poems (page 99 and sheets 100-176, only on the even pages) may be at least partly contemporary with the Finck translation.
2. 笔记本 C：歌德诗歌（第 99 页及 100-176 页，仅限偶数页）可能至少部分与芬克的翻译同时期。

3. Notebook C: Finck, second part (sheets 7-48).
3. 笔记本 C：芬克，第二部分（第 7-48 页）。

4. Notebook C: Conversations with Eckermann (sheets 49-98, 101-75, only on the odd pages, and 177-94).
4.  笔记本 C：与埃克曼的对话（第 49-98 页、101-75 页，仅奇数页，以及 177-194 页）。

5. Notebook 7: the translations of Marx (sheets 2r-34r) may be partly contemporary with the Conversations.
5. 笔记本 7：马克思的译文（第 2 页至 34 页）部分可能与对话同时期。

6. Notebook A: “Die literarische Welt” (sheets 1r-50v).
6. 笔记本 A：“文学世界”（第 1 页-50 页）。

7. Notebook A: Grimm, fifteen tales (sheets 51r-99r).
7. 笔记本 A：格林童话，十五个故事（页码 51r-99r）。

8. Notebook B: Grimm, eight complete and one incomplete tale, continuation (sheets 1r-23r).
8. 笔记本 B：格林，八个完整故事和一个不完整的故事，续篇（第 1 页-23 页）。

9. Rough copy of letter to Julca, written between November 14 and 23, 1931 (sheet 23rv).
1931 年 11 月 14 日至 23 日期间，致朱尔卡的信件草稿（第 23 页背面）。

Although there are very few references to this order of contents in the Letters from Prison, they still seem to confirm its correctness, sometimes with quite precise chronological details. The earliest possible date for the beginning of the translations is indicated in the letter to Tania of February 9, 1929. In this letter Gramsci informed his sister-in-law that he had obtained permission to write in his cell, and that he had started the translation work that he had envisioned for a long time. On November 18, he wrote her: “At present, I’m translating only from German, because I don’t want to overtax my memory and disperse my attention, but next year, when I’ll have completed the German program I have set for myself, I’ll take up Russian again in depth.”31 However, Gramsci’s “German program” kept him busy until after the end of 1931.
尽管《狱中书简》中很少提及此内容顺序，但它们似乎仍能证实其正确性，有时甚至包含相当精确的时间细节。翻译开始的最早可能日期，在 1929 年 2 月 9 日写给塔妮娅的信中有所提及。在信中，葛兰西告知其弟媳，他已获得在牢房中写作的许可，并已开始他长期以来设想的翻译工作。11 月 18 日，他写道：“目前，我只翻译德文，因为不想过度负担记忆力，分散注意力，但明年，当我完成自己制定的德文计划后，我将深入研究俄文。”31  然而，葛兰西的“德文计划”一直持续到 1931 年末。

At that time, as the letter to Tania of December 16, 1929, clearly demonstrates, Gramsci was working on Finck’s text, and he was translating the chapter entitled La lingua dei negri africani [The Language of the Black Africans] (Notebook C). Finally, Gramsci’s request for Lohnarbeit und Kapital was recorded on March 24, 1930, and he quoted a passage from this work in a letter to his brother Carlo on August 25.32 The translations from this collection are therefore likely to have been written between the summer and autumn of 1930. Gramsci still had before him the numerous articles from the Literarische Welt, so his translation of the tales could hardly have started before 1931. Although the exact date of its beginning remains unknown, the translation of the tales was certainly interrupted between November 14 and 23, when Gramsci wrote to Julca instead of finishing the translation of the last tale that he had begun. The rough copy of this letter represents, therefore, the earliest possible date for the Grimm texts and for all of Gramsci’s translations from German.
当时，正如 1929 年 12 月 16 日的致塔尼亚信件所明确表明的那样，葛兰西正在研究芬克的著作，并翻译了名为《非洲黑人语言》（笔记 C）的章节。1930 年 3 月 24 日，葛兰西要求提供《雇佣劳动与资本》一书，并在 1930 年 8 月 25 日的信中引用了该书的一段文字。因此，这些译文很可能写于 1930 年的夏季和秋季之间。葛兰西手中还有《文学世界》杂志的众多文章，因此他的童话翻译工作不可能在 1931 年之前开始。虽然其确切的开始日期仍然未知，但童话的翻译工作无疑在 1931 年 11 月 14 日至 23 日期间中断过，当时葛兰西给朱尔卡写信，而不是完成他刚开始翻译的最后一篇童话。因此，这封信的草稿代表了格拉姆斯基德文译作以及所有格拉姆斯基德文译作的最早可能日期。

This chronology is further supported by evidence of Gramsci’s increased linguistic skills as his translation work progressed: his fluency in German had improved (as shown by his gradually improving understanding of verbal forms and idiomatic phrases that were previously mistranslated), and he had developed a smoother style of writing. In fact, after a series of technically pedestrian translations, Gramsci attempted an unexpectedly original adaptation of the tales (Märchen) for their intended readership.
该时间表还得到葛兰西翻译技巧提升的证据支持：他的德语能力有所提高（体现在他逐渐改进对之前翻译错误的动词形式和习语的理解），写作风格也更加流畅。事实上，在经过一系列技术性平庸的翻译后，葛兰西尝试对这些故事（Märchen）进行了一次出人意料的原创性改编，以迎合其目标读者群。

Notebook D contains only the beginning of the second draft of the tales: the second draft was supposed to consist of a transcription and stylistic revision addressed to the children of his sister Teresina, as results from the letter that he wrote to her on January 18, 1932. However, fate decided otherwise: the draft was interrupted after two pages for no apparent reason, and was never resumed. The prison authorities may have forbidden Gramsci to send the manuscript to his sister. This suggestion, first made by Gerratana, seems to be confirmed by Gramsci’s use of "if” when he promised the tales to Teresina: "I’ll . . . send them to you, if I get permission.”33
笔记本 D 仅包含第二稿故事的开头部分：第二稿本应包含一份转录和针对他姐姐特雷西娜的孩子们的风格修订，正如他 1932 年 1 月 18 日写给她的信件所示。然而，命运却另有安排：该稿件毫无理由地在两页后中断，并且从未恢复。监狱当局可能禁止葛兰西将手稿寄给他的姐姐。葛拉塔纳首先提出的这一建议，似乎得到了葛兰西在向特雷西娜承诺故事时使用“如果”的证实：“我将……如果得到许可，将它们寄给你。”

For obvious reasons of space, our analysis is limited to the implications of Gramsci’s "translation exercises” for some of the main topics of the Notebooks; in particular, we concentrate on the translation of the Grimms’ Märchen, which marks the conclusion of Gramsci’s translation project, both chronologically and conceptually. With his adaptation of the Grimms’ fairy tales or popular tales for children, 34 Gramsci wanted to give his personal “contribution to the imagination of the little ones,”35 and although the second draft was never completed, his contribution does stand as a concrete educational proposal, as well as an example of the “translatability of philosophical and scientific languages” that he dealt with in the Notebooks during the same period.36
由于空间限制，我们的分析仅限于葛兰西“翻译练习”对《狱中札记》部分主要主题的影响；特别是，我们集中研究了格林童话的翻译，它在时间和概念上都标志着葛兰西翻译项目的终结。通过将格林童话或儿童通俗故事改编，葛兰西希望为“小家伙们的想象力”做出个人贡献，尽管第二稿从未完成，但他的贡献仍然是一项具体的教育建议，以及同一时期他在《狱中札记》中探讨的“哲学和科学语言的可翻译性”的范例。

From "Mimesis” to Interpretation
从“摹仿”到诠释

Only recently has recognition been granted to the importance of Gramsci’s linguistic interests, formerly often a source of embarrassment for those who felt somehow obliged to justify its presence throughout his early and his mature writings. Here most of the credit goes to Franco Lo Piparo, whose enlightening book traces the fundamental import of linguistics “in the formation of all the main Gramscian concepts: that of the national-popular, the intellectuals, folklore, hegemony, political society, civil society, consent.”37 For Gramsci, linguistics was “not simply a Nebenfach" (“subsidiary subject") as Tullio De Mauro observes in his introduction to Lo Piparo’s work, “but a pivotal point, a fundamental element of all his theoretical reflection."38 And his study of foreign languages and their literature, resumed in jail and culminating in his translations from the culturally most significant languages, should also therefore be considered as a way “to put oneself in contact with other cultural lives.”39 His aim was clearly to acquire the necessary concrete analytical elements, and the wide array of instruments necessary for historical inquiry, in order to analyze the complex interaction between the history of a language, cultural apparatuses and society. According to Gramsci, “linguists are essentially historians ... they study languages precisely in so far as they are not art, but the ‘material5 of art, a social product, and the cultural expression of a given people.”40
直到最近，人们才开始认识到葛兰西的语言学兴趣的重要性，而这些兴趣以前常常令那些感觉有义务为其在早期和成熟著作中的存在辩护的人感到尴尬。这里大部分的功劳归于弗朗哥·洛皮帕罗，他的开创性著作追溯了语言学“在形成所有主要葛兰西概念中的根本意义：民族-人民、知识分子、民间文化、霸权、政治社会、公民社会、同意。”37 对葛兰西而言，语言学“并非仅仅是‘Nebenfach’（辅助学科）”，正如图利奥·德毛罗在他的洛皮帕罗著作导言中所观察到的，“而是一个枢纽，所有他理论思考的基本要素。”38 而且，他在监狱中恢复并最终以翻译文化上最具影响力的语言而告终的外国语言及其文学研究，也因此应被视为“与其他文化生活取得联系的方式”。39 他显然旨在获得必要的具体分析要素，以及进行历史研究所需的各种工具，以便分析语言史、文化机制和社会之间错综复杂的相互作用。根据葛兰西的观点，“语言学家本质上是历史学家……他们研究语言，恰恰是因为语言并非艺术，而是艺术的‘素材’，一种社会产品，以及特定民族的文化表达。40

Gramsci recognized that his knowledge of foreign languages, albeit sufficient to “speak and especially to read,"41 was limited: this is why he resolved to pursue a “systematic” study not only of German and Russian, but also of English, Spanish, Portuguese and Rumanian. He was not allowed to write or make any notes in the early stages of his imprisonment and so, at the beginning of his work (among the four “homogeneous” subject matters that he intended to give a treatment of für ewig, in the manner of Goethe, was “a study of comparative linguistics'^), it seems logical that he tried to make the most of his time and energies in conducting a preparatory study that could be of use for his project without necessitating any written notes.
葛兰西意识到自己虽然掌握了足够的外国语言，“能够说，特别是能够读”，41 但其知识仍然有限：正因如此，他决心系统地研究德语、俄语，以及英语、西班牙语、葡萄牙语和罗马尼亚语。他在被监禁初期无法书写或做笔记，因此，在他开始的著作中（四个“同质”研究主题中，他打算以歌德的方式“永远”进行论述，其中之一是“比较语言学研究”），他似乎很自然地试图充分利用时间和精力，开展一项无需书面笔记的准备性研究，为他的项目服务。

It is neither by chance nor out of unreasonable punctiliousness that, on October 3, 1927, Gramsci reiterated his request for Finck’s book (the first that he had set out to translate). He did not want to content himself with the other book by the same author (Die Haupttypen des Sprachbaus [The main types of language structure], Leipzig 1909) that the bookseller had wrongly sent to him. Nor is it a mere coincidence that in the same letter Gramsci asked not only for Die Sprachstämme des Erdkreises, the most complete classification of languages that was available at the time, but also for Giulio Bertoni and Matteo Giulio Bartoli’s Manualetto di linguistica (in actual fact Breviario rather than Manualetto), the programmatic manifesto of the new approach to linguistics founded by his former professor Bartoli.
1927 年 10 月 3 日，葛兰西并非偶然或出于不合理的严谨，再次要求索取芬克的著作（他最初打算翻译的著作）。他不想满足于该作者的另一本书（《语言结构的主要类型》，莱比锡，1909 年），因为书商错误地寄给了他。同样，葛兰西在同一封信中要求的不仅是《地球语言族系》，当时最完整的语言分类，而且还有朱利奥·贝托尼和马特奥·朱利奥·巴尔托利合著的《语言学概要》（实际上是《简明指南》而非《概要》），这是由他以前的教授巴尔托利创立的新语言学方法的纲领性宣言。

Bartoli’s Breviario provided Gramsci with a methodology: in fact, “Bartoli’s innovation lies precisely in this: that he has transformed linguistics, conceived narrowly as a natural science, into an historical science, the roots of which must be sought ‘in space and time’ and not in the vocal apparatus in the physiological sense.”43 Finck’s learned work
巴尔托利《简明语法》为葛兰西提供了一种方法论：事实上，“巴尔托利的创新恰恰在于此：他将狭义上的语言学，即自然科学，转变为一门历史科学，其根源必须在‘时空’中寻找，而不是在生理意义上的发音器官中。”43  芬克的学术著作

effectively complemented Bartoli’s insofar as his classification, far from being mechanical and arbitrary, was based on ethnic and geographical distribution of linguistic phenomena, thus making it possible to devise an implicit and tentative historical profile of these phenomena. The complementary nature of the two works, both of them anti-positivistic and anti-evolutionist, is further confirmed if we consider that, in Gramsci’s own words, Bartoli’s work “paved a new way in the idealistic sense,”44 whereas Finck’s took in hand and developed Romantik philosophical intuitions by declaring that there was a direct relationship between language and culture, thought and language. (Fink had in fact been a follower of [Wilhelm von] Humboldt, and was also strongly indebted to Steinthal.45)
有效地补充了巴尔托利的工作，因为他的分类并非机械或武断，而是基于语言现象的民族和地理分布，从而使得人们能够构建这些现象的隐含和初步的历史概况。这两部著作的反实证主义和反进化论的互补性质，如果我们考虑格拉姆斯基自己的话，即巴尔托利的工作“在理想主义意义上开辟了一条新道路”，而芬克的工作则接手并发展了浪漫主义哲学的直觉，宣称语言与文化、思想与语言之间存在直接关系。（事实上，芬克曾是[威廉·冯]洪堡的追随者，并且也深受施泰因塔尔的影响。）

In criticizing naturalistic scientism, Finck opposed (much as Gramsci did in his early and mature writings) the neo-grammatical stance that language processes can be explained through predictable intrinsic laws. Instead, Finck saw language as the expression of worldviews and cultures, inseparable from human activities, as shown in the introduction to Die Sprachstämme des Erdkreises:
批评自然主义科学主义时，芬克反对（正如葛兰西在其早期和成熟著作中所做的那样）新语法立场，即语言过程可以通过可预测的内在规律来解释。相反，芬克认为语言是世界观和文化的表达，与人类活动密不可分，正如《地球语言族群》导论中所显示的那样。

Since language as an entity is not independent of human beings, it cannot exist, develop and disappear without the aid of human beings. In fact, any given language (such as German) is nothing but a sum of activities which appear more or less similar and homogeneous: not even a single one of them can result [derive]46 from another, but all should be attributed to the human beings who perform these activities (Notebook B, sheet 29rv).
语言作为一种实体，并非独立于人类而存在，它无法在没有人类帮助的情况下存在、发展和消失。事实上，任何一种语言（例如德语）都不过是诸多或多或少相似且同质的活动总和：其中任何一项活动都不能由另一项活动产生，而所有活动都应归因于执行这些活动的个体人类。（笔记本 B，第 29 页反面）

This is a passage from Gramsci’s translation of Finck47: the exaggeratedly painstaking effort he put into translating the whole work can only be explained by a deep interest in this matter, which is further confirmed by his use of Finck’s work for various noterelle di cultura (“brief notes on culture”). According to Gramsci, culture is always connected with language and writing; Finck’s acute observations on popular and elite varieties, dialect fragmentation or homogeneity of the languages he examined must have proved valuable in ascertaining the existence, or absence, of a national culture in different countries, and in understanding how a national culture could be attained. Thus, the “Esperantistic” value that Gramsci attributes to Chinese ideograms, insofar as they “have no organic connection with any particular language,” suggests a series of considerations about “the so-called universal conventional languages in so far as they are not the historical expression of any particular, necessary conditions, become an element of social stratification, and of the fossilization of certain strata”： the conclusion is that China cannot have a “widespread popular culture.”48
这篇文字摘自葛兰西对芬克 47 的翻译：他将整部著作翻译得如此费力，只能用他对该事物的浓厚兴趣来解释，这在他的笔记札记（“文化简述”）中使用芬克的作品进一步得到证实。根据葛兰西的观点，文化始终与语言和文字息息相关；芬克对大众和精英语言差异、方言破碎或语言同质性的敏锐观察，一定对确定不同国家是否存在或不存在民族文化，以及理解如何获得民族文化大有裨益。因此，葛兰西将汉字赋予的“世界语”价值，在于它们“与任何特定语言都没有有机联系”，暗示了一系列关于“所谓的普世约定俗成语言，就其并非任何特定、必要条件的历史表达而言，成为社会阶层划分以及某些阶层僵化的因素”的思考：结论是，中国不可能拥有“广泛的大众文化”。48

The translation notebooks include about fifty poems from Goethe’s biographical anthology entitled Über allen Gipfeln (about twenty of these translations were revised and corrected by Gramsci on the basis of a previous translation of Benedetto Croce’s),49 as well as a section of the Conversations with Eckermann. These translations complement Gramsci’s notes on Goethe, while demonstrating his renewed interest in him, which had been stimulated by Farinelli and, later on, by Croce. Indeed, as early as 1917-1918, Croce had induced Gramsci to popularize Goethe’s humanistic message in the organs of cultural renewal that he had given rise to.50 At the time, Gramsci was the young editor of Il Grido del Popolo and had just begun his activity as a leader of the Turin working class, but his “elective affinity” with Goethe continued for the next twenty years and was further developed in the Notebooks.
翻译笔记本包含歌德传记选集《山巔之上》中的约五十首诗歌（其中约二十首译文经格拉姆斯基根据贝内代托·克罗齐先前译文修订和校正），以及《与埃克曼的谈话》的部分内容。这些翻译补充了格拉姆斯基对歌德的注释，并展现了他对歌德的重新关注，这种关注最初源于法拉利尼，后来则由克罗齐激发。事实上，早在 1917-1918 年，克罗齐就促使格拉姆斯基在克罗齐所创立的文化革新刊物上推广歌德的人文主义信息。50 当时，格拉姆斯基是《人民呼声报》的年轻编辑，刚刚开始领导都灵工人阶级的活动，但他与歌德的“择亲”关系持续了二十年，并在《笔记》中进一步发展。

Against this backdrop, the translations of “Goethe as creator” and “Goethe as artist” (Notebook C, 49) confirm that Gramsci’s “aesthetic admiration”51 for Goethe was fed by his unlimited intellectual curiosity about the poefs “exceptional character." Indeed, for Gramsci, Goethe was a modern poet insofar as he managed to express “in serene and classical form ...his confidence in man’s creative activity, in nature seen not as an enemy or as an antagonist, but as a force to be understood and dominated, relinquishing without regret our faith in those ‘ancient fables’ in which the still-present perfume of poetry renders them even deader as beliefs and faiths."52
在此背景下，“歌德作为创造者”和“歌德作为艺术家”（笔记 C，49）的译文证实了葛兰西对歌德的“审美赞赏”51 源于他对诗人“非凡个性”的无限求知欲。事实上，对于葛兰西而言，歌德是一位现代诗人，因为他成功地以“宁静而古典的形式……表达了他对人类创造力的信心，将自然视为一种可理解和掌控的力量而非敌人或对抗者，毫不留恋地放弃我们对那些‘古老的寓言’的信仰，因为诗歌的余韵使它们即使已死也更像信仰和信念。”52

The active role of human beings in history and, consequently, the refusal of any kind of spontaneous teleology, providentialism or “superstition” are, according to Gramsci, the salient and intertwined features of Goethe’s humanism.53 These features, first identified in Gramsci’s journalistic work, were subsequently the object of his reflection in the Letters and in the Notebooks (and not by chance is Goethe often quoted in the section entitled “History and Anti-history"), and were also compared symbolically with the myth of Prometheus, as it appears from the modern version of the myth, that Goethe reproposed in his hymn, the subject of one of Gramsci’s prison translations. The lines “Qui siedo, e formo gli uomini a mia immagine, una schiatta che mi somigli nel soffrire, nel piangere, nel godere e nel gioire, e nel non curarsi di te, al par mio!” / “Here I will sit, forming men after my own image, a race that resembles me in suffering, weeping, enjoying and rejoicing, in paying no attention to you, just as I do!” (Notebook C, 148 and 150, interlinear variant) concludes the Titan-demiurge, a rebel against God, sealing his own fate with a totally human self-affirmation.
格拉姆斯基认为，人类在历史中的积极作用，以及由此而来的对任何形式的自发目的论、神意论或“迷信”的拒绝，是歌德人道主义的显著且交织的特征。53  这些特征，首先在格拉姆斯基的新闻工作中被识别，随后成为他在书信和笔记中反思的对象（并非偶然的是，歌德经常出现在“历史与反历史”一节中），并且象征性地与普罗米修斯的神话进行了比较，正如歌德在他的颂歌中重提的现代神话版本，这是格拉姆斯基监狱翻译作品的主题之一。诗句“Qui siedo, e formo gli uomini a mia immagine, una schiatta che mi somigli nel soffrire, nel piangere, nel godere e nel gioire, e nel non curarsi di te, al par mio!” / “Here I will sit, forming men after my own image, a race that resembles me in suffering, weeping, enjoying and rejoicing, in paying no attention to you, just as I do!” (笔记本 C，148 和 150，行间变体)  总结了这位反抗上帝的泰坦造物主，他以完全的人类自我肯定而决定了自己的命运。

In Gramsci’s view, the victory of the Russian revolution established the role of people as becoming “at last . . . the makers of their own destiny” and it is possible to see the figure of Prometheus behind the obscure “watchmaker of the revolutions,” the bringer of fire who was summoned to ensure that the mainspring of change be “not a mechanical fact like unease, but . . .
在葛兰西看来，俄国革命的胜利确立了人民作为“最终……自身命运的创造者”的角色，我们可以看到普罗米修斯的身影隐藏在模糊的“革命钟表匠”背后，这位带来火的使者被召唤出来，确保变革的动力之源“不是像不安一样一种机械事实，而是……”

the audacity of thought which creates increasingly higher and more luminous social myths.”54 In an article against the harsh tax increases brought in by the Italian government, Gramsci had described Prometheus as a “liberator” and a "revolutionary”： “Prometheus is the unknown inventor of the match. Prometheus is the symbol of the human spirit, never content with what has been already obtained, but constantly striving to improve and replace the good with the better, and even the better with the best . . . so that an ever-increasing number of human beings should enjoy well-being, be freer from the chains of natural laws.”55
“思想的胆识，创造出日益高尚而光辉的社会神话。”54 在一篇反对意大利政府严厉增税的文章中，葛兰西将普罗米修斯描述为“解放者”和“革命者”：“普罗米修斯是火柴的无名发明者。普罗米修斯是人类精神的象征，决不满足于已取得的成就，而是不断努力改进和取代好的东西，甚至将好的东西取代为更好的，以及将更好的东西取代为最好的……以便越来越多的人享受福祉，摆脱自然规律的束缚。”55

As a symbol of the human spirit, the myth of Prometheus stands as a metaphor for history when Gramsci makes use of it in his critique of the positivist version of Marxism that emerges from Bukharin's Popular Manual,56 which Gramsci considered a narrowminded “metaphysics of matter” that had lost contact with thought. Gramsci's long digression about the myth of Prometheus aims at challenging Bukharin's trivialization of bourgeois culture, and is fully consistent with his intention to advance a philosophical refoundation of Marxism.57 In comparing Goethe's hymn dedicated to Prometheus with the incomplete drama, Gramsci accepts Leonello Vincenti's chronology, according to which the drama was written after the hymn.58 However, unlike Vincenti (a Germanist who links the titanism of Prometheus to Goethe's religious crisis), Gramsci tries to explain it with Goethe's need to expand to work as an artist, work that for the poet coincides with action. From this perspective, the later nature of the drama is then demonstrated by its greater complexity, by the greater, more constructive awareness that fuels Prometheus’s rebellion: in the drama, the protagonist is seen “not merely as a rebel titan, but rather as a ‘homo faber,’ conscious of himself and of the meaning of his own actions.”59
作为人类精神的象征，普罗米修斯的神话在葛兰西批判布哈林的《大众手册》中产生的实证主义马克思主义时，成为了历史的隐喻。56 葛兰西认为，该手册是一种狭隘的“物质形而上学”，与思想脱节。葛兰西关于普罗米修斯神话的冗长论述旨在挑战布哈林对资产阶级文化的庸俗化，并完全符合他推进马克思主义哲学重建的意图。57 在比较歌德献给普罗米修斯的颂歌与未完成的戏剧时，葛兰西接受了莱奥内洛·文森蒂的年代学，后者认为戏剧创作时间晚于颂歌。58 然而，与文森蒂（一位将普罗米修斯的巨人精神与歌德的宗教危机联系起来的德语学者）不同，葛兰西试图用歌德作为艺术家需要拓展其创作，而对于诗人而言，创作与行动相一致来解释。 从这个角度看，戏剧的后期性体现在其更大的复杂性，体现在推动普罗米修斯反抗的更深刻、更具建设性的意识：在戏剧中，主人公被看作“并非仅仅是一个反抗的泰坦，而更是一个‘能工巧匠’，意识到自己以及自己行为的意义。”五九

Prometheus thus becomes a moral and social myth. An awareness of humanity’s historic task is the only antidote against all forms of teleology. This belief, prefigured in the coupling “history and anti-history” (the core subject of Gramsci’s philosophical writings and the red thread that runs through the Notebooks), is also at the basis of Gramsci’s original “adaptation to the present” of the Grimms’ tales.
普罗米修斯因此成为一个道德和社会神话。对人类历史使命的意识是所有形而上学目的论的唯一解药。这种信念，在“历史与反历史”的结合中预示（葛兰西哲学著作的核心主题，以及贯穿《狱中札记》的红线），也是葛兰西对格林童话的“适应当下”的最初构想的基础。

As far as Marx’s texts are concerned, rather than making generic remarks regarding their connection with the subjects dealt with in the Prison Notebooks, it is thought preferable to concentrate on a number of differences between the original and the translation which, however small, should not be considered unimportant. The first difference can be found in the title of a chapter of Manifest der Kommunistischen Partei, Bourgeois und Proletarier, that, significantly, Gramsci translates as Teoria della storia [Theory of History] (Q7, sheet 4). This variation seems programmatic in nature if it is related to Gramsci’s project to “rehabilitate” Marx by freeing him from the vulgarizing schemes imposed on him by both revisionist and orthodox Marxists, who had confined Marxist thought to the narrow constrictions of historical reconstruction: Gramsci’s intention was rather to restore the philosophical value of historical materialism as an instrument for analyzing political processes as they actually unfold. According to Leonardo Paggi, Gramsci achieves this aim by “re-establishing the concept of the antagonistic social relations of production occurring when one social class replaces another in the direction of society [Bourgeois und Proletarier], and by attributing philosophical value to this concept as capable of laying the foundations for a general theory of history.^60
就马克思的文本而言，与其对《狱中札记》中所讨论主题与之之间的关联作出笼统的评论，不如集中于原著与译文之间若干差异的考察，即使这些差异很小，也不应被视为无关紧要。第一个差异体现在《共产党宣言》一章的标题上，即“资产者和无产者”，格拉姆斯基却将其译为“历史理论”（《狱中札记》Q7，第 4 页）。如果将这种差异与格拉姆斯基旨在“恢复”马克思，使其摆脱修正主义和正统马克思主义强加于他的庸俗化图式这一目标联系起来，这种变化似乎具有纲领性的意义。因为这两类马克思主义者将马克思主义思想局限于狭隘的历史重建框架之内；而格拉姆斯基的意图恰恰在于恢复历史唯物主义作为分析实际政治进程工具的哲学价值。 根据莱昂纳多·帕吉，葛兰西通过“重新确立生产关系中的对抗性社会关系的概念，即一个社会阶级取代另一个阶级主导社会发展[资产阶级和无产阶级]，并赋予该概念哲学价值，使其能够为历史的一般理论奠定基础”来实现这一目标。^60

Gramsci subsequently specified that the multiplicity and specificity of historical reality does not affect the legitimacy of this theorization, because “the philosophy of praxis is realized through the concrete study of past history and through present activity to construct new history”: however, “a theory of history and politics can be made, for even if the facts are always unique and changeable in the flux of movement of history, the concepts can still be theorized.”61 The new title that Gramsci chose for Marx’s chapter in 1930 therefore represents a nonnegligible point of reference within the chronology and development of his thought.
葛兰西随后指出，历史现实的多样性和特殊性并不影响该理论的合法性，因为“实践哲学是通过对过去历史的具体研究以及当前活动来构建新历史而实现的”：然而，“即使历史运动的流变中事实总是独一无二且变化的，仍然可以对概念进行理论化，从而建立历史和政治理论”。61 因此，葛兰西于 1930 年为马克思章节选择的新的标题，在思想的时间顺序和发展中代表了一个不容忽视的参考点。

The second difference can be found in the following chapter, whose title Forderungen der Kommunistischen Partei in Deutschland was translated— and put in historical perspective—by Gramsci as Esigenze della politica tedesca prima del 1848 [Needs of German politics before 1848] (Q7, sheet 10v).62 These changes announce Gramsci’s evolution from apprenticeship to mastery as translator: what was initially an “exercise” became a pedagogical project based on a precise method reflecting Gramsci’s political view of translation: Gramsci had actually put his views on translation into practice since 1925 as secretary of the PCI, when he had started developing his programmatic approach to translation.
第二个区别可以在下一章中找到，该章标题《德国共产党的要求》——葛兰西将其翻译并置于历史背景下——译为《1848 年前德国政治的需求》（Q7，第 10 页反面）。62 这些变化标志着葛兰西从翻译学徒到大师的转变：最初的“练习”变成了一个基于精确方法的教学项目，反映了葛兰西的政治翻译观：葛兰西实际上从 1925 年起，担任意大利共产党（PCI）书记期间，就开始将他的翻译观点付诸实践，并开始发展其翻译的纲领性方法。

At that time, in his Italian translation of Bukharin’s introduction and first chapter of Popular Manual (published in German in 1922) for a school of the Communist Party, Gramsci had modified a passage in which historical materialism was defined—in accordance with the positivistic approach of the book—as the “general doctrine of society and the laws of its development, that is sociology”63: Gramsci replaced this definition with a new one underlining the philosophical value of historical materialism as theory of history, thus anticipating, in many ways, his own considerations in the Notebooks.
当时，在格拉姆斯基为共产党员学校翻译布哈林的《普及手册》（1922 年德文版）导言和第一章的意大利文版时，他修改了一段关于历史唯物主义的定义。根据该书的实证主义方法，这段定义将历史唯物主义定义为“社会的一般学说及其发展规律，即社会学”63。格拉姆斯基用新的定义取代了旧定义，强调了历史唯物主义作为历史理论的哲学价值，在许多方面预示了他自己在《狱中札记》中的思考。

Gramsci and the “Kinder- und Hausmärchen”
葛兰西与《儿童与家庭故事》

In 1927, in a letter to Tania, Gramsci wrote: "I am now reading the fairy tales of the brothers Grimm, which are very elementary,”64 referring to Reclam’s small book entitled Fünfzig Kinder- und Hausmärchen, an abridged edition of the Grimms’ much larger collection. Gramsci had known of the Grimms’ tales for at least ten years, having read the unabridged edition in Italian. Although there is no explicit reference to this, his knowledge of the tales is documented by two articles written in 1917, where Gramsci summarizes "the tale of that boy who went off around the world to learn the exact meaning of the banal expression to ‘have goose flesh'" and gives a partial summary of Clever Hans (Der gescheite Hans).65 This tale is not included in the Italian abridged editions that were on sale at the time and that Gramsci might have known; the probable source, instead, is Salani’s unabridged 1908 collection.66
1927 年，在给塔尼娅的信中，葛兰西写道：“我现在正在读格林兄弟的童话，非常浅显。”64 他指的是雷克莱姆出版的《五十个儿童和家庭故事》，这是格林兄弟庞大故事集的精简版。葛兰西至少十年前就已接触格林童话，此前已阅读过意大利语的完整版。尽管没有明确提及，但 1917 年他撰写的两篇文章证明了他对这些故事的了解，其中葛兰西总结了“那个为了弄清‘起鸡皮疙瘩’这个平凡表达的真正含义而周游世界的男孩的故事”，并对《聪明的汉斯》做了部分总结。65 这个故事并未包含在当时意大利销售的、葛兰西可能已知的精简版中；相反，其可能的来源是 1908 年萨拉尼出版的完整版。66

In two polemical articles (the first one was against Teofilo Rossi, the mayor of Turin; the second one argued against the theatre of horror, the “Italian Guignol,” that was headed for a quick demise, according to Gramsci), the tales of the Brothers Grimm are used as an ethical gauge against which reality can be assessed, a demonstration of Gramsci’s pedagogical intent as inseparable from his political commitment, as would be shown in paradigmatic form in his translations in 1931.
在两篇具有争议的文章中（第一篇反对都灵市长特奥菲洛·罗西；第二篇反对即将迅速消亡的恐怖剧场——“意大利木偶戏”——格拉姆斯基认为），格林兄弟童话被用作衡量现实的伦理标准，体现了格拉姆斯基的教育意图与政治承诺的不可分割性，正如他 1931 年的翻译中所范例地展现的那样。

This side of his work, carried out even unbeknownst to his family, comes out only in a letter to his sister: “I have translated from German, as an exercise, a series of popular tales, exactly like the ones we liked so much when we were children,” he wrote to Teresina on January 18, 1932, “and that actually resemble them to some extent, because their origin is the same. . . . I’ll make sure to copy them in a notebook and send them to you as soon as I get permission, as my contribution to developing the imagination of the little ones.”67 Since he never transcribed the tales, this project was long believed—different from what Gramsci himself states in the letter—to have remained in the realm of good intentions. However, we now know that the project had already been set down in its essential lines, and required only some stylistic revision.
他这方面的作品，甚至连家人也不知情，只在写给妹妹的信中出现：“我翻译了一些流行故事，作为练习，这些故事跟我们小时候很喜欢的那类一模一样，”他在 1932 年 1 月 18 日写给特雷西娜，“而且在某种程度上确实与之相似，因为它们的起源相同……我会把它们抄写在笔记本上，一得到许可就寄给你，作为对孩子们想象力的培养贡献。”67 由于他从未抄写这些故事，长期以来人们——与葛兰西本人在信中所述不同——认为这个项目仅仅停留在良好愿望的层面。然而，我们现在知道，该项目的基本框架已经确立，只需要进行一些风格上的修改。

Gramsci’s caution led him to write this letter in a vaguely allusive tone: optimistic self-censorship led him to sacrifice any details or clarifications regarding his ambitious and enigmatic promise of a personal “contribution to developing the imagination of the little ones." If this cryptic prison message of his was not enough for overcoming the censors’ mistrust, and if he never managed to send his family the fairy tales that he had promised, nevertheless, when these folktales are carefully analyzed and given their legitimate place in the context of the whole of Gramsci’s work, these neglected Notebooks will stand as his unalienable and highly eloquent contribution and, to the maligned translator, author’s rights will finally be accorded. Since the purpose of Gramsci’s translation of the tales emerges clearly from the manuscripts, the above is implicit in the almost imperceptible, yet significant, departures from the original texts, clearly destined to change the nature of his translation “exercises” into a concrete pedagogical proposal.
葛兰西的谨慎使他以含蓄的语气撰写这封信：乐观的自我审查迫使他放弃任何关于他雄心勃勃且神秘的“为小孩子们发展想象力”的个人“贡献”的细节或澄清。如果他这封神秘的狱中信件不足以克服审查员的猜疑，如果他从未寄出他承诺给家人的童话，尽管如此，当这些民间故事经过仔细分析并置于葛兰西全部著作的语境中时，这些被忽视的笔记仍将作为他不可剥夺且极具说服力的贡献，而受辱的译者，作者的权利最终也将得到承认。由于葛兰西翻译这些故事的目的从手稿中清晰可见，上述内容隐含于对原文的细微却显著的偏离之处，这些偏离无疑将改变他翻译“练习”的性质，使其成为具体的教学提案。

The reasons for choosing some tales rather than others, and changing their original order, still remain in the realm of hypothesis. It is impossible to ascertain to what extent Gramsci had chosen to concentrate on well-known characters (the first part contains in the main the best-known tales), to follow his own personal taste (stories of talking animals and metamorphoses are frequent in the second part) or to what extent his choice was determined by unconscious processes or simply by linguistic elements (some of the tales he did not include were in dialect, and it cannot be excluded that the ones selected were those that Gramsci remembered best in Italian).68 It is certainly remarkable that his collection starts with the story of that young but anonymous personage who travels the world to learn about fear—the same story that had attracted his attention in 1917 when he wrote the polemic article mentioned above. This tale is paradigmatic of the individual’s self-formation and of how a person grows up by overcoming fear, but the symbolic meaning possibly escaped Gramsci (much as it did even Bettelheim), and he decided to give a name to the protagonist: what the Brothers Grimm call Märchen von einem, der auszog, das Fürchten zu lernen [The Story of the Youth Who Went Forth to Learn What Fear Was], becomes Storia di uno, Giovannin Senzapaura, che partì di casa per imparare cos'è la pelle d'oca [The Story of a Youth, Johnny Lackfear, Who Set Off from Home to Learn the Meaning of Goose Flesh], based on the title of an Italian folktale.
选择某些故事而非其他故事，以及改变其原始顺序的原因，仍然停留在假设层面。无法确定葛兰西在多大程度上选择集中于知名人物（第一部分主要包含最著名的故事），遵循其个人喜好（第二部分中动物说话和变形的故事很常见），抑或其选择受无意识过程或仅仅语言因素的影响（他未收录的一些故事是用方言写的，不能排除他所选的故事是他最记得的意大利语故事）。68 值得注意的是，他的文集以那篇关于年轻但无名人物周游世界学习恐惧的故事开头——同一故事曾于 1917 年吸引了他的注意，当时他撰写了上述那篇争议性文章。 这个故事是个人自我形成以及如何克服恐惧而成长的一个范例，但其象征意义可能逃过了葛兰西（就像它甚至逃过了贝特海姆），他决定给主人公取个名字：格林兄弟称之为“Märchen von einem, der auszog, das Fürchten zu lernen”[“外出学习恐惧的故事”]，变成了基于意大利民间故事标题的“Storia di uno, Giovannin Senzapaura, che partì di casa per imparare cos'è la pelle d'oca”[“一个青年，乔瓦尼·森扎帕乌拉的故事，他离开家去学习什么是鸡皮疙瘩”]。

The choice of this and other titles reveals Gramsci’s attitude as a writer of children’s fiction, as demonstrated by the Story of the Hedgehogs that he wrote later on for his sons Delio and Giuliano, together with other short stories and animal and rural fables that are characterized by an almost classical sober style.69 Consciously ignoring the popularized Italian version of Snow White (Sneewittchen, currently translated as Biancaneve), Gramsci entitled this tale Nevina [The little snow girl] and made Tom Thumb (Daumesdick or Daumerling: the two names reflect the older tale by Perrault) even smaller, by changing the popular Italian title Pollicino [Little Thumb] into Mignolino (or its variant Mignoletto [Thumbling]), a more comic, almost caricatural name. If these can well be considered to be the kind of small poetic license that most translators sometimes indulge in, the manuscripts actually contain a series of microscopic “betrayals,” interpolations and molecular substitutions, the changes remaining, however, functional to the public for whom the translations were destined, and their philological arbitrariness is outweighed by their cultural importance.
选择这些以及其他标题体现了葛兰西作为儿童文学作家，其态度。正如他后来为儿子德利奥和朱利亚诺创作的《刺猬的故事》以及其他短篇故事、动物寓言和乡村寓言所展现的那样，这些作品的特点是近乎古典的朴实风格。69  葛兰西有意识地忽略了流行的意大利版白雪公主（Sneewittchen，目前译为白雪公主），将该故事命名为“内维娜”（The little snow girl）。他将拇指姑娘（Daumesdick 或 Daumerling：这两个名字反映了佩罗的旧故事）缩小，通过将流行的意大利标题“拇指姑娘”（Pollicino）改为“米格诺利诺”（或其变体米格诺莱托，Thumbling），一个更具喜剧色彩、近乎漫画化的名字。如果这些可以被认为是大多数译者有时会使用的微小诗意许可，那么手稿实际上包含一系列微观的“背叛”，插值和分子替换，这些变化仍然对翻译对象大众具有功能性，其语言学上的任意性被其文化重要性所压倒。

In the fifteenth tale translated, Die zwölf Brüder [The Twelve Brothers], the birth of a sister and the intention of the father to kill the twelve brothers is heralded by a red flag, a typical signal of danger and death. In his translation, however, Gramsci consistently changes the red color into black, the choice being so systematic it cannot be considered an oversight. Writing for his sister’s children, Gramsci must have decided to transform the symbol of death in the original tale by making it understandable in his contemporary context: in other words, Gramsci translated this symbol into the “Italian historical language,” with a transparent allusion to current political events.
在第十五个翻译故事《十二兄弟》中，妹妹的诞生以及父亲杀害十二兄弟的意图，都以红旗作为预兆，这是典型的危险和死亡信号。然而，在格拉姆斯基的翻译中，他一贯地将红色改为黑色，这种选择系统性太强，无法被视为疏忽。格拉姆斯基为其妹妹的孩子们翻译，想必他决定将原故事中的死亡象征转化为其当代语境下的可理解形式：换言之，格拉姆斯基将此象征翻译成了“意大利历史语言”，并以一种清晰的暗示指涉了当时的政治事件。

The twentieth tale that appears in first draft is Rumpelstilzchen (Rumpelstiltskin), which Gramsci had significantly chosen to open the collection that he had promised to his sister. The text undergoes two major changes, converging to give it a local flavor, so that almost by accident, as it were, the Germanic world of the Märchen becomes more familiar to their young Sardinian readers. We here give the original, followed by Gramsci’s version:
第一稿中出现的第二十篇故事是《灰姑娘》（Rumpelstiltskin），葛兰西有意将其作为他承诺给妹妹的文集的开篇。该文本经历了两次主要修改，最终使其更具地方特色，因此，几乎是偶然地，童话故事中的日耳曼世界变得更熟悉于年轻的撒丁岛读者。我们在此提供原文，后跟葛兰西的版本：

“Heisst du vielleicht Rippenbiest oder Hammelswade oder Schnürbein?9' Aber es antwortete immer: “So heiss ich nicht.” Den dritten Tag kam der Bote wieder zurück und erzählte: “Neue Namen hab ich keinen einzigen finden können; aber wie ich an einen hohen Berg um die Waldecke kam, wo Fuchs und Has’ sich gute Nacht sagen.”70 [“Perhaps your name is Shortribs, or Sheepshanks, or Laceleg,” but he always answered, “That is not my name.” On the third day the messenger came back again, and said, “I have not been able to find a single new name, but as I came to a high mountain at the end of the forest, where the fox and the hare bid each other good night”].71
“也许你的名字是肋排，或者羊腿，或者系带腿？9”但他总是回答：“我不是叫这个名字。”第三天，使者又回来了，说：“我没有找到一个新名字；但我走到森林尽头一座高山，那里狐狸和兔子在道晚安。”70

Ti chiami forse Catarrino, Saltamontone, Trombatore ma egli rispondeva sempre: “Non mi chiamo così.” Il terzo giorno ritornò il messaggero che raccontò: “Non ho potuto trovare neanche un nome nuovo, ma mentre attraversavo un'alta montagna nel paese di Pastinarca, dove la volpe augura la buona notte alle galline” (Notebook B, sheet 14r).
你或许叫他卡塔里诺、萨尔塔蒙托内、特罗姆巴托，但他总是回答：“我并非如此称呼。”第三天，使者回来说道：“我找不到任何新的名字，但在帕斯蒂纳卡国，穿过一座高山时，那里的狐狸向母鸡道晚安。”（笔记本 B，第 14 页）

The unusual names suggested by the messenger (Catarrino, Saltamontone and Trombatore [Little Monkey, Ram's Leap, Trumpeter]) are reminiscent of the Sardinian language, and this is even more true of paese di Pastinarca, an archaic name for an imaginary rural community, probably derived from the fusion of the noun arca (ark) and the verb pastinare72: Gramsci thus changes the setting of the tale by replacing the foggy atmosphere of Northern forests with a more familiar imagery of the Sardinian countryside, like his native Ghilarza, culminating in the substitution of a wild hare with more homely animals such as hens. The association between a fox (volpe) and a brood of hens is of course more natural in popular Mediterranean imagery, and well attested in the popular literature of the nineteenth century.
信使提出的奇特名字（Catarrino、Saltamontone 和 Trombatore [小猴子、山羊跳跃、号手]）让人联想起撒丁语，而“Pastinarca 村”这个古名，一个虚构的乡村社群名称，很可能源于名词“arca”（方舟）和动词“pastinare”的融合，更是如此。72 格拉姆斯奇由此改变了故事的背景，用撒丁乡村的熟悉意象取代了北方森林的迷雾，如同他家乡基拉尔扎一般，最终用家禽如母鸡取代了野兔。狐狸（volpe）和一群母鸡之间的联系，当然在流行的地中海意象中更为自然，并在 19 世纪的通俗文学中得到了很好的印证。

Gramsci thus aims at transforming the Märchen into “popular folktales” by adopting the “historically determined language of the civilization to which he [the translator] supplies the informative material”： however, he went beyond his original intention of adapting the tales to a Sardinian environment, easily recognizable from the very first story translated. It was only somewhat later on, when he was well into the translation work, that he developed and executed a more ambitious plan: the translation of common sense, imbued with fatalism and “superstition,” into a secular and nonreligious, rational common sense.
葛兰西旨在通过采用“他[译者]提供的该文明的具有历史决定性的语言”将童话故事转化为“大众民间故事”；然而，他超越了最初将这些故事改编为萨丁岛环境的意图，这种意图从第一篇翻译的故事中就很容易辨认出来。直到他投入翻译工作一段时间之后，他才制定并执行了更宏大的计划：将充满宿命论和“迷信”的常识翻译成世俗的、非宗教的、理性的常识。

In fact, his more ostensibly obvious, radical intervention on the original text of the Märchen concentrates precisely on their religious element, which is increasingly secularized by Gramsci, first one would say in an experimental way but then, starting from the fifteenth tale onward, in a scrupulously systematic way. All the spiritual elements—not only explicit references to God, but all direct or indirect references to the idea of transcendency, any residue whatsoever of divine providence—are expunged from the tales or replaced with references to nature, all explicable in terms of rationality.
事实上，他更显而易见的、激进的干预对《童话》原著的干预，恰好集中在其宗教元素上，而葛兰西正日益将其世俗化，起初可以说是一种实验性的方式，但从第十五个故事开始，则以一种一丝不苟的系统方式进行。所有精神元素——不仅包括对上帝的明确提及，而且包括所有直接或间接提及超越性观念的元素，以及任何神圣庇护的残余——都被从故事中清除，或被替换为关于自然的描述，所有这些都可用理性来解释。

As early as the sixth tale, the God of the Christians is replaced with a mythological figure: the cry Ach Gott!73 becomes Per bacco [By Jove], without any metaphysical references (Notebook A, sheet 69v); elsewhere, the reference to an unfathomable providence (befahl sich Gott [“said a prayer”],74 is simply omitted (sheet 77r), whereas another Ach Gott is rendered with an almost blasphemous Per dio [My God!] (sheet 86r). However, in the first tales this attempt at secularization seems to be just an experiment, since most religious expressions actually remain unchanged.
早在第六个故事中，基督教上帝便被一个神话人物所取代：Ach Gott!73 的呼喊变成了 Per bacco [朱庇特], 没有任何形而上的指涉（笔记本 A，第 69v 页）；在其他地方，对不可捉摸的命运的提及（befahl sich Gott [“祈祷”]，74）则被简单地省略了（第 77r 页），而另一个 Ach Gott 被翻译成近乎亵渎的 Per dio [我的上帝!]（第 86r 页）。然而，在第一个故事中，这种世俗化的尝试似乎仅仅是一种实验，因为大多数宗教表达实际上保持不变。

Starting from Little Brother and Little Sister, the fifteenth tale in Gramsci’s manuscript, all metaphysical references disappear and allusions to the idea of providence are deliberately expunged from the text regardless of their being actual references to religion or stereotypical set phrases which have entered into use to indicate fear, happiness or surprise, but which, although they have lost their old meaning, still retain an echo of their original religious sense. Below is a list of the religious expressions that appear in the Märchen with the secularized variants introduced by Gramsci (table 8.1).75
从葛兰西手稿的第十五篇故事《小弟弟和小妹妹》开始，所有形而上学的引用都消失了，对命运的暗示也故意被删除，无论这些暗示是实际的宗教引用，还是已进入日常用语以表示恐惧、快乐或惊讶的刻板说法，尽管这些说法已经失去了原意，但仍保留着其原始宗教意味的回响。以下是《童话》中出现的宗教表达方式及其葛兰西引入的世俗化变体列表（表 8.1）。

Nothing seems to escape the translator’s attention in this secularizing process, not even the most “innocent” line, in Hänsel und Gretel, where Gramsci deliberately ignores the supernatural connotation of the word himmlisch [heavenly], and translates it as a perfectly rational and realistic weather word: Der Wind, der Wind, das himmlische Kind ["The wind, the wind, the heaven-born wind”]76 often translated by professional [Italian] translators with phrases that render一or even reinforce一its religious meaning (so that the wind is variously defined as “il celeste bambino”/ "the heavenly child,” “il divino bambino”/ "the divine child,” or even “il bambino mandato da Dio”/ “the God-sent child” or "il bambinello Gesù”/ “Baby Jesus”),77 is simply and effectively translated by Gramsci as il vento, il vento, figlio dell'aria ["the wind, the wind, child of the air”] (Notebook B, sheet 8r).
在这个世俗化过程中，似乎没有任何东西能逃过译者的注意，甚至连《汉塞尔与格丽特》中最“无辜”的语句也不例外。葛兰西有意忽略了“himmlisch”（天上的）的超自然内涵，将其翻译为一个完全理性且现实的天气词汇： “Der Wind, der Wind, das himmlische Kind” ["风，风，天生的风"] 76  专业的[意大利]译者常常会用一些强化其宗教含义的译法（例如将风翻译为“il celeste bambino”/“天上的孩子”，“il divino bambino”/“神圣的孩子”，甚至“il bambino mandato da Dio”/“上帝派来的孩子”或“il bambinello Gesù”/“耶稣婴孩”），77  而葛兰西则简洁有效地将其翻译为“il vento, il vento, figlio dell'aria” ["风，风，空气的孩子"]（笔记 B，第 8 页）。

Gramsci even eliminates those passages in which the author’s comments on the characters and plot seem to endorse a fatalistic attitude, implicitly leading the reader to conclude that human fate is not determined by human actions, but by some metahistorical force (blind or providential) abstracted from any rational determination. This seems the only possible explanation for the remarkable absence, in Gramsci’s manuscripts, of the following expressions: "Ja, es gibt viel Trübsal und Not auf der Welt!” ["Truly, there is much worry and affliction in this world”],78 "In den alten Zeiten, wo das Wünschen noch geholfen hat” ["In olden times when wishing still helped one”],79 "Ach, du schöne Königstochter, wie soll’s mit dir noch werden!” ["Alas, fair princess, what is to become of thee now!”].80
葛兰西甚至删除了作者对角色和情节的评论似乎支持宿命论的那些段落，暗含地引导读者得出结论：人类命运并非由人类行动决定，而是由某种超历史力量（盲目的或恩典般的）决定的，这种力量与任何理性决定都无关。这似乎是葛兰西手稿中以下表达方式显著缺失的唯一可能解释：“是的，世界上有许多忧虑和苦难！”，“在古代，愿望还能有所帮助”，“唉，美丽的公主，你将何去何从！”

There is just one expression that escaped Gramsci’s attention: the phrase "Geh nur in Gottes Namen” ["For Heaven’s sake, just go in peace”],81 in the last unfinished tale, is not eliminated but translated literally as "Va pure in nome di dio” / “go now, in God’s name” (Notebook B, Gente furba [Wise Folks], sheet 21v). This may have been just an oversight, but we believe that there is a complex link between the missing secularization process, the sudden interruption of Gramsci’s translation work, and the rough of copy of his letter to Julca (which has been considered as the earliest possible date, the terminus ante quem, for Gramsci’s translations). Since the tale’s date was inferred from the draft of the letter (between November 14 and 23, 1931, as we have seen), the cause of its interruption cannot be a ban imposed by the prison authorities subsequent to January 1932. The translation of Gente furba was still under way when Gramsci started writing this letter to Julca. In fact, the two texts come one after the other almost without interruption, except for a sketchy, almost accidental line drawn in pen; furthermore, the tale and the letter are remarkably similar in subject matter, and this may suggest that Gramsci was so upset as a result of the tormented connection he had made between the subject of the story and Julca that he was distracted from the secularization work he had begun and decided to put it off indefinitely.
格拉姆斯基的注意力只停留在一个表达上：最后一篇未完成的故事中，“Geh nur in Gottes Namen” ["上帝保佑，请安息"]，并非被删除，而是被逐字翻译为“Va pure in nome di dio” / “现在就去，上帝保佑”（笔记 B，《狡猾的人》，第 21 页）。这或许只是疏忽，但我们认为，缺失的世俗化过程、格拉姆斯基翻译工作的突然中断以及他写给朱尔卡的信件的粗略副本（被认为是格拉姆斯基翻译的最早可能日期，即截止日期）之间存在着复杂的联系。由于故事的日期是从这封信的草稿推断出来的（如我们所见，时间在 1931 年 11 月 14 日至 23 日之间），因此其中断的原因不可能是 1932 年 1 月之后监狱当局的禁令。格拉姆斯基开始给朱尔卡写信时，《狡猾的人》的翻译工作仍在进行中。 事实上，这两篇文章几乎没有间断地接连出现，只是中间有一行潦草的、几乎是偶然的笔迹；此外，故事和信件在主题上惊人地相似，这可能暗示葛兰西由于他将故事主题与朱尔卡建立的痛苦联系而感到非常不安，以至于他分心了，中断了自己开始的世俗化工作，并决定无限期推迟。

The tale is the story of two women: one is so foolish that she causes her husband’s ruin, whereas the other is a widow who lets herself be convinced that she can be of use to her husband by sending clothes and money to him “in Heaven." The absurdity of this situation is based both on the contrast between the pious illusion of the widow and the inevitability of death, and on the preposterous candor with which she goes to every effort to keep up a relationship that exists solely in her own mind: Gramsci’s translation does not however reflect the author’s sardonic irony. Just before there was about to enter the scene the third fool in the tale (a man who thinks he can build a bridge to a dimension with no return),82 Gramsci jotted down the draft of his letter (the first and only rough copy written in prison). Upset by Julca’s persistent silence and by their mutual misunderstandings (Julca’s last letter, as Gramsci remarks at the start, dated back to “over three months ago"), he pours out all his uncontrollable anguish at the lack of communication with his wife, and complains about the absurdity of “a relationship between phantoms”:
这个故事讲述了两个女人的故事：一个愚蠢到导致丈夫破产，另一个则是一位寡妇，她深信自己可以通过寄送衣物和金钱给“天堂”中的丈夫而有所帮助。这种荒谬之处，既源于寡妇虔诚的幻想与死亡的必然性之间的对比，也源于她以荒谬的坦诚，不遗余力地维持着只存在于她脑海中的关系：葛兰西的翻译并未体现出作者的辛辣讽刺。就在即将出现故事中的第三个傻瓜（一个认为自己能建造通往无法返回的维度桥梁的人）之前，葛兰西草拟了他的信件（他唯一一份在狱中写下的草稿）。由于朱尔卡持续的沉默以及他们之间的误解（正如葛兰西在信的开头所言，朱尔卡的最后信件已是“三个多月前”的事），他倾泻出对缺乏沟通的难以抑制的痛苦，并抱怨“幽灵之间的关系”的荒谬性。

It seems to me that we have increasingly become phantoms for each other, unreal beings, outside time and space, like conventional and faint (crystallized) memories of a short period of time spent together; we no longer understand our mutual needs, we do not even know how to keep up a flow of common feelings between us any longer, we are not a source of strength for each other (Notebook B, sheet 23rv).
在我看来，我们彼此之间似乎越来越成为幽灵般的存在，虚幻的个体，超脱时空，如同短暂相处时光的陈旧而模糊（凝固）的记忆；我们不再理解彼此的需求，甚至不知道如何维持彼此间的感情交流，我们不再是彼此的力量来源。（笔记本 B，第 23 页反面）

This is arguably the most genuine of Gramsci’s letters to Julca; unlike the other letters, it was not written on the day and at the time prescribed by the prison’s rules, but on the spur of emotion—an unprecedented case—directly in the translation notebook. We may even note that the shift from fiction to reality is not marked by changes in handwriting or style, and in addressing himself to his wife, Gramsci continues the imaginative language of the tale. Evidence of this comes from comparing the draft quoted above with the letter to Julca of November 30, 1931, which uses in part the rough copy. The reason underlying the absurd relationship has clearly been rationalized (in the meantime Gramsci had learned that a letter from Julca had arrived), and is this time dealt with in the more detached language of someone who has regained control of his emotions. The spontaneous outpouring of emotions now turns to an explicit reproach: "I believed that a certain communality in our lives would still be possible, that you would help me not to lose contact completely with the life of the world; at least with your life and that of the children. Yet it seems to me, and I say this even though I must cause you much pain, that you have helped to intensify my isolation, making me feel it more bitterly."83
这封写给朱尔卡的格拉姆斯基信件，可以说是最真实的信件之一；与其他信件不同，它并非按照监狱规定的时间和地点书写，而是出于情感的冲动——前所未有的情况——直接写在翻译笔记本上。我们甚至可以注意到，从虚构到现实的转变并没有体现在笔迹或风格的变化上，在写给妻子时，格拉姆斯基继续使用故事中的想象语言。证据来自将上述草稿与 1931 年 11 月 30 日写给朱尔卡的信件进行比较，后者部分使用了草稿。荒谬关系背后的原因显然已被合理化（与此同时，格拉姆斯基得知朱尔卡来信），这次是用恢复了情感控制的人更为冷静的语言来处理的。情感的自然迸发现在变成了明确的责备：“我曾相信我们生活中某种共同性仍然可能存在，你将帮助我不要完全失去与世间的联系；至少与你的生活和孩子们的生活。” 然而，尽管我必须令你痛苦，但我仍然觉得，你加剧了我的孤立感，让我更加痛苦地感受到了它。83

The rough copy might even be seen as an unexpected, paradoxical twist in the conclusion of the Grimms’ tale. Gramsci’s abandonment of his translation work, and perhaps even the secularization that was missing from Gente furba, would thus seem to connect back with reality breaking into the dimension of fable.
粗稿甚至可以被视为格林童话结尾的意外、反讽的转折。葛兰西放弃翻译工作，甚至可能连《狡猾之人》中缺失的世俗化，都似乎与现实闯入寓言维度联系了起来。

Euthanasia of a Translator
翻译员的安乐死

At this point we must necessarily illustrate briefly the inexplicable一or perhaps only too explicable—treatment reserved to these translations. Only the data that emerge from the analysis of the texts, from a scrupulous juxtaposition of the manuscripts with the German edition that Gramsci had with him in jail, matched against his letter to Teresina, and then taking into consideration all the other secondary comparisons, justify an interest in its own right in Gramsci’s translation of the Märchen. However, these data were blatantly overlooked by the editors of the Vallecchi anthology, Elsa Fubini and Mimma Paulesu, referred to above.84 As Carlo Muscetta declares in his introduction to that anthology, no “linguistic study of Gramsci’s results as a novice translator” was performed (it should be noted that Gerratana’s dating of these manuscripts generically to 1929 led the editors to believe that the tales had been translated then). For this unconvincing anthology, Gramsci’s manuscripts were not compared with the German original but with Clara Bovero’s Italian version, and “corrected” on the basis of this latter. The editors, after defining their principles (“since these are however translations, we made changes when we thought it wise for the sake of textual clarity and legibility”85), made between twenty and forty “interventions” on each page of the volume. What emerges is a castrated version of Gramsci, who, clearly subject to the inexorable knife of the cosmetic surgeon aimed at eliminating unevenness and at masking flaws, has been rendered all but unrecognizable, albeit not unworthy for the “common reader.”
此时，我们必须简要地说明一下对这些译文的处理方式，这种处理方式是难以解释的——或者说，或许过于容易解释。只有从文本分析中出现的资料，即对手稿与葛兰西在狱中随身携带的德文版进行严谨的并置，再对照他的特蕾莎来信，以及考虑所有其他辅助比较，才能证明葛兰西对《童话》的翻译本身具有独立的意义。然而，以上资料却遭到瓦莱奇文集编辑者埃尔莎·富比尼和米玛·保莱苏的公然忽视。84 正如卡洛·穆切塔在其文集导言中所声明的那样，他们并未进行“对葛兰西作为初学者译者成果的语言学研究”（值得注意的是，格拉塔纳将这些手稿笼统地定为 1929 年创作，导致编辑们认为这些故事当时就已翻译完成）。对于这个缺乏说服力的文集，葛兰西的手稿并非与德文原著进行比较，而是与克拉拉·博韦罗的意大利语版本进行比较，并以此为基础进行“校正”。 编辑在界定其原则（“由于这些是翻译，因此，当我们认为为了文本的清晰性和可读性而这样做明智的时候，我们进行了修改”85）之后，在该卷的每一页上进行了二十到四十次“干预”。结果出现的是一个阉割版的葛兰西，他显然受到了旨在消除不均匀性和掩盖缺陷的美容外科手术刀的无情切割，变得几乎无法辨认，尽管对“普通读者”来说并非不值得。”

Based on these premises, Muscetta believed that the “common reader” would consider Gramsci’s translations to be “far from unworthy,” and is repeatedly at pains to point this out to any possible “experts” or “specialists,” certain that they would “regret” the fact that the translator had not continued his stylistic revision (that of Notebook D), a revision pursued with militant zeal by the editors who deemed themselves worthy of taking Gramsci’s place.
基于这些前提，穆切塔认为“普通读者”会认为葛兰西的译文“远非不值得”，并一再强调这一点，以防万一的“专家”或“学者”，确信他们会“后悔”翻译者没有继续他的风格修订（即《笔记 D》的修订），这种修订是编辑们以战斗的热情进行的，他们认为自己有资格取代葛兰西的位置。

It is therefore unsurprising that Muscetta, who was unaware of the changes that Gramsci had made to the Grimms’ tales (the only objective data that cannot be ignored on pain of failure of any initiative whatsoever), tried to look for psychoanalytic explanations. In order “to evaluate the reasons for his [Gramsci’s] choices,” Muscetta turned his analysis to the “subjective condition” of the translator, trying all means to unravel the subconscious reasons for his choice of certain tales rather than others, based on their hidden symbolic meaning.
因此，穆切塔（他不知道葛兰西对格林童话所做的修改——这是任何尝试都不可忽视的唯一客观数据）试图寻找精神分析学解释，也就不足为奇了。为了“评估他[葛兰西]选择的理由”，穆切塔将分析重点放在了译者的“主观状况”上，试图通过各种手段探究他选择某些故事而非其他故事的潜意识原因，这些原因基于故事的隐藏象征意义。

The result is a psycho-critical interpretation, as hurried as it is implausible, explicitly influenced by Bettelheim (a fashionable author, and an obligatory point of reference for the study of folktales), where the subjects of the traditional Märchen are related to the concerns, both documented and undocumented, of Gramsci as a man and as a prisoner. This operation is not devoid of those hagiographic overtones that still persist and which, despite all the criticism that they have received, are still in general currency. As already emphasized, this is a foolproof method to decree the death of an author.
结果是一项心理批判性解读，虽然仓促却难以置信，明显受到贝特尔海姆（一位流行作家，也是研究民间故事的必经参考点）的影响，其中传统童话故事的主题与葛兰西作为个人和囚犯的关切（既有文献记载的，也有未记载的）相关联。这项操作并非没有那些至今仍存留的传记色彩，尽管它们受到了诸多批评，但在总体上仍然盛行。正如之前强调的那样，这是宣告作者死亡的万无一失的方法。

It is really not necessary to resort to Gramsci, for the "-nth” patched-up version of the Märchen, a work that has already been subjected to countless attempts at popularization for the delight of children or for the edification of the “common reader." The result is an abominable hybrid which makes it impossible to appreciate Gramsci’s intentions even from the formal point of view一an element which seems to rank very high in the editors5 priorities. Instead, this would actually represent the most negligible aspect of Gramsci’s translation whose importance, as we have seen, lies elsewhere. And the questions that they raise are totally different.
其实没必要求助于葛兰西，对于这个被无数次尝试普及，以取悦儿童或教化“普通读者”的童话故事的“第 n 版”修补版本。结果是一个令人厌恶的混合体，从形式角度来看，甚至无法理解葛兰西的意图——这似乎是编辑们优先考虑的重点。相反，这实际上代表着葛兰西翻译中最微不足道的一面，其重要性，正如我们所见，在于其他方面。而他们提出的问题则完全不同。

An Alternative Project 一个替代项目

Why did Gramsci decide to secularize the Grimms’ tales? What was the purpose of this “betrayal"? Seemingly his intention was that of not, through the agency of the tales, instilling an ideologizing element into his nephews, an operation which is particularly effective in early childhood, as he had already realized at the time of his journalistic activity. However, the question poses itself of how such a simplistic and apparently ingenuous removal of the “obstacle" on the part of the mature Gramsci can be reconciled with his belief—expressed often in his writings—that ideology transmitted by religion should be demystified not by ignoring it, but by historicizing it.
葛兰西为何决定世俗化格林童话？这种“背叛”的目的是什么？表面上看，他的意图在于，不通过这些童话向侄子们灌输意识形态，因为这种在幼儿时期特别有效的方法，他在新闻工作时期就已经意识到了。然而，成熟的葛兰西如此简单、看似天真的去除“障碍”如何与他在著作中反复表达的信念相协调呢？他认为，宗教传播的意识形态应该通过对其进行历史化，而非忽视它，来解构。

Gramsci had already tackled this subject in the articles of his early period. In 1916 he had written that “metaphysical needs produced by tradition, the instinctive legacy of thousands of years of terror and ignorance of the reality surrounding one" can only be overcome by explaining them and only by understanding them as an “object of history" can one recognize their “vacuity."86 This concept resurfaces in 1933, in a discussion with Julca concerning the education of their elder son, especially in reference to his reading matter. After asking his wife “why Delio got the idea” of reading Harriet Beecher Stowe’s novel Uncle TOm's Cabin, Gramsci was concerned to know whether someone would be able “to historicize it for him, by setting the religiosity and emotions with which this book is permeated in their proper space and time,” in the knowledge that this is a “very difficult task to do for a boy (to do seriously, of course, and not with the usual generalizations and commonplaces).”87
葛兰西在其早期文章中已探讨过这一主题。1916 年，他写道，“由传统产生的形而上学需求，数千年恐怖和对周围现实的无知所遗留的本能遗产”只能通过解释来克服，只有将它们理解为“历史对象”，才能认识到它们的“空虚”。86 这一概念在 1933 年与朱尔卡讨论长子教育时再次出现，尤其与他的阅读材料有关。葛兰西询问妻子“为什么德利奥会想到”阅读哈丽特·比彻·斯托的《汤姆叔叔的小屋》时，他关心的是是否有人能够“为他将其历史化，将这部书所充满的宗教性和情感置于其适当的时间和空间”， 意识到这是一项“对一个男孩来说非常困难的任务（当然要认真对待，而不是用通常的概括和陈词滥调）”。87

However, in 1933 Delio was already nine years old, whereas the intended readers of the tales that Gramsci had translated in 1931-1932 (the eldest being about seven) were still at the stage where children “besides images and representations they begin to form logical connections.”88 His nephews’ young age may have led Gramsci to prefer a process of secularization to a rational explanation, which must of its nature require the use of previously acquired historical categories. Furthermore, according to Gramsci, “fables and tales such as those of the Grimm brothers” fall within the vast and stratified domain of folklore.89 Therefore, the religiosity of these texts, here understood as that “disaggregated common sense” which is always the product of a series of inorganic historical sedimentations, did not seem to him inseparable, as in Beecher Stowe’s novel, and thus immovable from the context of folktales, without detriment to the “popular” content that he deemed to be particularly appropriate for the emotions and mentality of children.
然而，1933 年，德利奥已经九岁，而 1931-1932 年葛兰西翻译的那些故事（年龄最大的大约七岁）的预期读者，仍然处于“除了形象和表象之外，开始形成逻辑联系”的阶段。88 他的侄子们的年纪可能导致葛兰西更倾向于世俗化过程而非理性解释，后者必然需要运用先前获得的历史范畴。此外，根据葛兰西的说法，“格林兄弟之类的寓言和故事”属于广阔而分层的民间传说领域。89 因此，这些文本的宗教性，此处理解为“分散的常识”，这始终是无机历史沉淀系列的产物，在他看来并非像比彻·斯托的小说那样，与民间故事的语境不可分割且不可移动，而这并不损害他认为特别适合儿童情感和心态的“大众”内容。

Given the age of his nephews, the secularization of the tales was not only “consistent with the aim,” but also perfectly coherent with Gramsci’s pedagogy, if one takes account of his dislike of educational orientations that lead children to “fantasize about pseudoscientific hypotheses,” and his firm belief that students should be “led back onto a path that permits the development of a solid and realistic culture, purified of all traces of rancid and stupid ideologies.”90 When writing to his family, Gramsci never got tired of quoting Engels’s idea that “man is entirely an historical formation, obtained by coercion,”91 and declared一implicitly and explicitly一that human nature does not exist as an abstract and immutable entity, and even intellectual tools are not innate, but acquired historically: therefore, it is necessary to counter environmental influences with an educational program that reconciles “spontaneity” with “discipline.” Gramsci believed that children, especially in infancy and elementary education levels, should be taught “dogmatically (relatively speaking, of course) the basic elements of the new conception of the world, in opposition to the conception of the world conveyed by the traditional environment (folklore in its full scope).”92
鉴于他侄子的年龄，这些故事的世俗化不仅“符合目标”，而且与葛兰西的教育理念完全一致，如果考虑到他对引导儿童“幻想伪科学假设”的教育方向的厌恶，以及他坚定的信念，即学生应该“被引回一条允许发展坚实而现实的文化，净化所有腐朽和愚蠢意识形态的道路”。90  在写信给家人时，葛兰西从不厌倦引用恩格斯的观点，即“人是完全的历史产物，是通过强制获得的”91，并明确或含蓄地宣称，人类本性并非抽象不变的实体，甚至智力工具也不是天生的，而是历史获得的：因此，有必要用一个调和“自发性”与“纪律”的教育计划来对抗环境的影响。葛兰西认为，儿童，尤其是在婴儿期和小学阶段，应该被“教条式地（当然，相对而言）”灌输新的世界观的基本要素，这与传统环境（包括其全部民俗）所传达的世界观相抵触。九十二

The declared need to cultivate a certain “dogmatism” in the early stages of education without stifling the child’s "spontaneity” is coherent with Gramsci’s polemic against idealism: his criticism was particularly addressed at the abstract libertarianism of Gentile, who assigned the formation of individuals to an “natural” unraveling of innate inclinations, but in fact finished up by subjecting them to an environmental determination that was more dogmatic and authoritarian than any “conscious leadership.” Gramsci wrote about Gentile’s theory of education:
在早期教育阶段宣称需要培养某种“教条主义”，同时又不扼杀孩子的“自发性”，与葛兰西批判唯心主义的论点相一致：他的批评尤其针对詹蒂莱的抽象自由主义，后者将个体形成归因于内在倾向的“自然”展开，但实际上最终将其置于比任何“有意识的领导”都更教条和专制的环境决定论之下。葛兰西论及詹蒂莱的教育理论时写道：

the new pedagogy has concentrated its fire on “dogmatism” in the field of instruction and the learning of concrete facts一i.e., precisely in the field in which a certain dogmatism is practically indispensable and can be reabsorbed and dissolved only in the whole cycle of the educational process. . . . On the other hand it has been forced to accept the introduction of dogmatism par excellence in the field of religious thought, with the result that the whole history of philosophy is now implicitly seen as succession of ravings and delusions.93
新的教学法将火力集中于教学和具体事实学习领域的“教条主义”——即在某种教条主义实际上不可或缺，并且只能在整个教育过程中被吸收和消解的领域……另一方面，它被迫接受在宗教思想领域引入教条主义的极端形式，结果是整个哲学史现在被隐含地视为一系列狂言和妄想。

In other words, Gramsci criticized the fundamental mystification approved by Gentile, who, from a nonreligious perspective, considered religion to correspond with the Hegelian spiritual infancy of mankind, and had introduced it as a compulsory subject in elementary schools in 1923, extending this correspondence to any nonmetaphorical infancy. Gramsci believed that this attitude meant abandoning the notion of educating. The weakness of idealism was thus reconfirmed in the “school question,” in which no attempt was made “to construct a conception which could take the place of religion in the education of children.”94
换言之，葛兰西批评了詹蒂莱所认可的基本神秘化，詹蒂莱从非宗教的角度来看待宗教，认为宗教对应于黑格尔意义上人类精神的婴儿期，并于 1923 年将其作为小学必修课引入，并将这种对应关系延伸到任何非比喻意义上的婴儿期。葛兰西认为，这种态度意味着放弃了教育的概念。理想主义的弱点因此在“学校问题”中得到了再次证实，因为没有尝试“构建一种能够在儿童教育中取代宗教的概念”。94

For the tales to represent a real “contribution to developing the imagination of the little ones,” thus constituting an alternative pedagogical program, it was not, therefore, enough to eliminate religion, the providential vision of life: it was also necessary to replace it with the first elements of the new conception of the world in order to promote logical abilities and at the same time lay the foundations for a future historicization of religion. In this case, Gramsci played the role of excubitor, of supervisor, through a third party: he was forced to express his thought ambiguously, the only way open to him, and managed to perfect his contribution with happy intuition, by relying on Teresina’s comprehension.
为了让这些故事真正地“对培养小孩子的想象力有所贡献”，从而构成一种替代性的教学方案，仅仅消除宗教、消除对人生的恩典观是不够的；还需要用新的世界观的基本要素来取代它，以促进逻辑能力的发展，同时为宗教的未来历史化奠定基础。在这种情况下，葛兰西扮演了监护人、监督者的角色，通过第三方来完成：他被迫以含糊其辞的方式表达自己的思想，这是他唯一能选择的途径，并依靠特雷西娜的理解，以快乐的直觉完善了自己的贡献。

If one reads the rest of his letter to Julca concerning their son’s readings, one realizes that Gramsci is criticizing his wife’s pedagogic shortcomings as too close to the Geneva school. In contrast with this, he describes the figure of the exemplary teacher, the mystagogue or initiator—as exemplified in the past in figures like De Sanctis, Renato Serra and Arturo Farinelli—not into esoteric mysteries, but an initiator who furnishes the instruments for exorcizing them.95 According to Gramsci, Julca’s inability to “successfully historicize” the novel for Delio came from her emotional, noncritical attitude, which relegated her to a “subaltern rather than a leading position. That is, you assume the position of someone incapable of historically criticizing ideologies by dominating them, explaining and justifying them as a historical necessity of the past; of someone who, brought into contact with a specific world of emotions, feels attracted or repulsed by it, remaining always within the sphere of emotion and immediate passion.”96
如果阅读格拉姆斯基写给朱尔卡的信件中关于其儿子阅读的部分，人们会发现格拉姆斯基批评其妻子的教育不足之处，过于接近日内瓦学派。与之相反，他描述了榜样教师形象，即神秘导师或启蒙者——如同过去的人物，如德·桑克蒂斯、雷纳托·塞拉和阿图罗·法里内利——并非引导进入神秘的奥秘，而是提供工具以驱散这些奥秘的启蒙者。95 格拉姆斯基认为，朱尔卡未能成功地“将小说历史化”给德利奥，源于她情感化、非批判性的态度，这使她沦为“从属而非领导地位”。也就是说，你扮演的是一种无法通过掌控、解释和为过去的历史必然性辩护来批判意识形态的人；你接触到特定情感世界时，会被吸引或排斥，始终停留在情感和直接激情领域。96

These explicit pedagogical guidelines also cast light on Gramsci’s “coded” instructions transmitted by letter to his sister (January 18, 1932), which are often quoted but remain incomprehensible outside the context of his translations. A more in-depth reading reveals new aspects that would be impossible to grasp on a superficial reading:
这些明确的教学指导也阐明了葛兰西通过信件（1932 年 1 月 18 日）传达给妹妹的“编码”指示，这些指示经常被引用，但在脱离其翻译背景下却难以理解。更深入的阅读揭示了新的方面，这些方面在粗浅的阅读中是无法把握的。

Perhaps the person who reads them will have to add a pinch of irony and indulgence in presenting them to the listeners, as a concession to modernity. But how does this modernity present itself? The hair will be bobbed, I imagine, and the songs will be about “Valencia” and the mantillas of the women of Madrid, but I am sure there will survive old-fashioned types like Aunt Alene and Corroncu and my little tales will still find a suitable environment. Anyhow I don’t know if you remember: I always used to say, when I was a child, that I would have liked to see Aunt Alene on a bicycle, which proves that we had fun comparing the troglodytes with the relative modernity of that time; even though it was beyond our immediate environment, this never ceased appealing to us and arousing pleasant sensations in us.97
或许读者在向听众呈现这些故事时，需要添加一些讽刺和宽容的成分，作为对现代性的让步。但这种现代性是如何呈现的呢？我想，头发会剪短，歌谣会唱到“瓦伦西亚”和马德里妇女的曼蒂利亚，但我相信，像艾琳阿姨和科隆库这样的老派人物会继续存在，我的小故事仍然会找到合适的土壤。无论如何，我不知道你是否还记得：我小时候总是说，我希望看到艾琳阿姨骑自行车，这证明我们曾经乐于将穴居人与那个时代的相对现代性进行比较；尽管它超出了我们直接的环境，但这从未停止吸引我们，并激起我们愉快的感受。

Through the use of irony, Gramsci introduces a significant new element into the traditional relationship between narrator and public: on the one hand, he reaffirms a constant element of popular short stories—that is, their being transmitted orally—while on the other hand he almost anticipates Brecht’s V-Effekte [Verfremdung-Effekte]—the estrangement, or alienation, effects introduced by Brecht in epic theater—by using irony to break the illusion and act as an antidote to empathy. With an ironic attitude, attraction or repulsion no longer remain within “the sphere of emotions and immediate passion” and the public is therefore prevented from developing an unconditional attachment to the character’s story, and this distancing “spirit of cleavage” is seen as a necessary condition for a critical, potentially revolutionary, conscience to develop.
通过运用反讽，葛兰西在传统叙述者与公众的关系中引入了重要的新元素：一方面，他重申了流行短篇故事的恒定要素——即它们以口头方式传播；另一方面，他几乎预示了布莱希特的“V-效应”（[疏离效果]）——布莱希特在史诗剧院中引入的疏离或异化效果——通过运用反讽来打破幻觉，并作为对移情的解药。带着一种反讽的态度，吸引或排斥不再局限于“情感和直接激情”的领域，因此公众被阻止对角色的故事产生无条件的依恋，这种“分裂精神”被视为发展批判性、潜在革命性良知所必需的条件。

The narrator’s "estrangement” approach enables Gramsci to free the text from the fixity stemming from magic and timelessness, and at the same time frees the public from an attitude of uncritical, passive reception, typically facilitated by the magical atmosphere of fairy tales with their intention of orienting readers by disorienting them. The originality of Gramsci’s intuition consists of relying not so much on the content of the tales to perform an educational task (and it is well known that Gramsci distrusted openly educational literature), but on a formal element which gives them a particularly open character. This becomes particularly evident if we consider that Gramsci’s estranging procedure is conceived of as the basis for “an historical, dialectical conception of the world, which understands movement and change . . . and which conceives the contemporary world as a synthesis of the past, of all past generations, which projects itself into the future.”98 Due to its intrinsically anti-teleological nature, irony is the magical key to the doors of history.
叙述者的“疏离”方法使葛兰西得以使文本摆脱源于魔法和永恒性的僵化，同时解放公众对童话故事那种通常由其定向读者（通过使他们迷失方向）的魔力氛围所促成的非批判性、被动接受的态度。葛兰西的洞察力的独创性在于，并非那么依赖于故事内容来执行教育任务（众所周知，葛兰西不信任公开的教育性文学），而是依赖于赋予它们一种特别开放特质的形式要素。如果我们考虑到葛兰西的疏离程序被视为“一种历史的、辩证的世界观的基础，它理解运动和变化……并把当代世界视为过去、所有过去世代的综合，它投射到未来。”98，这一点就变得尤为明显。由于其内在的反目的论性质，讽刺是通往历史之门的魔法钥匙。

The screen provided by irony allows the establishment of a double perspective that, enlarging the structure of the work, also widens its legibility by appealing to the listeners to participate actively: this perspective entails, on the one hand, the dimension of univocality of the work and of its characters, and on the other hand, the dynamic polyvocality of the relationship between the work and current reality. By juxtaposing literature and reality, past and present, by comparing two worlds that are similar and different at the same time—the archaic and immobile world of the tales (the “troglodytes”) and the dynamic, complex and inevitably contradictory reality of the province of Sardinia (a mixture of “troglodytes” and “modernity” or, to maintain Gramsci’s metaphor, “Aunt Alene on her bicycle”)一his nephews would be able to acquire, together with the first logical instruments of thought, an embryonic historicist approach.
反讽提供的屏幕允许建立双重视角，它扩展了作品的结构，也通过呼吁听众积极参与来拓宽其可读性：这种视角一方面包含作品及其人物的单义性维度，另一方面包含作品与现实之间动态的多声性维度。通过并置文学与现实，过去与现在，通过比较同时相似又不同的两个世界——故事（“穴居人”）的古老而静止的世界，以及撒丁岛省份的动态、复杂且不可避免地矛盾的现实（“穴居人”与“现代性”的混合，或者，为了保持葛兰西的隐喻，“阿伦姨妈骑自行车”）——他的侄儿们将能够在思维的第一套逻辑工具的同时，获得一种胚胎状态的历史主义方法。

Gramsci’s pedagogical advice to his sister can actually be interpreted as an attempt to use the tales to reproduce on a different level—in an elementary way—the conditions and modes of learning the historical method that he had acquired through the study of dead languages. Indeed, for Gramsci, Greek and Latin were, paradoxically, appropriate instruments for developing a historical consciousness precisely by virtue of their double, ambiguous nature as “the dead who are still alive,”99 representing at the same time “a fossil museum” and an organism that continually comes to life again: it is this characteristic that allows Latin and Greek to promote “a historicizing understanding of the world and of life, which becomes a second—nearly spontaneous—nature, since it is not inculcated pedantically with an openly educational ‘intention,’”100 without leading to simplifications and generalizations.
葛兰西对妹妹的教育建议，实际上可以解读为一种尝试，在不同的层面——以一种初级的形式——复制他通过学习死语言而获得的历史方法的学习条件和模式。对葛兰西而言，希腊语和拉丁语，正因其双重、模棱两可的特性——“活着的死者”——恰恰是发展历史意识的合适工具。它们同时代表着“化石博物馆”和不断复苏的生命体：正是这种特性使得拉丁语和希腊语能够促进对世界和生活的“历史化理解”，这种理解成为一种第二自然——几乎是自发的自然，因为它并非以公开的教育“意图”死板地灌输，而不会导致简单化和概括化。

The Grimms’ tales could be read from an “estranging” perspective by using the historical method, no longer the exclusive prerogative of the study of Latin, which is but one of its many possible fields of application. Indeed, Gramsci envisaged that the historical method could be used for “the study of any science, since it enlarges the mind and shapes concrete mentalities.”101 An “estranging” reading of the tales makes it possible to transfer the historical method from the micro-social to the macro-social dimension, and from the linguistic field to that of the study of folk traditions: in 1932, when Gramsci wrote that “it will be necessary to replace Latin and Greek as the fulcrum of the formative school,”102 he was probably also referring to his own pedagogical project, where he had already tested this process of substitution.
格林童话可以通过运用历史方法，从“疏离”的视角解读，而不再仅仅局限于拉丁语研究，这只是其众多应用领域之一。事实上，葛兰西设想历史方法可以用于“任何学科的研究，因为它扩展了思维，塑造了具体的思维方式”。101 从“疏离”的视角解读这些故事，可以将历史方法从微观社会层面转移到宏观社会层面，从语言领域转移到民间传统研究领域：1932 年，当葛兰西写道“有必要用形成性学校的支点来取代拉丁语和希腊语”102 时，他可能也在指他自己的教学项目，在那里他已经检验过这种替代过程。

At the time he was editor of the Grido del popolo, Gramsci had used the principle of panta rhei [“everything is in flux”] to argue against the Esperantists, asserting the living flow of language, and it was this fundamental teaching he intended to transmit to his nephews. The Heraclitean principle—the key to understanding Gramsci’s pedagogical conception and his entire thought—can also be found elsewhere in the Notebooks, where he focuses on the double nature of language (both a “living thing” and “a museum of fossils of life and civilization”)103 whose ambivalence is expressed and guaranteed by this perennially metaphorical weave. It is almost as if, as a linguist, Gramsci had decided to translate the relation, implicit in the metaphor, and indicative of historical and social change, but at the same time of continuity between past and present, through a literary screen that reflected its expandable and multifaceted nature, allusive as it is to historical development.
在担任《人民报》编辑期间，葛兰西曾利用“万物皆流”的原则反驳世界语者，强调语言的生生不息。他希望将这一基本教诲传达给他的侄子们。赫拉克利特原则——理解葛兰西的教育理念和整个思想的关键——同样可以在《笔记》中找到，他在其中关注语言的双重性质（既是“活物”，又是“生命和文明的化石博物馆”）103，其内在的矛盾通过这种持续不断的隐喻编织得以体现和保证。仿佛一位语言学家，葛兰西决定通过一个反映其可扩展性和多面性、并暗示着历史发展的文学屏幕，来翻译隐含在隐喻之中的关系，这种关系体现了历史和社会变革，同时也体现了过去和现在之间的连续性。

Irony lends further meaning to the mechanical process of secularization of the tales, integrating it, insofar as it overturns their original providentialism, and introduces once again a historicizing perspective which seemed to have been lost in the elimination of the religious element. Gramsci thus replaces “metaphysical needs” with the “absolute secularization and earthliness of thought,” as postulated by the philosophy of praxis, laying the basis for the formation of a historical consciousness able to “trace the thread of the new conception of the world.”104 To ancestral confessional religion he opposes the only “faith” he had believed in since his youth which, in Crocean terms, he defined as a “secular religion”一namely, history.
反讽赋予世俗化叙事机械过程更深层意义，因为它颠覆了叙事原有的恩典论，并重新引入了在去除宗教因素后似乎已丧失的历史视角。葛兰西因此用“绝对的世俗化和尘世化思维”取代了“形而上学需求”，正如实践哲学所假定的那样，为形成能够“追溯新世界观线索”的历史意识奠定了基础。104 他将祖先的信条宗教与他自青年以来唯一相信的“信仰”——用克罗齐的话来说，他将其定义为“世俗宗教”——历史，相对立。

Used as a didactic instrument (partly Socratic and partly Brechtian avant la lettre but, as we have seen, most of all Gramscian) irony thus becomes a dialectical element of knowledge and liberation, thus “developing the imagination of the little ones” that, for Gramsci, represented a point of arrival, since it coincided with a “spontaneous” creativity that was the paradoxical result of the use of a rigorous “discipline” intended as a “conscious direction” in education.
作为一种教学工具（部分苏格拉底式，部分布莱希特式先驱，但正如我们所见，最重要的是葛兰西主义的），因此，讽刺成为知识和解放的辩证要素，从而“发展小孩子的想象力”，这对于葛兰西来说，代表着到达的终点，因为它与一种“自发”的创造力相符，而这种创造力是严谨的“纪律”（被理解为教育中的“有意识的引导”）使用的矛盾结果。

It should be noted that, despite their familiar and occasional character, Gramsci’s translations are consistent with the theoretical framework found in the Notebooks, thus confirming the substantial overall coherence and unity of inspiration of Gramsci’s entire prison writings.105 In these translations there converge, translated into practice in an almost paradigmatic way, the various remarks and reflections on linguistics, on folk traditions, on pedagogy and on political culture that Gramsci was engaged in making during those years and on which he was subsequently to go into greater depth, all directed toward his inquiry into the political value of culture, the function of schools, and the role of the intellectuals in society.
需要注意的是，尽管葛兰西的译文风格熟悉且偶有特色，但它们与《狱中札记》中的理论框架保持一致，从而证实了葛兰西全部狱中著作在整体上的连贯性和思想的统一性。105 在这些译文中，对语言学、民间传统、教育学和政治文化等方面的各种评论和思考，以近乎范式的方式转化为实践，葛兰西在那些年一直在进行这些思考，并随后深入探讨，所有这些都指向他对文化政治价值、学校功能以及知识分子在社会中的作用的探究。

Gramsci’s pedagogical project itself is an attempt to accomplish the twofold task that is implicit in Marx’s proposal—taken from the theses on Feuerbach that Gramsci had translated in prison and that he so often quoted in his letters to his family—on the need to “educate the educator." Gramsci, as an advocate of active pedagogy, believed that the task of education cannot be separated from the historically determined environment which it addresses, and to which it must conform (hence the need to translate the Märchen as folktales—that is, to adapt them to the cultural tradition and mentality of their public, by rewriting them in Italian “historical language”). In fact, the main aim of education must tend toward transforming, molecularly but progressively, the environment and the dominant conception of the world (hence the substitution of a providentialist vision of the world with historicism, and of common sense, imbued with “superstition,” with the philosophy of praxis). Yet again, in Gramsci, pedagogy and politics coincide: his alternative project, too, enters into a wider political design.
葛兰西的教育项目本身就是试图完成马克思的隐含双重任务——该任务源于葛兰西在狱中翻译的费尔巴哈论题，并在其家书中屡次引用——即“教育教育者”的必要性。葛兰西作为一位倡导积极教学法的倡导者，认为教育的任务不能脱离其所针对的历史环境，并必须顺应该环境（因此需要将童话故事翻译为民间故事——即，将其适应于其受众的文化传统和心态，通过用意大利的“历史语言”改写它们）。事实上，教育的主要目标必须倾向于逐步、微观地改造环境和占主导地位的世界观（因此用历史主义取代世界的神意论视角，用实践哲学取代充满“迷信”的常识）。再次，在葛兰西看来，教育与政治是统一的：他的替代方案也融入更广泛的政治设计中。

Notes 笔记

1. Antonio Gramsci, Letters from Prison, two volumes, ed. Frank Rosengarten, trans. Raymond Rosenthal (New York: Columbia Uiversity Pres, 1994), vol. 2, 207, hereafter cited as LP1 and LP2. There is a list of abbreviations on pages ix-x.
1. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中书简》，两卷，弗兰克·罗森加特编，雷蒙德·罗森塔尔译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，1994），卷 2，207 页，以下简称 LP1 和 LP2。书内有缩写词表，见第 ix-x 页。

2. Antonio Gramsci, Quaderni del Carcere, four volumes, ed. Valentino Gerratana (Turin: Einaudi, 1975), 1473, hereafter QC. Q11§49. [To facilitate locating passages in various translations and anthologies, we use the standard method of providing the notebook (Quaderno) number一in this case 11——followed by the section number, §. See the introduction, page 12, for discussion. We will indicate the English translation, if used.] Antonio Gramsci, Further Selections from the Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Derek Boothman (Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1995), 312, hereafter cited as FSPN. The critical edition of the Prison Notebooks does not include a complete index of Gramsci’s own notes, which can be found in “Quaderni dell’istituto Gramsci/Sezione Toscana,” no. 1, Bibliographical exhibition, Biblioteca Nazionale Centrale (December 8, 1977-January 28, 1978).
2. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》，四卷，瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳编 (都灵：埃纳迪出版社，1975)，第 1473 页，以下简称 QC。Q11§49。[为方便在各种译本和选集中查找段落，我们采用标准方法，提供笔记本（Quaderno）编号——在本例中为 11——后跟章节编号，§。请参阅导言，第 12 页，了解更多讨论。我们将标注英文译本，如果使用的话。] 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》节选，德雷克·布斯曼编、译 (明尼阿波利斯：明尼苏达大学出版社，1995)，第 312 页，以下简称 FSPN。 《狱中札记》的批判性版本不包含葛兰西本人笔记的完整索引，该索引可在“葛兰西研究所/托斯卡纳分部”的《笔记》（Quaderni dell’istituto Gramsci/Sezione Toscana），第 1 期，文献展览，国家中央图书馆（1977 年 12 月 8 日至 1978 年 1 月 28 日）中找到。

3. Q4§3, Antonio Gramsci, Prison Notebooks, vol. 2, ed. and trans. Joseph Buttigieg (New York: Columbia University Press, 1996), 142, hereafter cited as PN2.
3. Q4§3，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》第二卷，乔瑟夫·巴蒂吉耶编辑并翻译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，1996），第 142 页，以下简称 PN2。

4. 11§48, FSPN, 309; the same concept is in Q4§42.
4. 11§48, FSPN，309；同一概念见 Q4§42。

5. Duemila pagine di Gramsci, ed. G. Ferrata and N. Gallo, two volumes (Milan: Il Saggiatore, 1964), vol. I, 720. The first acknowledgment of the importance of translation in Gramsci’s work is Leonardo Paggi, Gramsci e il moderno principe (Roma: Editori Riuniti, 1970).
5. 格拉姆斯基著作，费拉塔（G. Ferrata）和加洛（N. Gallo）编辑，两卷（米兰：意象出版社，1964），第一卷，第 720 页。格拉姆斯基著作中首次承认翻译重要性的论述见于莱昂纳多·帕吉（Leonardo Paggi）的《格拉姆斯基与现代王子》（罗马：联合出版社，1970）。

6. [They are now included as the first volume of the National Edition of Gramsci’s Collected Works, presented publicly on April 30, 2007, by the Italian president, Giorgio Napolitano.]
6. [它们现已包含在葛兰西全集的国家版第一卷中，于 2007 年 4 月 30 日由意大利总统乔治·纳波利塔诺公开发布。]

7. Antonio Gramsci, Favole di libertà, ed. Elsa Fubini and Mimma Paulesu (Florence: Vallecchi, 1980).
7. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《自由的寓言》，埃尔莎·福比尼和米玛·保莱苏编（佛罗伦萨：瓦莱奇出版社，1980）。

8. For Gramsci’s early writings, see Antonio Gramsci, Scritti 1915-1921, ed. Sergio Caprioglio (Milan: Il Corpo, 1968), and Per la verità, ed. R. Martinelli (Rome: Editori Riuniti, 1974).
8. 参见安东尼奥·葛兰西，《1915-1921 年文集》，塞尔吉奥·卡普里奥利编辑 (米兰：伊尔·科尔波出版社，1968)；以及《为真理而作》，罗伯特·马蒂内利编辑 (罗马：联合出版社，1974)。

9. Benedetto Croce, Quaderni della Critica 10 (1948), 78-79.
9. 贝内代托·克罗齐，《批评札记》第 10 册（1948），第 78-79 页。

10. See also Eugenio Garin, Gramsci nella cultura contemporanea, in Studi gramsciani, second edition (Rome: Editori Riuniti, 1969), 400.
参见尤金尼奥·加林，《葛兰西与当代文化》，载《葛兰西研究文集》，第二版（罗马：联合出版社，1969），第 400 页。

11. The first volume, entitled Cronache torinesi 1913-1916, edited by Sergio Caprioglio, appeared in 1980. [This work was then carried to completion, and careful philological work is now being done, at the time of publication of this translation, to establish definitive texts for the National Edition of Gramsci’s writings.]
11.  由 Sergio Caprioglio 编辑的《都灵纪事 1913-1916》第一卷于 1980 年出版。[该著作随后得以完成，目前（在本文翻译出版之际），为了建立《葛兰西文集》国家版中的权威文本，正在进行细致的文献学研究。]

12. Valentino Gerratana, “Introduction” to QC, xxxvii.
12. 瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳，“QC 导论”，xxxvii。

13. Gerratana, xxxviii. 13. 格拉塔纳，xxxviii。

14. This is evident from several inaccuracies (for example, repetitions of the same word) that Gramsci could have corrected if he had reread the text.
14. 这从一些不准确之处（例如，重复使用同一个词）可以看出，如果葛兰西重新阅读过该文本，他本可以进行修正。

15. In 1912-1913, Gramsci had attended the lectures of Farinelli, for whom the first chair in German literature had been created in 1907. In some of his earliest articles, Gramsci had praised Farinelli as “a true master of life and of humanism” (Scipio Slataper, in Avanti! XX, 101 (April 10, 1916), now in Cronache torinesi, op. cit., 251): following Hegel, Farinelli conceived history as history of the spirit, and was among the first in Italy to understand the importance of thought in early German Romanticism. While in prison, however, Gramsci’s praise turned to blame when he discovered that his professor had gone over to fascism.
15. 1912-1913 年，葛兰西曾旁听法里内利教授的讲座。法里内利教授于 1907 年获得德国文学首个讲席。在葛兰西的早期文章中，他曾称赞法里内利为“一位真正的生命和人文主义大师”（斯奇皮奥·斯拉塔佩尔，《前进报》 XX，101 页（1916 年 4 月 10 日），现收录于《都灵纪事》，同上，第 251 页）：追随黑格尔，法里内利将历史视为精神的历史，并且是意大利最早理解早期德国浪漫主义中思想重要性的学者之一。然而，在狱中，当葛兰西发现他的教授倒向法西斯主义时，他的赞扬变成了责备。

16. Bartoli and Gramsci developed a close cooperation: in the young Gramsci, a brilliant student of linguistics who carried out research for Bartoli on Sardinian terms, and had decided to write his final dissertation on comparative linguistics, Bartoli saw his successor. One of Gramsci’s regrets was that of having interrupted his linguistic studies.
16. 巴尔托利和葛兰西建立了密切的合作：在年轻的葛兰西身上，一位杰出的语言学学生，为巴尔托利研究撒丁语词汇，并决定以比较语言学为最终论文主题，巴尔托利看到了他的接班人。葛兰西的遗憾之一是中断了他语言学的学习。

17. LP2, 244项5. 17. LP2，244 项 5.

18. Gerratana, xxxvi. 18. 格拉塔纳，xxxvi。

19. [This type of analysis was in fact carried out in Gianni Francioni, L'Officina gramsciana (Naples: Bibliopolis, 1984). It is an essential reference work for all serious Gramsci scholars, with the proviso that some members of the collective that worked under Gerratana think that it added only rather marginally to what they had deduced (translator’s note based on information from Gerratana’s collaborators).]
19. [这种类型的分析实际上已经在吉安尼·弗朗西奥尼的《葛兰西工作室》(那不勒斯：Bibliopolis, 1984) 中进行过。对于所有严肃的葛兰西学者来说，这是一本必读的参考著作，但前提是，在葛拉塔纳领导下的集体中的一些成员认为，它对他们已经推导出的内容的补充作用相当有限。(译者注，根据葛拉塔纳合作者提供的信息).]

20. Gerratana’s contention that all the articles belong to the same issue of the journal (that of October 14) is therefore inaccurate, QC, 2430.
因此，格拉塔纳认为所有文章都属于同一期期刊（即 10 月 14 日）的观点是不准确的，QC，2430。

21. The tales are translated from the Brothers Grimm, Fünfzig Kinder- und Hausmärchen (Leipzig: Verlag von Ph. Reclam Jun., n.d.) (the authors are Jacob and Wilhelm Grimm, not Karl and Jacob, as inaccurately reported in Q, 2431, by Gerratana, who unwittingly perpetuated a mistake that is frequent in Gramscian literature. This confusion was initiated by a careless commentator who, not knowing the first names of the authors of the Tales, reported them incorrectly. The Reclam volume reproduces the 1912 fiftieth edition of the Kleine Ausgabe first published in 1825 as an abridged edition of the Grimms’ much larger 1812-1815 collection, last revised by Wilhelm Grimm in 1858 (tenth edition). Gramsci probably owned this book before being arrested in 1926, because, unlike other texts, there is no trace of his asking either Tania or his brother Carlo to send it to him. It is impossible to ascertain whether Gramsci had received the book from Sperling & Kupfer, the Milan bookshop where Gramsci’s friend Piero Sraffa had opened an account for him, since, unfortunately, the bookshop and all its documents were destroyed during the war.
21. 这些故事译自格林兄弟《五十个儿童与家庭故事》（莱比锡：Ph. Reclam Jun. 出版社，无日期）。（作者是雅各布和威廉·格林，而非卡尔和雅各布，后者在 Gerratana 的 Q, 2431 中出现错误引用，无意中延续了葛兰西文献中常见的错误。这种混淆源于一位粗心大意的评论家，他由于不了解故事作者的姓名而报告了错误信息。Reclam 版本重印了 1912 年《小版》的第五十版，该版本最初于 1825 年出版，是格林兄弟 1812-1815 年大型系列故事集的精简版，最后一次修订由威廉·格林于 1858 年完成（第十版）。葛兰西很可能在 1926 年被捕前就拥有这本书，因为与其他文本不同，没有迹象表明他曾要求塔尼亚或他的兄弟卡洛给他寄这本书。无法确定葛兰西是否从米兰的斯佩林与库弗书店收到这本书，因为葛兰西的朋友皮耶罗·斯拉法在那里为他开设了账户。不幸的是，该书店及其所有文件都在战争中被毁。

22. In the rough copy, which was partly used for his letter of November 30, 1931, Gramsci writes that his last communication with Julca had taken place “on August, 13, over three months ago.” However, as his letter to Tania of November 23, 1931, clearly demonstrates, Gramsci knew that a letter from his wife had arrived at the prison of Turi in the intervening time, although it had not been forwarded to him yet. The rough copy cannot therefore have been written after November 23.
22. 在 1931 年 11 月 30 日信件的草稿中，部分内容被使用，葛兰西写道，他最后一次与朱尔卡的联系是“三个月前，也就是 8 月 13 日”。然而，正如他 1931 年 11 月 23 日写给塔尼亚的信件清楚地表明的那样，葛兰西知道，在此期间，他妻子的来信已到达图里监狱，尽管尚未转交给他。因此，这封草稿不可能写于 11 月 23 日之后。

23. In our opinion, this is a leftover (persistent, though in any case to disappear) from an entire series of consonants with strokes through (p, r, q, etc.), especially when written as capitals or used at the beginning of sentences.
23. 我们认为，这是一种遗留现象（持久，但最终将消失），源于一整套带笔画的辅音（如 p、r、q 等），尤其是在书写为大写字母或用于句首时。

24. If Gramsci had written the rough copy of this letter before the translation of the tales—or in any case before its sudden interruption—there would be no point in leaving five blank lines. Furthermore, the handwriting and several elements within the text, and in Gramsci’s family life, suggest that the letter was written after the tales, as we shall see.
24. 如果葛兰西在翻译故事之前（或者，无论如何，在翻译突然中断之前）写了这封信的草稿，那么在信中留出五行空白就毫无意义。此外，笔迹以及信件文本中的一些要素，以及葛兰西的家庭生活，都表明这封信是在故事之后写成的，正如我们将要看到的。

25. A few pages with a list of words and the beginning of a translation of Milton.
25. 几页包含单词列表以及弥尔顿译文的开头部分。

26. From an anthology of Goethe’s writings: Über allen Gipfeln: Goethes Gedichte im Rahmen seines Lebens, ed. E. Hartung (Munich: Wilhelm Langewiesche-Brandt, 1922).
26.  出自歌德文集：《山巔之上：歌德诗歌与其生平》，埃·哈特洪编著（慕尼黑：威廉·朗格维希·勃兰特，1922）。

27. J. P. Eckermann, Goethes Gespräche mit Eckermann, ed. F. Deibel (Leipzig: Insel-Verlag, 1921).
27. 埃克曼著，歌德与埃克曼谈话录，德比尔编，1921 年（莱比锡：茵瑟尔出版社）。

28. Karl Marx, Lohnarbeit und Kapital: Zur Judenfrage und andere Schriften aus der Frühzeit, second edition (Leipzig: Verlag von Ph. Reclam Jun, n.d). In this collection, the passage entitled Über Goethe was said to be Marx’s, but it was in fact written by Engels.
28. 卡尔·马克思，《雇佣劳动与资本：论犹太人问题及其他早期著作》，第二版（莱比锡：菲利普·雷克莱姆出版社，无日期）。在这本书集中，题为《论歌德》的章节据说是马克思的著作，但实际上是恩格斯所写。

29. We are not considering Gramsci’s translations from Russian, based on Rachele Gutman-Polledro and Alfredo Polledro’s Antologia Russa (QC, 2397-99), which are in Notebook 9, due to our limited knowledge of this domain. As concerns their chronology, the letter to Julca of October 1, 1933, seems to suggest that Gramsci had completed these translations by 1930: “For various reasons it’s been almost three years since I’ve read a line in Russian, and I have forgotten much of what I used to know (which in fact was not much).” LP2, 320.
29. 鉴于我们对该领域了解有限，我们暂不考虑葛兰西根据拉切莱·古特曼-波莱德罗和阿尔弗雷多·波莱德罗的《俄罗斯文选》(QC, 2397-99) 从俄文翻译的著作，这些著作收录于笔记 9 中。关于其时间顺序，1933 年 10 月 1 日给朱尔卡的信似乎暗示葛兰西已于 1930 年前后完成这些翻译：“由于种种原因，我已经差不多三年没读过俄文，我已忘记了许多以前知道的东西（实际上以前也没知道多少）。” LP2, 320。

30. The pages are numbered only on the recto side, as in Notebooks A and 7: therefore, for the sake of clarity, we specify whether each sheet should be intended as recto (r) or verso (v), an indication which was also used, albeit inaccurately, by Gerratana (see QC, 2389, 2430, 2435, 2439, 2442).
30. 与笔记本 A 和 7 相同，页面仅在纸张的正面标注页码；因此，为了清晰起见，我们标明每张纸是正面（r）还是反面（v）。此标记也曾被格拉塔纳使用（参见 QC，2389、2430、2435、2439、2442），尽管使用不准确。

31. LP1, 292-93. [The word “only,” necessary for the sense, and included in the Italian original, has here been added to the translation published in Letters from Prison.]
31. LP1，292-93。[原文中必要的“仅”字，已在《狱中书简》的译文中添加。]

32. The passage of Über Feuerbach (Theses on Feuerbach) on the need to “educate the educator” is quoted again by Gramsci on May 14, 1931, in a letter to his sister Teresina, LP2, 364.
32. 1931 年 5 月 14 日，葛兰西致其姐姐特雷西娜的信中（LP2，364 页）再次引用了《关于费尔巴哈的提纲》中关于“教育教育者”的论述。

33. LP2, 130. [Rosenthal’s Letters from Prison translation errs here in reading “as soon as I get permission,” which does not correspond to the Italian of the letter as reported here: “if I get permission.”]
33. LP2，130。[罗森塔尔狱中书信译文此处错误地理解为“我一得到许可”，这与此处报告的意大利文“如果我得到许可”不符。]

34. LP1, 112, and LP2, 129.
LP1, 112；LP2, 129。

35. LP2, 130, emphasis added.
35. LP2，130，重点标注。

36. [That is, the first drafts of these notes, whose final version (FSPN, 307-12) dates to summer 1932.]
36. [即这些笔记的初稿，其最终版本（FSPN，307-12）完成于 1932 年夏季。]

37. Franco Lo Piparo, Lingua, Intellettuali e Egemonia in Gramsci (Bari: Laterza, 1979), 11.
37. 法兰克·洛·皮帕罗，《语言、知识分子与葛兰西的霸权》（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1979），第 11 页。

38. Tullio De Mauro, “Preface,” in Lo Piparo, ix.
38. 图利奥·德·毛罗，“前言”，载《洛皮帕罗》，第 ix 页。

39. Q11§12, Antonio Gramsci, Selections from the Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Quintin Hoare and Geoffrey Nowell Smith (New York: International Publishers, 1971), 325, hereafter cited as SPN.
39.  Q11§12，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》选编，昆廷·霍尔和杰弗里·诺韦尔·史密斯译（纽约：国际出版公司，1971），325 页，以下简称《狱记》。

40. Q6§71, Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Cultural Writings, ed. David Forgacs, trans. William Boelhower (Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1985), 177, hereafter cited as SCW. Emphasis added.
40. Q6§71，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《文化著作选集》，戴维·福格卡斯编，威廉·博尔霍韦尔译（剑桥，马萨诸塞州：哈佛大学出版社，1985），177 页，以下简称 SCW。  （重点标出。）

41. LP1, 112. 41. LP1，112。

42. LP1, 83. 42. LP1，83。

43. Q3§74, SCW, 174, emphasis added.
43. Q3§74，SCW，174，强调部分。

44. Q3§74, SCW, 174. 44. Q3§74，SCW，174。

45. Steinthal, a Hegelian and Humboldtian, also contributed to Labriola’s background in theoretical linguistics.
45. 斯坦塔尔，一位黑格尔和洪堡学派的支持者，也为拉布里奥拉的理论语言学背景做出了贡献。

46. Henceforth the interlinear variants in the quotations from Gramsci’s manuscripts will be indicated within square brackets.
46. 今后，从葛兰西手稿引用的引文中，行间变体将用方括号标示。

47. [Here, of course, retranslated into English.]
47. [此处当然，重新翻译成英文。]

48. Q5§23, PN2, 285. In discussing the problem of Chinese morphology, Gramsci writes that “it is necessary to check Finck’s booklet on the major types of languages” (Q5§23, PN2, 288). However, this was not the book that Gramsci himself translated in prison, as Gerratana specifies (see QC, 2672), but Die Haupttypen des Sprachbaus, which he had probably sent back to his wife after receiving it by mistake (see LP1, 145-46).
48. Q5§23，PN2，285。在讨论汉语形态学问题时，葛兰西写道：“有必要查阅芬克关于主要语种类型的册子”（Q5§23，PN2，288）。然而，正如格拉塔纳所指明的那样（见 QC，2672），这并非葛兰西本人在狱中翻译的书籍，而是《主要语言类型》，他很可能在误收后将其寄回妻子（见 LP1，145-46）。

49. In prison, Gramsci had a copy of Benedetto Croce, Goethe, second edition (Bari: Laterza, 1921), but he never quoted this book as a source for his own translations; however, a number of interlinear corrections reveal that he did refer to this work, sometimes by rewriting his entire translations based on Croce’s. Gramsci often described Croce as a master of style, and this holds true for his translations too.
49. 在狱中，葛兰西拥有贝内德托·克罗齐的《歌德》，第二版（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1921），但他从未引用此书作为其翻译的来源；然而，一些行间校正显示他确实参考了该著作，有时甚至根据克罗齐的观点重写了整个翻译。葛兰西经常将克罗齐描述为风格大师，而他的翻译也体现了这一点。

50. Gramsci intended to lay the foundations for an ideological renewal within the Socialist party by putting to good use “the progressive legacy of the Western bourgeois civilization,” in other words by “appreciating the efforts made by humanity to free itself from idolatries and ancestral or mythological taboos” (Giancarlo Bergami, Il Giovane Gramsci e il Marxismo 1911-1918 [The Young Gramsci and Marxism 1911-1918] [Milan: Feltrinelli, 1977], 55). In this period of intense educational initiative, Goethe was a continual point of reference for Gramsci: his works were read and discussed at the “Club di vita morale” (“Club of Moral Life,” the discussion circle that Gramsci had founded in Turin at the end of 1917 with Andrea Viglongo, Carlo Boccardo and Attilio Carena) as the club’s library demonstrates, but they were also dealt with in Il Grido del popolo (The Cr^ of the People, a small provincial newspaper that Gramsci transformed into a cultural and philosophical weekly journal). In his articles for Il Grido del popolo, Gramsci mainly concentrated on Goethe’s most “modern” aspects, which he analyzed in more depth in the Notebooks.
50. 格拉姆斯基意在通过利用“西方资产阶级文明的进步遗产”，换言之，通过“欣赏人类摆脱偶像崇拜和祖先或神话禁忌的努力”，为社会主义党内进行意识形态更新奠定基础（Giancarlo Bergami，《年轻的格拉姆斯基与马克思主义 1911-1918》[米兰：Feltrinelli，1977]，55 页）。 在这段充满教育热情的时期，歌德是格拉姆斯基持续的参照对象：他的著作在“道德生活俱乐部”（Gramsci 于 1917 年末与安德烈·维格隆戈、卡洛·博卡多和阿蒂利奥·卡雷纳在都灵创立的讨论小组）中被阅读和讨论，俱乐部图书馆证明了这一点，但它们也在《人民呼声报》（Gramsci 将其改造成文化和哲学周刊的当地小报）中被讨论。在《人民呼声报》的文章中，格拉姆斯基主要关注歌德最“现代”的方面，他在《狱中札记》中对此进行了更深入的分析。

51. LP2, 38. 51. LP2，38.

52. Q9§121.

53. There springs spontaneously to mind the reference to LukWcs's thought and the importance for him of Goethe, considered as the greatest representative of those humanistic ideals born of the struggle for the development of personality through social action.
53.  自然而然地联想到卢卡奇的思想，以及他眼中歌德作为人文主义理想的杰出代表的重要性，歌德代表着那些源于社会行动促进个性发展之斗争的人文主义理想。

54. “L’orologiaio,” Il Grido del Popolo (August 18, 1917), xxii, n.682, now in Scritti Giovanili 1914-1918 (Turin: Einaudi 1958), 126.
54.“钟表匠”，《人民呼声报》（1917 年 8 月 18 日），第 XXII 卷，第 682 期，现收录于《青年著作选集 1914-1918》（都灵：艾纳迪出版社，1958 年），第 126 页。

55. “Prometeo monopolizzato,” Avanti! XXI no. 19 (January 19, 1917), now in Cronache Torinesi, 711-12. Emphasis added.
55.“普罗米修斯被垄断”，《前进！》XXI 号第 19 期（1917 年 1 月 19 日），现收录于《都灵纪事》第 711-712 页。  (加粗部分为原文强调部分。)

56. [Gerratana (QC, 2539) states that in all probability the edition that Gramsci was able to receive in prison was the 1927 French translation La Théorie du Matérialisme Historique of the 1921 Russian original. Gramsci had to refer to it for censorship reasons with a gloss, translated in Selections from the Prison Notebooks as the “Popular Manual”； in English the book is The Theory of Historical Materialism (Ann Arbor: University of Michigan Press, 1969).]
56. [格拉塔纳（QC，2539）认为，格拉姆斯基在狱中能够获得的版本极有可能为 1921 年俄文原著的 1927 年法文译本《历史唯物主义理论》（La Théorie du Matérialisme Historique）。由于审查原因，格拉姆斯基不得不使用注释，该注释在《狱中札记选集》中译为“人民手册”；英文版则名为《历史唯物主义理论》（Ann Arbor：密歇根大学出版社，1969）。]

57. In the sense intended by Leonardo Paggi, La Teoria Generale del Marxismo in Gramsci, in Storia del Marxismo Contemporaneo, ed. Aldo Zanardo (Milan: Feltrinelli, 1973).
57.  在莱昂纳多·帕吉的理解中，《葛兰西的马克思主义总论》，载于阿尔多·扎纳多主编的《当代马克思主义史》（米兰：费特里内利，1973）。

58. Vincenti relied on an essay written by Julius Richter. More recent studies suggest that the hymn is in fact a shorter version written after the drama.
58. 文森特依靠朱利叶斯·里希特撰写的一篇论文。最近的研究表明，这首赞美诗实际上是戏剧之后创作的较短版本。

59. Q8§214, for a partial translation, see SPN, 471-72.
59. Q8§214，部分翻译见 SPN，471-72。

60. Paggi, La Teoria Generale, 1332. Emphasis added.
60. Paggi，《一般理论》，1332 页。  (强调部分)

61. Q12§26, SPN, 427. Emphasis added. See also Q4§13, PN2, 155.
61. Q12§26，SPN，427。重点标出。另见 Q4§13，PN2，155。

62. Amongst the data that arise from careful textual analysis, one element should be pointed out that goes beyond philology, one whose significance may be assessed adequately only in the light of the question raised in 1967 at the Congress of Gramscian Studies in Cagliari. In reply to a question by Norberto Bobbio, Gerratana highlighted the difference between Marx’s and Gramsci’s concepts of “civil society”： according to Gerratana, Bobbio’s contention that Gramsci had derived his own concept of “civil society” directly from Marx is not in contradiction with the fact that, in the Notebooks, Gramsci had translated “a series of extracts from On the Jewish Question ... one of the main essays in which Marx marked the distinction between ‘civil society5 and the ‘political state.’” Gerratana supported this statement by adding that “the German phrase bürgerliche Gesellschaft is translated by Gramsci as ‘società borghese,5 or ‘bourgeois society,5 rather than ‘civil society’” (Gramsci e la cultura contemporanea, ed. P. Rossi [Rome: Editori Riuniti, 1969], 170). Although this is true in general (the same rendition can also be found in Gramsci’s other translations from Marx’s anthology), in the second translated text entitled Il materialismo storico一and only in this text一 twice consecutively Gramsci corrected this phrase: this may have happened in the rereading process, possibly after a comparison with the French translation that Gramsci had quoted elsewhere (Q7, sheet 28r). Contrary to his habit of keeping the first solution and adding an interlinear variation, in this case Gramsci crossed out the phrase “bourgeois society” and replaced it with “civil society”: his change of mind still remains a mystery.
62.  在仔细的文本分析中产生的数据里，有一点值得指出，它超越了语言学，其意义只有在 1967 年卡利亚里葛兰西研究大会提出的问题下才能充分评估。针对诺伯特·鲍比奥提出的问题，葛拉塔纳强调了马克思和葛兰西“公民社会”概念的区别：根据葛拉塔纳的说法，鲍比奥认为葛兰西直接从马克思那里汲取了“公民社会”的概念，并不与葛兰西在《笔记》中翻译了《论犹太人问题》中的一系列摘录（其中一篇主要论述了马克思对“公民社会”与“政治国家”的区分）这一事实相矛盾。葛拉塔纳补充道，“在德语中，bürgerliche Gesellschaft 被葛兰西翻译为‘società borghese’，或‘资产阶级社会’，而不是‘公民社会’”（葛兰西与当代文化，P. 罗西编，[罗马：联合出版社，1969]，170 页）。 虽然总的来说这是正确的（在葛兰西对马克思文集的其他译文中也能找到同样的译法），但在题为《历史唯物主义》的第二篇译文中——并且仅此一篇——葛兰西连续两次修改了这一说法：这可能发生在重读过程中，或许是在与葛兰西在其他地方引用的法语译文进行比较之后（Q7，第 28 页右）。与他通常保留最初的方案并添加行间变体不同，在这次修改中，葛兰西划掉了“资产阶级社会”并将其替换为“公民社会”：他改变主意的原因仍然是个谜。

63. Quoted in Paggi, La Teoria Generale, 1335.
引自 Paggi，《一般理论》，第 1335 页。

64. LP1, 112. LP1，112。

65. I wish to thank Sergio Caprioglio for pointing out the two articles. The first one, Il tramonto di Guignol [The twilight of Guignol], L'Avanti (March 13, 1917), is now in Antonio Gramsci, Letteratura e Vita Nazionale (Turin: Einaudi, 1950), 276-78, and the second one, Le Tessere e la Favola del Furbo, Avanti! XXI, 59 (February 28, 1917), only recently attributed to Gramsci, is in the volume Antonio Gramsci, La Città Futura (1917-1918), ed. Sergio Caprioglio (Turin: Einaudi, 1982).
65. 感谢塞尔吉奥·卡普里奥格里指出这两篇文章。第一篇，《木偶的黄昏》（Il tramonto di Guignol），载于《前进报》（L'Avanti，1917 年 3 月 13 日），现收录于安东尼奥·葛兰西著，《文学与民族生活》（Turin: Einaudi，1950），第 276-278 页；第二篇，《拼图和狡猾的寓言》（Le Tessere e la Favola del Furbo），《前进报》XXI，第 59 页（1917 年 2 月 28 日），最近才归因于葛兰西，收录于《安东尼奥·葛兰西，未来之城》（1917-1918），塞尔吉奥·卡普里奥格里编辑（Turin: Einaudi，1982）。

66. Gramsci was almost certainly aware of the centenary of the Grimms’ tales (Märchen), which was celebrated the same year that he attended Farinelli’s lectures on German classics and romantics and to which space was given over in the Italian press. See also my article, Antonio Gramsci und die Brüder Grimm, in the collectively authored volume Brüder Grimm Gedenken III (Marburg: Elwert, 1981).
66. 格拉姆斯基几乎肯定知道格林童话（Märchen）一百周年纪念，这一年他同时旁听法里内利教授的德国民俗及浪漫主义讲座，意大利媒体也对此进行了报道。另见我合著的《兄弟格林纪念 III》（《兄弟格林纪念 III》，马尔堡：埃尔沃特出版社，1981 年）中的文章《安东尼奥·格拉姆斯基与格林兄弟》。

67. LP2, 129-30. Emphasis added.
67. LP2，129-130。重点标出。

68. We give a list of the translated tales and, in brackets, their original titles preceded by the numbers with which they appear in Reclam’s edition of the Märchen. Notebook A——1. Storia di uno, Giovannin Senzapaura, che partì di casa per imparare cos'è la pelle d'oca/ The Stor^ of the Youth Who Went Forth to Learn What Fear Was (3. Märchen von einem, der auszog, das Fürchten zu lernen); 2. Il lupo e i sette caprettini/ The Wolf and the Seven Little Kids (4. Der Wolf und die sieben Geisslein); 3. Cenerentola/ Cinderella (14. Aschenputtel); 4. Cappuccetto Rosso/ Little Red Riding Hood (17. Rotkäppchen); 5. I quattro musicanti di Brema/ The Bremen To^n Musicians (18. Die Bremer Stadtmusikanten); 6. Mignolino/ Tom Thumb (20. Daumesdick); 7. Il pellegrinaggio di Mignoletto/ Thumbling's Travels (21. Daumerlings Wanderschaft); 8. Elsa la furba/ Clever Elsie (19. Die kluge Else); 9. Nevina/ Snow White (27. Sneewittchen); 10. Gianni e la felicità [fortuna]/ Hans in Luck (33. Hans im Glück); 11. La contadinella furba/ The Peasant's Clever Daughter (33. Die kluge Bauerntochter); 12. La figlia di Maria/ Our Lady's Child (2. Marienkind); 13. Il re dei ranocchi/ The Frog King (1. Der Froschkönig, oder der eiserne Heinrich); 14. I dodici fratelli/ The Twelve Brothers (7. Die zwölf Brüder); 15. Fratellino e sorellina/ Little Brother and Little Sister (9. Brüderchen und Schwesterchen). Notebook B—16. I tre omini della foresta/ The Three Little Men in the Forest (10. Die drei Männlein im Walde); 17. Le tre filatrici/ The Three Spinners (12. Die drei Spinnerinnen); 18. Giannino e Margheritina [Ghitina]/ Hansel and Gretel (11. Hänsel und Gretel); 19. Rosina [Rosaspina], ossia la bella addormentata nel bosco/ Sleeping Beauty [Little Briar-Rose] (24. Dornröschen); 20. Rumpelstilzchen/ Rumpelstiltskin (28. Rumpelstilzchen); 21. Il cane e il passero/ The Dog and the Sparrow (29. Der Hund und der Sperling); 22. Millepelli/ All-kinds-of-fur (31. Allerleirauh); 23. Il forasiepe [re di macchia] e l'orso/ The Willow-~wren and the Bear (38. Der Zaunkönig und der Bär); 24. Gente furba/ Wise folks (39. Die klugen Leute).
68. 我们列出翻译后的故事，以及括号内它们在 Reclam 版《童话集》中的原文标题，并附上它们在该版本中的编号。A 笔记本——1.  《一个胆大妄为的青年去学习害怕是什么的故事》/《外出学习恐惧的青年》（3. 《一个外出学习恐惧的人》）；2. 《狼和七只小羊》/《狼和七只小山羊》（4. 《狼和七只山羊羔》）；3. 《灰姑娘》/《灰姑娘》（14. 《灰姑娘》）；4. 《小红帽》/《小红帽》（17. 《红透帽》）；5. 《布莱梅的四个音乐家》/《布莱梅城的音乐家》（18. 《布莱梅城的音乐家》）；6. 《拇指姑娘》/《拇指姑娘》（20. 《拇指姑娘》）；7. 《拇指姑娘的旅行》/《拇指姑娘的旅程》（21. 《拇指姑娘的旅程》）；8. 《狡猾的埃尔莎》/《聪明的埃尔莎》（19. 《聪明的埃尔莎》）；9. 《涅维娜》/《白雪公主》（27. 《白雪公主》）；10. 《幸运的汉斯》/《汉斯之幸运》（33. 《汉斯之幸运》）；11. 《聪明的农家女》/《聪明的农家女孩》（33. 《聪明的农家女孩》）；12. 《圣母之子》/《圣母之子》（2. 《圣母之子》）；13. 《青蛙王》/《青蛙王子》（1. 《青蛙王子》，或《铁人亨利》；14. 十二兄弟；15. 小弟弟和小妹妹（9. 兄弟和姐妹）。笔记本 B—16. 森林中的三个小男人（10. 森林中的三个小矮人）；17. 三个纺织女（12. 三个纺织女）；18. 翰塞尔和格丽特（11. 亨塞尔和格丽特）；19. 罗西娜[罗莎皮娜]，或森林中睡美人（24. 睡美人）；20. 鲁珀斯蒂尔茨金（28. 鲁珀斯蒂尔茨金）；21. 狗和麻雀（29. 狗和麻雀）；22. 千皮（31. 千奇百怪）；23. 灌木鸟和熊（38. 篱雀和熊）；24. 聪明的人（39. 聪明的人）。

69. Originally in Lettere dal carcere, Gramsci’s tales for children were published in a separate collection, Antonio Gramsci, L'albero e il riccio, ed. G. Ravegnani (Rome: Editori Riuniti, 1966).
69. 格拉姆斯基的儿童故事最初收录于《狱中书简》，后单独出版成册，见于《安东尼奥·格拉姆斯基，树与刺猬》，拉维格纳尼（G. Ravegnani）编， （罗马：联合出版社，1966）。

70. Brothers Grimm, 188. 格林兄弟，188

71. [We have taken the English quotations from widely available sources; obviously other translations exist and those used may not always correspond to the ones known by readers, for example, the guesses at Rumpelstiltskin’s [Rumpel-stilts-kin’s] name are sometimes rendered “Bandy-legs, Hunchback, Crook-shanks” (Harmondsworth: Penguin, 1996), 143.]
71. [我们从广泛可获得的英文来源中摘录了英文引文；显然存在其他译文，而所使用的译文可能并不总是与读者所知的译文相符，例如，对《格林童话》中跛足汉斯[跛足汉斯]名字的猜测有时被译为“跛腿、驼背、瘸腿”（哈蒙兹沃思：企鹅出版社，1996 年），143 页。]

72. Carlo Battisti and Giovanni Alessio’s Dizionario Etimologico Italiano reads, “pastinare = rivoltare, divellere la terra, v. dotta (lat. pastinare), con continuatori popolari nei nostri dialetti meridionali compreso il sardo” (“pastinare = to dig and plough the earth, formal lexis [from Latin, pastinare], finding a continuation in Southern dialects, including Sardinian”).
72. 卡洛·巴蒂斯蒂和乔瓦尼·阿莱西奥的《意大利语词源字典》写道：“pastinare = 翻土，犁地，书面语（拉丁语 pastinare），在我们的南部方言中（包括撒丁语）有通俗的延续。”

73. Brothers Grimm, 134. 格林兄弟，134。

74. Brothers Grimm, 173. 格林兄弟，173。

75. [In this table, translator’s notes are added to explain the words substituted or changed by Gramsci.]
75. [本表中，翻译注记补充说明了葛兰西替换或修改的词语。]

76. Brothers Grimm, 85. 格林兄弟，85。

77. These quotations are taken respectively from: Jakob Grimm, Cinquanta novelle per i bambini e per le famiglie, trans. Fanny Vanzi Mussini (Milan: Hoepli, 1897); Le nocella per tutti (Florence: Salani, 1908); Jakob Grimm, Fiabe, trans. Dino Provenzal (Milan: Istituto Editoriale Italiano, 1914); Jakob Grimm, Biancaneve e altre novelle, trans. A. Mazzoni (Florence: Bemporad, 1922).
77. 这些引文分别摘自：雅各布·格林，《五十个儿童和家庭故事》，范妮·范齐·穆西尼译（米兰：霍普利出版社，1897）；《人人皆可读的故事》（佛罗伦萨：萨拉尼出版社，1908）；雅各布·格林，《童话》，迪诺·普罗文扎尔译（米兰：意大利编辑社，1914）；雅各布·格林，《白雪公主和其他故事》，A. 马佐尼译（佛罗伦萨：贝姆波拉德出版社，1922）。

78. Brothers Grimm, 133; see Notebook A, Mignolino, sheet 69v).
格林兄弟，133 页；见笔记簿 A，米格诺利诺，69v 页。

79. Brothers Grimm, 7; see Notebook A, Il re dei ranocchi [The Frog King], sheet 89v.
格林兄弟，第 7 卷；见笔记本 A，青蛙王，第 89 页背面。

80. Brothers Grimm, 203; see Notebook B, Millepelli, sheet 17v. The same holds true for untranslated expressions such as “dem alles glückte, was es anfing” [“for everything it did turned out well”] (Brothers Grimm, 130; see Notebook A, Mignolino, sheet 67v) and “begegnete ihm ja eine Verdriesslichkeit, so würde sie doch gleich wieder gutgemacht” [“if he did meet with any vexation it was immediately set right”] (Brothers Grimm, 214, see Notebook A, Gianni e la fortuna, sheet 82r). The remaining—very few—omissions in Gramsci’s translation of the Grimms’ tales are probably oversights.
80. 格林兄弟，203 页；见笔记本 B，Millepelli，第 17v 页。同样的情况也适用于未翻译的表达，例如“dem alles glückte, was es anfing” [“凡事皆成”]（格林兄弟，130 页；见笔记本 A，Mignolino，第 67v 页）和“begegnete ihm ja eine Verdriesslichkeit, so würde sie doch gleich wieder gutgemacht” [“即使他遇到挫折，也会立刻得到弥补”]（格林兄弟，214 页，见笔记本 A，Gianni e la fortuna，第 82r 页）。格拉姆斯基翻译格林童话的剩余（极少）遗漏之处，可能只是疏忽。

81. Brothers Grimm, 241. 格林兄弟，241。

82. At this point in the Grimms’ original fable the word used is “Himmel” / "Heaven.”
82. 在格林兄弟原著童话中，此处使用的词语是“Himmel”/“天堂”。

83. LP2, 106. 83. LP2，106。

84. Gramsci, Favole di Libertà.
84. 格拉姆斯基，《自由的寓言》。

85. Carlo Muscetta, “Introduction” to Gramsci, Favole di Libertà, xxxiii.
85. 卡洛·穆切塔，在《葛兰西：自由寓言》导言，第 xxxiii 页。

86. Antonio Gramsci, “La storia,” Avanti! XX (August 29, 1916), 240, now in Cronache Torinesi, 513-14.
86. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，“历史”，前进报 XX（1916 年 8 月 29 日），240 页，现收录于《都灵纪事》，第 513-514 页。

87. LP2, 318, emphasis added [and translation modified].
87. LP2，318，强调部分[以及翻译修改]

88. LP1, 301. 88. LP1，301。

89. Q8§135, PN3, 314. 89. Q8§135，PN3，314。

90. LP2, 370 [altering the translation by using the more exact “culture” instead of “education”].
90. LP2，370 [更改翻译，使用更精确的“文化”代替“教育”]

91. LP1, 302. 91. LP1，302。

92. Q4§50, PN2, 211. 92. Q4§50，PN2，211。

93. Q12§2, SPN, 41. 93. Q12§2，SPN，41。

94. Q11§12, SPN, 329, emphasis added.
94. Q11§12，SPN，329，强调部分。

95. Antonio Gramsci, “La luce che si è spenta” [The Light That Has Been Extinguished], in II Grido del Popolo, no. 591 (November 20, 1915), now in Cronache torinesi, 23-26.
95. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，“熄灭的光芒”[熄灭的光芒]，载于《人民号角》第 591 期（1915 年 11 月 20 日），现收录于《都灵纪事》，第 23-26 页。

96. LP2, 318 [translation modified replacing “dominant” with "leading”].
96. LP2，318

97. LP2, 130. Emphasis added.
97. LP2，130。重点标出。

98. Q12§2, SPN, 35. 98. Q12§2，SPN，35。

99. Antonio Gramsci, “La difesa dello Schultz,” Avanti! XXI, no. 328 (November 27, 1917), now in Scritti giovanili, 134.
99. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，“对舒尔茨的辩护”，《前进报》XXI，第 328 期（1917 年 11 月 27 日），现收录于《青年著作》，第 134 页。

100. Q12§2, SPN, 39. 100. Q12§2，SPN，39。

101. Gramsci, “La difesa dello Schultz,” 135.
101. 格拉姆斯基，“舒尔茨的防御”，135。

102. Q12§2, SPN, 39. 102. Q12§2，SPN，39。

103. Q11§28, SPN, 450. 103. Q11§28，SPN，450。

104. Q11§27, SPN, 465. 104. Q11§27，SPN，465。

105. In this respect, it would be extremely important to collect the entire corpus of Gramsci’s translations in a single volume. This would provide a useful integration and a long overdue complement to the critical edition of the Notebooks.
105.  就此而言，将葛兰西所有译作汇编成册至关重要。这将为《笔记》的批判性版本提供有益的整合，并弥补长期欠缺的补充。

* Translated from Lucia Borghese, “Tia Alene in Bicicletta: Gramsci Traduttore dal Tedesco e Teorico della Traduzione,” Belfagor 36, no. 6 (November 1981): 635-65. Translated by Sabrina Fusari with some assistance from Derek Boothman.
译自 Lucia Borghese，“Tia Alene 在自行车上：葛兰西作为德语译者和翻译理论家”，《贝尔法格尔》第 36 卷，第 6 期（1981 年 11 月）：635-65。由 Sabrina Fusari 翻译，Derek Boothman 协助。

Table 8.1. 表 8.1

Gramsci: Notebook A 葛兰西：笔记 A

“Se nostra madre lo sapesse! Vieni, andremo insieme per il vasto mondo,” Fratellino e sorellina, sheet 95v ("If our mother only knew. Come, we will go forth together into the wide world.” Brother and Sister: Gramsci omits the initial “God pity us”).
要是母亲知道了！来吧，我们将一起走向广阔的世界。”  弟弟妹妹，95v 页（葛兰西省略了开头的“愿上帝怜悯我们”）。

Alla sera, quando sorellina era stanca (omission), metteva la sua testina sulla spalla del capriolino, sheet 96v (“In the evening, when the sister was tired, she laid her head upon the roe’s back”: Gramsci omits “and had said her prayers”).
傍晚，当妹妹疲倦时（略），她把头靠在小鹿的背上，96v 页（“傍晚，当妹妹疲倦时，她把头靠在小鹿的背上”：葛兰西省略了“并且做完祷告”）。

Disse il re: "Ahimè, cosa capita?,” sheet 98v (The king said: "Alas, what is happening?”： Gramsci substitutes for “Ah God, [Good heaven] what is this?”).
国王说：“唉，发生了什么事？”（第 98v 页）（葛兰西将“啊上帝，[天哪]这是怎么回事？”替换为“唉，发生了什么事？”）。

e in quell momento riacquistò la vita ("and at the same moment she received life again”： Gramsci omits “and by God’s grace”).
在那时她重新获得了生命（葛兰西省略了“上帝恩赐”）。

Notebook B 笔记本 B

“Per carità一rispose la fanciulla一le fragole non ci sono d’inverno,” I tre omini della foresta, sheet
“可怜的——小女孩回答——冬天没有草莓，”森林中的三个小矮人，单页

1v ("Oh dear,” said the girl, “there are no strawberries to be found in winter.” The Three Little
1v（“哎呀，”女孩说，“冬天找不到草莓。”三个小

Men in the Wood: Gramsci changes the words "Dear God”).
林中之人：葛兰西改变了“亲爱的上帝”一词。

“Cara sorellina, consolati e dormi tranquilla: tutto andrà bene per noi,” Giannino e Ghitina, sheet 6r (“Be easy, dear little sister, and go to sleep quietly; everything will be fine for us.” Hansel and Gretel: Gramsci substitutes for “God will not forsake us”).
卡拉·索雷利娜，安慰并安靜地睡吧：我們一切都會好起來。（格林童話《漢塞爾與格麗特》第 6 頁，葛蘭西將“上帝不會拋棄我們”替換。）

“Non piangere Ghitina, e dormi tranquilla; ce la caveremo anche questa volta.” sheet 7v ("Don’t cry, Gretel, and go to sleep quietly; we will make it this time too.” ibid.: Gramsci substitutes for "the good God will help us”).
别哭，格丽特，安静地睡吧；这次我们也能行。（伊比德：葛兰西用“这次我们也能行”代替了“上帝保佑我们”）

“Ahimè, chi ci aiuterà?” esclamava——“almeno le fiere ci avessero divorati nella foresta,” sheet 9r (“Alas, who will help us now?” cried she; “if only we had been devoured by wild beasts in the wood”： Gramsci substitutes for “dear God, do help us”).
啊，谁来帮助我们？她喊道——“要是我们当初在森林里被野兽吃掉就好了”，9r 页（葛兰西用“亲爱的上帝，请帮助我们”代替了这句话）。

“La natura non permette, che il padre sposi sua figlia; da un tale abominio non potrebbe risultare nessun bene, e tutto il reame ne sarebbe portato alla rovina,” Millepelli, sheet 16v (“Nature has forbidden a father to marry his daughter, no good can come from such a crime, and the kingdom will be involved in the ruin.” Allerleirauh/All-kinds-of-fur, or Catskin: Gramsci substitutes the alternative “nature" for “God” and “abomination“ for “sin” [“Sünde”]).
自然不允许父亲娶女儿；这种可憎之事不会带来任何好处，整个王国都将因此而毁灭。  《千皮》第 16 页下半页（“自然”替代了“上帝”，“可憎”替代了“罪恶”[“罪恶”]）。

“indossò il mantello fatto di tanti pezzettini di pelle vellosa, e si tinse di nero la faccia e le mani con la fuliggine. Uscì di casa in tale truccatura [così truccata] (omissione) e camminò tutta la notte,” sheet 17r (“She put on her mantle of all kinds of fur, and blackened her face and hands with soot. In that disguise [disguised in that way] ...
她披上了一件由各种毛皮碎片缝制而成的斗篷，并用烟灰将脸和手涂黑。她以这种装扮走出家门（省略），整夜行走。

she set forth and walked the whole night”: Gramsci omits “she commended herself to God”).
她出发并走了整整一夜：“葛兰西省略了‘她祈求上帝的庇佑’”。

German Reclam Edition 德语莱因哈特版

“Dass Gott erbarm, wenn das unsere Mutter wüsste! Komm, wir wollen miteinander in die weite Welt gehen” (Brüderchen und Schwesterchen, page 28).
上帝保佑，要是母亲知道了！来，我们一起去广阔的世界吧。

Abends, wenn Schwesterchen müde war und sein Gebet gesagt hatte, legte es seinen Kopf auf den Rücken des Rehkälbchens (page 60).
晚上，当妹妹累了，祷告完毕后，将头靠在小鹿背上。（页 60）

Sprach der König: “Ach Gott, was ist das?” (page 65).
国王的语言：“啊，上帝，这是什么？”（第 65 页）

und hatte in dem Augenblick durch Gottes Gnade das Leben wiedererhalten.
在那一刻，蒙上帝恩典，他恢复了生命。

“Du lieber Gott,” sagte das Mädchen, “im Winter wachsen ja keine Erdbeeren” (Die drei Männlein im Walde, page 67).
“天哪，”女孩说，“冬天草莓不会长。”（《森林里的三个小伙子》，第 67 页）

“Sei getrost, liebes Schwesterchen, und schlaf nur ruhig ein, Gott wird uns nicht verlassen” (Hänsel und Gretel, page 78).
亲爱的妹妹，请放心，好好睡吧，上帝不会抛弃我们。

“Weine nicht, Gretel, und schlaf nur ruhig, der liebe Gott wird uns schon helfen” (page 83).
格丽特，别哭，好好睡，上帝会帮助我们的。(page 83)

“Lieber Gott, hilf uns doch,” rief sie aus, “hätten uns nur die wilden Tiere im Wald gefressen” (page 87).
“上帝啊，救救我们吧，”她喊道，“但愿森林里的野兽吃了我们。”

“Gott hat verboten, dass der Vater seine Tochter heirate, aus der Sünde kann nichts Gutes entspringen, und das Reich wird mit ins Verderben gezogen” (Allerleirauh, page 201).
上帝禁止父亲娶女儿，罪恶不能生出好事，王国也将被拖入毁灭。

zog den Mantel von allerlei Rauchwerk an und machte sich Gesicht und Hände mit Russ schwarz. Dann befahl sie sich Gott und ging fort und ging die ganze Nacht.
她披上各种烟熏的斗篷，用煤烟把脸和手弄黑。然后她祈求上帝，走了出去，整夜不停地走。

On “Translatability'' in Gramsci’s Prison Notebooks
Fabio Frosini*
格拉姆斯基狱中札记中关于“翻译性”的探讨  法比奥·弗罗西尼*

The theme of translatability of languages [linguaggi] is evidence of a strong link to the philosophical status of Marxism. The radical form of translation, that is, the one that makes possible all other translations, is the translation of philosophy into politics. Translation, if regarded from the correct point of view (that of Marx), is a “reduction'; if regarded from the mistaken point of view (that of idealism), it is an “overturning [capovolgimento].'
语言[语言]的可译性主题体现了与马克思主义哲学地位的紧密联系。彻底的翻译，即所有其他翻译的基础，是将哲学翻译成政治。如果从正确的视角（马克思的视角）来看待翻译，它是一种“还原”；如果从错误的视角（唯心主义的视角）来看待，它是一种“颠覆”。

As it is known, Gramsci devoted the fifth section of Notebook 11 to the “translatability of scientific and philosophical languages.' This section does not have a title, even though Gramsci refers to it in Notebook 10 as “the notebook concerning the ‘Introduction to the Study of Philosophy.'"1 Moreover, “Notes for an Introduction and a Beginning to the Study of Philosophy and the History of Culture' is written as a title on the top of the recto side of page 11, which could be understood to refer to the entire section. In other words, the theme concerning the translatability of languages constitutes an integral part of Gramsci’s project of rethinking philosophy. Or better, to use Gramsci’s explanation, the philosophy-culture couplet, in the precise sense that he used it, should be understood in the light of the “equality of, or the equation between, ‘philosophy and politics,5 thought and action,' that is, a philosophy of praxis for which “everything is political, even philosophy or philosophies ... and the only ‘philosophy5 is history in action, life itself.'2 The presence of the couplet, philosophyculture, in the notebook devoted to the “introduction to philosophy' is not extrinsic, but rather coincides with the philosophical nucleus of Marxism, insofar as only thinking of philosophy as joined with the “culture' in which it is immerged and against which it reacts, reforming and transforming that “culture,' will it be possible to fully grasp philosophy's specific reality. This specific reality of philosophy consists in an unending work of the transformation of “common sense,' which is where philosophy gains relief, as happens with a picture of a landscape.
众所周知，葛兰西在笔记 11 的第五部分探讨了“科学和哲学语言的可翻译性”。尽管葛兰西在笔记 10 中将其称为“关于《哲学研究导论》的笔记”，但这部分并没有标题。此外，“哲学和文化研究导论及开端笔记”被写在第 11 页的正面顶部，这可以理解为指代整个章节。换言之，语言可翻译性的主题构成了葛兰西重新思考哲学的项目不可分割的一部分。或者更确切地说，正如葛兰西所解释的那样，他所使用的“哲学-文化”二元对，应该理解为“哲学与政治、思想与行动的平等或等式”，即一种实践哲学，其中“一切皆政治，甚至哲学或哲学体系……，唯一的‘哲学’是行动中的历史，即生命本身。”2 “哲学文化”这一对偶概念出现在“哲学导论”笔记本中并非外在于，而是与马克思主义哲学内核相符。因为只有将哲学视为与它所浸润并与其发生反应、从而改造和变革的“文化”相结合，才能真正把握哲学的具体现实。哲学的这种具体现实在于对“常识”的不断改造，哲学由此获得立足点，如同风景画般显现。

As can be seen with little more than a superficial glance, the theme of the translatability of languages brings forth a strong connection with the philosophical status of Marxism. Gramsci fully explicates this connection in a passage from Notebook 10, wherein he refers to the title of the fifth section of Notebook 11. This passage is in Notebook 10II§6iv entitled “Translatability of scientific and philosophical languages”：
正如略加审视即可看出，语言可译性这一主题与马克思主义的哲学地位有着紧密的联系。葛兰西在笔记 10 中的一段文字中充分阐述了这种联系，其中他提及了笔记 11 第五节的标题。这段文字位于笔记 10II§6iv，题为“科学和哲学语言的可译性”。

The notes written under this heading are in fact to be brought together in the general section on the relationships between speculative philosophies and the philosophy of praxis and their reduction to this latter as a political moment that the philosophy of praxis explains “politically.” Reduction of all speculative philosophies to “politics,” to a moment of the historico-political life; the philosophy of praxis conceives the reality of human relationships of knowledge as an element of political “hegemony.”3
本标题下的注释实际上应归入关于思辨哲学与实践哲学之间关系的总论，以及将它们简化为实践哲学作为政治时刻的分析，实践哲学以此“政治”地解释。所有思辨哲学都简化为“政治”，即历史政治生活的时刻；实践哲学将人类知识关系的现实理解为政治“领导权”的组成部分。

The note containing this passage of Gramsci’s, which is divided in four parts, is extraordinarily important from a theoretical point of view. This entire note is entitled “Introduction to the Study of Philosophy.” In his first point, entitled “The Term ‘Catharsis,’” Gramsci draws an initial account of his reflection on this Aristotelian concept, which he takes from Croce’s aesthetics. He affirms that the term “catharsis” can be appropriated by the philosophy of praxis to point out “the passage from the purely economic (or egoistic-impassionate) to the ethico-political moment”一that is, the hegemonic—even stating that “to establish the ‘cathartic’ moment becomes therefore ... the starting-point for all the philosophy of praxis.”4 In this way, according to Gramsci, “the cathartic process coincides with the chain of syntheses which have resulted from the evolution of the dialectic,”5 that is, of the dialectical unfolding that Marx defined through the extreme terms of its ideal oscillations—by the two criteria he enunciated in the Preface of 1859 to the Critique of Political Economy. Gramsci summarizes these two criteria in the following way：
葛兰西这篇分四部分的笔记，从理论角度来看非常重要。整篇笔记题为“哲学研究导论”。在第一部分，题为“‘净化’一词”，葛兰西初步阐述了他对亚里士多德这一概念的思考，他汲取了克罗齐美学的观点。他认为，“净化”一词可以被实践哲学所借用，以指明“从纯粹的经济（或利己主义的、激情驱动的）到伦理政治时刻”——即霸权时刻——的转变，甚至声明“确立‘净化’时刻，因此成为……所有实践哲学的出发点”。4 按照葛兰西的观点，“净化过程”与“辩证法演变所产生的综合链”相符，5 即马克思在其《政治经济学批判》1859 年序言中通过其理想振荡的极端术语所界定的辩证法展开——即他所阐述的两个标准。葛兰西总结了这两个标准如下：

One must keep in mind the two points between which this process oscillates: that no society poses for itself problems the necessary and sufficient conditions for whose solution do not already exist or are coming into being; and that no society comes to an end before it has expressed all its potential content.6
必须记住这个过程所摆动的两点：任何社会都不会给自己设定其解决问题的必要充分条件尚未存在或正在形成的问题；任何社会都不会在其表达所有潜在内容之前结束。

The space of catharsis—that is, of hegemony or of historical initiative—is delimited by two slopes: the new that comes to light and the old that perishes—by conditions that are only negative. In other words, for Gramsci, historical materialism establishes the conditions in which something either will not be able to come to light at all or will not be able to perish; it does not extend to the affirmative level of prediction. Thus the centrality of “catharsis” in the philosophy of praxis consists indeed of it being an integral part of historical materialism. Catharsis is the specific form human freedom assumes within historical materialism. Consequently the only possible predictive statements will be the ones formulated in terms of catharsis—namely, not in predictive terms, but rather in terms of open and alternative possibilities. In this way, both fatalism and determinism are banished in any of their possible forms.7
“净化”的空间——即霸权或历史主动权的空间——受两个斜坡的限制：新兴事物和衰亡旧事物——仅由消极条件决定。换言之，对于葛兰西而言，历史唯物主义确立了某些事物要么根本无法出现，要么无法消亡的条件；它并未延伸到预测的肯定层面。因此，“净化”在实践哲学中的核心地位，恰恰在于它是历史唯物主义不可分割的一部分。“净化”是人类自由在历史唯物主义中所呈现的特定形式。因此，唯一可能的预测性陈述，将以“净化”为概念框架——即并非以预测性，而是以开放和替代性可能性的形式。以此方式，宿命论和决定论的所有可能形式都被驱逐。

The same reference to the two criteria of the preface of 1859 was already present in a previous note, Q7§20, which Gramsci transcribed together with others in Q11§22. In this note, Gramsci pointed out that in the Popular Manual, the theory of historical materialism of Bukharin “does not deal with a fundamental point: how does the historical movement come to light from the structures? This is indeed the crucial point of historical materialism.% He continues recalling the two fundamental criteria of Marx’s preface mentioned above to conclude:
1859 年序言中对这两个标准的提及，已出现在之前的注释中，即 Q7§20，葛兰西将其与其他注释一起抄录在 Q11§22 中。在这篇注释中，葛兰西指出，在《大众指南》中，布哈林的历史唯物主义理论“没有处理一个根本问题：历史运动是如何从结构中显现出来的？这确实是历史唯物主义的关键所在。”他继续援引上述马克思序言中的两个基本标准，以得出结论：

Only on these grounds can all mechanistic views and every trace of superstitious belief in “miracles” be eliminated. On these grounds also one must pose the problem of the formation of social groups and of political parties and, in the final analysis, of the function of great personalities in history.9
只有在此基础上，才能消除所有机械论观点以及一切关于“奇迹”的迷信思想。在此基础上，我们还必须探讨社会群体的形成、政治党派的形成，以及最终，历史中伟大人物的功能。

“This ground” is therefore what in Q10II§6 (but also in other texts contained in Q10I) Gramsci calls “catharsis” and what allows one to think politics, and within politics the role “of the great historical personalities,” who always belonged to the idealistic philosophy of history (remember Napoleon, “spirit of the world on horse back”).10
因此，“这片土地”在 Q10II§6（以及 Q10I 中的其他文本）中，葛兰西称之为“净化”，它允许人们思考政治，以及政治之内的“伟大历史人物”的角色，他们始终属于理想主义的历史哲学（记住拿破仑，“世界精神骑在马上”）。

It is in the context of this reflection that one must read the subsequent part of Q10II§6: “II. The Subjective Conception of Reality and the Philosophy of Praxis” that has as a corollary “III. Reality of the External World." In fact, Gramsci presents the philosophy of praxis as capable of “translating” idealistic philosophy into realistic terms thanks to the concept of catharsis, namely, of highlighting and giving value to what is historicity
在反思的语境下，必须阅读 Q10II§6 的后续部分：“二. 现实的主观概念与实践哲学”；其推论为“三. 外在世界的现实性”。事实上，葛兰西将实践哲学呈现为一种能够借助“净化”的概念，即突出和赋予历史性以价值，将唯心主义哲学“翻译”成现实主义术语的能力。

(i.e., politics) in idealism, even though in the form of a “philosophical romance.”11
(即，政治) 在理想主义中，即使是以“哲学浪漫”的形式。

The “translation” Gramsci speaks about in “IV. The Translatability of Scientific Languages” is therefore closely tied, on the one hand, to the problem of praxis or politics—that is, to the problem of the enigma represented by “historical movement” on the basis of the structure—and, on the other, to the theme concerning the comparison between the philosophy of praxis and idealism. Gramsci’s two-fold articulation of his discourse on translation is analogous to Marx’s theoretical reasoning in his Theses on Feuerbach. In Thesis 1 he says, “Hence, in contradistinction to materialism, the active side was developed abstractly by materialism—which, of course, does not know real, sensuous activity as such.”12 When, in fact, Gramsci writes that “the philosophy of praxis conceives the reality of human relationships of knowledge as an element of political ‘hegemony,’”13 he does nothing but call attention to the specific value that must be assigned to the “active side” Marx speaks about in Thesis 1. Yet Gramsci’s specific claim demands that this active side is “translated” into a worldly language —that is, it is grasped according to its specific reality (i.e., as the production of hegemony).
“葛兰西”在“四. 科学语言的可翻译性”中所谈的“翻译”，因此一方面与实践或政治问题密切相关——也就是说，与根据结构理解“历史运动”的谜题问题密切相关；另一方面，与实践哲学与唯心主义的比较主题密切相关。葛兰西关于翻译的双重阐释类似于马克思在《关于费尔巴哈的提纲》中的理论论证。在第一条提纲中，他说：“因此，与唯物主义相对照，唯物主义抽象地发展了能动性——当然，它不了解真正的、感性的活动本身。”12 事实上，当葛兰西写道“实践哲学将人类认识关系的现实视为政治‘领导权’的要素”13 时，他所做的不过是强调必须赋予马克思在第一条提纲中所谈的“能动性”的特定价值。然而，葛兰西的具体论断要求将这种能动性“翻译”成世俗语言——也就是说，根据其具体现实（即作为领导权的生产）来理解它。

Exactly as Marx could not have appropriately grasped the “active side” represented by the concept of Thätigkeit [activity] had he not already possessed the idea of sensuous activity (which is irreducible to idealism), the philosophy of praxis could not have grasped the concept of catharsis without already possessing the idea of the unity of theory and practice, which indeed negates what is idealistic in the concept of catharsis. In fact, as Marx’s concept of “sensuous activity” contains his detachment from idealism thanks to the notion of the “real basis,” which he elaborated in The German Ideology, in the same manner, Gramsci’s idea of "‘equality’ of, or the equation between, ‘philosophy and politics,5 thought and action,”14 which he elaborated in the Prison Notebooks, radically puts into question the abstract unity of the principle, which is at the basis of Croce and Gentile’s idealism. For them一and they are in complete agreement on this specific point—unity is the principle (i.e., the form), and only as such can it also be the result—namely, history or matter. For Gramsci it is the reverse: unity can only be a result, and therefore only a material unity, that is, transitory and contingent. As seen above, Gramsci does not negate the role of form. Rather, he rethinks it as a function of the potentiality or of the realization (which nothing can guarantee, to the extent that it belongs to the sphere of “catharsis”) of the potentials which are present in matter (i.e., in social relationships).
正如马克思只有先拥有感性活动（它不可还原于唯心主义）的概念，才能恰当地把握“Thätigkeit”（活动）所代表的“能动性”一样，实践哲学只有先拥有理论与实践的统一概念，才能把握净化（catharsis）的概念，而这种统一概念恰好否定了净化概念中的唯心主义成分。事实上，正如马克思的“感性活动”概念通过他于《德意志意识形态》中阐述的“现实基础”概念摆脱了唯心主义一样，葛兰西在《狱中札记》中提出的“哲学与政治的‘平等’或‘等式’，思想与行动的统一”14 的思想，也从根本上质疑了克罗齐和詹蒂莱唯心主义的根本原则的抽象统一性。对于他们——他们在这方面完全一致——统一性是原则（即形式），并且只有作为原则，它才能成为结果——即历史或物质。 对于葛兰西而言，情况正好相反：统一只能是结果，因此只能是物质的统一，即短暂且偶然的。如上所述，葛兰西并非否定形式的作用。相反，他将形式重新思考为潜在性或实现（其结果无法保证，因为它属于“净化”的范畴）的函数，这些潜在性存在于物质之中（即社会关系之中）。

Translation of Politics and Politics of Translation
政治与翻译的政治

According to Gramsci, the concept of the unity of theory and practice would be reduced to a procedure of mechanical transposition or to a “simple game of ‘generic schematisms,’”15 if translatability did not coincide with it. In this statement, Gramsci refers to the way the Pragmatists deal with the problem of language as a cause of errors and with the translatability of scientific languages. Beyond this superficial or "weak” (as it has also been called recently)16 level of translatability, there is a deeper and more important one that is necessary to understand in order to grasp the entire meaning of translatability. Gramsci formulates this deeper level in the Notebooks, wherein he conceives it as a relationship between national cultures:
根据葛兰西，如果翻译能力不与理论与实践的统一概念一致，那么该概念就会被简化为机械的转换程序或“简单的‘一般模式’游戏”15。在这句话中，葛兰西指的是实用主义者如何处理语言作为错误根源的问题以及科学语言的可翻译性问题。除了这种肤浅或“弱”（最近也有过这种称呼）16 的翻译能力层面之外，还存在一个更深层次、更重要的层面，理解它对于把握翻译能力的全部意义至关重要。葛兰西在《狱中札记》中阐述了这个更深层次的层面，他将其理解为民族文化之间的关系。

Translatability [of philosophical and scientific languages [linguaggi]] presupposes that a given stage of civilization has a “basically” identical cultural expression, even if its language is historically different, being determined by the particular tradition of each national culture and each philosophical system, by the prevalence of an intellectual or practical activity, etc.17
哲学和科学语言的翻译性[语言]，预设了特定文明阶段拥有“基本相同”的文化表达，即使其语言在历史上不同，也由各自民族文化传统和哲学体系、以及知识或实践活动的盛行等因素决定。17

Taking into account this hierarchical articulation of the theory of translatability, it can be said therefore that the “fundamental” equivalence between the languages [linguaggi] of different sciences and philosophies is nothing but the particular case of a wider fact. Namely, of the fact that since each culture一on the level of national cultures一is always complete as such and does not have expressive deficiencies, the different national traditions will have to be decoded as different forms of response to historical problems, which are fundamentally identical一provided that they are regarded as related to forms of civilization that are comparable and insofar as they are comparable. What follows from this is the relativization of diverse languages [linguaggi] and (given the unity of theory and practice) a clarification of their uniquely political character.
考虑到翻译可能性理论的这种等级结构，因此可以认为不同科学和哲学的语言之间的“根本”等值，不过是一个更广泛事实的特殊情况。即，由于每一种文化——在民族文化层面——始终是完整的，并且没有表达上的不足，不同的民族传统就必须被解码为对根本相同的历史问题的不同回应形式——前提是将它们视为与可比的文明形式相关，并且只要它们是可比的。由此产生的结果是不同语言的相对化，以及（鉴于理论与实践的统一）对其独特政治性质的阐明。

The radical form of translation, the one that makes all others possible, is the translation of philosophy into politics—namely, the peculiar understanding of the “reality” of “human relationships of knowledge” according to their specific unfolding in their various national contexts, that is, the way philosophers—and in general intellectuals—realize the unity of philosophy and common sense in light of their respective national traditions and languages [linguaggi].
翻译的根本形式，即所有其他形式的基础，是将哲学翻译为政治——即根据其在不同国家语境中具体展开的方式，对“知识的人际关系”的“现实”进行特殊理解，也就是说，哲学家们（以及一般知识分子）如何根据各自的国家传统和语言（linguaggi）来实现哲学与常识的统一。

This should not lead to the conclusion, however, that Gramsci thinks of the “reduction” of philosophy (and of culture in general) into politics as an operation of ideological unveiling. For Gramsci, the critique of ideologies is something that is far more complex and cannot be reduced to this moment, that is to say, only to its simple and elementary presupposition. Once this translation of philosophy into politics is done, what must be highlighted is the specific function of the couplet, philosophy-culture, which is indeed the level grasped in the space of catharsis.
然而，这并不意味着葛兰西认为将哲学（以及一般文化）“还原”为政治，是一种意识形态揭示的操作。对葛兰西而言，意识形态批判远比这复杂，不能简化为这一时刻，也就是说，不能仅仅归结于其简单而基本的预设。一旦将哲学翻译为政治，就必须强调哲学—文化这对概念的特定功能，这实际上是通过净化过程把握到的层面。

I will come back to this point later when I try to show that there is a very strong anti-reductionism present in the concept of translatability. This helps Gramsci free himself from any temptation to think of the realm of theory in terms of detachment from the radical nature of political praxis—a temptation which is evident here and there in the first year in which Gramsci worked on his Notebooks. Before showing this anti-reductionism, I would like to discuss another passage in which Gramsci articulates the nexus between translatability and praxis on the level of hermeneutical criteria that are indispensable to realize correct translations:
我将在稍后讨论可翻译性概念中存在的强烈反还原论，届时我会回到这一点。这帮助葛兰西摆脱了将理论领域视为与政治实践的根本性质分离的诱惑——这种诱惑在葛兰西最初撰写“狱中札记”的第一年时显而易见。在展示这种反还原论之前，我想讨论葛兰西阐述可翻译性与实践之间联系的另一个段落，该段落探讨了实现正确翻译必不可少的诠释学标准。

Philosophy—politics—economics. If these are constitutive elements of a single conception of the world, there must necessarily be, in the theoretical principles, convertibility from one to the others, a reciprocal translation into the specific language of each constitutive part: each element is implicit in the others and all of them together form a homogeneous circle (cf. the earlier note on “Giovanni Vailati and scientific language”).18
哲学——政治——经济。如果这些构成一个世界观的要素，那么在理论原则上，必然存在着彼此之间的可转换性，一种将彼此翻译成各自构成部分的特定语言：每个要素都隐含在其他要素之中，并且所有要素共同构成一个同质的循环（参见之前关于“乔瓦尼·瓦伊拉蒂和科学语言”的注释）。

Some criteria for inquiry and critique follow from this statement, which are useful to the historian of culture and ideas:
由此陈述可得出一些用于文化和思想史研究者的探究和批判标准

A great personality may happen to express his most creative thought not in what would seem to be, from an external classificatory point of view, the most “logical” context but in another place where it would appear to be extraneous (Croce, I believe, has made this critical observation quite often in different places). A politician writes about philosophy; it could be that one should look for his "true” philosophy in his political writings instead. In every personality there is one dominant and predominant activity; it is in this activity that one must look for his thought, which, in most cases, is implicit and sometimes in contradiction with what is stated ex professo. To be sure, this criterion of historical judgment entails many pitfalls of dilettantism, and it must be applied with great caution, but that does not negate the fact that the criterion is pregnant with truth.19
一个伟大的人物可能恰好表达他最具创造性的思想，并非从外部分类的角度来看最“逻辑”的语境，而是在另一个看似无关紧要的地方（我相信克罗齐在不同的地方经常提出过这一关键的观察）。一个政治家写关于哲学的文章；这可能是应该在他政治著作中寻找他的“真正”哲学。在每个个性中都有一种占主导地位和主要的活动；必须在这个活动中寻找他的思想，这在大多数情况下是隐含的，有时与他公开声明的内容相矛盾。当然，这种历史判断的标准包含许多业余爱好者的陷阱，必须谨慎地应用它，但这并不否定该标准蕴含着真理。

The criterion of translatability is capable of highlighting real connections that are independent of, and in disagreement with, those apparent from formalistic consideration. Regarding formalistic approaches, Gramsci refers back to Croce’s conception of historiographic categorization and its aversion to genre. But the presupposition, from which Gramsci’s antiformalism springs, is anti-Crocean. Gramsci does not argue in favor of the unity of the spirit, but rather for the unity of theory and practice and therefore the idea that true philosophy can be found in the realm Croce defined as economic. In other words, the “homogeneous circle” Gramsci is speaking about is not the expressive circle of [Croce’s] distincts, since its unity does not reside in the form, but—as shown above—in the matter and hence is always a possible unity (i.e., a unity to be realized). This is what Gramsci writes in a passage from Q7§35, which I already quoted above regarding the “equality or equation between ‘philosophy and politics,5 thought and action”：
翻译标准能够突出那些独立于、且与形式主义考虑相悖的真实联系。关于形式主义方法，葛兰西参考了克罗齐的历史学分类概念及其对体裁的厌恶。但葛兰西的反形式主义的预设，却与克罗齐的思想相悖。葛兰西并非主张精神的统一，而是主张理论与实践的统一，以及真正的哲学存在于克罗齐定义的经济领域之中的理念。换言之，葛兰西所谈的“同质圆圈”并非[克罗齐]不同事物表现的圆圈，其统一性并非在于形式，而是——如上文所述——在于内容，因此始终是一个可能的统一（即一个有待实现的统一）。葛兰西在 Q7§35 的一段话中写到这一点，我之前已经引用过，关于“‘哲学与政治、思想与行动’之间的平等或等式”。

Nor have the “faculty of reason” or the "mind” created unity, and they cannot be regarded as a unitary fact since they are a formal, categorical concept. It is not “thought” but what people really think that unites humans and makes them different.20
“理性能力”或“心灵”并未创造统一，且它们不能被视为一个单一的事实，因为它们是形式的、范畴的概念。真正让人类团结起来并使他们有所区别的不是“思想”，而是人们的真实想法。

Given all this, there is no criteria, fixed or unfixed, from which to locate the centrality of one “element” or ordering principle to compare the other “elements.” Rather, such a principle has to be found and explained continuously, continually motivated, and thus, will be particular and indeed profoundly historical (precisely in the sense that history = matter). That is, it must be deeply tied to the biography of individuals as well as, on a national scale, the unrepeatable way the relationship between culture and society is realized in given contexts. As one can see, Gramsci’s discourse on national cultures一that is, on the culture-activity or the form of civilization that predominates in each culture cannot be separated from the problem represented by the necessity “for the historian of culture and ideas,” to develop some “criteria for inquiry and critique” capable of preventing the “dangers of dilettantism” represented by the tendency to forge keys capable of opening all doors or to reduce history to some formulas which Gramsci stigmatizes (in agreement with [Antonio] Labriola and the “revisionist” Croce) since his time in Turin.21
鉴于所有这些，不存在任何固定的或非固定的标准，用于确定一个“要素”或排序原则的中心地位并与其他“要素”进行比较。相反，这样的原则必须不断地被发现并解释，不断地被激发，因此，它将是特定且深刻地具有历史意义的（正是在历史=物质的意义上）。也就是说，它必须与个人的传记以及在国家层面上特定语境中文化与社会关系实现的不可重复的方式紧密联系。正如人们所看到的，葛兰西关于民族文化的论述——也就是说，关于每个文化中占主导地位的文化活动或文明形式——不能与“文化和思想史学家”必须解决的难题分离，即发展一些“探究和批判标准”，以防止由试图打造万能钥匙或将历史简化为某些公式的倾向所代表的“业余主义的危险”，葛兰西自都灵时期起就一直谴责这种倾向（与[安东尼奥]拉布里奥拉和“修正主义”的克罗齐观点一致）。

What are these canons of inquiry and critique? An answer can be found in Q7§81:
这些探究和批判的规范是什么？答案可以在 Q7§81 中找到

Types of periodicals. Foreign contributors. One cannot do without foreign contributors, but foreign collaboration should also be organic and not anthological, sporadic, or casual. In order for this kind of collaboration to be organic, the foreign contributor must not only be knowledgeable about the cultural currents in their country; they also have to be able to “compare^ them with the cultural currents in the country where the periodical is published, that is, they need to know that country's cultural currents and understand its national “discourse” [linguaggio]. The periodical (or, rather, the editor-in-chief of the periodical), then, must also mold the foreign contributors so that this organic integration can be achieved.... The type of [foreign] contributor being discussed here does not exist “spontaneously^ but must be formed and cultivated. Opposed to this rational way of thinking about collaboration is the superstition of having among one's foreign contributors leading figures, the great theoreticians, etc. One cannot deny the usefulness (especially commercial usefulness) of having marquee names. But form a practical point of view, the advancement of culture is much better served by the type of contributor who is totally in tune with the periodical and who knows how to translate a cultural world into the discourse [linguaggio] of another cultural world; someone who can discover similarities even where none are apparent and can find differences even where everything appears to be similar, etc.22
期刊类型。外国撰稿人。外国撰稿人不可或缺，但其合作应是自然的，而非编年史式的、零星的或偶然的。为了实现这种自然的合作，外国撰稿人不仅需要了解其本国文化潮流，还需要将之与期刊出版国文化潮流进行“比较”，即需要了解该国的文化潮流并理解其国家的“话语”。期刊（或更确切地说，期刊主编）则必须塑造外国撰稿人，以实现这种自然的融合……本文讨论的外国撰稿人类型并非“自然产生”的，而是需要培养和塑造的。与这种理性的合作理念相对立的是，迷信于拥有外国领军人物、著名理论家等。不可否认，拥有知名人物（尤其是商业上的知名度）是有用的。 但从实践角度来看，文化进步更受益于那些与期刊完全契合，并能将一种文化世界翻译成另一种文化世界的语境的人；能够在看似毫无相似之处的地方发现相似性，并在看似完全相同的地方发现差异等的人。22

Gramsci had already expressed this concept clearly in Q1§43:
葛兰西已经在 Q1§43 中清晰地表达了这一概念

Types of periodicals. . . . Patient and systematic “repetition” is the fundamental methodological principle. But not a mechanical, material repetition: the adaptation of each of basic concept to diverse peculiarities, presenting and
期刊类型…… 患者和系统的“重复”是基本的 методологический 原则。但不是机械的、物质的重复：将每个基本概念适应于不同的特性，呈现和

re-presenting it in all its positive aspects and in its traditional negations, always ordering each partial aspect in the totality. Finding the real identity underneath the apparent differentiation and contradiction and finding the substantial diversity underneath the apparent identity is the most essential quality of the critic of ideas and of the historian of social development.23
重新呈现其所有积极方面及其传统的否定方面，始终按其整体性排列每个部分方面。在表面的差异和矛盾下找到真正的同一性，并在表面的同一性下找到实质的多样性，是思想批判者和社会发展史家的最基本品质。

It must be noted that both passages are devoted to “Types of Periodicals.” In fact, for Gramsci, the periodicals are at the same time centers for the irradiation of a unitary “language” [lingua] and of “translation,” both to the extent that they “translate” national cultures (think of the political, but also of the poetic foreign texts published in L'Ordine Nuovo) and to the extent that they “translate” certain themes into the language of a specific public, which they not only intend to reach and educate, but also help come to light.
必须指出，两段文字都致力于“期刊类型”的研究。事实上，对于葛兰西而言，期刊同时是辐射统一的“语言”[lingua]和“翻译”的中心，其意义在于它们“翻译”民族文化（想想《新秩序》中发表的政治和诗歌外文作品），以及在于它们将某些主题“翻译”成特定公众的语言，不仅旨在触及并教育该公众，还在于帮助其显现。

The relationship between scientific and philosophical languages [linguaggi], which the Pragmatist recognized, is nothing but a particular manifestation of the problem of a national linguistic unity. This problem can be dealt with correctly only if actively formulated in terms of linguistic “unification.” Yet, given the equivalence of language [lingua] and ideology, this relationship is correctly posited only if it is thought of as an active process of ideological unification (recall the passage cited above: “It is not ‘thought’ but what people really think that unites humans and makes them different.”)Even in the notes written in the early prison years one can see that the generating center of Gramsci’s thoughts was the unity of theory and practice conceived as an historical self-creation. In fact, if we examine Q4§33 (“The Passage from Knowing to Understanding to Feeling and Vice Versa”)we have Gramsci’s formulation of the problem concerning the unification of the intellectuals and the people, that is, as a unification of “knowing” and "feeling” (i.e., of “reason” and "sentiment”). He returns to this theme many times in the Notebooks, wherein he discusses the relationship between the “solid” convictions needed for action and the theoretical “understanding” of the problems tied to action itself.24
科学语言和哲学语言[linguaggi]之间的关系，实用主义者所认识到的，不过是一个民族语言统一问题的特殊表现形式。只有将这个问题积极地表述为语言“统一”的问题，才能得到正确处理。然而，鉴于语言[lingua]与意识形态的等同性，这种关系只有被视为意识形态统一的积极过程，才能被正确地理解（回想一下上面引用的段落：“不是‘思想’，而是人们真正思考的东西将人类团结起来，并使他们有所不同。”）。即使在早期狱中所写的笔记中，也能看出葛兰西思想的产生中心是将理论与实践统一起来，视为历史的自我创造。事实上，如果我们考察 Q4§33（“从认识到理解再到感觉，以及反之亦然”），我们就能看到葛兰西对知识分子和人民统一问题的表述，即作为“认识”和“感觉”（即“理性”和“情感”）的统一。 他在《笔记》中多次回到这个主题，讨论了行动所需的“坚定”信念与行动本身所牵涉问题的理论“理解”之间的关系。24

From Reduction to Translation
从简化到翻译

We can now return to the theme concerning the relationship between philosophy and politics in the light of the translatability of national cultures. To pursue this goal, it will be useful to start from Q3§48, in which the relationship between “spontaneity” and “conscious direction” is paralleled with that between “philosophy” and “common sense”:
现在我们可以回到哲学与政治关系这一主题，结合民族文化的可翻译性来探讨。为了实现这一目标，从 Q3§48 开始会有所帮助，其中“自发性”与“有意识的引导”之间的关系与“哲学”与“常识”之间的关系相类比。

In this regard, a fundamental theoretical question arises: can modern theory be in opposition to the “spontaneous” sentiments of the masses? ("Spontaneous” in the sense that they are not due to the systematic educational activity of an already conscious leadership but have been formed through everyday experience in the light of “common sense,” that is, the traditional popular conception of the world: what is very tritely called “instinct,” which is itself a rudimentary and basic historical acquisition). It cannot be in opposition: there is, between the two, a “quantitative” difference——of degree not quality; it should be possible to have a reciprocal “reduction,” so to speak, a passage from one to the other and vice versa. (Remember that I. Kant considered it important to his philosophical theories to be in agreement with common sense; the same is true of Croce. Remember Marx’s assertion in The Holy Family that the political formulas of the French Revolution are reducible to the principles of classical German philosophy.)25
在这方面，一个根本性的理论问题出现了：现代理论能否与民众的“自发”情感相悖？(“自发”是指它们并非源于已经觉悟的领导阶层的系统教育活动，而是通过日常生活经验，在“常识”——即对世界的传统大众观念——的照耀下形成的：这被非常简单地称为“本能”，它本身就是一种原始而基本的歷史获得物）。它不可能相悖：两者之间存在“数量”上的差异——程度上的差异而非性质上的差异；应该有可能实现一种相互的“还原”，可以说，从一种到另一种的过渡，反之亦然。（记住，康德认为他的哲学理论与常识相符很重要；克罗齐也是如此。记住马克思在《神圣家族》中论述过，法国大革命的政治公式可以还原为古典德国哲学的原则。）

Gramsci’s reference to the equation, which was formulated in Marx’s The Holy Family, between German speculative philosophy and French political intuitive thought (“If Herr Edgar [i.e., Bruno Bauer] compares French equality with German ‘self-consciousness’ for an instant, he will see that the latter principle expresses in German, i.e., in abstract thought, what the former says in French, that is, in the language [lingua] of politics and of thoughtful observation.”)26 This reference recurs many times in the Notebooks and is one of his favorite references when he deals with the theme of translatability. It condenses the entire complex problematic in which Gramsci frames this problem, even though it does so with an evocative formula. The comparison between French culture and German culture is, in fact, in a certain way, paradigmatic because of their respective relationship to philosophy and to politics, to theory and to practice. There was already a lively comparison between the French and the Germans before Marx and Engels (and later Gramsci will take note of it on the grounds of Croce’s essay “La Preistoria di un Paragone” [The prehistory of a comparison], which he summarized in Q8§208).27 Both in the Lectures on the History of Philosophy and on the Lectures on the Philosophy of History, Hegel affirmed that insofar as the German people and the French people are opposed, they are the ones that fully express the present form of the spirit of the world each according to its own peculiar way. On the one hand, the Germans express the present form of the spirit of the world in a philosophy that “contains the revolution in the form of thought”； on the other, the French expressed it by conducting the revolution in political practice and translating the “concept” into “effectual reality.”28
葛兰西引用了马克思《神圣家族》中关于德国民粹哲学与法国政治直觉思维之间等式的论述（“如果埃德加先生[即布鲁诺·鲍威尔]片刻将法国平等与德国的‘自我意识’进行比较，他就会发现，后者以德语，即抽象思想的形式表达了前者在法语，即政治和思想观察语言中所表达的内容。”）26  这一引用在《狱中札记》中反复出现，是他处理“可译性”主题时最喜爱的引用之一。尽管它用一种引人入胜的公式表达，但它浓缩了葛兰西在此问题上所构建的整个复杂问题。事实上，法国文化与德国文化之间的比较，由于它们各自与哲学、政治、理论和实践的关系，在某种程度上具有范例意义。 马克思和恩格斯之前，法德两国就已经存在着热烈的比较（后来葛兰西会在克罗齐的论文“一个比较的史前史”[《一个比较的史前史》]的基础上加以注意，他将其总结在 Q8§208 中）。27 既在《哲学史讲义》中，也在《历史哲学讲义》中，黑格尔都断言，就德国人和法国人而言，他们各自以其独特的方式，充分地表达了世界精神的当下形态。一方面，德国人以一种“包含着思想形式的革命”的哲学表达了世界精神的当下形态；另一方面，法国人则通过政治实践的革命，将“概念”转化为“现实效力”。28

Evidently, Marx and Hegel are not saying the same thing. An enormous problem is raised by the differences between Marx and Hegel’s position (i.e., that concerning the relationship between the philosophy of praxis and speculative philosophy). This problem is already formulated in some way in Q3§48, where Gramsci recalls Kant and Croce’s aspiration to reach an agreement between their own philosophies and common sense, adding the passage from The Holy Family mentioned above. Both the case of Kant and Croce and the case of Marx concern the unity between philosophy and common sense, but they formulate this unity in opposite ways. By comparing France and Germany, Marx stresses the primacy of political praxis over self-consciousness, whereas for Kant, Croce and Hegel the comparison between France and Germany or between common intellect and philosophy29 explicates the fact that a unity between these two moments is always already there, because it corresponds to a principle—namely, to the form of human reason and spirit.
显然，马克思和黑格尔并非表达相同的意思。马克思与黑格尔立场（即实践哲学与思辨哲学之间的关系）的差异引发了一个巨大的问题。这个问题在 Q3§48 中有所体现，其中葛兰西回忆了康德和克罗齐力图调和自身哲学与常识的愿望，并补充了上述《神圣家族》中的段落。康德、克罗齐和马克思的情况都涉及哲学与常识的统一，但他们对这种统一的表述方式却截然相反。通过比较法国和德国，马克思强调政治实践优先于自我意识，而对于康德、克罗齐和黑格尔而言，法国和德国或普通理智与哲学之间的比较揭示了这两个层面的统一始终存在，因为它对应于一个原则——即人类理性与精神的形式。

The reference to the comparison between the French and the Germans is therefore ambivalent because it refers to the idea of speculation, insofar as this comparison can mean both a reduction of speculation to abstraction (primacy of politics) and, on the opposite hand, the discovery within abstraction of a form (or supreme form) of praxis (the primacy of philosophy conceived as Thätigkeit—i.e., as creativity). While Gramsci never takes the second path, his route often crosses the first one, even though he detaches himself from it thanks to his balanced position contained in the notion of translatability, in which (if this notion is thought profoundly) neither of the two moments can prevail over the other or can be assumed to be the original one.
因此，法国与德国的比较具有双重含义，因为它涉及投机的概念。这种比较既可以指将投机简化为抽象（政治的优先性），也可以指在抽象中发现某种形式（或至高形式）的实践（哲学作为 Thätigkeit——即作为创造力的优先性）。虽然葛兰西从未走上第二条道路，但他经常与第一条道路相交，即便他通过“可翻译性”这一概念所保持的平衡立场摆脱了它。如果深入思考这一概念，那么两方面中的任何一方都不能凌驾于另一方之上，也不能被认为是最初的。

The heaviest traces of Gramsci’s tendency toward “politicization” can be found in Notebook 1, which is not by accident, at the same time, the laboratory in which the concept of translatability comes to light.30 It is enough to refer to Q1§44 (transcribed in Q19§24), in which for the first time the reference to French politics and German classical philosophy appears. Yet the group of texts, Q1§150 and 151 (transcribed together in the same note, Q10II§61, but in reverse order) and Q1§152 (transcribed in Q10II§60), is even more interesting. These texts must be read together with the subsequent one, Q1§153 (transcribed in Q16§21), entitled “Conversation and Culture." In this note Gramsci returns to the theme concerning the diffusion of a homogeneous way of thinking, articulating it from the viewpoint of the “research of a pedagogical principle." He concludes this note with some considerations on translation from Latin and Greek into Italian conceived as an exercise which is mechanical only at the beginning, but that soon becomes a “comparison" and a “translation" of one culture into another (this confirms the connection between the theme I am dealing with now and that concerning the “diffusion" of culture).31
葛兰西“政治化”倾向的最显著痕迹可见于笔记 1，这并非偶然，同时也是“可译性”概念显露的实验室。30 只需参考 Q1§44（转录于 Q19§24），其中首次出现了对法国政治和德国古典哲学的提及。然而，文本组 Q1§150 和 151（在同一笔记中合录，Q10II§61，但顺序相反）以及 Q1§152（转录于 Q10II§60）则更引人注目。这些文本必须与后续文本 Q1§153（转录于 Q16§21），题为“对话与文化”一起阅读。在这篇笔记中，葛兰西重返关于传播同质思维方式的主题，并从“教育原则研究”的角度阐述。他以一些关于从拉丁语和希腊语翻译成意大利语的考虑作为本文的结尾，他认为这最初只是机械性的练习，但很快就会变成一种“比较”和一种“文化间的翻译”（这证实了我目前研究主题与“文化传播”主题之间的联系）。31

Let’s now go back to Q1§150-152. In these notes what occurs is a sort of backwards movement. Gramsci starts by considering, on the one hand, the relationship between the bourgeoisie and proletariat and, on the other, the intellectuals, strongly devaluating the latter. The intellectuals “create” the concept of a modern state conceived as an “absolute” since in this way they make their own historical position absolute and at the same time they react against the French Revolution (“reaction national-transcendence,” etc.). In this way, Gramsci explains philosophical idealism as a theoretical absorption of revolutionary innovations and as the thought that fertilizes post-Napoleonic Europe. Thus the currents “that seem most autochthonous, in that they appear to develop a traditional Italian current”32 are indeed the ones that are “Jacobin” in the worst sense in Italy of the Risorgimento. The national tradition they develop is made by nothing other than “culture” (that of the Italian intellectuals’ cosmopolitism) which is not able to truly unite the people-nation.
现在回到 Q1§150-152。这些笔记中出现了一种倒退的运动。葛兰西首先考察资产阶级与无产阶级之间的关系，以及知识分子，并强烈贬低了后者。知识分子“创造”了现代国家的概念，将其视为“绝对的”，因为这样他们就能使自己的历史地位绝对化，同时对抗法国大革命（“民族超越反应”等等）。通过这种方式，葛兰西将哲学理想主义解释为对革命创新的理论吸收，以及孕育拿破仑后欧洲的思想。因此，“看似最本土化，因为它们似乎发展了传统的意大利潮流”32 的那些思潮，实际上在意大利复兴时期具有最糟糕的“雅各宾”性质。他们发展起来的民族传统，只不过是“文化”（意大利知识分子世界主义的文化）而已，它无法真正团结人民-民族。

Note the conceptual couple formed both by the intellectuals making their position absolute and by the reaction to the revolution. The first element in this couple is the hegemonic one. The second has almost no autonomy. That is why Gramsci’s conclusion is harsh, even though formulated in the form of a doubt:
注意知识分子将自身立场绝对化以及对革命的反应所构成的概念对偶。这一对偶中的第一个要素是霸权性的。第二个要素几乎没有自主性。这就是为什么葛兰西的结论如此严厉，尽管它以疑问的形式表述。

The question is very complicated and full of contradictions; therefore, it is necessary to study it more thoroughly on a historical basis. In any case, Southern intellectuals during the Risorgimento appear clearly as the scholars of the "pure” state, of the state in itself. And whenever intellectuals seem to “lead,” the concept of the state in itself reappears with all the “reactionary” retinue that usually accompanies it.33
这个问题非常复杂，充满矛盾；因此，有必要从历史角度对其进行更深入的研究。无论如何，在意大利统一运动时期，南方知识分子清晰地展现为“纯粹”国家的学者，即国家本身的学者。而且，每当知识分子似乎“领导”时，“国家本身”的概念便再次出现，伴随其通常的“反动”随从。

In the next note, Q1§151, mentioned above, Gramsci deepens the theme concerning the relationship between France and the other countries of Europe.
下一笔记，上述的 Q1§151，葛兰西深化了关于法国与欧洲其他国家关系的主题。

Another important question . . . is that of the function that intellectuals believed they had in this smoldering political ferment of the Restoration. Classical German philosophy is philosophy of this period and it enlivens the national liberal movements from 1848 to 1870. Consider, in this respect, how Marx reduces the French maxim “liberté, fraternité, égalité” to German philosophical concepts (The Holy Family). This reduction, it seems to me, is extremely important theoretically; it should be placed next to what I have written on the Conception of the state from the point of view of the productivity (function) of the social classes.34 What is “politics” for the productive class becomes “rationality” for the intellectual class. What is strange is that some Marxists believe “rationality” to be superior to “politics,” ideological abstraction superior to economic concreteness. Modern philosophical idealism should be explained on the basis of these historical relations.35
另一个重要问题……是知识分子在复辟时期这种暗流涌动的政治动荡中所认为的自身功能。古典德国哲学是这一时期的哲学，它激发了 1848 年至 1870 年的民族自由运动。在这方面，考虑一下马克思如何将法国格言“自由、博爱、平等”简化为德国哲学概念（《神圣家族》）。在我看来，这种简化在理论上极其重要；它应该与我关于从社会阶层生产力（功能）角度看国家概念的论述并列。34 对生产阶级而言的“政治”，对知识分子阶级而言则成为“理性”。奇怪的是，一些马克思主义者认为“理性”优于“政治”，意识形态的抽象优于经济的具体性。现代哲学唯心主义应该根据这些历史关系来解释。35

The entire last paragraph is omitted when Gramsci writes the C-text (yet the variants of these texts are generally of fundamental importance). The reason for this omission is that, in this way, Gramsci eliminates the ambivalence present in this passage and in the previous one mentioned above by affirming only one of the two components: the political one. In this way, Gramsci allows a reading of the equation of The Holy Family in terms of a “reduction” of the abstraction to politics conceived as the unveiling of ideology, so that philosophical idealism as a whole is deprived of any reality; politically, philosophical idealism becomes synonymous with reaction and, theoretically, it becomes nothing other than politics deprived of substance.
当葛兰西撰写 C 文本时，最后一段完全被省略（尽管这些文本的变体通常至关重要）。之所以省略，是因为通过这种方式，葛兰西消除了这段文字以及前面提到的文字中的歧义，只肯定了其中的一个组成部分：政治部分。通过这种方式，葛兰西允许以“还原”的方式解读《神圣家族》的等式，将抽象还原为政治，即揭示意识形态，从而剥夺了哲学唯心主义的任何现实性；在政治上，哲学唯心主义成为反动的同义词，在理论上，它只不过是没有实质的政治。

In Q1§152, Gramsci explicates this last aspect by providing Marx’s (actually Engels’s) image about Hegel as the one who “has men walking on their heads.”36 Hence, Gramsci is concerned with the idea that if translation is regarded from the correct point of view (that of Marx), it is a reduction, whereas, if it is regarded from the mistaken point of view (that of idealism), it is an overturning [capovolgimento一literally a head-turn]. That is, the relationship between philosophy and politics is analogous to the one between ephemeral illusion and solid reality. Yet this way of positing the problem is at odds with Gramsci’s fundamental theoretical intention at the base of his Notebooks—namely, that of fighting against theoretical and political economism and sectarianism. In fact, in the second draft of these sections, Gramsci radically downsizes his previous statements, rereading them in the light of the concept of translatability.
在 Q1§152 中，葛兰西通过马克思（实际上是恩格斯）将黑格尔比作“让人们倒立行走”的形象来阐述这一点。36 因此，葛兰西关注的是，如果从正确的视角（马克思的视角）来看待翻译，它是一种简化；而如果从错误的视角（唯心主义的视角）来看待，它是一种颠覆[capovolgimento——字面意义上的头转向]。也就是说，哲学与政治之间的关系类似于短暂的幻觉与坚实的现实之间的关系。然而，这种对问题的表述方式与葛兰西在《狱中札记》的基础理论意图相悖——即反对理论和政治经济学以及宗派主义。事实上，在这些章节的第二稿中，葛兰西极大地缩减了他之前的陈述，用可译性的概念重新解读了它们。

Yet it is impossible not to see that the idea of translatability—that is, the problem regarding the unity between theory and practice—is already present in the notes mentioned above, which Gramsci writes in his earlier prison years, thanks to the structural ambiguity contained in the way he thinks of translation. That is, sometimes he thinks of translation as the correspondence between theories and sometimes as their overthrowing [capovolgimento]. In other words: the affirmation that the relationship between France and Germany is a relationship between politics and rationality corresponds to a negative statement about “rationality” only if the fact that rationality is an overturning [capovolgimento] of politics is equivalent to assigning to this overturning [capovolgimento] a merely privative reality (as nonconcreteness, nonhistoricity, etc.). And vice versa, the affirmation that the relationship between France and Germany is a relationship between politics and rationality turns into a very different statement when the overturning [capovolgimento] is seen as a form of translation, that is, as a way to realize that the same politics that was being carried out in Germany and in France (in different ways and with specifically different ends, especially from the perspective of their class differences). To put it in Gramsci’s own terms, this form of translation can then be seen as a form of “hegemony,” even though its sign [as in the mathematical plus and minus signs] is inverted [rovesciato], the same as the Jacobins’ “permanent revolution” is inverted into the “passive revolution” of the Moderates.
然而，不可能不注意到，可译性——即理论与实践统一的问题——在以上提到的葛兰西早期狱中札记中已经存在，这得益于他思考翻译方式中内含的结构性歧义。也就是说，有时他将翻译视为理论间的对应，有时则视为其颠覆。换言之：法国与德国之间的关系是政治与理性的关系这一断言，仅当理性是政治的颠覆，且这种颠覆仅具有剥夺性现实（如非具体性、非历史性等）时，才对应着关于“理性”的否定陈述。 反之亦然，法国与德国关系是政治与理性的关系这一断言，当颠覆[capovolgimento]被视为一种翻译形式，即作为一种实现德国和法国（以不同方式，且具有截然不同的目标，尤其从阶级差异的角度来看）所进行的相同政治的途径时，便会变成一个截然不同的陈述。用葛兰西自己的话来说，这种翻译形式便可以被视为一种“霸权”，尽管其标志[如同数学的正负号]被颠倒[rovesciato]，正如雅各宾派的“永久革命”被颠倒为温和派的“被动革命”一样。

Gramsci’s concept of “passive revolution” (which he announces, not by mere coincidence, in Q1§150 and 151 by referring to the “formation of modern states in Europe as ‘reaction—national transcendence5 of the French Revolution and Bonapartism [passive revolution],”37 points out the start of his reevaluation of the overturning [capovolgimento] in terms of translation (i.e., his own understanding of the positive and not privative political nature of abstraction). Once this new viewpoint is achieved, the concepts Gramsci already elaborated in Notebook 1 can be reread (i.e., explicated or “translated”)in a different way. Thus, in Q8§208, which is entitled “[Reciprocal] Translatability of National Cultures,” Gramsci will even be able to trace Marx’s version of the comparison between French politics and German classical philosophy back to Hegel’s and to find the “source” of the fundamental philosophical idea of Marx’s Theses on Feuerbach in Hegel’s comparison, namely, the unity of theory and practice:
葛兰西的“被动革命”概念（他并非偶然地在 Q1§150 和 151 中提及，将欧洲现代国家形成描述为对法国大革命和波拿巴主义的“反动——民族超越”（被动革命）），标志着他对“颠覆”（capovolgimento）的重新评估（即，他对抽象的积极而非消极的政治本质的理解）。一旦获得这一新的视角，葛兰西在笔记本 1 中已阐述的概念就可以以不同的方式重新解读（即，阐释或“翻译”）。因此，在 Q8§208，题为“[相互]可译的民族文化”，葛兰西甚至能够追溯马克思对法国政治与德国古典哲学的比较，追溯到黑格尔，并找到马克思《关于费尔巴哈的提纲》中基本哲学思想的“源头”——即理论与实践的统一。

This passage from Hegel is, I believe, the same one that Marx specifically refers to in the Holy Family when he cites Proudhon against Bauer. But the passage from Hegel, it seems to me, is much more important as the “source” of the view, expressed in the Theses on Feuerbach, that the philosophers have explained the world and the point now is to change it; in other words, that philosophy must become “politics” or “practice” in order for it to continue to be philosophy. The “source,” then, of the theory of the unity of theory and practice.38
我认为这段黑格尔文字，与马克思在《神圣家族》中引用蒲鲁东反驳鲍威尔时所指的正是同一段。但我认为，这段黑格尔文字，作为一种观点的“来源”而言，更为重要，即《关于费尔巴哈的提纲》中所表达的观点：哲学家们解释了世界，现在的问题是如何改变它；换言之，哲学为了继续作为哲学，必须转化为“政治”或“实践”。因此，“理论与实践的统一”的理论，其“来源”就在这里。

Gramsci obviously puts the term “source” in quotation marks. This makes it far more significant that he used the term. He doesn’t intend to claim that Hegel enunciated the theory of the unity of theory and practice, but rather that indeed his answer—the overcoming of the French Revolution—is contained in the comparison French-Germany, namely, that by placing himself on the terrain of “passive revolution,” he produced some knowledge effects critically appropriable by historical materialism. “The reality of human relationships of knowledge” consists of the double productivity (both theoretical and practical) of philosophy, which is synthesized by the notion of hegemony.39
葛兰西显然用引号标注了“来源”这个词。这使得他使用该词显得更加重要。他并非意在宣称黑格尔阐述了理论与实践的统一论，而是说，他的答案——对法国大革命的克服——包含在法德比较之中，即，通过置身于“被动革命”的领域，他产生了一些知识效应，历史唯物主义可以批判性地借鉴。“人类知识关系的现实性”包含了哲学的双重生产力（理论和实践），这由“霸权”的概念综合而成。

Notes 笔记

1. Antonio Gramsci, Further Selections from the Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Derek Boothman (London: Lawrence & Wishart, 1995), 318-19, hereafter cited as FSPN. Q10II§60. [There is a list of abbreviations on page ix-x. To facilitate locating passages in various translations and anthologies, we use the standard method of providing the notebook (Quaderno) number一in this case 10, part II一followed by the section number, §. See the introduction, page 12, for discussion. We will indicate the English translation, when used.]
1. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》节选，德雷克·布斯曼编著，译文（伦敦：劳伦斯与威沙特出版社，1995），318-19 页，以下简称《狱记》。Q10II§60。[页 ix-x 有缩写列表。为方便在各种译本和文集中查找引文，我们采用标准方法，提供笔记本（Quaderno）编号——在本例中为 10，第二部分——后跟章节编号，§。请参阅第 12 页的导论以了解讨论内容。我们将标注使用的英文译文。]

2. Q7§35, Antonio Gramsci, Prison Notebooks, vol. 3, ed. and trans. Joseph Buttigieg (New York: Columbia University Press, 2007), 187, hereafter cited as PN3. Not long ago, Domenico Jervolino talked about “a very strong link between praxis and translation” in Gramsci [see introduction, page 9]. On this subject see,
2. Q7§35，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》第三卷，约瑟夫·巴蒂吉耶编辑并翻译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，2007），187 页，以下简称 PN3。不久前，多梅尼科·杰尔沃利诺谈到了葛兰西的“实践与翻译之间存在着非常紧密的联系”[见导言，第 9 页]。关于此话题，请参阅

however, above all, the essay by Maurizio Lichtner, “Traduzioni e metafore in Gramsci” [see chapter 10, this volume]. Moreover, the relationship between hegemony and translatability is stressed by André Tosel, Filosofia Marxista e Traducibilità dei Linguaggi e delle Pratiche [Marxist Philosophy and the Translatability of Languages and Practices], in Filosofia e Politica: Scritti dedicati a Cesare Luporini (Florence: La Nuova Italia, 1981), 235项5 [see also chapter 16].
然而，最重要的是，Maurizio Lichtner 的论文“Gramsci 的翻译和隐喻”（见本书第 10 章）。此外，André Tosel 在《马克思主义哲学与语言和实践的翻译性》（收录于《哲学与政治：献给 Cesare Luporini 的论文集》（佛罗伦萨：La Nuova Italia，1981），第 235 页）中强调了霸权与翻译性的关系（另见第 16 章）。

3. Q10II§6iv, FSPN, 306. 3. Q10II§6iv，FSPN，306。

4. Q10II§6i, Antonio Gramsci, Selections from the Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Quintin Hoare and Geoffrey Nowell Smith (New York: International Publishers, 1971), 366-67, hereafter cited as SPN. Translation altered slightly, see QC, 1244. Emphasis added.
4. Q10II§6i，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》节选，昆廷·霍尔和杰弗里·诺韦尔·史密斯译，纽约：国际出版公司，1971 年，第 366-367 页，以下简称《狱中札记》。翻译略有改动，见 QC，1244。重点标注。

5. Q10II§6i, SPN, 367. 5. Q10II§6i，SPN，367。

6. Q10II§6i, SPN, 367. Translation altered slightly, QC, 1244.
6. Q10II§6i，SPN，367。翻译略有改动，QC，1244。

7. I would speak about catharsis as “prediction” in the critical sense, which is specifically Gramsci’s, that Nicola Badaloni assigned to this term (in his Antonio Gramsci: La filosofia della prassi come previsione [Antonio Gramsci: The Philosophy of Praxis as Prediction], in Storia del marxismo, ed. E. Hobsbawm, vol. III, 2 [Turin: Einaudi, 1981]) rather than of catharsis as “mediation” as André Tosel did (in A. Tosel, Philosophie de la praxis et dialectique [Philosophy of Praxis and Dialectic], in La pensée, no. 237 (1984): 105). For the same reason, I believe that Tosel’s critique of the notion of catharsis cannot be accepted (see Tosel, 1981, 242ff). Moreover, Tosel himself implicitly revised his critique in Marx en Italiques (Mauvezin: Trans Europe Repress, 1991), 147-49.
7. 我将“净化”理解为“预测”，特别是指尼科拉·巴达洛尼（Nicola Badaloni）在其著作《安东尼奥·葛兰西：实践哲学作为预测》（Antonio Gramsci: La filosofia della prassi come previsione，载于霍布斯鲍姆主编《马克思主义史》第三卷第二期，都灵：埃纳迪出版社，1981）中赋予该术语的葛兰西式的批判性意义，而非安德烈·托塞尔（André Tosel）在《实践哲学与辩证法》（Philosophie de la praxis et dialectique，载于《思想》杂志，第 237 期，1984 年：105 页）中所理解的“调解”。出于同样的原因，我认为托塞尔对“净化”概念的批判不可接受（见托塞尔，1981，第 242 页及以下）。此外，托塞尔本人在《马克思的斜体字》（Marx en Italiques，毛维赞：欧洲跨境出版社，1991），第 147-149 页中，也间接地修正了他的批判。

8. Q7§20, PN3, 171. 8. Q7§20，PN3，171。

9. Q7§20, PN3, 171. 9. Q7§20，PN3，171。

10. See Leonardo Paggi, “Da Lenin a Marx” [From Lenin to Marx], in Le Strategie del Potere in Gramsci. Tra fascismo e socialismo in un solo paese 1923-1926 [The Strategies of Power between Fascism and Socialism in only One Country 1923-1929] (Rome: Editori Riuniti, 1984), 461-66, on the relationship between historical materialism and political science in the Prison Notebooks. It should be recalled that in the well-known letter to W. Borgius of January 25, 1894, Engels mentioned the problem of the appearance of the “so called great men” in history, in order to deprive the causality/necessity nexus of its significance and to reduce the former to an appearance of the latter (Karl Marx and Frederick Engels: Collected Works, vol. 50 [London: Lawrence & Wishart, 2004], 264-67), and hence in a direction which is different from Gramsci’s. Gramsci recalls the letter to Borgius in Q4§38, (QC, 462; PN2, 184) a propos of the notion of “ultimate analysis” and therefore in an anti-economistic sense.
10. 见莱昂纳多·帕吉 (Leonardo Paggi)， “从列宁到马克思” ，载于《葛兰西的权力策略：法西斯主义与一个国家的社会主义（1923-1929）》（罗马：联合出版社，1984），第 461-66 页，关于《狱中札记》中历史唯物主义与政治学的关系。应回忆，在 1894 年 1 月 25 日写给 W. 博格斯 (Borgius) 的著名信件中，恩格斯提到了历史中“所谓的伟大人物”出现的问题，以便剥夺因果/必然联系的意义，并将前者简化为后者的表象（《马克思恩格斯全集》第 50 卷 [伦敦：劳伦斯与威沙特，2004]，第 264-267 页），因此其方向与葛兰西的不同。葛兰西在 Q4§38 中回忆了这封信（QC，462；PN2，184），关于“最终分析”的概念，因此具有反经济主义的意义。

11. Q8§217, 1079. 11. Q8§217，1079。

12. [Frosini takes his quotation from Gramsci’s translation of Thesis 1 (see QC, 2355). See Karl Marx and Frederick Engels, The German Ideology, ed. C. J. Arthur (New York: International Publishers, 1970), 121.]
12. [弗罗西尼引用了葛兰西对论题 1 的翻译（见 QC，2355）。参见《德意志意识形态》，卡尔·马克思和弗里德里希·恩格斯著，C. J. 阿瑟编，纽约：国际出版公司，1970 年，第 121 页。]

13. Q10II§6, FSPN, 306. 13. Q10II§6，FSPN，306。

14. Q7§35, PN3, 187. 14. Q7§35，PN3，187。

15. Q11§47, FSPN, 307. 15. Q11§47，FSPN，307。

16. Derek Boothman, Traducibilità [Translatability]. Paper delivered at the seminar on the lexicon of the Prison Notebooks of the IGS [International Gramsci Society] Italia, Rome, February 23, 2003, in www.gramscitalia/html/seminario.htm. [See also chapter 7 in this volume and Derek Boothman, Traducibilità e Processi Traduttivi (Perugia: Guerra Edizioni, 2004), 61-65.]
16. 德雷克·布斯曼，翻译可能性[Translatability]。2003 年 2 月 23 日在意大利国际葛兰西学会（IGS）罗马监狱札记词汇研讨会上发表的论文，见 www.gramscitalia/html/seminario.htm。[另见本书第 7 章和德雷克·布斯曼，《翻译可能性与翻译过程》（佩鲁贾：格拉编辑社，2004），第 61-65 页]

17. Q11§47, FSPN, 307. [Frosini added “of philosophical and scientific languages.”]
17. Q11§47，FSPN，307。[弗罗西尼补充了“哲学和科学语言的”。]

18. Q4§46, PN2, 196. He dealt with Vailati in Q4§42.
18. Q4§46，PN2，196。他在 Q4§42 讨论了维拉蒂。

19. Q4§46, PN2, 196. 19. Q4§46，PN2，196。

20. Q7§35, PN3, 186. 20. Q7§35，PN3，186。

21. See Q4§38, 463, on Engels’s critiques to economism within historical materialism. For these aspects in the young Gramsci, see Leonardo Paggi, Antonio Gramsci e il Moderno Principe [Antonio Gramsci and the Modern Prince]; I. Nella crisi del Socialismo Italiano [I. In the Crisis of Italian Socialism] (Rome: Editori Riuniti, 1970), chapter 1.
21. 参阅 Q4§38、463，了解恩格斯对历史唯物主义中经济主义的批判。关于青年葛兰西的这些方面，请参阅莱昂纳多·帕吉的《安东尼奥·葛兰西与现代王子》（Antonio Gramsci e il Moderno Principe），第一部分《意大利社会主义的危机》（Nella crisi del Socialismo Italiano），（罗马：联合出版社，1970），第一章。

22. Q7§35, PN3, 211-12. 22. Q7§35，PN3，211-12。

23. Q1§43, PN1, 128-29. 23. Q1§43，PN1，128-29。

24. See Q1§29, QC, 23ff., “Sarcasm as an Expression of Transition among Historicsts”; Q4§40, QC, 465, “Philosophy and ideology”; Q4§45, QC, 471ff., “Structure and Superstructure”; Q4§61, QC, 507, “Philosophy-ideology, science-doctrine” (the last paragraph of this note is very important); Q7§37, QC, 887, “Goethe”; Q8§175, QC, 1047, “Gentile”; Q11§62, QC, 1488ff., “The Historicity of the philosophy of praxis."
24. 见 Q1§29，QC，23 页以下，“历史主义者之间的过渡表达——讽刺”；Q4§40，QC，465 页，“哲学与意识形态”；Q4§45，QC，471 页以下，“结构与上层建筑”；Q4§61，QC，507 页，“哲学—意识形态，科学—教条”（本节最后一段非常重要）；Q7§37，QC，887 页，“歌德”；Q8§175，QC，1047 页，“詹蒂勒”；Q11§62，QC，1488 页以下，“实践哲学的历史性”。

25. Q3§48, 330-31, PN2, 51.
25. Q3§48，330-31，PN2，51。

26. Karl Marx and Fredrick Engels, Collected Works, vol. 4 (New York: International Publishers, 1975), 39. [As quoted in PN1, 434n.38, with original italics re-added.]
26. 马克思恩格斯全集，第 4 卷（纽约：国际出版公司，1975），第 39 页。[引自 PN1，第 434 页注 38，原文斜体字已恢复]

27. See Benedetto Croce, “La Preistoria di un Paragone,” published in Critica (1906) and quoted by Gramsci in the reprint in Conversazioni Critiche: Serie seconda (Bari: Laterza, 1918) (1950, fourth edition), 292-94. For a detailed indication of the sources provided by Croce, see Antonio Gramsci, Filosofia e Politica. Antologia dei “Quaderni del carcere", ed. Fabio Consiglio and Fabio Frosini (Florence: La Nuova Italia, 1997), 62-65 and footnote.
27. 见 Benedetto Croce，“一个比喻的史前史”，发表于《批评》（1906），引自葛兰西在《批判对话录：第二辑》（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1918 年）（1950 年第四版）中的重印本，第 292-94 页。欲了解克罗齐所提供来源的详细说明，请参阅安东尼奥·葛兰西，《哲学与政治》。“狱中札记”选集，法比奥·康西略和法比奥·弗罗西尼编（佛罗伦萨：新意大利出版社，1997），第 62-65 页及脚注。

28. See G. W. F. Hegel, Lectures on the Philosophy of Histor^y, vol. 3, trans. E. S. Haldane and Frances Simson (London: Routledge and Kegan Paul, 1968), 359-60, and G. W. F. Hegel, Lectures on the History of Philosophy, trans. R. F. Brown and J. M. Stewart (Berkeley: University of California Press, 1990).
见 G. W. F. 黑格尔，《历史哲学讲义》，第 3 卷，E. S. 霍尔丹和弗朗西斯·西姆森译（伦敦：Routledge and Kegan Paul，1968），第 359-360 页；以及 G. W. F. 黑格尔，《哲学史讲义》，R. F. 布朗和 J. M. 斯图尔特译（伯克利：加州大学出版社，1990）。

29. Since France represents intuitive thought, which produces practical overturning, it can be almost perfectly overlapped onto the Gemeinverstand conceived as practical intellect. An analogous consideration can be made regarding the couplet Germany-philosophy. Thus, what counts is not the diverse origin of the two couplets of concepts, but rather that Gramsci makes them converge.
29. 由于法国代表直觉思维，它产生实际的颠覆，因此几乎可以完全与被视为实践智力的 Gemeinverstand 重合。关于德国-哲学这一对概念，也可以做类似的考虑。因此，关键不在于这两个概念对偶的不同起源，而在于葛兰西使它们趋同。

30. On this initial tendency in Gramsci, see G. Cospito, “Struttura e sovrastruttura nei ‘Quaderni5 di Gramsci” [Structure and Superstructure in Gramsci’s "Notebooks”], in Critica Marxista 3项 (2000): 98-107.
30. 关于葛兰西的这一最初倾向，参见 G. Cospito，“葛兰西《狱中札记》中的“结构与上层建筑””，载《马克思主义批判》第 3 期（2000）：98-107 页。

31. Q1§154, which Gramsci transcribes in Q10II§60 together with Q1§152. Both are entitled Marx and Hegel.
31. 格拉姆斯基在 Q10II§60 中将 Q1§154 与 Q1§152 一起转录，这两者都题为“马克思和黑格尔”。

32. Q1§150, 133. 32. Q1§150，133。

33. Q1§150, 133, PN1, 230.
33. Q1§150，133，PN1，230。

34. Q1§150, PN1, 229. See the previous quoted passage.
34. Q1§150，PN1，229。参见前引文。

35. Q1§151, PN1, 231. 35. Q1§151，PN1，231。

36. Q1§152, PN1, 232. Frederick Engels stated, “It was a time when, as Hegel says, the world stood upon its head” (here Engels put the passage from Hegel’s Philosophy of History in the footnote) (Engels, “Socialism: Utopian and Scientific,” Marx and Engels: Collected Works, vol. 24 [London: Lawrence & Wishart, 1989], 285). Gramsci knew this text, even though he didn’t have it in the prison in Turi. Another interesting passage is in Engel’s Ludwig Feuerbach and the End of Classical German Philosophy: “Thereby [i.e., through Marx’s dialectic] the dialectic of concepts itself became merely the conscious reflection of the dialectical motion of the real world and thus the Hegelian dialectic was placed upon its head; or rather, turned off its head, on which it was standing, and placed upon its feet.” Marx and Engels: Collected Works, vol. 26 (London: Lawrence & Wishart, 1990), 383.
36. Q1§152, PN1, 232. 弗里德里希·恩格斯指出，“正如黑格尔所说，这是一个世界颠倒过来的时代”（此处恩格斯在脚注中引述了黑格尔《历史哲学》中的这段话）(恩格斯，《空想社会主义和科学》，《马克思恩格斯全集》第 24 卷[伦敦：劳伦斯与维沙特出版社，1989]，285 页)。尽管格拉姆斯基在图里囚禁期间没有这篇文章，但他知道这段文字。另一段有趣的论述见于恩格斯《路德维希·费尔巴哈和德国古典哲学的终结》：“由此[即通过马克思的辩证法]，概念的辩证法本身仅仅变成了现实世界辩证运动的意识反映，从而黑格尔的辩证法被颠倒过来；或者更确切地说，它被从它所站立的头部移开，并被置于其脚上。”《马克思恩格斯全集》第 26 卷(伦敦：劳伦斯与维沙特出版社，1990)，383 页。

37. Q1§151, PN1, 230. 37. Q1§151，PN1，230。

38. Q8§208, PN3, 355. 38. Q8§208，PN3，355。

39. In “Traduzioni e metafore in Gramsci” (see chapter 10, pages 187-211). Maurizio Lichtner draws a correspondence between the irreducible metaphorical character of language and the impossibility of arguing on the theoretical level in favor of a concept of “truth,” unless it immediately refers to “history.” Yet in this way the theoretical value of this concept would be annulled. I believe that the basis of Lichtner’s assessment is the assumption that the metaphorical nature of language and its ideological character are the same, for Gramsci. But rethinking the concept of truth within metaphor consists of thinking criteria that allow to distinguish between truth effects and ideology effects within this mutable and by definition incomplete terrain. That is not to say that truth refers to history (as something external or other), but rather about the historical production of truth. The fact is that all the interpretation by Lichtner is based on the theses by Biagio de Giovanni, according to whom the truth of praxis consists of its actuality (see pages 88-89 and notes 8, 9, and 10 in this volume). This perspective ends up separating again the terrain of history from that of truth, as can be well seen from Lichtner’s conclusions.
39. 在“葛兰西的翻译与隐喻”（见第 10 章，第 187-211 页），马里奥·利希特纳建立了语言不可还原的隐喻特性与在理论层面论证“真理”概念的不可能性之间的对应关系，除非它立即指涉“历史”。然而，以这种方式，该概念的理论价值将会被取消。我认为，利希特纳的评价基础是假设，对于葛兰西而言，语言的隐喻性质及其意识形态特征是相同的。但是，在隐喻中重新思考真理的概念，在于思考允许区分真理效果和意识形态效果的标准，这些效果存在于这个变化且定义上不完整的领域之中。这并不是说真理指的是历史（作为外部或其他事物），而是关于真理的历史生产。事实上，利希特纳的所有诠释都基于比阿吉奥·德·乔凡尼的论题，即实践的真理在于其现实性（见本书第 88-89 页及第 8、9 和 10 页注）。 这种观点最终再次将历史领域与真理领域分开，正如利希特纳的结论所显示的那样。

* Translated from “Sulla ‘Traducibilità’ nei Quaderni di Gramsci,” Critica Marxista 6 (2003): 110. Translated by Rocco Lacorte with assistance by Peter Ives.
出自《关于葛兰西文稿中的“可译性”》，《马克思主义批判》第 6 期（2003 年）：110 页。由罗科·拉科尔特翻译，彼得·艾夫斯协助。

10
Translations and Metaphors in Gramsci
Maurizio Lichtner*
葛兰西的十种翻译和隐喻  马里奥·利希特纳*

To take an expression in a metaphorical sense means attributing to it a different meaning than the literal one. But is it always possible to trace back and define perfectly the literal meaning to which the expression refers? Isn’t it the case that sometimes metaphor is used specifically because the precise meaning of an enunciation cannot be provided? The conceptual content the metaphor refers to might be similar to those indistinct images, which Wittgenstein talks about, that cannot be profitably substituted with sharp images.1
将一个词语用比喻意义理解，意味着赋予它与字面意义不同的含义。但我们是否总是能够追溯并完美地定义该词语所指的字面意义？难道比喻有时正是因为无法提供一个精确的陈述意义而被使用的吗？比喻所指的观念内容，或许类似于维特根斯坦所谈到的那些模糊的图像，这些图像无法用清晰的图像有效地替代。

In 1988, Badaloni raised the role that the recognition of metaphors has in Gramsci’s reading of Marx.2 Gramsci’s critical attitude consists precisely in recognizing that certain expressions of Marx are metaphorical, that they indicate something, “an orientation and a line of tendency,” but they must not be taken literally—that is, reified. Gramsci avoids the “mere reproduction of Marx’s formulations." His project, Badaloni says, is to “reutilize that which, in Marx, has been lowered to 'metaphor' in a context where the 'metaphorical' summarizes conceptual meaning. In sum, to carry out a critical reading of Marx means to 're-attribute' a new conceptual value to the metaphorical meanings."3
1988 年，巴达洛尼提出隐喻识别在葛兰西解读马克思中的作用。² 葛兰西的批判性态度恰恰在于认识到马克思某些表述具有隐喻性，它们指涉某种东西，“一种方向和倾向”，但不能被字面理解——即不能被物化为教条。葛兰西避免了对马克思公式的“简单重复”。巴达洛尼指出，他的项目是“在马克思中将被降格为‘隐喻’的东西重新利用到一个语境中，在这个语境中‘隐喻’概括了概念意义。总之，进行马克思的批判性阅读意味着‘重新赋予’隐喻意义新的概念价值。”³

At the center of his interpretation of Marxism as historicism, or absolute historicism,4 there is then a particular metaphor, that of immanence. Marx uses this expression in a metaphorical sense. He certainly does not mean what the speculative tradition meant (the presence of the divine in the world), but something new. If this is fundamental to understanding historical
在他将马克思主义解读为历史主义或绝对历史主义的核心，存在着一种特定的隐喻，即内在性。马克思使用这个词语具有隐喻意义。他当然并非指思辨传统所理解的意义（神在世界中的存在），而是指一种新的含义。如果这对于理解历史至关重要

materialism, then it must be explained and conceptualized. The new concept of immanence—Badaloni says—is to be understood as a “unity of theory and praxis, overcoming of the dichotomy between traditional idealism and traditional materialism.”5 The new concept of immanence means that “it is neither possible to do without reality reducing it to a mere expression of human acts nor is it historically right to exaggerate the duty of reality to the point of re-attributing rationality to it, and putting it in the domain of personified thing-ness.”6
如果要谈唯物主义，就必须对其进行解释和概念化。巴达洛尼认为，新的内在性概念——应理解为“理论与实践的统一，克服传统唯心主义与传统唯物主义之间的二分法”。5 新的内在性概念意味着，“既不可能将现实简化为人类行为的单纯表达而忽略它，也不应该夸大现实对人类的责任，以至于重新赋予其理性，将其置于拟人化物体的领域。”6

Certainly, Marx’s metaphor of immanence is not accidental. It points out something specific which couldn’t be expressed in other words with respect to the theory-praxis relationship and the structure-superstructure relationship. But is Gramsci able to conceptualize it to the point of reinstating a precise meaning to the metaphorical expression? Is Gramsci able to substitute a “theory” for the metaphor? Or does his very critical, anti-dogmatic approach to Marx’s text have another result? The conclusion might in effect be that the metaphor, once recognized as such, can no longer be used as a concept and it is not even possible to substitute it with a precise and “clear” conceptual definition. One can only substitute contingent—that is, historically determined—affirmations to the claim of absoluteness which is typical of the metaphorical way of speaking. The thesis of this article is that we cannot retrieve from Gramsci any “theory” of the structuresuperstructure relationship or of the theory-practice relationship. Also, for Badaloni the “penetration of structural and superstructural elements” that characterizes Gramsci’s concept of the historical bloc has a justification that is purely historical. It is the “decisive historical character of the epoch in which we live” that the “relevance of subjective factors resulting from conscious human will and organization structured in hegemonic relationships are not fixed a priori but are historically displaced.” Gramsci’s concept has value today because “we live in a period of transition,” in which “nothing is irreversibly decided within the articulated ‘historical bloc.’” The “new philosophy of immanence” that Gramsci elaborates is adequate to the historical moment, because in it “no result is preconstituted and everything depends on the reaction of the structure and the superstructure, of material agents and of human wills, on the whole.”7
当然，马克思的内在性隐喻并非偶然。它指出了关于理论-实践关系和结构-上层建筑关系的某些特定内容，用其他词语无法表达。但是，葛兰西能否将它概念化到能够恢复该隐喻表达的精确含义的程度？葛兰西能否用“理论”来取代该隐喻？或者，他对马克思文本的批判性、反教条化方法是否产生了另一种结果？结论或许实际上是，一旦被识别为隐喻，该隐喻就不能再用作概念，甚至无法用精确而“清晰”的概念定义来取代它。我们只能用偶然的——也就是说，在历史上确定的——断言来取代隐喻性言论中典型的绝对性主张。本文的论点是，我们无法从葛兰西那里获得关于结构-上层建筑关系或理论-实践关系的任何“理论”。 此外，对于巴达洛尼而言，葛兰西的历史块的概念中“结构和上层建筑要素的渗透”具有纯粹的历史依据。正是我们所处的“决定性历史时期”，使得“源于有意识的人类意志和组织，并以霸权关系为结构的主观因素的关联性并非先验地固定，而是历史地推移”。葛兰西的概念在今天仍然有价值，因为“我们生活在一个转型时期”，在这个时期，“在已阐述的‘历史块’中，没有任何事情是不可逆转地决定的”。葛兰西阐述的“新内在哲学”适应于历史时刻，因为它“没有任何结果是预先确定的，一切取决于结构和上层建筑、物质力量和人类意志的整体反应。”7

Every recent and thorough reading of the Notebooks has accomplished a historicization of Gramsci’s formulations. For example, De Giovanni, in his 1985 essay, “Il Marx di Gramsci” [The Marx of Gramsci], concentrates his attention on what he calls the “synolon philosophy-politics." He doesn’t ask himself how the synolon can be conceived, but how “this synolon has become actual” in Gramsci’s reflection.8 The actuality of the identification philosophy-politics, theory-praxis, originates from a determined interpretation of the “modern” by Gramsci: the "form” of modern history, De Giovanni says, appears to him “as revolving around great hegemonic clashes and around the re-organization of all kinds of knowledge in relation to those clashes." The XI Thesis on Feuerbach is, therefore, valid for him, because of the "subjectivization of the masses and of their collective practical agency.” The structure-superstructure relationship expresses a history that is more "dense with consciousness,"9 where what was objective is transferred into the subject. De Giovanni continues, the modern “comes about through the intrusion of praxis, that is, through the dense constitution of praxis as a terrain able to absorb every other element"一that is, the objective elements as well as the abstract ones. 10 However, beyond the recognized actuality or representative capability of Gramsci’s formulations with respect to the "modern," the problem remains: why doesn’t Gramsci succeed in his attempt to substitute Marx’s metaphor with "a theory"? Why does Gramsci need "to translate" Marx’s annunciations and why is this translation never satisfactory, that is, always provisional and relative?
对《笔记》的每一次最近且彻底的阅读都完成了对葛兰西论述的历史化。例如，德乔凡尼在其 1985 年文章“葛兰西的马克思”中，将注意力集中在他所称的“哲学-政治综合体”上。他不是探究如何理解这个综合体，而是探究“这个综合体如何在葛兰西的反思中成为现实”。8 哲学-政治、理论-实践的同一性的现实性源于葛兰西对“现代”的特定解读：德乔凡尼称，现代历史的“形式”在他看来“是围绕着重大的霸权冲突以及各种知识与这些冲突的关系的重组而展开的”。因此，他对《关于费尔巴哈的第十一条论题》的有效性，源于“大众及其集体实践能动性的主观化”。结构-上层建筑关系表达了一种“充满意识”的历史，9 其中客观的因素被转移到主体中。 德·乔凡尼继续说道，现代“是通过实践的介入而产生的，也就是说，通过实践作为一种能够吸收所有其他元素的领域——即客观元素和抽象元素的稠密构成”。然而，超出人们对葛兰西关于“现代”的表述在实际意义或代表能力的认可之外，问题依然存在：为什么葛兰西未能成功地用“理论”取代马克思的隐喻？为什么葛兰西需要“翻译”马克思的宣言，以及为什么这种翻译永远不够令人满意，也就是说，总是临时的和相对的？

Marx’s Metaphors 马克思的隐喻

Following the Prison Notebooks, let’s start by looking at how Gramsci’s reflections on the metaphorical quality of Marx’s expression come to light and what they lead to.11 Let’s consider, in particular, the three series of the "Appunti di Filosofia" [Notes of Philosophy] in Notebooks 4, 7 and 8, where Gramsci’s reasoning is particularly concentrated and coherent with respect to its objectives and its developments, along the leading thread which is common to all three series一that is, materialism and idealism. The reference to the subsequent, "special" notebooks, dealing with philosophical topics (Notebooks 10 and 11), can obviously not be left out, but here we limit ourselves to mentioning the "rewritings" of the notes contained in the "Notes on Philosophy," together with the eventual modifications.12 The idea that some of Marx’s fundamental terms are metaphors emerges in correspondence with the critique of Bukharin’s Popular Manual initiated in Notebook 4. In note 11, “Problemi fondamentali del marxismo” [Fundamental Problems of Marxism],13 Gramsci continues his reflection which tends to liberate Marx from the so-called orthodox traditional interpretation, in a materialist vein.14 Gramsci, therefore, distinguishes the “philosophical currents” that Marx studied, his “philosophical culture,” the “elements” from which “Marx started his philosophizing”15 from that which is effectively his position.16 The philosophy of Marx is not reducible to the previous systems, in particular, to materialism. Among the other previous systems, Gramsci says, the most important is Hegelianism, “especially for his attempt to overcome the traditional conception of ‘idealism’ and ‘materialism.’” It is at this point that the term “immanence” comes on stage: “when one says that Marx uses the expression ‘immanence’ in a metaphorical sense, one says nothing: in reality, Marx provides the term ‘immanence’ with a proper meaning, that is, he is not ‘pantheist’ in the traditional metaphorical sense, but he is ‘a Marxist5 or a ‘historical materialist.’”17 Here Bukharin is not named but it is his statement to which Gramsci refers. Thus, at first, it seems essential to Gramsci to repeat that Marx’s term “immanence” is not empty of content but, among other things, it has a central meaning that must be defined.18
在《狱中札记》之后，让我们首先考察葛兰西如何反思马克思表达的隐喻性，以及这些反思导致了什么结果。11 特别是，让我们关注《哲学札记》的三个系列，即札记 4、7 和 8，在这些系列中，葛兰西的论证尤其集中而连贯，与其目标和发展相一致，贯穿所有三个系列的主线是唯物主义和唯心主义。当然，不能忽略后续的、专门论述哲学主题的札记（札记 10 和 11），但此处我们仅限于提及“哲学札记”中笔记的“重写”以及随后的修改。12 马克思一些基本术语是隐喻的观点，源于札记 4 中对布哈林《大众读本》的批判。在札记 11“马克思主义的基本问题”13 中，葛兰西继续他的反思，旨在从唯物主义的角度解放马克思，摆脱所谓的正统传统解释。因此，葛兰西区分了马克思研究的“哲学思潮”，他的“哲学文化”，以及“马克思开始哲学思考的要素”15，与他实际的立场 16。马克思的哲学并非可简化为先前的体系，特别是唯物主义。葛兰西认为，在其他先前体系中，最重要的是黑格尔主义，“特别是其尝试克服传统意义上的‘唯心主义’和‘唯物主义’”。正是在这一点上，“内在性”一词登场：“当有人说马克思用‘内在性’这个词语是比喻意义上的时候，其实什么也没有说：事实上，马克思赋予‘内在性’一个确切的含义，也就是说，他并非以传统比喻意义上的‘泛神论者’，而是‘马克思主义者’或‘历史唯物主义者’。”17  此处未提及布哈林，但葛兰西所指的正是他的论述。因此，对葛兰西来说，首先看来，重复马克思的“内在性”一词并非空洞，而是具有中心意义，必须加以界定。18

In the subsequent notes, the critique of the Popular Manual [Saggio populare]19 starts taking shape, and Gramsci comes back to the question of the term “immanence” in note 17. He accepts the idea that this term is a metaphor; but all of language, he objects, is a metaphor: “When one conception gives way to another, the earlier language persists, but it is used metaphorically. All of language has become metaphor,20 and the history of semantics is also an aspect of the history of culture: language is a living thing and simultaneously a museum of fossils of the past life.”21 To the extent that there is historical continuity, and, at the same time, there is transcendence, one can speak of metaphorical use of the previous terms: in effect, “Marx continues the philosophy of immanence,” and, at the same time, “he rids it of its whole metaphysical apparatus and brings it to the concrete terrain of history.”22 The use of the term is metaphorical, Gramsci continues, “only in the sense that the conception has been overcome, has been developed, etc.”23 However, Gramsci admits that Marx’s conception of immanence is not completely new in the history of thought (and he cites Giordano Bruno).
随后的笔记中，对《通俗手册》[Saggio populare]19 的批判开始成形，葛兰西在第 17 笔记中再次探讨“内在性”一词。他接受该词是隐喻的观点；但他反驳说，所有语言都是隐喻：“当一种观念让位于另一种观念时，先前的语言依然存在，但它被用作隐喻。所有语言都已成为隐喻，20 语义学史也是文化史的一个方面：语言是活生生的，同时也是过去生命化石的博物馆。”21 在存在历史连续性的同时，也存在超越性，人们可以谈论先前术语的隐喻用法：事实上，“马克思继续着内在性的哲学”，同时，“他摆脱了其整个形而上学体系，将其带到历史的具体领域。”22 葛兰西继续说，该术语的使用是隐喻的，“仅仅因为该观念已被克服、已被发展等等。”23 然而，葛兰西承认马克思的内在性概念在思想史上并非完全全新（他引用了乔尔达诺·布鲁诺）。

The expression “immanence” in Marx has, in any case, a “precise meaning,” Gramsci says, and “this [Bukharin] should have defined.” And then he adds, “such a definition would really have been ‘theory.’”24
马克思的“内在性”表达，无论如何，都具有“确切的含义”，葛兰西说道，而“布哈林本应予以界定”。然后他补充道，“这样的界定实际上将构成‘理论’”。

The metaphor seems to refer, therefore, to the definition, namely, to the concept; but shifting to some notes of Notebook 7, one will face more complex reasoning. In note 36, Gramsci goes back to Bukharin’s statement that Marx uses the term “immanence” only as metaphor. This statement, Gramsci says, is, “crude and unqualified” and is made as if it were a “selfsufficient explanation." Again it calls to mind the conception of language as metaphor and leads to very important consequences. Gramsci states, “All language is metaphor, and it is metaphorical in two senses: it is a metaphor of the 'thing' or ‘material and sensible object’ referred to, and it is a metaphor of the ideological meanings attached to words in the preceding periods of civilization."25 This second aspect is central to Gramsci; this is confirmed by the sentence introduced in the rewriting of this note in Notebook 11:
因此，该隐喻似乎指的是定义，即概念；但如果转向笔记 7 的某些笔记，将会面临更复杂的推理。在笔记 36 中，葛兰西回到布哈林的论述，即马克思仅将“内在性”一词用作隐喻。葛兰西认为，这一论述“粗糙且不加限定”，仿佛是一个“自足的解释”。它再次唤起将语言视为隐喻的概念，并导致非常重要的后果。葛兰西指出：“所有语言都是隐喻，并且在两种意义上是隐喻性的：它是指称的‘事物’或‘物质和感官对象’的隐喻，并且它是指先前文明时期附加在词语上的意识形态意义的隐喻。”25  这一第二方面对葛兰西至关重要；这一点通过笔记 11 中对该笔记的重写中引入的句子得到证实：

If perhaps it cannot quite be said that all discourse [discorso] is metaphorical in respect of the thing or material and sensible object referred to (or the abstract concept) so as not to widen the concept of metaphor excessively, it can however be said that present language [linguaggio] is metaphorical with respect to the meanings and the ideological content which the words used had in preceding periods of civilisation.26
如果不能完全地说所有话语[discorso]都就所指的事物或物质和感性对象（或抽象概念）而言是隐喻的，以免过度扩大隐喻的概念，那么，可以这样说，当前的语言[linguaggio]就所用词语在先前文明时期所具有的意义和意识形态内容而言是隐喻的。

It is this interest in the stratification of meanings that characterizes Gramsci’s historicism.
正是对意义分层结构的这种兴趣，体现了葛兰西的历史主义。

Yet, consequently, it is not possible to eliminate the metaphors substituting them with rigorous definitions; if one eliminated the metaphor, the historical density and the stratification of the meanings would be lost. Rather, a critical discourse on metaphor should provide an account of these meanings making them explicit. As Gramsci says, the following are erroneous tendencies: both the attempt of creating “fixed or universal languages” and the conception of “language as source of error,” which is typical of the “pragmatists,”27 who would like to substitute common language with a “completely abstract" “mathematical language."28 According to Gramsci’s approach, to rationalize language, taking away its metaphorical character—namely, its “extensive"29 meanings—would mean annihilating its historicity.
然而，因此，不可能用严谨的定义来取代隐喻；如果消除隐喻，历史密度和意义的分层将会丢失。相反，对隐喻的批判性话语应该解释这些意义，使其显性化。正如葛兰西所说，以下倾向是错误的：试图创造“固定或普遍的语言”以及将“语言视为错误之源”的概念，这典型于“实用主义者”，他们想用“完全抽象”的“数学语言”取代普通语言。根据葛兰西的方法，要使语言合理化，去除其隐喻特征——即其“广泛”的意义——就意味着消灭其历史性。

However, we can obtain a more radical consequence. The same conceptual definition of what metaphors point out will, in turn, be affected by historicity, and new metaphors which have different origins will insert themselves in the “theory” that we pretend substitutes for the metaphor. Gramsci, in effect, does nothing other than use new metaphors when he says that Marx, “rids” the philosophy of immanence of its metaphysical apparatus30 or when he talks about the philosophy of praxis as “absolute earthliness” of thought,31 not to mention, naturally, the image of the “historical bloc.”
然而，我们可以获得一个更激进的结论。对隐喻所指出的概念定义本身，反过来也会受到历史性的影响，新的具有不同来源的隐喻会插入到我们假装替代隐喻的“理论”中。实际上，葛兰西在说马克思“清除”了内在哲学的形而上学装置 30，或者谈论实践哲学是思想的“绝对世俗性”31 时，并没有做任何其他事情，更不用说“历史块”的意象了。

Gramsci goes back to the question of the continuity of language with respect to the past in a note in Notebook 8 entitled “Sul Saggio popolare: La quistione di nomenclatura e di contenuto” [On the Popular Manual: The question of nomenclature and content]. Initially, Gramsci’s discourse is on the intellectuals: their characteristic, as a “crystallized social category” is that of “reattaching itself, in the ideological sphere, to a prior category of intellectuals, and it does so by means of a common conceptual nomenclature.”32 The intellectuals, insofar as they are an expression of new historical situations, should, on the contrary, be “new,” and not posit themselves as “direct continuation of the previous intelligentsia.” Gramsci seems to allude to the distinction (which later became canonical) between “organic” intellectuals and “traditional” intellectuals. However, in those notes, we realize this distinction between the old and new fades. Language never completely changes, “at least in its external formal aspect.” It would seem that the form could be maintained from tradition and express a new “content." But, in reality, the expression would also have an impact on the content; the “content of language" is changed, Gramsci says, but “it is difficult to have a clear awareness [coscienza] of this change instantaneously.” It happens that one accepts “a term together with the content of a concept that belonged to an intellectual milieu now superseded; on the other hand, rejection of a term from another intellectual milieu of the past, even though its content has changed and it has become effective for expressing the new sociocultural content.” The term “materialism” has been accepted “according to its past content” within Marxism, and the term “immanence” has been “rejected because in the past it had a particular historical-cultural content." In sum, the relationship between “literary expression” and “conceptual content” is complex: Gramsci ends up saying that one must have an “historical sense,” and be able to grasp “the different moments of a process of cultural development.”33 It is not so simple to free “the new content” from the “old literary expression,” to decide a new expression without resonance, in order to define it; it is for this reason that metaphors remain with all that this involves.34
葛兰西在笔记 8“论通俗读物：命名法与内容问题”中重提语言与过去的连续性问题。最初，葛兰西的论述集中于知识分子：他们作为“凝固的社会范畴”，其特征在于“在意识形态领域中，通过共同的概念命名法，重新依附于先前的知识分子范畴”。32 知识分子，就其作为新历史局势的体现而言，应该“新生”，而非将自己定位为“先前知识分子的直接延续”。葛兰西似乎暗指了（后来成为规范的）“有机”知识分子与“传统”知识分子之间的区别。然而，在这些笔记中，我们发现旧与新的这种区别逐渐模糊。语言永远不会完全改变，“至少在其外部形式方面”。看来，形式可以从传统中延续下来，并表达新的“内容”。然而，实际上，表达方式也会影响内容；葛兰西认为，“语言的内容”会发生改变，但“立刻清晰地意识到（coscienza）这种改变是困难的”。人们常常接受“一个术语及其属于现在过时的知识环境的概念内容”，另一方面，拒绝来自过去另一个知识环境的术语，即使其内容已经改变并已成为表达新的社会文化内容的有效工具。“唯物主义”一词在马克思主义内部已被“根据其过去的内容”接受，“内在性”一词则因其过去具有特定的历史文化内容而被“拒绝”。总而言之，“文学表达”与“概念内容”之间的关系是复杂的：葛兰西最终指出，必须具有“历史感”，并能够把握“文化发展过程的不同阶段”。33  要从“旧的文学表达”中解放出“新的内容”并非易事，要找到没有共鸣的新表达，进而定义它，这正是隐喻依然存在的原因。34

Let’s look now at some other Marxist concepts that have to do with the structure-superstructure relationship which Gramsci thinks he can discover the origin of and the context from which they were extracted. These concepts as used by Marx result, therefore, in a figurative sense; for this reason, they lose a lot of their certainty.
现在让我们看看其他一些马克思主义概念，这些概念与葛兰西认为可以发现其起源和语境的结构-上层建筑关系有关。因此，马克思使用这些概念，在比喻意义上；由于这个原因，它们失去了很多确定性。

In Q1§113, Gramsci reflects on a passage of The Critique of Political Economy, in which Marx says that “just as one does not judge an individual by what he thinks about himself,” one also can not evaluate the difference between what an epoch is and how it represents it itself.35 The expression, he says, “may be connected to the then relatively recent upheavals in criminal procedure and related theoretical discussions.”36 The “confession” of the accused individual is no longer essential; what count are only “the material evidence and the testimony." This possible nexus fascinates Gramsci; it seems “suggestive" to him一as he adds later on.37
在 Q1§113 中，葛兰西反思了《政治经济学批判》中的一段话，其中马克思说道：“正如人们不应该根据一个人对自己想法来评价他一样”，人们也不能根据一个时代自身对自身的描述来评价时代本身的差异。35 他说，这句话“可能与当时相对较新的刑事诉讼变革及其相关的理论讨论有关”。36 被告的“供述”不再重要；只有“物证和证词”才算数。这种可能的联系让葛兰西着迷；他后来补充说，这似乎“具有启发性”。37

Then, in Notebook 8, note 207 (“Questioni di terminologia" [Questions of Terminology]), Gramsci considers another one of Marx’s expressions to be a metaphor. This expression is also contained in the 1859 preface when he says that “the 'anatomy' of civil society is constituted by its 'economy.'"38 The term “anatomy" comes from natural sciences; Gramsci asks himself if the same concept of structure and superstructure should owe something “linked to the debates stirred up by the classification of animals, a classification that entered its 'scientific' stage precisely when anatomy, rather than secondary and incidental characteristics, came to be regarded as fundamental." Gramsci says that finding a concept's context of origin is important: “the origin of the metaphor that was used to refer to a newly discovered concept helps one to understand better the concept itself by tracing it back to the particular historical and cultural world from which it sprang."39 But what does it mean, “to better understand"? Gramsci's discourse is more explicit in the rewriting: to trace a metaphor back to its “linguistic-cultural origin . . . is useful to define the limit of the metaphor itself, stopping it in other words from becoming material and mechanical.”40
然后，在笔记本 8，注释 207（“术语问题”）中，葛兰西认为马克思的另一个表述也是一种隐喻。这个表述也出现在 1859 年序言中，他写道：“市民社会的‘解剖’是由其‘经济’构成的。”38 “解剖”一词源于自然科学；葛兰西自问，结构与上层建筑的概念是否也应与“动物分类所引发的争论有关，这种分类恰好是在解剖学，而非次要和偶然的特征，被视为根本的时候，进入了其‘科学’阶段。”葛兰西认为，找到概念的起源背景很重要：“用来指代新发现概念的隐喻的起源有助于人们通过追溯其产生的特定历史和文化世界来更好地理解该概念本身。”39 但“更好地理解”意味着什么？葛兰西在重写中阐述得更明确：要追溯隐喻的“语言文化起源”。 界定隐喻的限度，有助于防止其物化和机械化。40

Starting from this note in Notebook 8, these two examples are associated with each other41; they then come back together in Notebook 10, note 41xii, in which Gramsci asks himself which cultural and scientific context the philosophy of praxis reacts against at “the moment of its foundation.” “Anatomy” and Gramsci’s juridical reference are among those “images and metaphors the founders of the philosophy of praxis often go back to”; they constitute true and real “clues,” because they specifically expose their place of origin.42 One finds these two “metaphors” again in Notebook 11, in note 50, where Gramsci’s discourse is more radical. The statement that the economy is the anatomy of civil society is defined as a “traditional expression,” a “simple metaphor” (where the adjectives “traditional” and “simple” have the evident meaning of lowering and taking away conceptual value),43 and a “scheme easy to understand” which is used in order to be understood by “culturally backward social strata.” The impression of Gramsci’s strong relativization of the key concepts of historical materialism is also confirmed by an observation on the heterogeneity of the references: “one must distinguish between the two founders of the philosophy of praxis whose language does not have the same cultural origin and whose metaphors reflect different interests.”44
从笔记本 8 的这一笔记开始，这两个例子相互关联 41；它们随后在笔记本 10，笔记 41xii 中再次汇合，其中葛兰西自问实践哲学在“其奠基时刻”反对的是哪些文化和科学背景。“解剖学”以及葛兰西的法学参照物，都属于“实践哲学的创始人经常回溯到的那些‘意象和隐喻’”；它们构成了真正的“线索”，因为它们明确地揭示了其起源地。42  在笔记本 11，笔记 50 中，再次出现这两个“隐喻”，葛兰西的论述更加激进。将经济视为公民社会的解剖结构的陈述，被定义为“传统的表达”，一个“简单的隐喻”（其中“传统”和“简单”这两个形容词明显地意在贬低和剥夺概念价值），43 以及一种“易于理解的模式”，以便被“文化程度较低的社会阶层”理解。葛兰西对历史唯物主义核心概念的强烈相对化印象，也通过对参考文献异质性的观察得到印证：“必须区分实践哲学的两大奠基人，他们的语言并非源于相同的文化背景，其隐喻也反映了不同的利益。”四十四

In sum, to grasp the origin of concepts, bringing them back to the context where they are commonly used is needed in order to not only to “better understand” the concepts themselves, but to relativatize them, to “define the limit” of their figurative and metaphorical use, and to stop the metaphor from becoming “material and mechanical.”45 We might add, again with Wittgenstein, that to bring words back “from their metaphysical to their everyday use,” means to make concepts lose their excellence and sublimity; if these concepts “have a use, it must be . . . humble.” Their sense is provided by the use made of them in some “language game,” namely, in those particular contexts where they originate, that is, have their “original home.”46
总而言之，要理解概念的起源，需要将它们还原到其常用语境中，以便不仅“更好地理解”这些概念本身，而且使它们相对化，确定其比喻和隐喻使用的界限，并阻止比喻变得“物质化和机械化”。45 我们还可以补充，正如维特根斯坦所说，将词语“从形而上学的使用还原到日常使用”，意味着使概念失去其卓越性和崇高性；如果这些概念“有用途，那一定是……卑微的”。它们的意义来自在某些“语言游戏”中对它们的运用，即在它们起源的那些特定语境中，也就是它们的“原生环境”中。46

The Translatability of Languages
语言的可翻译性

Another aspect, which is connected to the metaphorical nature of languages, is that of the translatability of languages. In the view of Marxism as historicism, the theme of the translatability of language by Gramsci is fundamental: Marxism appears, in fact, as “the translation of Hegel’s historicism.” Yet Gramsci speaks of translatability in many senses that do not entirely overlap. We need to make these differences of meaning explicit and also to find in which aspects of these differences Gramsci’s theoretical engagement is prevalent.
另一个方面，与语言的隐喻性相关的是语言的翻译可能性。从马克思主义的历史主义视角来看，葛兰西关于语言翻译性的主题至关重要：马克思主义实际上是“对黑格尔历史主义的翻译”。然而，葛兰西所说的翻译性包含着多种并非完全重叠的意义。我们需要明确这些意义上的差异，并找出葛兰西的理论参与在这些差异的哪些方面最为突出。

In Notebook 1, the first reference to one of Marx’s texts appears within a different discourse, in the long note on Risorgimento. Speaking of Jacobinism and of the Action Party [Partito d’Azione], as is commonly known, Gramsci claims that classic Jacobinism has a progressive and highly positive character (which represents the more consequential political thought of the French Revolution). 47 Jacobins were not “abstract” (Gramsci uses “abstractionists”)： “Jacobins’ language perfectly reflected the needs of the time, according to French traditions and culture.” Moreover, to this point, he adds in parentheses: “see Marx’s analysis in The Holy Family where it turns out that Jacobins’ phraseology corresponded perfectly to the formulas of classical German philosophy, which is today acknowledged to have the greater concreteness and which has given rise to modern historicism.”48
在笔记本 1 中，对马克思文本的首次引用出现在不同的论述中，即关于“复兴运动”的冗长笔记。谈及雅各宾主义和行动党，正如众所周知，葛兰西声称经典的雅各宾主义具有进步且高度积极的特征（这代表了法国大革命中更具影响力的政治思想）。47 雅各宾派并非“抽象的”（葛兰西使用“抽象主义者”）： “雅各宾派的语言完美地反映了那个时代的需求，符合法国的传统和文化。”此外，他在括号中补充道：“参见马克思在《神圣家族》中的分析，其中表明雅各宾派的措辞与古典德国哲学的公式完美对应，后者如今被认为具有更大的具体性，并孕育了现代历史主义。”48

This correspondence between a historico-political and a philosophical language is the first case of translation that we encounter. Gramsci goes back to this theme in note 151, in which he deals with the Restoration, or the post-Napoleonic period, in Europe. He hints at the role of the intellectuals in the situation of “political fermentation,” and he affirms that “classical German philosophy is the philosophy of this period and it enlivens the national liberal movements of 1848 until 1870.” Gramsci then adds, referring again to the passage from The Holy Family, “Consider, in this respect, how Marx reduces the French maxim ‘liberté, fraternité, egalité’ to German philosophical concepts.”49 Gramsci focuses his attention on this “reduction” made by Marx saying that it seems “extremely important theoretically.”50 From what follows, we derive the sense in which Gramsci focuses his attention on this reduction by Marx. Gramsci refers to the shift from “politics” to “rationality” or from concrete historico-economic to philosophico-abstract discourse; a shift that, as it will be seen, does not go in only one, but in both, directions. That in the passage from “politics” to "rationality” one doesn’t end up at all in pure appearance is shown in Gramsci’s view of historico-materialism. The only thing that Gramsci asks in this text is that "ideological abstraction” wouldn’t be isolated by the "economic concreteness” of which the former is a translation. Gramsci asks himself how a Marxist could prefer abstraction. To deem the level of ideological abstraction “superior” is, in fact, what characterizes "modern philosophical idealism.”51
历史政治语言与哲学语言之间的这种对应关系，是我们遇到的第一例翻译案例。葛兰西在笔记 151 中再次提及这一主题，其中他探讨了欧洲的复辟时期，或拿破仑后的时期。他暗示了知识分子在“政治动荡”时期所扮演的角色，并断言“德国古典哲学是这一时期的哲学，它激励了 1848 年至 1870 年的民族自由运动”。葛兰西随后再次提及《神圣家族》中的那段话：“从这个角度来看，马克思如何将法国格言‘自由、博爱、平等’简化为德国哲学概念？”49 葛兰西关注马克思所做的这种“简化”，认为它在理论上“极其重要”。50 从接下来的内容中，我们可以推导出葛兰西关注马克思这种简化的意义。葛兰西指的是从“政治”到“理性”的转变，或从具体的史实经济到哲学抽象话语的转变；正如将要看到的，这种转变并非单向，而是双向的。 从“政治”到“理性”的过渡中，并非全然陷入纯粹的表象，葛兰西的历史唯物主义观对此作出了说明。葛兰西在这篇文章中唯一的要求是，“意识形态的抽象”不应被“经济的具体性”（前者是后者的翻译）孤立。葛兰西自问，为什么一位马克思主义者会偏爱抽象。事实上，将意识形态抽象的层面视为“更高”的，正是“现代哲学唯心主义”的特征。五十一

In note 48 of Notebook 3, we find another passage in which Gramsci clearly assimilates two senses (politics and rationality) to the “reduction” mentioned above. The topic of note 48 is the relationship between “spontaneity and conscious leadership." After having said, on one hand, that pure spontaneity does not exist—rather, spontaneity must be educated, that is, led—within political action and, on the other hand, that direction一 that is, “theory"一cannot be separated and abstracted. Gramsci arrives at this consideration: between "modern theory" (Marxism) and "‘spontaneous5 sentiments of the masses there can not be opposition: between them there is a ‘quantitative5 difference, a difference in degree, not in quality: a reciprocal (so to say) ‘reduction,5 namely, a shift from spontaneous sentiments to theory and vice versa must be possible.” Gramsci’s conceptual reference is twofold: on the one hand, he thinks of the philosophy-commonsense relationship and remembers Kant’s interest, as well as Croce’s, in maintaining this relationship; on the other hand, the concept of "reduction" takes him to Marx’s affirmation in The Holy Family —discussed above—of the "formulas of the politics of the French Revolution" that "reduced themselves to the principles of classical German philosophy."52
在《笔记本 3》的第 48 页注释中，我们发现另一段话，葛兰西明确将两种意义（政治和理性）与上述“还原”联系起来。第 48 页注释的主题是“自发性和有意识的领导”之间的关系。一方面，他指出纯粹的自发性不存在——相反，自发性必须在政治行动中受到教育，即受到引导；另一方面，方向——也就是“理论”——不能被分离和抽象。葛兰西由此得出结论：在“现代理论”（马克思主义）和“群众的自发情感”之间不可能存在对立；它们之间存在“数量”上的差异，是程度上的差异，而非性质上的差异；一种相互的（可以说）“还原”是必须的，即从自发情感向理论的转变，以及反之亦然。葛兰西的概念参照是双重的：一方面，他思考哲学与常识的关系，并铭记康德以及克罗齐对维持这种关系的关注；另一方面，“还原”的概念将他引向马克思在《神圣家族》中（如上所述）对“法国大革命政治公式”的肯定，这些公式“还原为”古典德国哲学的原则。52

In sum, up to this point, translatability has to do with the relationship between the concrete-abstract and the abstract-concrete. Abstract discourse is the translation of a historical reality, and is in turn retranslated into praxis, mainly in historico-political action. Thus, the concept of translation leads us to the nucleus of the philosophy of praxis. However, in other texts, Gramsci explains more simply the translatability between (French) historico-political and (German) philosophico-abstract language in historiographic terms insofar as they are superstructures that reflect the same structure. In note 42 of Notebook 4, he comes back to a passage of The Holy Family, in which Marx “shows how the French political language used by Prudhon corresponds to and can be translated into the language of classical German philosophy.” Moreover, Gramsci adds, “This statement, it seemed to me, is very important for understanding the innermost value of historical materialism, for finding the way to resolve many apparent contradictions in the unfolding of history, and for responding to certain superficial objections to this theory of historiography.”53 In developing the note, Gramsci thematisizes the historiographical question in terms of the relationship between diverse superstructural formations, which are reciprocally translatable because they can be brought back to the same structure.
总而言之，到目前为止，翻译性与具体-抽象和抽象-具体之间的关系有关。抽象的论述是对历史现实的翻译，并进而被重新翻译成实践，主要体现在历史政治行动中。因此，翻译的概念将我们引向实践哲学的核心。然而，在其他文本中，葛兰西更简单地解释了（法语）历史政治语言和（德语）哲学抽象语言之间的可翻译性，在史学方面，因为它们是反映相同结构的超结构。在笔记 4 的第 42 页注释中，他回到了《神圣家族》中的一段，其中马克思“展示了蒲鲁东使用的法语政治语言如何对应并可以翻译成古典德国哲学的语言”。此外，葛兰西补充道，“这个论断，在我看来，对于理解历史唯物主义的内在价值，对于找到解决历史发展中许多表面的矛盾的方法，以及回应对这种史学理论的某些肤浅的反对意见，非常重要。”53 在撰写笔记的过程中，葛兰西将史学问题主题化，将其置于不同上层建筑结构之间关系的视角，这些结构是相互可翻译的，因为它们可以追溯到同一结构。

As two individuals belonging to the same culture may believe they maintain “different things” because “they use a different terminology” but, in reality, they say the same thing,54 so happens in the relationship between two national cultures. Gramsci says, “in the international sphere, two cultures, expressions of two fundamentally similar civilizations, believe that they are antagonistic, different, each one superior to the other, because they use different ideological, philosophical terms or because one has a more strictly practical, political character (France) while the other is more philosophical, doctrinal, theoretical." In reality, Gramsci continues, “to the historian, they are interchangeable: each one is reducible to the other; they are mutually translatable.”55
正如两个属于同一文化的人可能因为“使用不同的术语”而认为自己持有“不同的观点”，但实际上他们表达的是同一件事一样，在两种国家文化之间也存在类似的情况。葛兰西指出：“在国际领域，两种文化，作为两种根本相似的文明的表达，相信它们是相互对抗的、不同的，每一种都认为自己优于另一种，因为它们使用不同的意识形态、哲学术语，或者因为一种具有更严格的实用、政治特征（例如法国），而另一种则更具哲学、教条、理论特征。”实际上，葛兰西继续说道，“对于历史学家来说，它们是可互换的：每一种都可以还原为另一种；它们是相互可翻译的。”

With this, the theoretical nexus seems to dissolve, but reemerges in note 56 (in the part entitled “Miscellanea" [Miscellaneous] of Notebook 4). Gramsci’s discourse concerns the autonomy of politics and, therefore, Croce’s dialectic of the distincts and Gentile’s objections. Yet Gramsci says that Croce and Gentile, through their “reformation" of Hegel’s philosophy, have made Hegel more “abstract." In fact, “have they not lopped off his most realistic, most historicist features?"56 Hegel reflected on the French Revolution and the Napoleonic wars; his philosophy expresses “an extremely intense historical period during which all previous conceptions were peremptorily criticized by the realities of the time”; therefore, his philosophy could be a true “philosophy of history” instead of an “abstract speculation.” The relationship between classical German philosophy and the French Revolution is, thus, especially particular, and reflects the specific character of this philosophy of history that, in the development of Gramsci’s reasoning, “should lead to the identification of philosophy with history, action with thought, and the ‘German proletariat as the sole inheritor of classical German philosophy.’”57
至此，理论联系似乎解体，但在第 56 页脚注（第四笔记本“杂记”部分）中又重新出现。葛兰西的论述涉及政治的自主性，因此也涉及克罗齐的区分辩证法和詹蒂莱的反对意见。然而，葛兰西认为，克罗齐和詹蒂莱通过对黑格尔哲学的“改革”，使得黑格尔更加“抽象”。事实上，“难道他们没有削减他最现实、最历史主义的特征吗？”56 黑格尔反思了法国大革命和拿破仑战争；他的哲学表达了“一个极其紧张的历史时期，在此期间，所有先前的观念都被当时的现实彻底批判”；因此，他的哲学可以成为真正的“历史哲学”，而不是“抽象的思辨”。因此，古典德国哲学与法国大革命的关系尤其特殊，反映了这种历史哲学的特定特征，在葛兰西的论证发展中，“应该导致哲学与历史、行动与思想的同一，以及‘德国无产阶级作为古典德国哲学的唯一继承者’”。“57”

The intertwining of Gramsci’s two lines of reasoning is very clear in note 208 of Notebook 8 entitled “Traducibilita reciproca delle culture nazionali” [The (mutual) translatability of national cultures], a very dense text. Reading an essay by Croce contained in Conversazioni critciche [Critical Conversations], Gramsci has found the source of the statement by Marx in The Holy Family that “French political language is equivalent to German philosophical language.”58 This source concerns two passages contained respectively in Hegel’s Lectures on the Philosophy of History and in the Lectures on the History of Philosophy. Yet for Gramsci there is another aspect which is more interesting than the question of the translatability of the two languages from a historiographical perspective: in one of his texts, Hegel says that the principle of self consciousness, which the Germans interpreted as “tranquil theory,” was, on the contrary, interpreted as revolutionary by the French. In Hegel’s text, Gramsci sees the “source” of the thought expressed in the Theses on Feuerbach that philosophers have only explained the world and now we need to change it—namely, that philosophy must become “politics” (i.e., “practice”) to continue to be philosophy: the “source” for the theory of the unity of theory and “practice.”59 This is essential for Gramsci (“it seems to me ... much more important”)，even though the note closes on the theme “subject of the rubric,” namely, “that two similar structures have equivalent and mutually translatable superstructures." But then he adds: “Contemporaries of the French Revolution were aware of this, and that this is of the greatest interest"60; that is, again, what, above all, strikes Gramsci with regard to this reciprocal translatability is the specific “awareness"一namely, the inauguration of the unity of theory and praxis.
葛兰西的两种论证在《民族文化之相互翻译性》（第八笔记本，附注 208）中交织得非常清晰，这是一篇非常密集的文本。葛兰西在阅读克罗齐的《批判对话录》中的一篇文章时，发现了马克思在《神圣家族》中“法国政治语言等同于德国哲学语言”的论述来源。58 该来源涉及黑格尔《历史哲学讲义》和《哲学史讲义》中分别包含的两段文字。然而，对葛兰西来说，比从史学角度考察两种语言的翻译性更有趣的是另一个方面：在黑格尔的著作中，他指出，德国人将自我意识的原则理解为“平静的理论”，而法国人却将其理解为革命性的。 在黑格尔文本中，葛兰西看到了《关于费尔巴哈的提纲》中“思想之源”，即哲学家们只是解释了世界，现在我们需要改变它——换言之，哲学必须成为“政治”（即“实践”）才能继续作为哲学：这是“理论与‘实践’统一”理论的“源泉”。59 葛兰西认为这一点至关重要（“在我看来……重要得多”），尽管该注释以“主题的标題”为主题结尾，即“两种类似的结构具有等同且相互可翻译的超结构”。但他随后补充道：“法国大革命的同代人意识到了这一点，这极具意义”60；也就是说，葛兰西最关注的是这种相互可翻译性背后的特定“意识”——即理论与实践统一的开端。

The translation of Hegelianism into Marxism acquires, in the light of what we have seen thus far, a precise meaning: this translation is possible because we already find in Hegel a new conception of philosophy一that is, we find the capability of translating the abstract-concrete that later becomes the identity of theory and praxis. Moreover, we have the key to understand why, at some point, Gramsci denies the possibility of translating traditional philosophies within historical materialism. This key is in the first note of the second series of the “Notes on Philosophy."61 Gramsci says that the “translation of the terms of one philosophical system into the terms of another” has limits: “such translation is possible within traditional philosophy, whereas it is not possible to translate traditional philosophy into the terms of historical materialism." At first sight, one cannot understand why. Moreover, the reason provided by Gramsci proves nothing. Gramsci states that “the principle of reciprocal translatability is a ‘critical5 element of historical materialism, inasmuch as it presupposes or postulates that a given stage of the civilization has a ‘basically identical5 cultural and philosophical expression, even though the language of the expression varies depending on the particular tradition of each ‘nation’ or each philosophical system."62 This is the historiographical principle of historical materialism: if the structure is the same, the superstructures are reciprocally equivalent, and, in this sense, they are translatable. But this consideration is not firm; if we take into account that historical materialism is also a superstructure一 namely, it reflects an epoch一and is not necessarily the only way to reflect it. Gramsci affirmed this in Notebook 4 by saying that historical materialism is “provisional"一namely, that it “reflects the realm of necessity" with its conflicts一and it will be overcome, whereas idealism could “become ‘truth’ after the transition from one realm [necessity] to the other [freedom]."63 Historical materialism shares the nature and the destiny of the superstructures and is subjected, we may add, to the same conditions of translatability.
在迄今为止的考察中，黑格尔主义向马克思主义的翻译获得明确的意义：这种翻译之所以可能，是因为我们已经在黑格尔那里发现了哲学的新概念——即发现了后来成为理论与实践同一性的抽象—具体概念。此外，我们还掌握了理解为什么在某些时候葛兰西否认将传统哲学翻译到历史唯物主义之内的关键。这个关键在于《哲学笔记》第二辑的第一篇笔记。葛兰西指出，“一种哲学体系的术语翻译到另一种哲学体系的术语中”是有局限性的：“这种翻译在传统哲学内部是可能的，然而将传统哲学翻译到历史唯物主义的术语中是不可能的”。乍一看，人们难以理解其原因。此外，葛兰西给出的理由并不能证明什么。 葛兰西指出，“相互可译性原则”是历史唯物主义的“关键性要素”，因为它预设或假定一个文明阶段拥有“基本相同”的文化和哲学表达，尽管表达方式因每个“民族”或哲学体系的特定传统而异。62 这是历史唯物主义的历史学原则：如果结构相同，上层建筑则相互等价，因此在某种意义上是可译的。但这并非坚不可摧；如果考虑到历史唯物主义本身也是一个上层建筑——即，它反映了一个时代——并且并非反映该时代的唯一方式，那么情况就不一样了。葛兰西在笔记 4 中就此声明，历史唯物主义是“暂时的”——即，它“反映了具有冲突的必然性领域”——并且它终将被克服，而唯心主义则可能在从一个领域[必然性]过渡到另一个领域[自由]之后“成为‘真理’”。63 历史唯物主义与上层建筑具有相同的性质和命运，并且，我们可以补充说，它也受制于相同的可翻译性条件。

Yet what limits the translatability between “traditional philosophy" and historical materialism is something more intrinsic: it is the new way of philosophizing, the affirmation of the identity of theory and praxis, and the conception of philosophy as philosophy of praxis, that creates a discontinuity. However, in this way, Gramsci confirms the possibility of, at least, translating between Hegel’s philosophy of history and Marxism. In addition, the difference in the way of conceiving philosophy will not impede, as we will see, other retrievals一namely, other translations.
然而，“传统哲学”与历史唯物主义之间翻译的限制在于更内在的因素：新的哲学思考方式、理论与实践同一性的肯定以及将哲学视为实践哲学的观念，造成了断裂。然而，正是在这种方式下，葛兰西证实了至少在黑格尔的历史哲学与马克思主义之间进行翻译的可能性。此外，哲学观念差异不会阻碍，正如我们将看到的，其他再现——即其他翻译。

Looking now at the relationship between the translatability and the historicity of languages, still in Notebook 7, note 2, in a very brief note on the translatability of scientific and philosophical languages, Gramsci recalls that Lenin, in 1921, “said and wrote: ‘We have not been able to “translate" our language into the “European" languages.'"64 Gramsci refers to a resolution of the Third Congress of the Communist International that Lenin argued was “entirely based on Russian conditions,” and, therefore, as incomprehensible and inapplicable to "foreigners.”65
现在来看语言的可译性与历史性之间的关系，仍然在笔记本 7，注释 2 中，关于科学和哲学语言的可译性的一段简短笔记中，葛兰西回忆列宁 1921 年曾“说并写道：‘我们未能将我们的语言“翻译”成“欧洲”语言。’”64 葛兰西指的是共产国际第三次代表大会的一项决议，列宁认为该决议“完全基于俄罗斯的条件”，因此对“外国人”来说是不可理解和不适用的。65

All this might be reduced to the problem of the reception of Leninism in various countries. The need of translating then would be the expression of the necessity of adapting a discourse valid per se—that is, “universal” for different conditions. Yet, later, in a subsequent note (note 3, Notebook 7), one can see that the horizon widens, in the sense that Gramsci rejects every language that pretends to be universal. The “tendency to construct an Esperanto or Volapük of philosophy and of science” depends on the incomprehension of the “historicity of languages and hence of ideologies and scientific opinions." Whoever rejects the historicity of languages and wants to turn away from the necessity of continuously translating is like the one who believes that logic and epistemology “exist in and for themselves, abstracted from concrete thought and from particular concrete sciences,” and that language resides “in the dictionaries and grammar books” and technique “detached from work." A universal language (a Volapük) of philosophy would naturally annihilate as “delirium” and “prejudice” everything that has been said in other languages, that is, in the historical languages.66 A “form of thought" that deems itself as "'true,'" Gramsci adds in Notebook 11, in note 45,67 can (and must) “combat other forms of thought,” but it must do it “critically,” and with an historicist attitude.
所有这一切或许都可以归结为列宁主义在不同国家中的接受问题。翻译的必要性体现了需要将一个本身有效的（即，对不同条件而言“普遍的”）话语进行调整。然而，稍后，在随后的注释（笔记 7，注释 3）中，人们可以看到视野在扩展，因为葛兰西拒绝任何声称具有普遍性的语言。这种“构建哲学和科学的伊斯佩兰托语或沃拉普克语的倾向”源于对“语言的历史性，以及由此而来的意识形态和科学观点的历史性”的误解。任何拒绝语言的历史性并试图摆脱持续翻译必要性的人，都如同相信逻辑和认识论“存在于自身之中，从具体的思想和具体的科学中抽象出来”，并且语言“存在于词典和语法书中”，技术“脱离了工作”。哲学的普遍语言（一种沃拉普克语）自然会将其他语言（即，历史语言）中所说的一切视为“妄想”和“偏见”，予以消灭。葛兰西在第 11 本笔记，第 45 条注释中补充道，一种认为自己是“真理”的“思维方式”，（必须）“与其他思维方式对抗”，但必须以“批判性”和历史主义的态度进行。

Immediately afterwards, in Notebook 11, Gramsci begins a group of notes entitled “Translatability of Scientific and Philosophical Languages." After having copied the already-cited note on Lenin (Q11§46), he recapitulates a series of already-posited problems and then says:
紧接着，在笔记本 11 中，葛兰西开始了一组题为“科学和哲学语言的可翻译性”的笔记。在抄录了先前引用的关于列宁的笔记（Q11§46）之后，他总结了一系列已提出的问题，然后说道：

Thus it is to be seen whether one can translate between expressions of different stages of civilisation, in so far as each of these stages is a moment of the development of another, one thus mutually integrating the other, or whether a given expression may be translated using the terms of a previous stage of the same civilisation, a previous stage which however is more comprehensible than the given language etc.68
因此，必须考察是否能够在不同文明阶段的表达之间进行翻译，因为每个阶段都是另一个阶段发展的一个时刻，从而相互融合；或者说，是否可以使用同一文明先前阶段的术语来翻译给定表达，而该先前阶段比给定语言更易理解等等。

Beyond Marx's historiographic method based on the structuresuperstructure relationship, Gramsci fully retrieves, in the name of the historicity of languages, the possibility of diachronic translation and the use of terms (and concepts) of previous epochs without any limitations. He rules out any definitive way of speaking, that is, he rules out being able to do without further revisions and continuous translations.
超越马克思基于结构—上层建筑关系的历史学方法，葛兰西以语言的历史性之名，充分恢复了历时翻译的可能性，并允许无限制地使用先前时代的术语（和概念）。他排斥任何最终的说话方式，也就是说，他排斥无需进一步修订和持续翻译的可能性。

Marxism, initially, appeared to us as a translation of Hegel’s philosophy of history and its fundamental terms turned out to be metaphors insofar as they were derived from previous philosophies and were found in different areas of the culture of the time. But eventually Marxism seems to fully coincide with the historicist view of language. Caught in the continuous transition from old into new meanings, in the inevitable margin between “literary form” and content, Marxism will require a continuous engagement with interpretation that is the continuous work of translation.69
马克思主义，起初，在我们看来，是黑格尔历史哲学的翻译，其基本术语最终被证明是隐喻，因为它们源于先前的哲学，并出现在当时不同文化领域。但最终，马克思主义似乎完全符合历史主义的语言观。被困于旧意义向新意义的持续转变之中，在“文学形式”与内容之间不可避免的边缘地带，马克思主义将需要持续的诠释工作，这正是翻译的持续工作。

The Translation of Marx into Gentile and Croce’s Terms
马克思主义在詹姆士和克罗齐语境下的翻译

It is a matter of fact that Gramsci’s approach to Marx’s texts is influenced by Gentile and Croce’s readings of Marx. Gramsci’s many references, in the Notebooks, to Materialismo storico ed economia marxistica70 [Historical Materialism and Marxist Economics] and to Croce’s subsequent interventions are well known. The relationship between Gramsci and Gentile’s Filosofia di Marx [Philosophy of Marx] is much less studied.71 Yet it is enough to carefully read Gentile’s text to become aware that many crucial elements of Gramsci’s interpretation of historical materialism—from his critique of the concept of materialism to the question of “monism”一 come from Gentile himself.72
格拉姆斯基对马克思文本的解读受詹蒂莱和克罗齐对马克思的解读影响，这是不争的事实。格拉姆斯基在《狱中札记》中多次提及《历史唯物主义与马克思主义经济学》以及克罗齐的后续论述，这已为人所知。格拉姆斯基与詹蒂莱的《马克思哲学》之间的关系则鲜有研究。然而，仔细阅读詹蒂莱的文本便会发现，格拉姆斯基对历史唯物主义的解读，从他对唯物主义概念的批判到“一元论”问题，许多关键要素都源于詹蒂莱本人。

Here, however, we will not deal with the subject of Gramsci’s idealism. We only want to show how he feels the need to translate Marx’s text into another language—into the language of idealism and actualism—in order to make it understandable for himself.73 Yet the point I want to demonstrate is that the character of Gramsci’s work of translation is preeminently relative and provisional. The terms that Gramsci uses to clarify the pivotal points of historical materialism are just conceptual references, from which he later distances himself. The impression that one gets is that, in his work of translation, Gramsci eludes a true conceptual definition of those theoretical pivots. However, Gramsci’s nonconclusiveness cannot be due only to the fragmented nature of the Notebooks nor to Gramsci’s supposed theoretical limits; Gramsci’s reflection leads, instead, to the conclusion that a true conceptual definition of those pivotal points is impossible in the framework of the philosophy of praxis.
然而，我们在此不探讨葛兰西的唯心主义。我们只想说明，他为何需要将马克思的文本翻译成另一种语言——唯心主义和现实主义的语言——以便使其能够被自己理解。73 但我想论证的是，葛兰西的翻译工作具有明显的相对性和暂时性。葛兰西用来阐明历史唯物主义关键点的术语，仅仅是概念上的参考，他后来会与之疏离。人们的印象是，在翻译工作中，葛兰西回避了对这些理论支点的真正概念定义。然而，葛兰西的非结论性，并非仅仅因为“狱中札记”的片段性质，或者葛兰西所谓的理论局限；相反，葛兰西的思考导致了这样的结论：在实践哲学的框架内，对这些关键点的真正概念定义是不可能的。

First, we must examine how, in Notebook 4, Gramsci interprets the statement contained in Marx’s 1859 preface that humans become aware of conflicts on the level of ideology.74 Then, we must examine what consequences he derives from his interpretation of the preface with regard to the structure-superstructure relationship. In note 15, entitled Croce and Marx, Gramsci says, “The most interesting point to examine concerns ‘ideologies5 and their value.” The superstructures for Marx are not “appearances and illusions” as Croce claims; they “are an objective and operative reality.”75 According to Gramsci, the proof is the following: “Marx explicitly states that humans become conscious of their tasks on the ideological terrain of the superstructures, which is hardly a minor affirmation of 'reality.'" Yet, so far, Gramsci has not explained how and in what sense Marx's statement allows us to see the structure-superstructure relationship. Gramsci only says that the superstructures have a “concrete value” in Marx and that there is an essential connection between structure and superstructure. This connection is not clarified by the parallel made by Gramsci: “If humans become conscious of their task on the terrain of superstructures, it means that there is a necessary vital connection between structure and superstructures, just as there is between the skin and the skeleton in the human body."76
首先，我们必须考察葛兰西在《笔记四》中如何解读马克思 1859 年《序言》中关于人类在意识形态层面意识到冲突的论述。74 然后，我们必须考察他如何从对《序言》的解读中推导出关于结构与上层建筑关系的结论。在题为“克罗齐与马克思”的笔记 15 中，葛兰西写道：“最值得考察的点在于‘意识形态’及其价值。”75 对马克思而言，上层建筑并非克罗齐所称的“表象和幻觉”；它们是“客观且有效的现实”。75 葛兰西认为，证明如下：“马克思明确指出，人类在其所处的上层建筑意识形态领域中意识到自己的任务，这几乎是对‘现实’的非凡肯定。”然而，到目前为止，葛兰西尚未解释马克思的论述如何以及在何种意义上让我们理解结构与上层建筑的关系。葛兰西只说上层建筑在马克思那里具有“现实的价值”，并且结构与上层建筑之间存在着本质联系。 葛兰西的类比并未阐明这种联系：“如果人类在上层建筑领域意识到自己的任务，那就意味着结构与上层建筑之间存在着必要的生命联系，就像人体的皮肤与骨骼之间一样。76

After some considerations, which have a provisional or nondecisive character,77 in note 37, Gramsci deals with this subject starting from the question on the objectivity of knowledge. Gramsci cites again the sentence of Marx's 1859 preface and asks himself: is the consciousness human beings gain on the terrain of ideology “limited solely to the conflict between material forces of production and the relationships of production一 as Marx's text literally states一or does it apply to all consciousness, that is, to all knowledge"?78 Gramsci's interpretation naturally follows the latter direction from which springs an extremely dense and implicit reasoning that it is worth referring to in its entirety:
经过一些具有暂定或非决定性特征的考虑，在注 37 中，葛兰西从知识客观性的问题出发来探讨这一主题。葛兰西再次引用了马克思 1859 年序言中的那句话，并自问：人类在意识形态领域获得的意识，“仅仅局限于生产力与生产关系之间的冲突——正如马克思的原文所述——还是适用于所有意识，也就是说，适用于所有知识”？葛兰西的解读自然地遵循了后一种方向，由此产生了一种极其密集且隐含的推理，值得完整地参考。

How is “monism” to be understood in this context? It is obviously neither idealistic nor materialistic “monism,” neither “Matter” nor "Spirit,” but rather “historical materialism,,f that is to say, concrete human activity (history): namely, activity concerning a certain organized “matter” (material forces of production) and the transformed “nature” of man. Philosophy of the act (praxis), not of the “pure act” but rather of the “impure”一that is, the real一act, in the most secular sense of the word.
在这个语境下，“唯物主义”该如何理解？它显然既不是唯心主义的“唯物主义”，也不是唯物主义的“唯物主义”，既不是“物质”，也不是“精神”，而是“历史唯物主义”，也就是说，具体的实践活动（历史）：即关于特定组织的“物质”（生产力）以及人类自身被改造的“自然”的活动。行动（实践）的哲学，不是“纯粹行动”的哲学，而是“不纯粹”的——也就是说，真实的——行动的哲学，用最世俗的意义来说。

First of all, Gramsci takes for granted a certain “monism” that in some way emanates from the structure-superstructure relationship because only in this way can he understand the historical process. Gramsci needs this concept (derived from the reading that he is critical of, and which is part of his cultural heritage) to show a particular type of relationship. That is the relationship between consciousness, or human activity, on the one hand, and “matter” or "nature” on the other. But later, in order to clarify this crucial point, Gramsci has recourse to the philosophy of the act. If we want to understand the “philosophy of praxis” in depth, we can call it the philosophy of the act (this is what Gramsci means). But this definition immediately turns out to be provisional; it is an indispensable, conceptual point of reference一so it seems一but it is necessary to detach oneself from it. We must not talk about a pure act but, rather, about an “impure”一 namely, concrete (i.e., historical)一act.79
首先，葛兰西假定了一种某种程度上源于结构—上层建筑关系的“单一论”，因为只有这样他才能理解历史进程。葛兰西需要这个概念（源于他批判性阅读的对象，也是他文化遗产的一部分）来展现一种特殊的关系，即意识或人类活动与“物质”或“自然”之间的关系。但后来，为了阐明这一点，葛兰西求助于行动哲学。如果我们想深入理解“实践哲学”，我们可以称之为行动哲学（这就是葛兰西的含义）。但这个定义立刻被证明是暂时的；它似乎是一个必不可少的、概念性的参照点，但有必要摆脱它。我们不应谈论纯粹的行动，而应谈论“不纯粹的”——即具体的（亦即历史的）行动。

This line of reasoning ends in the next note, note 38, where he goes back to Marx’s statement “that humans become conscious of the fundamental conflicts on the terrain of ideologies." According to Gramsci, Marx’s statement has an “organic" value一namely, is an “epistemological" and not a “psychological" and "moral thesis."80 Gramsci never truly explains this difference. What he might want to say, however, is evidently that subjectivity, namely consciousness, has a nonderived character with respect to the objective conditions. One should be able to start from the subject as well as from the object, that is, from consciousness as well as reality, in explaining (in a unified way) the historical process.
这一论证在下一注，注 38 中结束，他在其中回到了马克思的论述：“人类在意识形态领域意识到根本冲突。”根据葛兰西，马克思的论述具有“有机”的价值——即，它是一个“认识论”的命题，而非“心理学”或“道德”的命题。80 葛兰西从未真正解释过这种区别。然而，他可能想要表达的意思显然是，主体性，即意识，相对于客观条件而言具有非衍生的特性。在解释（以统一的方式）历史进程时，应该能够从主体出发，也能够从客体出发，也就是说，从意识以及现实出发。

Let us now take up the problem of the unity of process and of its distinctions. In Q7§2, Gramsci says that the theory of structure and superstructure does not reintroduce a “theological dualism," as Croce maintains. The "detachment" between structure and superstructure is dialectical as well as the detachment “between thesis and antithesis." The superstructure “reacts dialectically to the structure."81 If so, however, Gramsci says, Marx “affirms in ‘realistic’ terms, a negation of the negation”； this is a movement that warrants “the unity of the process of the real.” Hence, Gramsci appeals to Croce’s theory of distincts even though he doesn’t agree with the expression “dialectic of distincts." The conception structure-superstructure does not lead to the “fragmentation [disgregazione] of the process of reality"82; therefore, one can speak of “distinction" in the same way that Croce speaks of distinctions between the “activities of the spirit." After all, Croce himself has been accused of the “fragmentation of the process of reality" by “the followers of Gentile."83
现在让我们探讨过程的统一性和差异性问题。在 Q7§2 中，葛兰西指出，结构与上层建筑的理论并非如克罗齐所言，重新引入了“神学二元论”。结构与上层建筑之间的“分离”既是辩证的，如同“论题与反题”之间的分离一样。上层建筑“对结构进行辩证的反作用”。81  如果如此，葛兰西说，马克思以“现实主义”的术语“肯定了否定之否定”；这是一个保证“现实过程的统一性”的运动。因此，葛兰西虽然不同意“差异的辩证法”这个说法，却诉诸克罗齐的差异理论。结构—上层建筑的概念不会导致现实过程的“碎片化（disgregazione）”82；因此，我们可以像克罗齐谈论“精神活动”的差异一样，谈论“差异”。毕竟，克罗齐本人也曾被“詹蒂莱的追随者”指责为“现实过程的碎片化”83。

Yet it seems that a more radical translation is needed: the concept of “historical bloc," through which Gramsci designates the indissoluble unity of structure and superstructure, must be viewed一he says一as “the philosophical equivalent of the ‘spirit’ of Croce’s philosophy." The “spirit" refers precisely to a unified process, within which all the dialectical oppositions and distinctions can be re-embraced. The “philosophical equivalent" allows us to understand that the causations within the historical bloc do not go one way starting from the material conditions. One must speak of a “dialectical activity and a process of distinction" within the historical bloc, and this “does not mean negating its real unity."84
然而，似乎需要更激进的翻译：葛兰西用“历史块”概念来指称结构与上层建筑的不可分割统一性，他认为，这一概念必须被视为“克罗齐哲学的‘精神’的哲学等价物”。“精神”恰恰指的是一个统一的过程，在这个过程中，所有辩证的矛盾和区别都可以被重新包容。“哲学等价物”使我们理解，历史块内的因果关系并非单向地从物质条件出发。我们必须谈论历史块内的“辩证活动和区分过程”，而这“并不意味着否定其真实的统一性”。

Finally, in note 25, which is about the objectivity of reality, Gramsci affirms that what appears to us as “real" is, at the same time, a historical construction, and vice versa. From this, he derives the courageous conclusion that “the rational and the real become one and the same thing."85 As he adds, “it seems to me that unless one understanding this relationship, it would be impossible to understand historical materialism, its philosophical position vis-à-vis traditional materialism and idealism, and the importance and significance of superstructures." The structuresuperstructure relationship and the unity of the process gain clarity when they are connected to Hegel’s Idea, which, as it is known, is the synthesis of the rational and the real:
最后，在第 25 注中，关于现实的客观性，葛兰西断言，在我们看来“真实”的事物，同时也是一种历史建构，反之亦然。由此，他得出“理性和现实合而为一”的勇敢结论。85 他补充道，“在我看来，如果不理解这种关系，就无法理解历史唯物主义，它与传统唯物主义和唯心主义的哲学立场，以及上层建筑的重要性。”当将结构—上层建筑关系和过程的统一性与黑格尔的“理念”联系起来时，便会更加清晰。“理念”，众所周知，是理性与现实的统一：

Notwithstanding what Croce says, Marx did not replace the Hegelian “idea" with the “concept" of structure. The Hegelian idea is [resolved] both in the structure and in the superstructures, and the whole [traditional (and not just Hegelian)] conception of philosophy is “historicized"; it has been made a reality by a different linguistic articulation and therefore by a different philosophy 一[if] philosophy is taken to mean [a system of] “concepts" concerning reality.86
尽管克罗齐的观点认为，马克思并未用“结构”的概念取代黑格尔的“观念”，但黑格尔的观念却既体现在结构中，也体现在上层建筑中，整个（不仅限于黑格尔的）传统哲学观念都被“历史化”了；它通过不同的语言表达方式，进而通过不同的哲学得以实现——如果哲学被理解为关于现实的“概念体系”。86

This tormented passage is an example of another radical translation; if, initially, the unity of the process found its ultimate expression in the philosophy of the act, now the Hegelian idea comes into play, and later it will be the relationship between “nature” and "spirit,” as we will see.87
这段饱受折磨的文字是另一次激进翻译的例子；如果最初，该过程的统一性在其行动哲学中找到了最终的表达，那么现在黑格尔的思想开始发挥作用，之后，我们将看到，“自然”与“精神”之间的关系将成为焦点。87

In Q8§61, the structure-superstructure relationship is again explained in terms of “distinction." As Gramsci says, referring to the problem of the autonomy of politics, “Croce’s approach is based on his distinction of the moments of the spirit and his affirmation of a moment of practice一a practical spirit that is autonomous and independent, albeit circularly linked to all of reality through the mediation of the dialectic of distincts.” However, the concept of distinction can be transferred into the philosophy of praxis, "wherein everything is practice, the distinction will not be between moments of the absolute spirit but between structure and superstructures; it will be a question of establishing the dialectical position of political activity as distinction within the superstructures. One might say that political activity is, precisely, the first moment or first level of the superstructure.”88
在 Q8§61 中，结构与上层建筑的关系再次以“区分”来解释。正如葛兰西所说，谈到政治自主性问题，“克罗齐的方法基于他对精神各个阶段的区分，以及他所肯定的实践的时刻——一个虽然通过辩证法与所有现实循环相联，但却是自主且独立的实践精神”。然而，区分的概念可以转移到实践哲学中，“在一切皆为实践的地方，区分将不再是绝对精神各个阶段之间的区分，而是结构与上层建筑之间的区分；这将是确定政治活动在作为上层建筑内部区分的辩证法位置的问题。可以说，政治活动恰恰是上层建筑的第一个时刻或第一个层面。”88

It can be said that “all of life is politics,” but “the whole system of superstructures” can be conceived as a system of “political distinctions.” However, here we see Gramsci’s explicit and wanted "introduction of the concept of distinction in the philosophy of praxis.” The concept of “historical bloc” will mean a “unity of opposites and of distincts.” These distincts will also introduce themselves in the structure ("technique, science, work, class, etc.”). Everything seems clear, in Gramsci’s architecture, but it is not; in fact, in order to justify the unity of the process in definitive terms, Gramsci must call the historical bloc a “unity between nature and spirit.” In this sense, the structure ceases to appear as a “hidden god"一a "noumenon"一and to be opposed to the "superstructures as 'appearances.'”89
可以说“人生皆政治”，但“全部上层建筑体系”可以被理解为“政治区分”体系。然而，我们在此看到葛兰西明确且有意地“将区分概念引入实践哲学”。“历史块”的概念将意味着“对立面和不同之物的统一”。这些不同之处也将体现在结构中（“技术、科学、劳动、阶级等”）。在葛兰西的架构中，一切似乎清晰明了，但并非如此；事实上，为了以最终的方式论证过程的统一性，葛兰西必须将历史块称作“自然与精神之间的统一”。从这个意义上说，结构不再像“隐藏的神”——“物自体”——那样，也不再与“上层建筑作为‘表象’”相对立。

We have already seen how Gramsci translates Engels’s statement about the worker’s movement, the "inheritor of classical German philosophy," in terms of an "identification of philosophy with history, action with thought,"90 and how he derives, from the XI Thesis on Feuerbach, the consequence that philosophy must become "politics"一namely, "practice.”91
我们已经看到葛兰西如何将恩格斯关于工人运动是“古典德国哲学的继承者”的论述翻译为“将哲学与历史、行动与思想等同起来”90，以及他如何从费尔巴哈第十一论题推导出哲学必须成为“政治”——即“实践”91 的结论。

In Q7§35, Gramsci translates Engels’s statement in more radically actualistic terms: Gramsci enunciates the identity (or “equality”)，inside historical materialism, between “philosophy and politics,” that is, between “thought and action”； this is what the expression “philosophy of praxis” means. “Everything is political, even philosophy or philosophies . . . and the only ‘philosophy5 is history in action, life itself." As Gramsci adds, “It is in this sense that one can interpret the thesis that the German proletariat was the heir of classical German classical philosophy."92
在 Q7§35 中，葛兰西以更激进的现实主义方式翻译了恩格斯的陈述：葛兰西在历史唯物主义内部阐明了“哲学与政治”、即“思想与行动”之间的同一性（或“平等”）；这就是“实践哲学”这个表达的含义。“一切都是政治的，即使是哲学或诸哲学……而唯一的‘哲学’是行动中的历史，是生命本身。”正如葛兰西补充的那样，“从这个意义上说，人们可以解释德国无产阶级是古典德国古典哲学的继承者的论断。”

Yet Gramsci must return to this topic and sensitively modify his own position taking into account Croce’s thesis about the Glosse al Feuerbach [Glosses on Feuerbach],93 that “one cannot speak of Marx as a philosopher and therefore one cannot speak of a Marxist philosophy since what Marx proposed was, precisely, to turn philosophy upside down一not just Hegel’s philosophy but philosophy as a whole一and to replace philosophizing with practical activity, etc."94 But how to interpret a unity of theory and praxis in which theory continues to survive as theory? How can theory become practice without becoming annihilated in practice? Gramsci finds himself in a difficult situation. He says that one should “research, study, and critique" the various solutions given to the relationship between theory and practice in the history of philosophy.95 Here, Gramsci is thinking of the scholastic concept (intellect “extensione fit practicus" [by simple extension becomes practice]一that is, he is thinking of Leibniz, and of the verum ipsum factum [the true and the made are the same] by Vico. Gramsci goes back to Croce’s text about the Glosses [Theses] and develops it to some extent in Q11§54.96
然而，葛兰西必须回到这一主题，并敏感地修正自身立场，考虑到克罗齐关于《对费尔巴哈的札记》的论点，即“不能将马克思视为哲学家，因此也不能谈论马克思主义哲学，因为马克思所提出的，恰恰是将哲学颠倒过来——不仅是黑格尔的哲学，而是整个哲学——并用实践活动取代哲学思辨，等等。” 但是，如何在理论与实践的统一中，让理论继续作为理论存在？理论如何转化为实践，而不被实践所湮灭？葛兰西陷入了困境。他说，应该“研究、学习和批判”哲学史上关于理论与实践关系的各种解决方案。 这里，葛兰西想到的是经院哲学的概念（智力“extensione fit practicus”——即，简单地扩展就成为实践——他想到莱布尼茨，以及维柯的“真即制”）。葛兰西回到克罗齐关于《札记》的文本，并在 Q11§54 中对其有所发展。

In Q10§31, Gramsci again references Croce’s reading of the Glosses on Feuerbach in a discourse that focuses on Croce’s concept of “religion,” which understands “a conception of the world (i.e., a philosophy) with a norm of conduct that conforms to it.” Yet, Gramsci asks himself, can a philosophy exist “without a moral will that conforms to it”?97 How is it possible to conceive the “two aspects"一namely, “the philosophy and the norm of conduct” as “separated from each other”? According to Croce, in the Thesis on Feuerbach, Marx “did not so much turn Hegelian philosophy upside down as philosophy in general, every sort of philosophy； and supplanted philosophical by practical activity." Gramsci’s answer expresses a much less demanding and radical position with respect to the identification of philosophy and history than what we saw above. This claim is “opposed to ‘scholastic,’ purely theoretical or contemplative, philosophy.” It is in favor of “a philosophy that produces an ethic conformant to it, a will capable of becoming reality, and that is in the last analysis identified in it.”98 As one can see, Gramsci admits this identification only in the “last analysis." Thesis XI does not express “a gesture repudiating every type of
在 Q10§31 中，葛兰西再次提及克罗齐对《费尔巴哈提纲》的解读，其论述集中在克罗齐的“宗教”概念，即“一种世界观（即一种哲学），并伴随与其相符的行为规范”。然而，葛兰西自问，哲学能否“没有与其相符的道德意志”？97 如何将“哲学和行为规范”这两个方面视为“彼此分离”？根据克罗齐在《费尔巴哈提纲》中的观点，马克思“与其说是颠覆了黑格尔哲学，不如说是颠覆了一切哲学，所有类型的哲学；并用实践活动取代了哲学活动”。葛兰西的回答表达了一种相较于上述观点而言，对哲学与历史的同一性认同要求更低、更不激进的立场。这一主张“反对‘经院式的’，纯粹理论的或沉思的哲学”。它主张“一种产生与其相符的伦理、一种能够变为现实的意志，并且最终在其自身中得以认同的哲学”。98 正如我们所见，葛兰西承认这种认同仅在“最终分析”中存在。论文第十一章并非表达“一种拒绝所有类型的"

philosophy," but rather the “irritation towards philosophers and their parrotlike utterances." This thesis is only “the vigorous affirmation of a unity between theory and practice." Gramsci then shifts to Engels’s phrase about the proletariat heir一an heir that, according to Croce, “‘would rather than carrying on the work of its predecessor, undertake another, different and opposite in nature.’" The heir, Gramsci says, on the contrary, continues the work of the proletariat, “since it has deduced from mere contemplation an active will capable of transforming the world." It is true that Gramsci adds, “in this practical activity, there is also contained the ‘knowledge,’" but only in the sense that it is laid down in practical activity “is it ‘real knowledge5 and not ‘scholasticism.’"99 Gramsci is not decisive here. But we can certainly notice how Gramsci’s expressions, which echo Gentile’s actualism 一and even if for only a moment a concept is sharply defined—soon afterwards fail to work. Then Gramsci shifts to Croce’s “religion" as a model for the theory-practice relationship.
然而，这并非“哲学”，而是“对哲学家及其鹦鹉学舌般言论的恼怒”。这一论点仅仅是“理论与实践统一的强烈肯定”。葛兰西接着转向恩格斯关于无产阶级继承者的说法——根据克罗齐的说法，这个继承者“与其继续前任的工作，不如从事另一项性质不同且相反的工作”。葛兰西说，相反，这个继承者继续着无产阶级的实践，因为它“从单纯的沉思中推导出一种能够改变世界的积极意志”。诚然，葛兰西补充道，“在这项实践活动中，也包含着‘知识’”，但这仅仅是指它在实践活动中确立的“才是‘真正的知识’，而不是‘经院哲学’”。葛兰西在此并不坚决。但我们无疑可以注意到，葛兰西的表达，虽然回响着詹蒂勒的唯实际论——即使只是片刻，一个概念被清晰地界定——但很快便失效。然后，葛兰西转向克罗齐的“宗教”作为理论与实践关系的模型。

Conclusion 结论

In sum, through his critical work on Marx’s text, his recognition of the metaphors, his attempt to connect them to concepts, and his effort to make the theoretical connections of historical materialism understandable by translating them into another language, Gramsci does not reach any definitive solution in terms of “theory."
总而言之，通过他对马克思文本的批判性研究，对隐喻的识别，尝试将它们与概念联系起来，以及努力将历史唯物主义的理论联系翻译成另一种语言，葛兰西并没有在“理论”方面得出任何确定的解决方案。

This does not mean that Gramsci’s reading undermines Marx, inviting us to turn our backs on Marxism. On the contrary, it might be the only way of dealing with Marx which is still feasible. One can talk about an active and live relationship with Marx’s thought only to the extent that one finds more or less defined problematics in Marx’s metaphors which have unspecified limits, but which are still meaningful to us, and to the extent that Marx’s terms will turn out to be translatable in some way and that we are interested in translating them.
这并不意味着葛兰西的解读削弱了马克思，促使我们抛弃马克思主义。相反，这或许是唯一可行的方法来处理马克思。只有在一定程度上，我们能够在马克思的隐喻中找到或多或少明确的问题，这些隐喻具有未指明的界限，但对我们仍然有意义；并且在一定程度上，马克思的术语能够以某种方式被翻译，并且我们对翻译它们感兴趣，我们才能谈论与马克思思想的积极而活跃的关系。

Yet we have to hint at a basic problem contained in this impossibility of theoretically defining the connections of the philosophy of praxis. Gramsci is aware of the classic objection people make to those who negate philosophy: philosophy cannot be denied without, at the same time, philosophizing and, therefore, reaffirming it.100 Why didn’t Croce refute Marx with this same argument after having accused Marx of having substituted philosophy with practical activity? Why, Gramsci asks himself, did Croce not use “the peremptory argument that philosophy cannot be negated except by engaging in it, i.e. by reaffirming what one wished to deny.” The consequence inferred by Gramsci is that Marx does not negate philosophy, that is, he does not properly want to “supplant” philosophy with practice but, rather, he wants to construct a philosophy of praxis. Croce recognized this requirement as valid in the case of Antonio Labriola.101
然而，我们必须暗示这种理论上无法定义实践哲学联系的基本问题。葛兰西意识到人们对那些否定哲学的人提出的经典反对意见：否定哲学，同时也在进行哲学思考，从而肯定了哲学。100 为什么在指责马克思用实践活动取代哲学之后，克罗齐没有用同样的论据反驳马克思？葛兰西自问，为什么克罗齐没有使用“只有通过从事哲学，即通过重申自己想要否定的事物，才能否定哲学”的断然论据？葛兰西由此推论，马克思并非否定哲学，也就是说，他并非真正想要用实践来“取代”哲学，而是想要构建一种实践哲学。克罗齐承认，安东尼奥·拉布里奥拉的情况符合这一要求。101

Yet the argument can be proposed again: are the affirmations made in the sphere and from the viewpoint of a philosophy of praxis theoretical or theoretico-practical? To what extent can they be assumed and analyzed in their logical-conceptual aspect?
然而，再次提出论点：实践哲学的声明，以及从实践哲学的视角提出的声明，是理论性的还是理论实践性的？在多大程度上，我们可以从逻辑概念的角度假设和分析它们？

Should not their truth be searched for elsewhere—namely, in the praxis in which they “realize” themselves, in this historical content they express and in the continuous “translation” that they perform between the concrete and the abstract?
难道他们的真理不应在别处寻找——即，在他们“实现”自身的实践中，在他们表达的历史语境中，以及他们在具体与抽象之间持续的“翻译”中吗？

In Q10§41,102 Gramsci asks himself about the difference between the solution of a conceptual connection in theoretical terms and that solution in historical terms. He asks himself this with respect to the distincts and the opposites and to the relationship that must be posited between the “politico-economic moment” and the “other historical activities.” How is a relationship “which is not that of ‘implication in the unity of the spirit’” to be defined? Gramsci asks himself, will “a speculative solution of these problems” exist, or is only a “historical one” possible?103 At first, Gramsci seems to look for it, that is, for a theoretical or logical solution through the confrontation of Croce and Gentile’s positions. On the contrary, later, he abandons the two philosophers to their quarrels over the opposites and the distincts because they both have “made Hegel more abstract.” To come back to Hegel means again finding the historical content (“the vital and immediate experiences of a most intense historical period”)104 that his philosophy expresses. Thus, the conceptual distinctions reveal themselves as unimportant with respect to that diverse test of truth constituted by the translation of the abstract into the historically concrete. For this reason, since, in Hegel, the abstract translates the historically concrete, as we have seen, his philosophy is the premise of the philosophy of praxis in which the reciprocal translation of theory into praxis becomes identification. But if the test of truth consists of shifting to praxis, namely, to history, it is evident that we cannot expect anything conclusive on the level of “theory.”
在 Q10§41,102 中，葛兰西自问理论层面上的概念联系的解决方式与历史层面上的解决方式有何不同。他针对“差异”和“对立”，以及“政治经济时刻”与“其他历史活动”之间的关系提出了这个问题。如何界定一种“并非‘精神统一中的蕴含’的关系”？葛兰西自问，这些问题的“思辨性解决”是否存在，或者只有“历史性解决”才可能？103 起初，葛兰西似乎在寻找，即通过对克罗齐和詹蒂莱立场进行比较，寻找理论或逻辑上的解决方案。相反，后来，他放弃了这两位哲学家关于差异和对立的争论，因为他们都“使黑格尔更加抽象化”。重返黑格尔意味着再次找到其哲学所表达的历史内容（“一个最为激烈的历史时期中充满活力和直接的经验”）104。 因此，在将抽象转化为历史具体这一多元的真理检验中，概念上的区分显得无关紧要。正因为如此，正如我们所见，在黑格尔那里，抽象翻译历史具体，他的哲学构成了实践哲学的前提，在实践哲学中，理论与实践的相互翻译成为同一。但是，如果真理的检验在于转向实践，即转向历史，那么我们显然不能指望在“理论”层面获得任何确切的结论。”

An analogous consideration can be made with regard to skepticism. Gramsci is aware that arguing in favor of the appearance (i.e., in favor of the nontruth) of the superstructures cannot be a general affirmation. On the contrary, it can concern only the single superstructures (i.e., single ideologies). To affirm, in general (i.e., as philosophical affirmation), the appearance and the nontruth of ideologies would mean affirming the appearance and the nontruth of the people making the argument. This would be self-refuting skepticism. But the assessment of the other ideologies is, for Gramsci, a theoretico-practical one—namely, a rather “practical act,” not a “philosophical act,” as he says in Q11§50.105 The same goes for his position: it must be maintained as "true” (in quotes in Gramsci) because, otherwise, one would slip into “skepticism” or agnosticism, “but it can be a specifically theoretical affirmation of one’s own 'truth'”： the “speculativity,” Gramsci says, in the philosophy of praxis is brought back “to its correct limits” negating that it is the “essential character of philosophy.”106 However, if the affirmation of a given “truth” is not specifically theoretical, but rather theoretico-practical, that is, inseparable from a will of historical affirmation, one will be unable to clarify any theoretical conceptions as such (keeping their logical form, their essence) unless they are translated almost instantly into different, “concrete,” historical-practical problems.
对怀疑论亦可作类比的考虑。葛兰西意识到，为上层建筑的表象（即为其非真理性）辩护，不能是一般肯定。相反，它只能关乎单一的上层建筑（即单一意识形态）。一般地（即作为哲学的肯定）肯定意识形态的表象和非真理性，就意味着肯定进行论证的人的表象和非真理性。这将是自我反驳的怀疑论。但葛兰西认为，对其他意识形态的评价，是一个理论—实践的评价——即一个相当的“实践行为”，而非“哲学行为”，正如他在 Q11§50.105 中所说。他的立场亦然：它必须被维持为“真实”（引号出于葛兰西），否则，就会滑入“怀疑论”或不可知论，“但它可以是对自身‘真理’的特定理论肯定”：葛兰西说，在实践哲学中，“思辨性”被拉回到“正确限度”，否定它为“哲学的本质特征”。106 但是，如果对某个“真理”的肯定并非纯粹的理论，而是理论—实践的，也就是说，与历史肯定的意志不可分割，那么，除非将这些理论观念几乎立刻翻译成不同的，“具体的”，历史—实践问题，否则就无法阐明这些理论观念本身（保持其逻辑形式、其本质）。

Notes 笔记

1. In paragraph 71, Wittgenstein says, “Is it even always an advantage to replace an indistinct picture by a sharp one?” If we compare the concept to an area, we can’t say that it has “vague boundaries." You cannot tell somebody “Stand roughly there” without tracing drawing some sort of “boundary.” The sharp image, the neatly defined concept that one, when drawing “a sharp boundary" (§76), cannot substitute for the blurry image, the faded and undetermined concept that occurs in our language games. Ludwig Wittgenstein, Philosophical Investigations, trans. G. E. M. Anscombe (New York: Macmillan, 1953), 34, 36.
1. 在第 71 段，维特根斯坦说道，“用清晰的图像取代模糊的图像，是否总是有利？”如果我们将概念比作一个区域，我们不能说它有“模糊的边界”。你不能对某人说“大致站在那里”，而不画出某种“边界”。清晰的图像，明确定义的概念，当绘制“清晰的边界”（§76）时，不能取代我们语言游戏中出现的模糊的图像、褪色和未确定的概念。路德维希·维特根斯坦，《哲学研究》，G. E. M. 安斯康姆译（纽约：麦克米伦，1953），34，36。

2. Nicola Badaloni. Il Problema dell'immanenza nella Filosofia Politica di Antonio Gramsci [The Problem of Immanence in Antonio Gramsci’s Political Philosophy] (Venice: Arsenale, 1988).
2. 尼可拉·巴达洛尼.  安东尼奥·葛兰西政治哲学中的内在性问题 [安东尼奥·葛兰西政治哲学中的内在性问题]（威尼斯：阿森纳尔，1988）。

3. Badaloni, Il problema, 36, 38-39.
3. 巴达洛尼，《问题》，36，38-39 页。

4. Even though this expression means nothing more than a “synthetic and eliptic formula," as Badaloni already stated in his earlier essay, Il Marxismo di Gramsci (Turin: Einaudi, 1975), 134.
4. 尽管正如巴达洛尼在其早先的论文《葛兰西的马克思主义》(都灵：艾纳迪，1975)，第 134 页所述，这个表达方式不过是一个“综合且省略的公式”。

5. Badaloni, Il problema, 22-23.
5. 巴达洛尼，《问题》，22-23 页。

6. Badaloni, Il problema, 7.
6. 巴达洛尼，《问题》，7。

7. Badaloni, Il problema, 38.
7. 巴达洛尼，《问题》，第 38 页。

8. Biagio de Giovanni, “Il Marx di Gramsci" [The Marx of Gramsci], in Marx oltre Marx, ed. Biagio de Giovanni and Gianfranco Pasquino (Bologna: Cappelli, 1985), 13.
8. 比阿吉奥·德·乔凡尼，“葛兰西眼中的马克思”，载于比阿吉奥·德·乔凡尼和吉安弗兰科·帕斯奎诺主编，《马克思超越马克思》（博洛尼亚：卡佩利出版社，1985），第 13 页。

9. de Giovanni, 14-16. 9. 德乔凡尼，14-16。

10. de Giovanni, 20-21. 10. 德乔万尼，20-21。

11. Antonio Gramsci, Further Selections from the Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Derek Boothman (Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1995), 318-19, hereafter cited as FSPN. There is a list of abbreviations on pages ix-x. Q10II§60. [To facilitate locating passages in various translations and anthologies, we use the standard method of providing the notebook (Quaderno) number一in this case 10, part II一followed by the section number, §. See the introduction, page 12, for discussion. We will indicate the English translation, if used.]
11. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》节选，德雷克·布思曼编、译 (明尼苏达大学出版社，1995)，318-19 页，以下简称《狱记》。书中附有缩写表，见 ix-x 页。Q10II§60。[为方便在各种译本和文集中查找引文，我们采用标准方法标注笔记本（Quaderno）编号——在本例中为 10，第二部分——以及章节编号，§。请参阅导言（第 12 页）了解更多讨论。我们将标明所使用的英文译本。]

12. We will not deal with the problem of the new function and sense that some notes assume in the new contexts, namely, this sphere concerning Gramsci’s engagement with Croce (Notebook 10) and in the thoroughly structured project ordered in sections of an “introduction to the study of philosophy" [introduzione allo studio della filosofia] that constitutes Notebook 11. On the chronology of the three series of “Notes on philosophy,” about the development of the “rubrics” and of the themes, see Gianni Francioni, L'Officina Gramsciana (Naples: Bibliopolis, 1984).
12. 我们不会处理一些笔记在新语境下假设的新功能和意义问题，即，关于葛兰西与克罗齐的互动（笔记本 10）以及构成“哲学研究导论”[introduzione allo studio della filosofia] 的、经过精心结构的、分章节的项目（笔记本 11）的这一领域。关于“哲学笔记”三辑的时间顺序，以及“栏目”和主题的发展，请参阅贾尼·弗朗奇奥尼的《葛兰西的工作坊》（那不勒斯：Bibliopolis 出版社，1984）。

13. I refer back to Valentino Gerratana’s note about the circumstance regarding Gramsci’s previous use and recent (critical) rereading of Bukharin's Manual (the complete title of which is The Theory of Historical Materialism: A Popular Manual of Sociolo^^). Antonio Gramsci, Quaderni del carcere, ed. Valentino Gerratana (Turin: Einaudi, 1975), 2539.
13. 我参考瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳关于葛兰西之前使用和近期（批判性）重读布哈林《手册》的情况的注释（该书完整标题为《历史唯物主义理论：社会学通俗手册》）。 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》，瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳编 (都灵：埃纳迪出版社，1975)，2539 页。

14. The direct antecedent is constituted by §3, where the argumentation is particularly broad.
14. 直接先行词由§3 构成，其论证尤为广泛。

15. In rewriting this note, in Q11§27, Gramsci adds “and whose language [linguaggio] he often reproduces." [Gramsci's reference is to the language of the great philosophers whom the young Marx studied.]
15. 在重写此笔记时，在 Q11§27 中，葛兰西补充道“并且他经常再现其语言[linguaggio]”。[葛兰西的参考是年轻的马克思所学习的伟大哲学家的语言。]

16. Gramsci is developing his particular Marxian philology, the setting of which一very significantly——is provided in the initial note of this notebook.
16. 格拉姆斯基正在发展他独特的马克思主义语文学，其背景——非常重要——在该笔记本的初始注释中得以体现。

17. Q4§11. Antonio Gramsci, Prison Notebooks, vol. 2, ed. and trans. Joseph Buttigieg (New York: Columbia University Press, 1996), 153, hereafter cited as PN2.
17. Q4§11. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》第二卷，乔瑟夫·巴蒂吉耶著译 (纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，1996)，第 153 页，以下简称 PN2。

18. This passage is repeated later in Q11§27, QC, 1437.
18. 本段在 Q11§27、QC、1437 中后文重复出现。

19. See in particular §13, that is the first note explicitly referring in title to Bukharin’s Popular Manual and that sets the fundamental problem of the relationship between “historical materialism" and “philosophical materialism" (Q4§13, PN2, 154).
19. 特别参见§13，这是首次以布哈林的《大众手册》为题明确提及，并确立了“历史唯物主义”与“哲学唯物主义”之间关系的基本问题（Q4§13，PN2，154）。

20. In Q11§28, Gramsci corrects himself by saying “all of language [linguaggio] is a continuous process of metaphor." Antonio Gramsci, Selections from the Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Quintin Hoare and Geoffrey Nowell Smith (New York: International Publishers, 1971), 450, hereafter cited as SPN.
20. 在 Q11§28 中，葛兰西修正了自己的观点，说“所有语言都是一个持续的隐喻过程”。 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记选集》，昆廷·霍尔和杰弗里·诺韦尔·史密斯译，纽约：国际出版公司，1971 年，第 450 页，以下简称《狱记》。

21. Q4§17, PN2, 159. 21. Q4§17，PN2，159。

22. Q4§17, PN2, 159. As Trincia correctly observes referring to the rewriting of this note, “In this passage, one can see Gramsci’s tendency to simplify and diminish his theoretical argumentation, which is perceived as necessary and is typical of his way of arguing" (F. S. Trincia, “Gramsci pensatore del l'immanenza," Critica Marxista 5 (1989): 95). I would argue that this “simplification" partly depends on his particular way of writing, in the sense that the notes often express a maximum of theoretical engagement with an element that is at the center of attention whereas what is left out can be routine. Later I will develop my considerations of Gramsci's use of some purely indicative concepts.
22. Q4§17, PN2, 159.  正如特林恰（Trincia）正确指出的，关于本文的重写，“在这段文字中，可以看到葛兰西（Gramsci）简化和削弱其理论论证的倾向，这被认为是必要的，也体现了他论证的方式”（F. S. 特林恰，“葛兰西作为内在性思想家”，《马克思主义批判》第 5 期（1989）：95）。我认为这种“简化”部分取决于他独特的写作方式，也就是说，这些笔记通常表达了对中心议题的理论参与最大化，而被省略的部分则可能是常规内容。之后我将进一步探讨葛兰西使用一些纯粹指示性概念的考虑。

23. This concept is clearer in the corresponding C-text from which I have already quoted: “the old immanence was superseded, has been superseded, yet, it is always presupposed as a link within the chain of reasoning from which the new is born." Q11§28, QC, 1438-39.
23. 这个概念在相应的 C 文本中更加清晰，我已经引用了其中一段：“旧的内在性被取代了，已经过时了，然而，它始终被预设为新事物诞生的推理链条中的一个环节。” Q11§28，QC，1438-39。

24. Q4§17, PN2, 159. 24. Q4§17，PN2，159。

25. Q7§36, Antonio Gramsci, Prison Notebooks, vol. 3, ed. and trans. Joseph Buttigieg (New York: Columbia University Press, 2007), 187, hereafter cited as PN3.
25. Q7§36，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》第三卷，乔瑟夫·巴蒂吉耶编辑及翻译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，2007），187 页，以下简称 PN3。

26. Q11§24, “Il linguaggio e le metafore" (Language and Metaphor), SPN, 450.
26. Q11§24，“语言与隐喻”，SPN，450。

27. When he rewrites his first draft, Gramsci adds that they are errors that derive from “the absence of a critical and historicist conception of the phenomenon of language." Q11§24, SPN, 451.
27. 当他重写初稿时，葛兰西补充道，这些错误源于“缺乏对语言现象的批判性和历史主义理解”。Q11§24，SPN，451。

28. Q7§36, PN3, 187. 28. Q7§36，PN3，187。

29. As stated in the rewritten passage, Q11§24, SPN, 452.
29. 如重写段落所述，Q11§24，SPN，452。

30. Q4§17, PN2, 159 30. Q4§17，PN2，159

31. Q11§27, SPN, 465. 31. Q11§27，SPN，465。

32. Q8§171, PN3, 332. Translation altered.
32. Q8§171，PN3，332。翻译已修改。

33. Q8§171, PN3, 332-33. 33. Q8§171，PN3，332-33。

34. Later in Notebook 11, Quistinio di nomenclatura e di contenuto [Questions of nomenclature and content], Q11§16. SPN 453-54.
34. 随后的笔记本 11，命名与内容问题[命名与内容的问题]，Q11§16. SPN 453-54。

35. The complete sentence in the preface continues with: “so one cannot judge such a period of transformation by its consciousness." Karl Marx, “Preface" to A Contribution to the Critique of Political Economy, trans. S. W. Ryazanskaya (Moscow: Progress Publishers, 1970), 21.
35.  序言中的完整句子继续写道：“因此，人们不能仅凭意识来判断这样一个转型时期。” 卡尔·马克思，《政治经济学批判大纲》序言，译自 S. W. 里亚赞斯卡娅（莫斯科：进步出版社，1970），21 页。

36. Q1§113, PN1, 198. 36. Q1§113，PN1，198。

37. As we will see, Gramsci goes back to this argument many times, and this passage is repeated in Q16§20.
37. 正如我们将看到的，葛兰西多次重申这一论点，这段文字在 Q16§20 中也有重复。

38. Marx says that his research led “to the conclusion . . . that the anatomy of this civil society, however, has to be sought in political economy." Marx, “Preface," 20.
38. 马克思说，他的研究“得出结论……这个市民社会的解剖结构，必须在政治经济学中寻找。” 马克思，“导言”，20。

39. PN3, 354. Translation altered.
39. PN3，354。翻译已修改。

40. FSPN, 315. Translation altered.
40. FSPN，315. 译文已修改。

41. Here Gramsci only rapidly says: “Recall the other indication related to the development of the juridical sciences." Q8§207, PN3, 354. Translation altered.
41. 这里葛兰西只快速地说：“回想一下与法学发展相关的其他指示。” Q8§207，PN3，354。译文已修改。

42. Q10II§41xii, FSPN, 397.
42. Q10II§41xii，FSPN，397。

43. Q11§50, FSPN, 315. 43. Q11§50，FSPN，315。

44. Q11§50, FSPN, 315. 44. Q11§50，FSPN，315。

45. Q11§50, FSPN, 315. 45. Q11§50，FSPN，315。

46. Wittgenstein, Sections 97 and 116, 44 and 48.
46. 维特根斯坦，第 97 和 116 节，第 44 和 48 节。

47. Q1§44, PN1, 147. 47. Q1§44，PN1，147。

48. Q1§44, PN1, 147. Translation altered. See Gerratana’s footnote in QC, 2486, about Gramsci’s recurring reference to this passage by Marx. Gramsci’s observations on this passage come back in Notebook 19, QC, 2028. Translation altered.
48. Q1§44，PN1，147。译文已修改。见 Gerratana 在 QC，2486 页的脚注，关于葛兰西反复提及马克思这段文字的说明。葛兰西对这段文字的观察见于笔记本 19，QC，2028 页。译文已修改。

49. Q1§151, PN1, 231. 49. Q1§151，PN1，231。

50. It must be noticed that the correspondence has become reduction, and that the reduction is a synonym of translation, as it turns out clearly in Q4§42, PN2, 192.
50. 必须注意到，对应关系已成为简化，而简化是翻译的同义词，正如 Q4§42、PN2、192 中清晰地表明的那样。

51. Q1§44, PN1, 147. 51. Q1§44，PN1，147。

52. Q3§48, PN1, 51. 52. Q3§48，PN1，51。

53. Q4§42, PN2, 191. 53. Q4§42，PN2，191。

54. Q4§42, PN2, 192. Gramsci is inspired by an article Luigi Einaudi wrote in October 1930. In this article he posed questions of translatability from one language to another, and he maintained against Ugo Spirito and the followers of Gentile that the novelty of a theory is often only a question of terminology.
54. Q4§42, PN2, 192. 格拉姆斯基受 1930 年 10 月路易吉·埃因霍德（Luigi Einaudi）的一篇文章启发。在这篇文章中，他提出了不同语言之间翻译的可行性问题，并与乌戈·斯皮里托（Ugo Spirito）及其詹蒂莱（Gentile）追随者辩论，认为一个理论的新颖性往往只是术语问题。

55. Q4§42, PN2, 192. 55. Q4§42，PN2，192。

56. Q4§56, PN2, 232. 56. Q4§56，PN2，232。

57. Q4§56, PN2, 232. Translation altered. Here Gramsci is quoting Engels’s phrase that concludes his Ludwig Feuerbach and the Outcome of Classical German Philosophy, trans. Clemens Dutt (New York: International Publishers, 1995), 64.
57. Q4§56，PN2，232。译文已修改。此处葛兰西引用了恩格斯在其《路德维希·费尔巴哈及其与古典德国哲学的终结》一书（由克莱门斯·达特译，纽约：国际出版公司，1995 年）第 64 页的结尾语。

58. Q8§208, PN3, 355. 58. Q8§208，PN3，355。

59. Here Gramsci’s reference is to Marx’s Thesis 11 on Feuerbach.
59. 这里葛兰西指的是马克思关于费尔巴哈的第 11 条论题。

60. Q8§208, PN3, 356. 60. Q8§208，PN3，356。

61. It is Q7§1, entitled “B. Croce e il materialismo storico” [B. Croce and Historical Materialism].
61. 题为“B. 克罗齐与历史唯物主义”的 Q7§1。

62. Q7§1, PN3, 153. 62. Q7§1，PN3，153。

63. Q4§40, PN2, 188. Gramsci comes back to this concept in Notebook 11, at the end of §62, SPN, 407.
63. Q4§40，PN2，188。葛兰西在札记 11，§62 末，SPN，407 处再次提及这一概念。

64. Q7§2, PN3, 157.

65. PN3, note 3, 498. Regarding Lenin’s passage and the circumstances it is related to, see Gerratana’s footnote in QC, 2748. This passage comes back in Notebook 11 (QC, 1468).
65. PN3，注 3，498。关于列宁的这段话及其相关情况，请参见 Gerratana 在 QC，2748 页的脚注。这段话在笔记本 11（QC，1468 页）中再次出现。

66. Q7§2, PN3, 157. 66. Q7§2，PN3，157。

67. It is the section about Esperanto filosofico e scientifico [Philosophical and Scientific Esperanto], in Q11§45, FSPN, 304. Regarding the sense of Gramsci’s anti
67.  Q11§45，FSPN 304 页的“Esperanto 哲学和科学”部分，关于葛兰西的反对...

Esperantist position and his earlier engagement with Esperanto, see Franco Lo Piparo, Lingua Intellettuali Egemonia in Gramsci (Bari: Laterza, 1979), 83 and 131.
参见弗朗哥·洛皮帕罗著《葛兰西与知识分子与霸权》（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1979），第 83 页和第 131 页，了解支持者立场及其早期参与世界语的情况。

68. Q11§47, FSPN, 307. 68. Q11§47，FSPN，307。

69. From what I have said one can understand how much Gramsci’s historicism is characterized according to linguistic perspective. It is also to be noticed that, shifting from A- to C-texts, Gramsci explicitly refers to the “linguistic phenomenon” (see Q11§24, SPN, 450). Yet at times he places his reference in the background, whereas, at other times, he stresses it: in Notebook 11, in the section entitled “Storia delle terminologie e delle metafore” [History of terminologies and metaphors] (§50), Gramsci goes back to Q8§207 and changes “another indication” into “another ‘linguistic5 indication” (PN3, 354, and FSPN, 316 [both translations altered]); shifting from Q7§25 (Oggettività del reale [The Objectivity of the Real]) to Q11§20 (Oggettività e realtà del mondo esterno [Objectivity and the Reality of the External World]), Gramsci’s mention of Marxism drops the reference “another linguistic expression” (PN3, 176, and SPN, 448).
69. 从我所说的内容可以看出，葛兰西的历史主义在语言学视角下具有怎样的特征。值得注意的是，在从 A 文本到 C 文本的转变中，葛兰西明确提及“语言现象”（见 Q11§24，SPN，450）。然而，有时他将此引用置于背景中，而有时则强调它：在笔记 11 中，在题为“术语和隐喻的历史” (§50) 的章节中，葛兰西回到了 Q8§207，并将“另一个迹象”改为“另一个‘语言学’迹象”（PN3，354，和 FSPN，316 [两者翻译均有修改]）；从 Q7§25（现实的客观性）到 Q11§20（客观性和外部世界的现实性），葛兰西对马克思主义的提及去掉了“另一种语言表达”的引用（PN3，176，和 SPN，448）。

70. Benedetto Croce, Historical Materialism and the Economics of Karl Marx, trans. Michael Curtis (New Brunswick, N.J.: Transaction Publishers, 1981) (first Italian edition, 1899).
70. 贝内代托·克罗齐，《历史唯物主义与卡尔·马克思的经济学》，迈克尔·柯蒂斯译 (新泽西州纽布伦瑞克：交易出版公司，1981 年)（第一版意大利文，1899 年）。

71. Gentile, La filosofia di Marx [The philosophy of Marx] (Florence: Sansoni, 1955 [1899]).
71. 詹蒂莱，《马克思的哲学》（佛罗伦萨：桑索尼出版社，1955 年[1899 年]）。

72. As A. Del Noce observes in his section “Gentile e Gramsci” in the entry “Il pensiero di Gentile” [The Thought of Gentile], Enciclopedia 1976-77, vol. 1 (Rome: Istituto dell’Enciclopedia Italiana, 1977), Gramsci’s interest in the Theses on Feuerbach and in interpreting Marx’s thought also relies on Gentile’s earlier interpretation of Marx.
72. 正如 A. Del Noce 在“Gentile 和 Gramsci”一节中，收录于《Gentile 的思想》[Gentile 的思想]，1976-77 年《百科全书》第 1 卷（罗马：意大利百科全书协会，1977 年）中所观察到的那样，Gramsci 对《关于费尔巴哈的论题》的兴趣以及对马克思思想的解读，也依赖于 Gentile 早期对马克思的解读。

73. Here I am not going back to the question about Gramsci’s confrontation with Croce, which must be viewed as Gramsci’s need of self-clarification rather than only as a mere procedure of politics of culture. I want to stress the relationship, which must be searched for in Gramsci, between the problematic of immanence conceived as unity of theory and practice, structure-superstructure, and his more fundamental choice in favor of immanence as a moral condition, which he derived from Croce in his formative years, and to which he repeatedly goes back also in his Notebooks (see how Croce’s fragment on Religione e Serenità [Religion and Serenity] reemerges in Q7§1and then in Q10§5 and §41i). I believe that Garin’s line of interpretation concerning Gramsci’s “close dialogue with Croce” is still valid. He presented his interpretation at the Gramscian Conference in January 1958 (Eugenio Garin, “Gramsci nella cultura italiana,” Studi Gramsciani [Rome: Editori Riuniti, 1958]), and subsequently in Eugenio Garin, “La formazione di Gramsci e Croce,” Critica Marxista 3 (1967): 119-33.
73. 在这里，我不想再回到葛兰西与克罗齐的冲突问题，这应该被视为葛兰西自我阐明的需要，而非仅仅是文化政治策略。我想强调葛兰西在以下问题上的关联：将内在性视为理论与实践统一、结构与上层建筑的难题，以及他更根本地选择内在性作为一种道德条件——这一选择源于他形成时期从克罗齐那里获得的启发，并且他在《狱中札记》中也一再回到这一选择（请参见克罗齐的《宗教与宁静》片段如何在 Q7§1、Q10§5 和§41i 中重新出现）。我认为加林关于葛兰西“与克罗齐的密切对话”的解读思路仍然有效。他在 1958 年 1 月葛兰西会议上（尤金·加林，“意大利文化中的葛兰西”，《葛兰西研究》（罗马：统一出版社，1958））以及随后的著作（尤金·加林，“葛兰西与克罗齐的形成”，《马克思主义批判》第 3 期（1967）：119-133）中阐述了这一解读。

74. Regarding Gramsci’s translation of this passage, see Gerratana’s footnote, in QC, 2631-32, and his abstract from Gramsci’s Notebooks on translation, in QC, 2359.
74. 关于葛兰西对这段文字的翻译，请参阅葛拉塔纳在《葛兰西文集》（QC）第 2631-32 页的脚注，以及他在《葛兰西文集》（QC）第 2359 页的翻译笔记摘要。

75. Q4§15, PN2, 157. 75. Q4§15，PN2，157。

76. Q4§15, PN2, 157. 76. Q4§15，PN2，157。

77. Here I refer to Q4§20 and §31, in which, respectively, Gramsci both deals with the problem of the “intrinsic” value of ideologies and distinguishes Marx’s conception of ideology from that of the seventeenth century.
77.此处我参考 Q4§20 和§31，其中，葛兰西分别讨论了意识形态的“内在”价值问题，以及将马克思的意识形态概念与十七世纪的意识形态概念区分开来。

78. Q4§37, PN2, 176. 78. Q4§37，PN2，176。

79. Q4§37, PN2, 176. It is evident that the distinction between "pure” and "impure” act does not have any specific theoretical value. Yet, certainly, Gramsci resists an identification between his philosophy of praxis and Gentile’s philosophy of the act. Since, indeed, Gramsci’s is a provisional and relative “translation,” one cannot conclude with Del Noce in favor of a theoretical identification between these two philosophies, which would imply that “theoretical Marxism” has been “put into a checkmate by actualism,” Del Noce, 297.
79. Q4§37, PN2, 176.  “纯”与“不纯”行为的区分显然没有理论价值。然而，葛兰西无疑反对将他的实践哲学与詹蒂勒的行为哲学等同。因为葛兰西的哲学是一种暂时的、相对的“翻译”，因此不能像德尔·诺切那样得出这两者在理论上等同的结论，这暗示着“理论马克思主义”已被“实际主义”所“压制”，德尔·诺切，297。

80. Q4§38, PN2, 186. 80. Q4§38，PN2，186。

81. Here Gramsci refers to the third Thesis on Feuerbach, in which Marx talks about the education of the educator. Regarding Gramsci’s use of this passage, see Gerratana’s footnote, in QC, 2748.
81. 这里葛兰西指的是费尔巴哈论题三，其中马克思谈到了教育者的教育。关于葛兰西对这段文字的运用，请参见葛拉塔纳在《葛兰西文集》第 2748 页的脚注。

82. Q7§1, PN3, 157. Translation altered.
82. Q7§1，PN3，157。翻译已修改。

83. Gramsci’s choice of Croce-Gentile is still a matter of debate. His relationship with Gentile appears as stronger but less conscious (see Roberto Finelli, “Gramsci tra Croce e Gentile” [Gramsci between Croce and Gentile], Critica Marxista 5 [1989]: 77-92). In his essay, which I mentioned above, Del Noce speaks of Gramsci’s true subordination to Gentile’s actualism, which was “neither wanted nor conscious.” However, one cannot agree with Del Noce’s statement that there is nothing of Croce in Gramsci; Del Noce, 286 and 295. In reference to Croce, Trincia has used the expression “theoretical uneasiness” (Trincia, 100), which is certainly in Gramsci; yet I think that since the perennial tentativeness of his “theoretical” formulations depends on his habit of translating, none of his formulations can be truly understood in themselves, but they always refer to something else.
83. 格拉姆斯基选择克罗齐-詹蒂莱仍然存在争议。他与詹蒂莱的关系似乎更强，但意识性较弱（参见罗伯托·菲内利，“格拉姆斯基在克罗齐与詹蒂莱之间”[Gramsci between Croce and Gentile]，《马克思主义批判》第 5 期[1989]：77-92）。在我的上述文章中，德尔·诺切谈到格拉姆斯基对詹蒂莱的实际主义的真正服从，这“既非有意也非有意识的”。然而，不能同意德尔·诺切的说法，格拉姆斯基中没有克罗齐的影子；德尔·诺切，286 和 295 页。关于克罗齐，特林恰使用了“理论上的不安”（特林恰，100）这个表达，这无疑存在于格拉姆斯基的著作中；但我认为，由于他“理论”表述的持久性犹豫源于他翻译的习惯，他的任何表述都不能真正独立理解，而总是指涉其他事物。

84. Q7§1, PN3, 157. This discourse comes back in Q10II§40, SPN, 368.
84. Q7§1, PN3, 157。该论述在 Q10II§40, SPN, 368 处再次出现。

85. Q7§25, PN3, 176. 85. Q7§25，PN3，176。

86. Q7§25, PN3, 176. Words in square brackets were Gramsci’s additions.
86. Q7§25，PN3，176。方括号内的词语为葛兰西的补充。

87. Later in Q11§20, SPN, 448.
87.  Q11§20 节后，SPN，448。

88. Q8§61, PN3, 271. Translation altered.
88. Q8§61，PN3，271。译文已修改。

89. Q8§61, PN3, 271. 89. Q8§61，PN3，271。

90. Q4§56, PN2, 232. 90. Q4§56，PN2，232。

91. Q8§208, PN3, 355. 91. Q8§208，PN3，355。

92. Q7§35, PN3, 187. 92. Q7§35，PN3，187。

93. [The reference is to Marx’s Theses on Feuerbach; see PN3, 620.]
93. [参见马克思的《关于费尔巴哈的提纲》；见 PN3，620 页]

94. Q8§198, PN3, 348. 94. Q8§198，PN3，348。

95. Q8§199, PN3, 349. 95. Q8§199，PN3，349。

96. Q11§54, SPN, 364. 96. Q11§54，SPN，364。

97. Q10II§31i, FSPN, 383. Translation altered. QC, 1269.
97. Q10II§31i，FSPN，383。翻译已修改。QC，1269。

98. Q10II§31i, FSPN, 384.
98. Q10II§31i，FSPN，384。

99. Q10II§31i, FSPN, 384.
99. Q10II§31i，FSPN，384。

100. I refer to the Q8§198 discussed above, PN3, 348.
100. 指上文讨论的 Q8§198，PN3，348。

101. He returns to this idea in Q10§31, FSPN, 384.
101. 他在 Q10§31，FSPN，384 页再次提到这个想法。

102. [The original has §31, but this must have been a typo.]
102. [原文应为§31，但此处可能为笔误。]

103. Q10§41, FSPN, 399-400.
103. Q10§41，FSPN，399-400。

104. Q10§41, FSPN, 399-400.
104. Q10§41，FSPN，399-400。

105. Q11§50, FSPN, 315-16.
105. Q11§50，FSPN，315-16。

106. Q11§45, FSPN, 304. Translation altered.
106. Q11§45，FSPN，304。翻译已修改。

* Translation from “Traduzioni e Metafore in Gramsci,” Critica Marxista 39, 1 (January/February 1991): 107-31. Translated by Rocco Lacorte with assistance by Peter Ives.
格拉姆斯基的翻译与隐喻，马克思主义批判 39 卷 1 期（1991 年 1 月/2 月）：107-131。由罗科·拉科尔特翻译，彼得·艾夫斯协助。

11
Translatability, Language and Freedom in Gramsci’s
Prison Notebooks
11. 格拉姆斯基狱中札记中的翻译能力、语言与自由

Rocco Lacorte* 拉科尔特*

This chapter is part of a larger project concerning the connection between Antonio Gramsci’s concept of "translatability'' and his (new) conception of language. At the core of this larger argument is the centrality of translatability to the whole philosophy of praxis一that is, to all the key concepts he develops in his Prison Notebooks. This involves the intimate link between Gramsci’s view of language and his theory of politics, history and freedom. Here I will focus on one specific part of this much larger argument dealing with how Gramsci uses the concept of "translatability' to theorize the unity of theory and practice insisting that "superstructures' are "objective and operative reality,"1 and not "false consciousness' or some nondialectical product that can be read off from economic "structures."? Gramsci takes this further, actually overturning the very distinction between structure and superstructure except for didactic purposes.3
本章节是关于安东尼奥·葛兰西的“可译性”概念与其（新的）语言观之间联系的更大项目的一部分。该论证的核心是可译性对于实践哲学——即他所有重要概念（见其狱中札记）——的关键性。这涉及葛兰西的语言观与其政治、历史和自由理论之间的密切联系。在此，我将专注于该论证的特定部分，即葛兰西如何运用“可译性”概念来论证理论与实践的统一，坚持“上层建筑”是“客观且有效的现实”，而非“虚假意识”或某种非辩证的、可从经济“结构”中直接解读的产品。葛兰西进一步发展了这一观点，实际上（除了教学目的外）颠覆了结构与上层建筑之间的区别。

Indeed, it can be derived from Gramsci’s note 208 in Notebook 8 (Q8§208) that translatability concerns both practical power (or effectiveness) of theory and theoretical power of practice.4 In this sense, translatability constitutes, at the same time, the theoretical ground for Gramsci’s concept of praxis and theory of immanence,5 both of which concern the worldly character of thought and of the superstructures which he sees the germs of in Marx.6 This means that translatability constitutes the theoretical acknowledgment that everything must be interpreted in terms of praxis (or human activity), insofar as it cannot transcend it.7 Thus, language also must be viewed as praxis,8 that is, as a necessary "moment' that praxis needs and produces to elaborate, shape, empower and express itself. That is to say, to make itself "more practical and real"9 or historically and politically effective. This is an important element in Gramsci’s critique of Idealism as well as vulgar economistic Marxism. The implications of this argument are that Gramsci’s ultimate goal was the overturning of current praxis.10 His use of the concept of “translation” shows, among other things, how he sees this struggle requiring more than intellectual critique in the traditional sense, and thus, his reflections on translation and reconceiving language are both deeply philosophical and prosaically practical and common.
的确，从葛兰西第八笔记本（Q8§208）的笔记 208 中可以推导出，翻译性关乎理论的实践力量（或有效性）和实践的理论力量。4 从这个意义上说，翻译性同时构成了葛兰西的实践概念和内在性理论的基础，5 这两者都关乎思想以及他从马克思那里看到的上层建筑的世俗特征。6 这意味着，翻译性构成了这样一种理论承认：凡事都必须根据实践（或人类活动）来解释，因为它无法超越实践。7 因此，语言也必须被视为实践，8 也就是说，它作为实践所必需和产生的一个必要“环节”，以阐述、塑造、赋能和表达自身。也就是说，使自身变得“更实用和真实”9，或在历史上和政治上更有效。这在葛兰西批判唯心主义以及庸俗经济学马克思主义中是一个重要因素。该论点的含义是，葛兰西的最终目标是推翻现有的实践。他使用“翻译”的概念，表明他认为这种斗争需要超越传统意义上的纯粹的知识批判，因此，他对翻译和语言重构的思考既深刻地具有哲学意味，又切实地具有实用性和普遍性。

Gramsci recommends that when studying an author, in his case Marx, it is necessary to reconstruct the history of his cultural biography. However, Gramsci stresses the fact that the novelty of the author’s thought cannot be reduced to its sources.11 While discussing Marx’s use of “sarcasm” as a positive articulation of new conceptions, he notes that Marx’s "historicism” coincides with the creation of "a new 'taste' and a new language.”12 One of the several themes within Gramsci's development of the concept of “translatability” is precisely this notion of how Marxist historicism or historical materialism "seeks to establish a break from the old conceptions while waiting for the new conceptions to gain strength” become dominant and replace the old conceptions. This is one of the key motifs that he addresses with his particular conception of “hegemony.”13 Gramsci sees these ideas already implicit in Marx and Lenin but he clarifies them by developing the concept of translation and his approach to language that he derived from his studies in historical linguistics.14 This chapter will trace out how in Notebooks 10 and 11 Gramsci incorporates many of the threads that he discusses in the earlier notebooks into this conception of translation. Indeed, in Notebook 10, Gramsci argues that Marx's philosophy of praxis is born out of translation, specifically the translation of the speculative form of the idea of immanence of German classical philosophy into the realistic one of the philosophy of praxis "with the aid of French politics and English classical economics.”15 Marx explicitly posits thought and knowledge as necessary to transform the world (i.e., as practical and political).
葛兰西建议，研究作者，例如马克思，需要重建其文化传记的历史。然而，葛兰西强调，作者思想的创新性不能仅仅归结于其来源。11  在讨论马克思将“讽刺”用作表达新概念的积极方式时，他指出马克思的“历史主义”与创造“新的‘趣味’和新的语言”相符。12  葛兰西发展“可翻译性”概念的几个主题之一，正是马克思的历史主义或历史唯物主义如何“寻求与旧观念决裂，同时等待新观念壮大，最终取代旧观念”的这一概念。这是他用“霸权”这一特定概念来探讨的关键主题之一。13 葛兰西认为这些思想在马克思和列宁那里已经隐含，但他通过发展翻译的概念以及他从历史语言学研究中得出的语言方法，对这些思想进行了阐明。14 本章将追溯葛兰西如何在《笔记 10》和《笔记 11》中将他在早期笔记中讨论的许多线索融入他对“翻译”的理解。实际上，在《笔记 10》中，葛兰西认为马克思的实践哲学源于翻译，特别是将德国古典哲学的内在性（immanence）思辨形式翻译成实践哲学的现实主义形式，“借助法国政治和英国古典经济学”。15 马克思明确地将思想和知识置于改造世界的必要条件（即作为实践性和政治性的）。

My argument, supported below, is that translatability is conceived as necessary to activate what the previous knowledge and way of conceiving have neutralized一in other words, the idea that knowledge can have a revolutionary function. Translation and translatability are not merely linguistic, or intellectual一in an abstract sense. They must involve praxis, political struggle and a transformation of daily life, ways of thinking and ways of producing. But this is also true of Gramsci's understanding of language as not a purely intellectual and abstract way of merely communicating, and, as has received much more attention within Gramscian scholarship, his conception of “intellectual activity” which includes the important role of “traditional intellectuals” but also that of “organic intellectuals.”16
我的论点，如下文所述，是可译性被视为激活先前知识和认知方式所中和之物——换言之，即知识能够具有革命功能的理念。翻译和可译性不仅是语言或智力的——在抽象意义上。它们必须涉及实践、政治斗争以及日常生活、思维方式和生产方式的变革。但格拉姆斯基对语言的理解亦然，语言并非纯粹的智力或抽象的交流方式，正如格拉姆斯基学界更为关注的，他的“知识分子活动”概念，其中包括“传统知识分子”的重要作用，以及“有机知识分子”的作用。16

It is this theme of the intellectuals that Gramsci raises in Notebook 10, but is central to many of the important passages in Notebook 1, where we can see these dynamics involving translation begin to emerge. Already in Notebook 1§44, analyzing the failures of the Italian Risorgimento as represented in his critique of Giuseppe Ferrari, Gramsci uses the concept of “translation." Ferrari’s failure, according to Gramsci, was that he “was not able to translate 'French' into 'Italian'”； thus he remained on the “outside of concrete Italian reality." His acuity “created new sects and factions but it left no mark on the real movement."17 In the same note, Gramsci raises Marx's comparisons in The Holy Family between French politics and German philosophy. These comparisons are at the root of his discussion of “translation" in Notebooks 10 (in which he adds English political economy)18 and 11. While he does not clearly draw out the distinction in Q1§44, he seems to be contrasting the inability of Ferrari to “translate," and thus his lack of effective impact on concrete reality, with the Jacobins who only now appear to be “abstractionists," but at the time the “Jacobins' language, their ideology reflected perfectly the needs of the time."19 Here he uses the term “language" connecting it with ideology and relating it to the integration of politics, economics and culture or philosophy. As we shall see, his reconception of language is an integral part of his insistence of a truly dialectical relationship of superstructures to economic structures一 rather than any reduction of the former to the latter. In the note just prior to this one, 1§43, in discussing different types of periodicals, he writes, “In reality, every political movement creates a language of its own, that is, it participates in the general development of a distinct language, introducing new terms, enriching existing terms with new content, creating metaphors."20 It is also here where he famously extends the term “intellectuals" to mean more than what he will later label of “traditional intellectuals" to include “the whole social mass that exercizes an organizational function in the broad sense, whether it be in the field of production, or culture, or political administration."21 Note that he also utilizes the formulation of production, culture and politics that parallels his formulation of economics, philosophy and politics in Q4§46, and German philosophy and French politics in Q1§44. He later combines all these formulations as English economics, German philosophy and French politics.
格拉姆斯基在札记 10 中提出知识分子这一主题，但它也是札记 1 中许多重要段落的核心，在那里我们可以看到这些涉及翻译的动态开始显现。早在札记 1§44，在批判朱塞佩·法拉利时，分析意大利复兴运动的失败，格拉姆斯基就使用了“翻译”的概念。根据格拉姆斯基的说法，法拉利的失败在于他“未能将‘法国’翻译成‘意大利’”，因此他仍然停留在“意大利具体现实之外”。他的敏锐性“创造了新的宗派和派系，但却未能对现实运动产生任何影响”。17 在同一笔记中，格拉姆斯基提出了《神圣家族》中马克思对法国政治与德国哲学的比较。这些比较构成了他在札记 10（其中他增加了英国政治经济学）18 和 11 中讨论“翻译”的基础。 虽然他在 Q1§44 中并未明确区分，但他似乎将法拉利未能“翻译”，从而缺乏对具体现实的有效影响，与雅各宾派做了对比。雅各宾派现在看来似乎是“抽象主义者”，但在当时，“雅各宾派的语言，他们的意识形态完美地反映了时代的需求。”19  在这里，他将“语言”与意识形态联系起来，并将其与政治、经济和文化或哲学的整合联系起来。正如我们将会看到的，他对语言的重新理解是他坚持真正辩证的“上层建筑”与经济结构关系的组成部分——而不是将前者简化为后者。在前面注释 1§43 中，在讨论不同类型的期刊时，他写道：“实际上，每一个政治运动都会创造出自己的语言，也就是说，它参与了独特语言的总体发展，引进新术语，用新内容丰富现有术语，创造隐喻。”20 他也正是在这里将“知识分子”一词的含义扩展，使其超越了他后来所定义的“传统知识分子”，而包含“在广义上行使组织功能的整个社会大众，无论是在生产、文化还是政治管理领域”。21 请注意，他还使用了与他在 Q4§46 中提出的经济学、哲学和政治学相对应的生产、文化和政治的表述方式，以及与他在 Q1§44 中提出的德国哲学和法国政治相对应的表述方式。他后来将所有这些表述方式结合起来，成为英国经济学、德国哲学和法国政治学。

If, as noted, the Jacobins are a key source that interests Gramsci in these passages, Lenin and his partial success with the Russian Revolution is clearly another. Lenin’s realized hegemony in Russia together with the experience of its translation into the Italian factory councils constitute the implicit theoretical ground for Gramsci’s critique of Ferrari. This means that Gramsci thinks of translatability in connection with the Leninist experience, and he states it explicitly by Q7§2.22 He entitled it “Translatability of Scientific and Philosophical Languages." And it reads, “In 1921: organizational issues. Vilici [Lenin] said and wrote: ‘We have not been able to “translate” our language into the “European” languages.’”23 He repeats this note in Q11§46, but in the notes around it, he develops a rich discussion and conception of “translation” and “translatability” as we will see below. Thus, it may very probably be that it has been his reflection on Lenin’s practical-theoretical experience, and on its translation-realization in Turin, that has made him progressively acknowledge24 or further acknowledge the presence in germ and the value of the principle of translatability in the passage of Marx’s The Holy Family, which he already refers to in the same note (Q1§44) but without associating it explicitly with translatability. Moreover, here translatability already appears as the implicit ground for thinking the deep interconnections between hegemony (or politics), language, ideology and culture.25 All this confirms that the historical events contemporary to Gramsci constitute an essential part of his innovative philosophical and revolutionary perspective, which cannot and must not be overlooked. Gramsci sees that he and Lenin are somewhat preceded by Marx regarding the use (not the theorization) of what he will later call translatability.
如果，正如所述，雅各宾派是这些段落中吸引葛兰西的关键来源，那么列宁及其在俄国革命中部分成功显然是另一个。列宁在俄国的实现的霸权以及其转化为意大利工厂委员会的经验构成了葛兰西批判法拉利的隐含理论基础。这意味着葛兰西将可翻译性与列宁主义经验联系起来，并在 Q7§2.22 中明确指出。他将其题为“科学和哲学语言的可翻译性”。文中写道：“1921 年：组织问题。维利奇[列宁]说并写道：‘我们未能将我们的语言“翻译”成“欧洲”语言。’”23 他在 Q11§46 中重复了这一注释，但在其周围的注释中，他发展了关于“翻译”和“可翻译性”的丰富讨论和概念，正如我们将在下面看到的。 因此，很可能正是他对列宁的实践理论经验及其在都灵的转化实现的反思，促使他逐渐承认 24 或进一步承认马克思《神圣家族》中可翻译性原则的萌芽及其价值，他在同一笔记（Q1§44）中已经提及，但并未将其明确与可翻译性联系起来。此外，在这里，可翻译性已作为思考霸权（或政治）、语言、意识形态和文化之间深刻联系的隐含基础。25 所有这些都证实，与葛兰西同时代的历史事件构成了他创新哲学和革命视角的重要组成部分，不容忽视。葛兰西认为，就运用（而非理论化）他后来称之为可翻译性而言，马克思在某种程度上领先于他和列宁。

The crucial passage where Gramsci puts this most explicitly and lays the foundation for his rich development of translation is Q10II§6, entitled “Introduction to the Study of Philosophy.”26 This passage lays out four points, labeled i-iv, all of which have been translated in the English-language anthologies, but scattered in a fashion that makes their significance much more difficult to determine. Point i is included in the Selections from the Prison Notebooks. Points ii and iv are included in Further Selections from the Prison Notebooks in the section entitled “Science, Logic and Translatability,'' and point iii, a hundred pages later in “The Philosophy of Benedetto Croce.”
葛兰西最明确地阐述这一关键论点并为其丰富的翻译发展奠定基础的段落是 Q10II§6，标题为“哲学研究导论”。26 该段落列出四点，标为 i-iv，这些点都已在英文选集中被翻译，但散布方式使得其意义难以确定。i 点包含在《狱中札记选集》中。ii 和 iv 点包含在《狱中札记续选》中，标题为“科学、逻辑和可翻译性”；iii 点则在“贝内代托·克罗齐的哲学”一文中，位于一百页之后。

Point iv, entitled “Translatability of Scientific Language,' is the culmination of his succinct discussion in point i of the term “catharsis,”27 in point ii of “The Subjective Conception of the Reality and the Philosophy of Praxis,”28 and in point iii, “The Reality of the External World.”29 These three themes are expanded throughout the other notes, especially in Notebook 10. Gramsci is explicitly about this in point iv:
第四点，题为“科学语言的翻译性”，是他在第一点“净化”27、第二点“现实的主观概念与实践哲学”28 以及第三点“外部世界的现实”29 的简要讨论的总结。这三个主题在其他笔记中，特别是第十号笔记中得到了扩展。葛兰西在第四点中明确地对此进行了论述：

The notes written under this heading are in fact to be brought together in the general section on the relationship between speculative philosophies and the philosophy of praxis and their reduction to this latter as the political moment that the philosophy of praxis explains “politically.' Reduction of all the speculative philosophies to “politics,' to a moment of historico-political life; the philosophy of praxis conceives the reality of human relationships of knowledge as an element of political “hegemony.'30
本标题下的注释实际上应汇集到关于思辨哲学与实践哲学关系的总论中，并将其简化为后者作为实践哲学解释的“政治”时刻。所有思辨哲学的“政治”化，即还原为历史政治生活的时刻；实践哲学将人类知识关系的现实理解为政治“领导权”的因素。

Thus, this notion of “translatability' is precisely the ground on which he criticizes speculative philosophies, that is, both the traditional subjective (point ii) and objective (point iii) worldviews.31 These correspond, respectively, to his critiques of Croce and Bukharin, as well as of the Pragmatists and of philosophical and linguistic Esperantism throughout Notebooks 10 and 11.32
因此，这种“可译性”的概念正是他批判思辨哲学的基础，即批判传统的唯心论（要点二）和唯物论（要点三）世界观。31  这分别对应于他在札记 10 和 11 中对克罗齐、布哈林以及实用主义哲学家和哲学语言的“世界语”的批判。32

In point i, Gramsci writes:
在点 i，葛兰西写道：

The term “catharsis' can be employed to indicate the passage from the purely economic (or egoistical-passional) to the ethico-political moment, that is the superior elaboration of the structure into superstructure in the minds of men. This also means the passage from “objective to subjective' and from “necessity to freedom.' Structure ceases to be an external force which crushes man, assimilates him to itself and makes him passive; and it is transformed into a means of freedom, an instrument to create a new ethico-political form and a source for new initiatives. To establish the “cathartic' moment becomes therefore, it seems to me, the startingpoint for all the philosophy of praxis, and the cathartic process coincides with the chain of syntheses which have resulted from the evolution of the dialectic.33
“净化”一词可用于指明从纯粹的经济（或利己主义-激情）阶段到伦理政治阶段的转变，即在人们心中，结构向上层建筑的更高层次发展。这也意味着从“客观到主观”以及从“必然到自由”的转变。结构不再是压迫人类、同化人类并使其被动的外在力量；它转化为自由的手段，成为创造新的伦理政治形式和孕育新举措的工具。因此，在我看来，确立“净化”时刻成为所有实践哲学的出发点，而净化过程则与辩证法演变中产生的综合链条相吻合。

Points ii and iii then posit those positions that the philosophy of praxis is to absorb, but more crucially critique and replace. Point ii is just two sentences ending with “the theory of the superstructures is the translation in terms of realist historicism of the subjective conception of reality.”34 This formulation is strictly connected to the one in Q10II§9, discussed above, concerning the “the unitary ‘moment’ of synthesis” of the philosophy of praxis created through German philosophy, French politics and English economics. This passage adds to the notion that the philosophy of praxis itself was born from a “translation” carried out by Marx, who therefore already possesses the method Gramsci will later develop and name “translatability,” as discussed above. Thus, what emerges from the reading of Q10II§6 is that the philosophy of praxis has its own autonomous way of seeing that is based on translatability, which itself is not a simple parthenogenesis,35 but rather, at the same time, the theory of the impossibility of the parthenogenesis of any idea or language, including Marxism, which conceives its own truth as historical and political.36
第 ii 和 iii 点接着阐述实践哲学所吸收、但更关键的是批判和取代的那些立场。第 ii 点只有两句话，以“上层建筑理论是现实主义历史主义对主体现实概念的翻译”结尾。34 此表述与前文讨论的 Q10II§9 中关于通过德国哲学、法国政治和英国经济学创造的实践哲学的“统一的‘综合’时刻”密切相关。这段话补充了这样一个观点：实践哲学本身源于马克思进行的“翻译”，因此马克思已经拥有了葛兰西后来发展并命名为“可翻译性”的方法，正如前文所述。因此，从对 Q10II§6 的阅读中可以看出，实践哲学有其自身独立的视角，该视角基于可翻译性，而可翻译性本身并非简单的自生，35 而是同时也是任何思想或语言（包括马克思主义）都不能自生的理论，因为马克思主义将自身真理视为历史性和政治性的。36

By affirming the reality of human knowledge relationships, that is, the impossibility that they transcend practice, politics or ideology, Gramsci highlights, first of all, the importance of catharsis or of the elaboration of structure into superstructures in humans’ consciousness. This elaboration makes sense because thought is organized by “specialized” intellectuals through linguistic activity into complex superstructures. This has real and practical effects. That is to say, this cathartic elaboration makes sense for Gramsci only in the light of translatability or of that specific way of seeing language and thought as immanent—that is, as an “element of political ‘hegemony’”一as it has been concretely demonstrated by the Russian Revolution, in which Marx’s theoretical language was translated into the political one of Lenin by adapting it to the concrete Russian situation and as Gramsci’s use of the term “hegemony” in Q10II§6iv witnesses.
通过肯定人类知识关系的现实性，即它们不可能超越实践、政治或意识形态，葛兰西首先强调了净化或人类意识中结构向上层建筑的阐释的重要性。这种阐释是有意义的，因为思想是由“专门化”的知识分子通过语言活动组织成复杂的社会上层建筑。这具有现实和实际的影响。也就是说，这种净化性阐释对葛兰西来说，只有在可翻译性或将语言和思想视为内在的特定方式——即作为政治“霸权”的“要素”——的光线下才有意义，正如俄国革命具体地证明的那样，其中马克思的理论语言被列宁翻译成适应具体俄国情况的政治语言，正如葛兰西在 Q10II§6iv 中使用“霸权”一词所证明的那样。

Point i also contains Gramsci’s quotation by heart of a passage of Marx’s Preface to the Critique of Political Economy, noting that a structure can and must be elaborated into superstructures on the grounds of given necessary and sufficient historical, social, economic and cultural conditions that coincide with David Ricardo’s concept of a “determined market.” Any theoretical elaboration that does without the ascertainment of these conditions or pretends it can transcend them results in abstractism and speculativism. Catharsis (i) is the concept the philosophy of praxis opposes to both subjectivism (ii) and objectivism (iii); insofar as, on the grounds of translatability (iv), on the one hand, it accepts that thought as human activity has a relatively creative value and function with respect to reality, but it rejects that it can transcend it (point ii); on the other hand, it allows criticizing the position of vulgar materialism, positivism, objectivism, and determinism (point iii), because to have knowledge even given necessary and sufficient conditions is not enough to transform a given reality. As he summarizes in Notebook 10, part II, §48, “the existence of objective conditions, of possibilities or of freedom is not yet enough: it is necessary to ‘know’ them, and know how to use them. And to want to use them. Man, in this sense, is concrete will, that is, the effective application of the abstract will or vital impulse to the concrete means which realise such will.”37
点 i 还包含了葛兰西背诵的马克思《政治经济学批判》序言中一段话，指出在既定的必要且充分的历史、社会、经济和文化条件下，一种结构可以且必须被阐述为上层建筑，这些条件与大卫·李嘉图的“确定市场”概念相符。任何不确定这些条件或假装能够超越这些条件的理论阐述，都导致了抽象主义和思辨主义。净化 (i) 是实践哲学反对主观主义 (ii) 和客观主义 (iii) 的概念；因为，一方面，基于可翻译性 (iv)，它承认思想作为人类活动对现实具有相对的创造价值和功能，但它拒绝认为思想能够超越现实 (点 ii)；另一方面，它允许批判庸俗唯物主义、实证主义、客观主义和决定论的立场 (点 iii)，因为即使拥有必要且充分的条件，也无法仅仅通过知识来改变既定的现实。 正如他在笔记本 10，第二部分，§48 中总结的那样，“客观条件、可能性或自由的存在还不够：必须‘认识’它们，并知道如何利用它们。还要想要利用它们。从这个意义上说，人是具体的意志，即抽象的意志或生命冲动有效地应用于实现这种意志的具体手段。”37

With respect to deterministic positions, catharsis further conceives the necessity of the elaboration of the structure on the level of the “superstructures in humans’ consciousness” as a necessary “moment” for creating a political consciousness and hence for politically determining the course of history by means of the organization of thought into a “material” force (through linguistic activity), which (consciously) becomes part of the historical contradictions and takes them up actively giving them a direction. Translatability brings to the fore the consciousness that working towards catharsis makes sense, insofar as it explicates the (political) role of (theoretical) language with respect not only to interpreting but also to transforming the world.
关于决定论立场，净化进一步设想，在“人类意识的超结构”层面阐述结构的必要性，作为创造政治意识，从而通过将思想组织成“物质”力量（通过语言活动）来政治地决定历史进程的必要“环节”。这种（有意识的）力量成为历史矛盾的一部分，并积极地接纳它们，赋予它们方向。翻译突显出，致力于净化是有意义的，因为它阐明了（理论）语言不仅在解释世界，还在于改造世界的（政治）作用。

Gramsci’s reference to hegemony in point iv of Notebook 10, part II, §6, again constitutes his link to Lenin. This connection together with Gramsci’s experience in Turin must be stressed, to the extent that it is the real contemporary historical and “experimental ground” on which the theories Gramsci embraced and developed find their real confirmation and are concretely observed in action and practice. Gramsci writes that “Hegel cannot be thought of without the French Revolution and Napoleon, with his wars, that is, without the vital and immediate experiences of a very intense historical period full of struggles and miseries, when the external world crushes the individuals and makes them touch the ground.”38 Likewise, it can be said that his philosophy of praxis together with its theoretical nucleus (i.e., translatability), which is also the ground for his theory of language, cannot be thought of without the Russian Revolution and its impact on him and the Western countries. Lenin is not only the symbol of a crucial collective historical-political event in which theoretical language has demonstrated its reality and ideological value in practice through translation, but also the one who poses the question of hegemony in terms of “translation” in Gramsci’s time.39
葛兰西在《狱中札记》第十卷第二部分第 6 节第四点中提及的霸权概念，再次体现了他与列宁的联系。这种联系以及葛兰西在都灵的经历必须强调，因为它们构成了葛兰西所拥抱和发展理论的真正当代历史和“实验性基础”，这些理论在行动和实践中得到真实的证实和具体观察。葛兰西写道：“没有法国大革命和拿破仑，没有他的战争，即没有充满斗争和苦难的非常紧张的历史时期中，外部世界压迫个人，使他们触及现实的活力和直接经验，就无法理解黑格尔。”38 同样，可以认为，他的实践哲学及其理论核心（即翻译性），也是他语言理论的基础，如果没有俄国革命及其对其和西方国家的冲击，就无法理解。 列宁不仅是具有关键意义的集体历史政治事件的象征，在实践中通过翻译展现了理论语言的现实性和意识形态价值，而且还在葛兰西时代提出了“翻译”意义上的霸权问题。39

Lenin’s "political” words recalled by Gramsci in Q7§2 and Q11§46, discussed above, imply he was conscious that communist hegemony could not be simply imposed from above, but should be constructed, at the same time, taking into account the different (both economic and historical, social, cultural, linguistic) conditions of the various countries outside Russia in order to build up a true international collective will. Hegemony and "real equality” presuppose the unity of theory and practice. This unity, however, does not exist before it is constructed (that is why one should talk about unification). At first, only the possibility of unity exists in relation to the rise of given conditions within given historical force-relationships. Thus, in the Notebooks, Gramsci theoretically develops translatability as the consciousness, which was to be gained on the practical ground, of the fact that theories, theoretical languages or heuristic knowledge models, as well as any other language, cannot be abstractly or mechanically transferred from one to another sphere of knowledge relationships.
列宁在 Q7§2 和 Q11§46 中关于“政治”用词的回溯，如上所述，暗示他意识到了共产主义霸权并非简单地自上而下强加，而应同时考虑到俄罗斯境外各国的不同（经济、历史、社会、文化、语言）条件，以建立真正的国际集体意志。霸权和“真正平等”预设了理论与实践的统一。然而，这种统一并非存在于构建之前（这就是为什么我们应该谈论统一的原因）。起初，只有在特定历史力量关系下，特定条件出现时，统一的可能性才存在。因此，在《狱中札记》中，葛兰西从理论上发展了可翻译性，即在实践基础上获得的意识，即理论、理论语言或启发性知识模型，以及任何其他语言，都不能从一个知识关系领域抽象地或机械地转移到另一个领域。

The result of all this is that Gramsci’s concept of superstructures or ideologies is a development and translation of Marx and Lenin’s in Q10II§41xii: "men become conscious of their social position and therefore of their tasks on the terrain of ideologies,”40 that is, politics. Therefore, superstructures from the perspective of the philosophy of praxis "are an objective and operative reality (or they become such when they are not pure individual machinations).” That is, they "are a necessary moment of the overturning of praxis . . . in order to destroy one hegemony and create another.”41 Gramsci derives the expression "overturning of praxis” from the third of Marx’s Theses on Feuerbach, in which, against materialistic or positivistic determinism and mechanicism, human activity or thought is said to react against given conditions. Gramsci reinterprets Marx’s concept simultaneously according to Lenin’s and his own concept and experience of hegemony. This illustrates both the continuity among the three "authors” and of the fact that contemporary historical events are the ground for Gramsci’s rethinking of Marx and Lenin or for his translation of their practical-theoretical positions. This, then, is more than an argument about Gramsci’s notion of "translation” but includes also a methodological model for how we need to approach Gramsci’s writings in our times. They require a further “translation” into the context of our times, both the economic and technological changes of electronic, global, “late” capitalism and also the very different ideological and cultural currents of the twenty-first century.
所有这些结果是，葛兰西的“上层建筑”或“意识形态”概念是对马克思和列宁在 Q10II§41xii 中“人们在意识形态领域意识到自己的社会地位，因此意识到自己的任务”——即政治——的拓展和转换。因此，从实践哲学的角度来看，“上层建筑”是一种客观而有效的现实（或者，当它们不是纯粹的个人图谋时，它们会变成这样）。也就是说，它们“是实践颠覆的必要环节……为了摧毁一种霸权并创造另一种霸权”。葛兰西将“实践颠覆”一词源于马克思的《关于费尔巴哈的提纲》第三点，在其中，反对唯物主义或实证主义的决定论和机械论，人类活动或思想被认为会对既定的条件做出反应。葛兰西根据列宁的以及他自身对霸权的概念和经验，对马克思的概念进行了解释。这既说明了三位“作者”之间的连续性，也说明了当代历史事件是葛兰西重新思考马克思和列宁或将他们的实践理论观点进行转换的根据。 这不仅仅是关于葛兰西“翻译”概念的争论，还包含了一种方法论模型，阐述我们如何需要在当今时代解读葛兰西的著作。它们需要进一步的“翻译”，使其适应我们这个时代的语境，包括电子、全球化、后资本主义的经济和技术变革，以及二十一世纪截然不同的意识形态和文化潮流。

Moreover it should be emphasized that Gramsci’s new idea of realistic immanence coincides with a “new conception of ‘necessity5 and freedom, etc.” and hence of praxis, language, etc.42 This new way of viewing immanence coincides with a new philosophy (i.e., the philosophy of praxis) developed in connection with David Ricardo’s concept of the “‘tendency law’ which leads to scientific definition of the fundamental economic concepts of homo oeconomicus and of the ‘determined market,’" as Gramsci writes in Q10II§9.43
此外，必须强调的是，葛兰西关于现实内在性的新思想与“新的‘必要性’和‘自由’等概念”，以及由此而来的实践、语言等，相一致。42 这种新的内在性观与一种新的哲学（即实践哲学）相吻合，该哲学与大卫·李嘉图的“‘趋势规律’概念联系在一起，该规律导致对经济人基本经济概念和‘确定性市场’的科学定义”，正如葛兰西在 Q10II§9 中所写。43

Thus, at this stage of his Notebooks, Gramsci is capable of rethinking the concept of “praxis," which he previously defined in Notebook 7, §18, as “the relationship between human will (superstructure) and the economic structure."44 With this conception of translation he also rethinks the concept of “freedom," that is, the modalities in which human wills or superstructures actively react against a given structure.45
因此，在这个阶段的《笔记》中，葛兰西能够重新思考“实践”的概念，他先前在《笔记》7，§18 中将之定义为“人的意志（上层建筑）与经济结构之间的关系”。44 通过这种翻译的理解，他也重新思考了“自由”的概念，即人类意志或上层建筑主动对抗既定结构的方式。45

Now, Gramsci comes to conceive “praxis” according to the dynamic of the “determined market,” which is identified by the Ricardian “hypothetical" method (“let us suppose that . . .”)46 which is made permanent by political, moral and juridical superstructures.47 On the one hand, Gramsci notes that “necessity exists when there exists an efficient and active premise, consciousness of which in people’s minds has become operative,”48 which Gramsci calls “automatism,” and discusses “the collaborative and co-ordinated activity of a social group that, following certain principles accepted (freely) out of conviction, works towards certain goals.”49 On the other hand, a process of liberation starts when the (subaltern) social groups who live those principles as extrinsic impositions attempt to implement the “shifting of the base of the automatism” so to construct a “new order” or automatism and “conformism,” which Gramsci also calls “historical bloc.”
现在，葛兰西根据“既定市场”的动态来理解“实践”，这个“既定市场”通过李嘉图的“假设”方法（“让我们假设……”）46 被政治、道德和法律的超结构永久化。47 一方面，葛兰西指出，“当存在一个有效且活跃的前提，人们头脑中的意识已经发挥作用时，就存在必要性”，48 葛兰西称之为“自动化”，并讨论了“一个社会群体，遵循某些（出于信念自由接受的）原则，为特定目标而开展协作和协调活动”。49 另一方面，当（次要）社会群体将这些原则视为外在强加时，一个解放过程开始，他们尝试实现“自动化基础的转移”，从而构建“新秩序”或自动化和“墨守成规”，葛兰西也称之为“历史块”。

These social groups must create a new “collective will,”50 a fundamental stage of which consists in constituting a “spirit of cleavage,”51 that is, they must develop their “instinctive” sense of distinction into the consciousness of “their own historical personality.”52 These groups act on the ground of a new “necessity” or "premise,” whose theories and ideologies (i.e., languages) appear at the beginning as a critique of the superstructures of the old premise.53 Their liberation requires that they work to produce a “catharsis,” which enables them to concretely engage a struggle for “hegemony.”54 For Gramsci, if a practical movement does not develop its own practice into its own language-ideology it cannot develop its will and its political consciousness一that is, it will be unable to develop its own meaning, position and the goals it needs to achieve with respect to a given social-historical environment. This implies that, for Gramsci, without the “linguistic” moment, a historical movement cannot become a political force, a real dialectical pole that can participate in or start a given concrete dialectical process, in order to practically demonstrate its historical rationality and necessity and to change the world.
这些社会群体必须创造新的“集体意志”50，其根本阶段在于形成“分裂精神”51，即他们必须将自身“本能”的区分意识发展为“自身的历史个性”52。这些群体基于新的“必然性”或“前提”而行动，其理论和意识形态（即语言）最初表现为对旧前提上层建筑的批判 53。他们的解放需要他们努力创造“净化”54，从而使他们能够切实参与争取“领导权”的斗争。对于葛兰西而言，如果一个实践运动不能将自身实践发展成为自身语言-意识形态，它就无法发展其意志和政治意识——也就是说，它将无法发展自身在特定社会历史环境中的意义、立场和目标。 这意味着，对于葛兰西而言，如果没有“语言”这一环节，一个历史运动就不能成为政治力量，不能成为一个能够参与或启动特定具体辩证过程的真正辩证两极，从而实际上展现其历史的合理性和必要性，并改变世界。

This argument concerning Gramsci’s use of “translation” then opens a larger set of considerations that go well beyond this chapter. As I have argued, Gramsci’s theory of superstructures is based on translatability, and this, in turn, rests on historical circumstances. In his synthesis, language is clearly and explicitly conceived as both interpretive and transformative,55 that is, as both necessary to interpret and to transform world. Here interpretation and transformation are very closely linked to translation. Similarly, for Gramsci, the “linguistic” and the “logical” can never be understood only as linguistic and logical in a strict sense. Politics or practice is also, at the same time, a necessary “moment” of the creation of a language and coincides with the activity through which both the real meaning and sense of a literal expression is exhibited and has significance. Gramsci’s consciousness that language is historical and political coincides with the idea that meanings are not eternal, but constantly part of the hegemonic struggle. Therefore, the struggle for hegemony is at once a struggle for meaning and sense一that is, simultaneously a cultural struggle for bringing new meanings to life and keeping them alive (in the face of those forces defending the old ones). At the same time, linguistic struggles (to the extent that they involve rational languages or that they are meant to “demonstrate” their rationality) are always struggles for hegemony.
关于葛兰西对“翻译”的运用这一论点，进而引发了超越本章范围的更广泛的思考。正如我所论证的，葛兰西的意识形态上层建筑理论建立在可翻译性之上，而这又依赖于历史环境。在他的综合论述中，语言被明确且清晰地视为既具有解释性又具有转化性，即，既是解释世界，又是改造世界的必要手段。此处，解释和改造与翻译紧密相连。同样，对于葛兰西而言，“语言的”和“逻辑的”永远不能仅仅以严格的语言和逻辑意义来理解。政治或实践同时也是创造语言的必要“环节”，并且与展现和赋予文字字面表达的真实意义和含义的活动相一致。葛兰西的意识，即语言具有历史性和政治性，与意义并非永恒，而是不断参与霸权斗争的观点相符。 因此，霸权斗争同时也是意义和理据的斗争——即，同时也是一种文化斗争，旨在赋予新的意义以生命并使其保持活力（面对捍卫旧意义的力量）。与此同时，语言斗争（只要它们涉及理性语言或旨在“证明”其理性）始终是霸权斗争。

Notes 笔记

1. I will cite Gramsci’s Prison Notebooks by giving the notebook number preceded by a Q (Notebook), and then an § prior to the note (or section) number, following the definitive source. Antonio Gramsci, Quaderni del Carcere, four volumes, ed. Valentino Gerratana (Turin: Einaudi, 1975), hereafter cited as QC. Where an English translation is used it is cited; otherwise translation is by the author. In this case, Q10II§41xii, Antonio Gramsci, Further Selections from the Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Derek Boothman (Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1995), 394-99, hereafter cited as FSPN. A list of abbreviations can be found on pages ix-x.
1. 我将引用葛兰西的《狱中札记》时，将以 Q (笔记本) 加上笔记本编号，然后加上 § 再加上笔记 (或章节) 编号，遵循权威版本。安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》，四卷，瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳编 (都灵：埃纳迪出版社，1975)，以下简称 QC。如有英文译本，则引用译本；否则由作者翻译。例如，Q10II§41xii，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记节选》，德雷克·布斯曼编、译 (明尼阿波利斯：明尼苏达大学出版社，1995)，第 394-399 页，以下简称 FSPN。缩写表见第 ix-x 页。

2. See Q10II§41, FSPN, 403-15; Q8§208. Antonio Gramsci, Prison Notebooks, vol. 3, ed. and trans. Joseph Buttigieg (New York: Columbia University Press, 2007), 255-56, hereafter PN3 (the first two volumes will be cited as PN1 and PN2 and were published in 1992 and 1996 respectively); Q15§10, Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Quintin Hoare and Geoffrey Nowell Smith (New York: International Publishers, 1971), 243-45, hereafter cited as SPN; Q15§22, SPN, 364-66.
2. 见 Q10II§41，FSPN，403-15；Q8§208。安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》，卷 3，约瑟夫·巴蒂吉耶编辑、翻译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，2007），255-56，以下简称 PN3（前两卷分别为 PN1 和 PN2，分别于 1992 年和 1996 年出版）；Q15§10，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记选编》，昆廷·霍尔和杰弗里·诺韦尔·史密斯编辑、翻译（纽约：国际出版社，1971），243-45，以下简称 SPN；Q15§22，SPN，364-66。

3. Q7§1, PN3, 153-57; Q10II§41i, FSPN, 403-15; Q15§10, SPN, 243-45; and Q15§22, SPN, 364-65.
3. Q7§1, PN3, 153-57；Q10II§41i, FSPN, 403-15；Q15§10, SPN, 243-45；以及 Q15§22, SPN, 364-65。

4. In Q8§208, entitled “The [Mutual] Translatability of National Cultures,” Gramsci writes, “philosophy must become ‘politics5 or ‘practice,’” meaning that these last two terms cannot be taken only in a strict sense; PN3, 355. He explicitly refers to one aspect of translatability一that is, the real effectiveness of theoretical language, whereas in what follows this sentence, by writing “in order to continue to be philosophy,” he refers to another aspect of translatability (i.e., the one concerning the knowledge power of practice). This aspect is also the one Gramsci writes in Q10II§12 about Lenin’s realized hegemony; SPN, 365-66. See also Q4§46, PN2, 196-97.
4. 在 Q8§208，题为“民族文化（的）互译性”的章节中，葛兰西写道，“哲学必须成为‘政治’或‘实践’”，这意味着后两者不能仅以严格的意义理解；PN3，355。他明确指出了可译性的一个方面——即理论语言的实际效力，而在接下来的文字中，通过写“为了继续成为哲学”，他指出了可译性的另一个方面（即与实践的知识权力相关的方面）。这个方面也是葛兰西在 Q10II§12 中关于列宁实现的霸权的论述中提到的；SPN，365-66。另见 Q4§46，PN2，196-97。

5. See also Fabio Frosini, La Religione dell'Uomo Moderno, chapter 6 (Rome: Carocci, 2009), which also contains some of his previous essays, including the one in this volume. See also Lichtner in this volume, pages 187-211.
5. 另见法比奥·弗罗西尼（Fabio Frosini）的《现代人的宗教》（La Religione dell'Uomo Moderno）第六章（罗马：卡罗奇出版社，2009），其中也包含他之前的一些文章，包括本文中的那篇。另见本文中利希特纳（Lichtner）的文章，第 187-211 页。

6. See, for example, Q10II§9, SPN, 399-402, and below.
例如，见 Q10II§9、SPN、399-402 页及以下。

7. In Q7§35, Gramsci writes, “Everything is political, even philosophy or philosophies (see the notes on the character of ideologies), and the only ‘philosophy’ is history in action, life itself." PN3, 187, emphasis added. See also Q11§59, SPN, 345-46.
7. 在 Q7§35 中，葛兰西写道：“一切都是政治的，甚至哲学或哲学体系（参见关于意识形态性质的注释），而唯一的‘哲学’是行动的历史，即生活本身。” PN3, 187，强调部分。另见 Q11§59，SPN，345-46。

8. See also Domenico Jervolino, “Croce, Gentile e Gramsci sulla Traduzione,” in Croce Filosofo, vol. 2, ed. Giuseppe Cacciatore, Girolamo Cotroneo and Renata Viti Cavaliere (Soveria Mannelli: Rubbettino Editore, 2003), 431-41.
8. 另见 Domenico Jervolino，“关于翻译的克罗齐、詹蒂莱和葛兰西”，载于《克罗齐哲学》，卷 2，由 Giuseppe Cacciatore、Girolamo Cotroneo 和 Renata Viti Cavaliere 编辑（Soveria Mannelli：Rubbettino 出版社，2003），第 431-441 页。

9. Q15§22, SPN, 364-65, and see also Q15§10, SPN, 243项5.
9. Q15§22，SPN，364-65 页，另见 Q15§10，SPN，243 页第 5 项。

10. For example, QII§41xii, FSPN, 405-6.
例如，QII§41xii，FSPN，405-6。

11. Q11§27, SPN, 463. 11. Q11§27，SPN，463。

12. Q1§29, PN1, 118. In the rewriting of this passage, the C-text, Gramsci adds, as “means of intellectual struggle." Q26§5, QC, 2301. For an explanation of A- and C-texts, see introduction, page 5.
12. Q1§29，PN1，118。在重写这段文字时，葛兰西补充道，C 文本是“知识斗争的手段”。Q26§5，QC，2301。关于 A 文本和 C 文本的解释，请见导言，第 5 页。

13. Q1§29, PN1, 118. 13. Q1§29，PN1，118。

14. There is a growing literature that supports this point in nuanced ways as evident in many of the chapters of this volume, especially chapters 1-5, but the classic reference is Franco Lo Piparo, Lingua, Intellettuali, Egemonia in Gramsci (Bari: Laterza, 1979).
14.  越来越多的文献从细微之处支持这一观点，正如本书许多章节，特别是第 1-5 章所体现的那样；但经典参考著作是弗朗哥·洛皮帕罗的《语言、知识分子与葛兰西的霸权》（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1979）。

15. Q10II§9, SPN, 399-400.
15. Q10II§9，SPN，399-400。

16. Q4§49, PN2, 199-210, and Q12§1, SPN, 5-14.
16. Q4§49，PN2，199-210，和 Q12§1，SPN，5-14。

17. Q1§44, PN1, 140. 17. Q1§44，PN1，140。

18. In Q4§46 (October-November 1930), Gramsci includes the concept of “economics” together with “politics” and "philosophy.” Gramsci adds “English political economics” to French politics and German philosophy only from the beginnings of 1932, in Notebooks 8 and 10, when he formulates the hypothesis that David Ricardo’s "tendency law” and "homo oeconomicus” would have a central role in the genesis of the philosophy of praxis.
18. 在 Q4§46（1930 年 10 月至 11 月），葛兰西将“经济学”与“政治”和“哲学”并列。葛兰西仅从 1932 年初开始，在笔记 8 和 10 中，将“英国政治经济学”添加到法国政治和德国哲学之中，当时他提出了这样的假设：大卫·李嘉图的“趋势规律”和“经济人”将在实践哲学的产生中发挥核心作用。

19. Q1§44, PN1, 147. 19. Q1§44，PN1，147。

20. Q1§43, PN1, 126. 20. Q1§43，PN1，126。

21. Q1§43, PN1, 133. 21. Q1§43，PN1，133。

22. See also Q3§48, PN2, 48-52.
另见 Q3§48，PN2，48-52。

23. PN3, 157. PN3, 157.

24. See Q4§42, PN2, 191-92, and, above all, Q5, part 5 (§46项9), FSPN, 306-13.
见 Q4§42，PN2，191-92 页，以及最重要的是 Q5，第五部分（§46 项 9），FSPN，306-13 页。

25. Later on, in Q10II§41x, Gramsci will explicitly write that, in Marx, one can find "contained in a nutshell the ethico-political aspect of politics or theory of hegemony and consent, as well as the aspect of force and of economics.” FSPN, 399. All this is already implicit in Gramsci’s connection of Marx’s passage to his concept of hegemony in Q1§44.
25. 之后，在 Q10II§41x 中，葛兰西将明确写道，在马克思的著作中，可以找到“浓缩的政治伦理维度或领导权与共识理论，以及强制与经济维度”。《FSPN》，399 页。所有这些在葛兰西将马克思的这段话与他在 Q1§44 中的领导权概念联系起来时就已经隐含其中。

26. Indeed, reading Q10II§6 together with Q8§208, Q10II§9 and part 5 (§46-49) of Notebook 11 allows one to grasp the crucial role of translatability in Gramsci’s philosophy.
26. 事实上，将 Q10II§6 与 Q8§208、Q10II§9 以及笔记本 11 的第 5 部分（§46-49）结合起来阅读，可以理解翻译可能性在葛兰西哲学中的关键作用。

27. See SPN, 366-67. 见 SPN，366-67 页。

28. See FSPN, 306. 见 FSPN，第 306 页。

29. See FSPN, 402-3. 见 FSPN，第 402-403 页。

30. FSPN, 306. 30. FSPN，306。

31. In Q10II§9, Gramsci’s implicit reference to objectivism and neo-objectivism (i.e., also to Buhkarin) is expressed by the expression "speculative determinism.” He writes that the "the necessary laws of regularity”一that is, the "laws of tendency” are "not laws in the naturalistic sense or that of speculative determinism, but in a ‘historicist’ sense, valid, that is, to the extent that there exists the ‘determined market.’” SPN, 401. The philosophy of praxis insists that "[i]n the economy the element of ‘interference5 is the human will, the collective will, differently oriented according to the general conditions of life of men, i.e. ‘tending5 or organised differently.” Q10II§57, FSPN, 190. Ricardo’s laws, which had an impact on Marx, implied organized collective will as the ground of his "determined market.” Yet Gramsci sees how Marx extends Ricardo’s "to the whole of history” giving birth to a new and original conception of the world. Q10II§9, SPN, 401.
31. 在 Q10II§9 中，葛兰西对客观主义和新客观主义（即，也包括布哈林）的隐含引用，体现在“思辨决定论”这一表述中。他写道，“规律的必然性法则”——也就是“趋势法则”——“并非以自然主义意义或思辨决定论意义上的法则，而是在‘历史主义’意义上有效，也就是说，只要存在‘确定的市场’。” SPN，401。实践哲学坚持认为：“在经济领域，‘干扰’因素是人的意志，是集体意志，其方向因人类生活的总体条件而异，即‘趋向’或组织方式不同。” Q10II§57，FSPN，190。 里卡多法则对马克思产生了影响，它暗示了组织起来的集体意志是其“确定市场”的基础。然而，葛兰西看到了马克思如何将里卡多的法则“延伸到整个历史”，从而产生了一种全新的、独创的世界观。 Q10II§9，SPN，401。

32. See Gramsci’s rewriting of some lines of Q7§1, PN3, 153-54, in Q11§47, FSPN, 307.
32. 见葛兰西对 Q7§1, PN3, 153-54 部分内容在 Q11§47, FSPN, 307 的改写。

33. Q10II§6iv, SPN, 366-67.
33. Q10II§6iv，SPN，366-67。

34. FSPN, 306. 34. FSPN，306。

35. Q6§71, Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Cultural Writings, ed. David Forgacs and Geoffrey Nowell-Smith, trans. William Boelhower (Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1985), 178, hereafter cited as SCW.
35. Q6§71，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《文化著作选集》，戴维·福格卡斯和杰弗里·诺韦尔-史密斯编，威廉·博霍沃尔译（马萨诸塞州剑桥：哈佛大学出版社，1985），178 页，以下简称《文选》。

36. See Q11§62, SPN, 404-7.
见 Q11§62，SPN，404-7。

37. SPN, 360. 37. SPN，360。

38. Q10II§41x, FSPN, 399-401.
38. Q10II§41x，FSPN，399-401。

39. See Q11§46, FSPN, 306.
见 Q11§46，FSPN，306 页。

40. FSPN, 395. In the same note Gramsci adds, "the philosophy of praxis is itself a superstructure,
40. FSPN，395. 在同一注记中，葛兰西补充道，“实践哲学本身也是一种上层建筑”。

on the terrain of which specific social groups become conscious of their own social being, their own strength, their owns tasks, their own becoming. In this sense, what Croce asserts is correct.... the
在哪些特定社会群体意识到自身社会存在、自身力量、自身任务、自身发展轨迹的领域。从这个意义上说，克罗齐的论断是正确的……

philosophy of praxis is ‘history made or in the making.’”
实践哲学是“正在创造或正在被创造的历史”。

41. FSPN, 395. 41. FSPN，395。

42. The “etc.” would seem to mean that for Gramsci, this new philosophy is also a new conception of “language”一that is, it contains a new way of conceiving language rooted in its autonomous practical-theoretical principles, which is not simply the one of linguistics.
42. “等等”似乎意味着，对于葛兰西而言，这种新哲学也是一种新的“语言”观念——也就是说，它包含着一种植根于其自主的实践理论原则的新的语言观，这并非仅仅是语言学意义上的语言。

43. SPN, 401. 43. SPN，401。

44. Q7§18, PN3, 170.

45. See Q7§1, PN3, 153-57, and its C-text, Q10II§41i, FSPN, 403-4 and 406-15.
见 Q7§1，PN3，153-57，及其 C 文本，Q10II§41i，FSPN，403-4 和 406-15。

46. Q8§128, PN3, 309. See also Q10II§8, FSPN, 179-80.
46. Q8§128，PN3，309。另见 Q10II§8，FSPN，179-180。

47. Q11§52, SPN, 410. 47. Q11§52，SPN，410。

48. Q11§52, SPN, 412-13. 48. Q11§52，SPN，412-13。

49. Q10II§8, FSPN, 179. 49. Q10II§8，FSPN，179。

50. See, for example, Q1§43, PN1, 125-36; and Q8§195, PN3, 346项7.
例如，见 Q1§43，PN1，125-136；以及 Q8§195，PN3，346 项 7。

51. See Q3§49, PN2, 53. The “spirit of cleavage” is a “moment” of the cathartic process, which also coincides with the “passage from necessity to freedom”； see above discussion of Q10II§6i.
51. 见 Q3§49, PN2, 53. “裂缝精神”是宣泄过程中的一个“时刻”，也与“从必然到自由的过渡”相符；见上文对 Q10II§6i 的讨论。

52. See, for example, Q3§46, PN2, 44-47; Q3§48, PN2, 48-52; Q3§49, PN2, 52-53; Q11§12, SPN, 323项3, and a consistent thread throughout Notebook 25.
例如，见 Q3§46，PN2，44-47 页；Q3§48，PN2，48-52 页；Q3§49，PN2，52-53 页；Q11§12，SPN，323 项 3；以及笔记本 25 中的一贯思路。

53. See, for example, Q8§195, PN3, 346-47.
例如，见 Q8§195，PN3，346-47 页。

54. For example, in Q8§227, PN3, 373: “There is a struggle between two hegemonies一always. Why does one of them triumph? Because of its intrinsic ‘logical’ qualities?” See also Q7§12, PN3, 165: “Conformism has always existed; today there is a struggle between ‘two conformisms,5 that is, a struggle for hegemony.”
例如，在 Q8§227，PN3，373 页中：“两种霸权之间总存在斗争。为什么其中一种会获胜？因为它固有的‘逻辑’特质。”另见 Q7§12，PN3，165 页：“墨守成规一直存在；今天存在‘两种墨守成规’之间的斗争，即争夺霸权的斗争。”

55. For example, in Q29§1, devoted to the study of grammar, Gramsci confirms that this study has a political value as such: “Grammar is ‘history’ or ‘a historical document5: it is the ‘photograph’ of a given phase of a national (collective) language [linguaggio] that has been formed historically and is continuously developing, or the fundamental traits of a photograph. The practical question might be: what is the purpose of such a photograph? To record the history of an aspect of civilisation or to modify an aspect of civilisation?” SCW, 179-80.
例如，在 Q29§1 中，关于语法研究的章节，葛兰西证实了该研究本身具有政治价值：“语法是‘历史’或‘一份历史文献’：它是已形成且持续发展中的民族（集体）语言[linguaggio]特定阶段的‘照片’，或照片的基本特征。实践问题可能是：这种照片的用途是什么？是为了记录文明某个方面的历史，还是为了改变文明的某个方面？”  SCW，179-180。

* This chapter developed out of a research project on “Gramsci, translatability and language,” presented initially in 1997, as part of a seminar at the School for High Philosophical Formation in Matera (Italy). Here I must thank the Gallo family, my mother, the Italian Institute for Philosophical Studies in Naples and its president, Gerardo Marotta, for their support. Moreover, I thank Bettina Rousos and Peter Ives for their great and necessary help with these translations and carrying out this volume.
本章源于 1997 年在马特拉高级哲学研修学院（意大利）研讨会上提出的研究项目“葛兰西、可译性与语言”。在此，我要感谢加洛家族、我的母亲、那不勒斯意大利哲学研究所及其主席杰拉尔多·马罗塔的支持。此外，还要感谢贝蒂娜·鲁索斯和彼得·艾夫斯，感谢他们为这些译文以及本书的出版所做的巨大且必要的帮助。

III
Politics, Theory and Method
12
Language and Politics in Gramsci
Francisco F. Buey*
三 政治、理论与方法 12 格拉姆斯基的语言与政治  弗朗西斯科·F. 布埃伊*

The whole of language [linguaggio] is a continuous process of metaphor, and the history of semantics is an aspect of the history of culture; language is at the same time a living thing and a museum of fossils of life and civilisations.
语言[linguaggio]整体是一个持续的隐喻过程，语义学史是文化史的一个方面；语言同时是活生生的，也是生命和文明化石的博物馆。

Antonio Gramsci, 1932-19331
安东尼奥·葛兰西，1932-1933

1

Gramsci’s preoccupation with the question of language and linguistic problems has always been constant from his earlier writings until his last notes in the Prison Notebooks in 1935 and his last letters. This preoccupation is well enough documented for the period of LOrdine Nuovo as well as in the case of the Notebooks and the letters from prison. Some interpreters of his work, such as Franco Lo Piparo and Tullio De Mauro, have stressed at various times the importance that the young Gramsci’s education as a linguist and philologist at the University of Turin had for the elaboration of his entire work and for configuring his philosophical and political thought.
葛兰西对语言和语言问题的关注，从早期著作一直持续到 1935 年《狱中札记》中的最后笔记以及他最后的信件。这种关注在《新秩序》时期，以及《狱中札记》和狱中信件中都有充分的文献记载。一些他的作品解读者，例如弗朗哥·洛皮帕罗和图利奥·德毛罗，曾多次强调年轻的葛兰西在都灵大学的语言学和语言学家教育对其整个作品的阐释，以及其哲学和政治思想的形成所具有的重要性。

Valentino Gerratana has put forth the hypothesis that Gramsci’s historical philological reflections, and in particular, his conception of language as a conforming activity一conforming on one hand to common feelings and beliefs and on the other to social fractures一had a decisive importance not only for his elaboration of a theory of culture based on the idea of a moral and intellectual reform but also in the elaboration of the theory of hegemony which is the central nucleus of Gramsci’s mature political philosophy.
瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳提出假设，葛兰西的历史文献学思考，特别是其将语言视为一种顺应性活动——一方面顺应共同的感受和信念，另一方面顺应社会裂痕——的概念，不仅对葛兰西基于道德和智力改革思想的文化理论的阐述至关重要，还在于葛兰西成熟政治哲学的核心——霸权理论的阐述中具有决定性意义。

I believe that today it is particularly interesting to stress again such aspects of Gramsci’s work: his will to communicate beyond specialist jargon and beyond the formulas established within the realm of a common and determined tradition of thought.
我相信今天再次强调葛兰西著作中的这些方面尤其有趣：他希望超越专业术语，超越在共同且确定的思想传统领域内建立的公式。

I think this for two reasons. First, because it seems to me that if Gramsci, among all Marxist theorists, is better known and has more to tell us, this is due not only to what he said and wrote but also to how he said it and the form in which he said it.
我认为这是因为两方面原因。首先，在我看来，如果格拉姆斯基在所有马克思主义理论家中更有名望，且有更多东西可以告诉我们，这不仅因为他说了什么和写了什么，还在于他说这些话的方式以及他表达这些话的形式。

Second, because the search for an adequate language [linguaggio] through which one can establish a dialogue between different generations that share a common emancipatory tradition is perhaps the main prepolitical task of the left if it is to dignify its name at the end of the twentieth century.
其次，由于寻找一种合适的语言，以此来建立在共同解放传统下不同世代间的对话，或许是二十世纪末左翼若要维护其名声，所面临的主要非政治任务。

In effect, the fight to give meaning to the words of one’s own tradition and the fight to name things is probably the first autonomous act of the fight among ideas during the end of the twentieth century. The Marxist socialist tradition finds itself in a situation similar to the one Girolamo Savonarola alludes to when, at the end of an earlier century, at the origin of European modernity, before the degeneration of official Christianity, he proposed to continue utilizing the key words of the Christian tradition, but to recuperate the concrete meanings that they once had and that they maintained for a small minority of people.
实际上，在二十世纪末，为自身传统的话语赋予意义以及为事物命名之争，很可能是思想斗争中第一个自主行为。马克思主义社会主义传统正处于与吉罗拉莫·萨沃纳罗拉类似的境地。后者在更早的一个世纪末，在欧洲现代性的起源时期，在官方基督教堕落之前，主张继续使用基督教传统的关键词，但要恢复它们曾经拥有的、且为一小部分人所保持的具体含义。

Along these lines of reasoning, one can observe that Gramsci left us a suggestive reflection that could usefully be applied to language [linguaggio] and to the metaphors utilized by the founders of the philosophy of praxis. “Language is always metaphorical,” Gramsci said in this context (Q11§28); even though it is not convenient to exaggerate the meaning of the term “metaphor” by arguing that every discourse is necessarily metaphorical, one can still say that “the present language is metaphorical with respect to the meanings and the ideological content which the words used had in the previous periods of civilization.”2
沿着这些推理思路，我们可以观察到，葛兰西留给我们一个富有启发性的思考，可以被有效地应用于语言[linguaggio]以及实践哲学创始人所使用的隐喻。“语言总是隐喻性的，”葛兰西在此语境下说道（Q11§28）；尽管不方便夸大“隐喻”一词的含义，认为所有话语都是必然隐喻性的，但仍然可以说，“当前的语言相对于过去文明时期所使用的词汇的意义和意识形态内容而言是隐喻性的。”

This observation is also valuable in determining the meaning of the terms of the philosophy of praxis, such as “civil society,” “ideology” and “hegemony” (not to mention “socialism” or “material democracy”), that are part of the current language of social sciences and of educated citizens in our epoch.
这一观察对于理解实践哲学中的术语，例如“公民社会”、“意识形态”和“霸权”（更不用说“社会主义”或“物质民主”），也具有重要意义，这些术语是当今社会科学和受过教育公民的常用语汇。

There is no doubt that Gramsci used some of these words (mainly “ideology”)with a different meaning than they had in Marx’s work. But undoubtedly, shifting to current discourse and to the handbooks of political sociology today, these terms have changed in meaning. The expression “civil society,” for example, has acquired so many different connotations in political and sociological language that one cannot escape a feeling of uneasiness hearing or seeing it ambiguously attributed to Gramsci.
毫无疑问，葛兰西使用了某些词语（主要指“意识形态”），其含义与马克思著作中的有所不同。但毫无疑问，在当今话语和政治社会学手册中，这些术语的含义已经发生了变化。例如，“公民社会”一词在政治和社会学语言中已获得了如此多的不同内涵，以至于听到或看到它被模棱两可地归因于葛兰西时，人们难免感到不安。

Thus, the problem is what to do, that is, how to operate, starting from such observations. Gramsci discards two contemporary and historically pervasive solutions: the utopia of fixed and universal languages, and the tendency of [Vilfredo] Pareto and the Pragmatists to abstractly theorize language as a cause of error. These solutions that looked for a resolution to the problem in question (that is, the ambivalence between daily and diverse language usage, the words of “the simple people,”3 on one hand, and the language of “educated” intellectuals, on the other) through a specific “dictionary” or through the creation of a pure (formal or mathematical) and universally usable, and used, language.
因此，问题在于如何行动，即如何从这些观察出发行事。葛兰西摒弃了两种同时代且具有历史普遍性的解决方案：固定且普遍的语言乌托邦，以及帕累托和实用主义者抽象地将语言视为错误根源的倾向。这些试图通过特定“词典”或创造一种纯净（形式或数学）且普遍适用和使用的语言来解决该问题（即日常和多样化语言使用之间的矛盾，一方面是“普通民众”的语言，另一方面是“受过教育”的知识分子的语言）的解决方案。

Regardless of what one thinks of the epistemological integrity of Pareto and Russells’s attempt to find languages in which terms are used univocally —and even separately from what one thinks of the (more recent) extension of those attempts to political science—it seems evident that such a pretense escapes the realm of concrete political activity. In fact, in this realm, one has to become acquainted with the impossibility of overcoming ambiguities, equivocations and metaphors. This, at least, is Gramsci’s point of view. Gramsci’s perspective implies the search for a nonformal or nonformalized, and in some sense metaphorical, language in which intellectuals and people that fight for a new culture can understand each other despite belonging to distinct generations.
无论人们如何看待帕累托和罗素试图寻找术语单义使用的语言（以及即便对这些尝试（更近期的）在政治科学上的延伸如何看待），这种假定似乎超出了具体的政治活动领域。事实上，在这个领域，人们必须认识到消除歧义、模棱两可和隐喻的不可能。至少，这就是葛兰西的观点。葛兰西的视角暗示了寻找一种非正式或非形式化，在某种意义上是隐喻性的语言，使知识分子和为新文化而奋斗的人们能够相互理解，尽管他们属于不同的世代。

To put it a different way, the renewal of the Marxist and socialist tradition, today, lacks any considerable effort being put toward the communication and understanding between generations, of diverse experiences and different views: an effort of linguistic innovation similar to the one made by Gramsci himself, first, in L，Ordine Nuovo and, subsequently, in his prison years.
换言之，当代马克思主义和社会主义传统的复兴，缺乏对代际之间、不同经验和不同观点之间的沟通和理解的显著努力：这需要一种类似于葛兰西本人最初在《新秩序》以及后来的狱中时期所做的语言创新努力。

The characteristics of this type of Gramscian effort can be synthesized by specifying, on the one hand, that it is methodologically innovative, on the level of form, in the way it presents one of the traditions of the (Marxist) workers’ movement and, therefore, for the way it interprets Marx’s work.
这种葛兰西式努力的特点可以通过以下方式概括：一方面，它在形式层面上具有方法论上的创新性，以一种方式呈现工人运动（马克思主义）的传统之一，并因此对马克思著作进行解读。

On the other hand, on a substantial level, this effort is also innovative with respect to the elaboration of socialist thought—a body of thought that comes from the same tradition, but that, in reality, focuses in an unprecedented way on new socioeconomic and cultural problems, which the classics of Marxism neither considered nor foresaw. The form in which Gramsci shapes his discourse, the language that he invents in order to interpret Marx and to think in continuity with Marx, but at the same time being innovative, is indeed fundamentally dialogic. I would like to stress this here. Gramsci’s is neither the tendentiously “architectonic” dialectical form used by Marx in the Critique of Political Economy and in Capital nor is it the type of “system” drafted by Engels in Anti-Duhring and in his reflection on the shift from utopian socialism to scientific socialism; nor is it the type of “tract” favorable to Bukharin; nor the almost always instrumental form adopted by Lenin in the majority of his works; nor the “essay” form that imposes a posterior “theoretical” Marxism. The form of Gramsci’s discourse is, above all, a simultaneous or deferred dialogue with three interlocutors: with the classics of the tradition (in order for him to specify their particular innovation), with the contemporaries close to him (in order to decide, if a decision is possible, what the preoccupations and problems of the moment are) and with himself, but without conceit, starting from the reconsideration of the experiences he had since 1917.
另一方面，从根本上讲，这项努力在社会主义思想的阐述方面也具有创新性——这套思想源于同一传统，但在现实中，它以前所未有的方式关注新的社会经济和文化问题，马克思主义经典著作既没有考虑也没有预见到这些问题。葛兰西塑造其论述的形式，他为了解释马克思并与马克思保持连续性，同时又具有创新性的语言，实际上是根本性的对话式。我想在这里强调这一点。葛兰西的思想既不是马克思在《政治经济学批判》和《资本论》中使用的倾向于“建筑式”的辩证形式，也不是恩格斯在《反杜林论》和其关于从空想社会主义到科学社会主义转变的反思中所构建的“体系”类型；也不是布哈林青睐的“论著”类型；也不是列宁在其大部分著作中所采用的几乎总是工具化的形式；也不是强加后设“理论”马克思主义的“随笔”形式。 葛兰西的论述形式，首先是与三位对话者同时或延宕的对话：与传统的经典（为了让他明确其独特的创新），与他周围的当代人（为了决定，如果可能的话，当下关注的焦点和问题是什么），以及与他自己，但无自负，从重新审视 1917 年以来的经验开始。

2

The importance Gramsci gave to language and speech during his entire life can be detected and studied from different spheres. In this chapter I will mainly refer to three of these spheres, especially focusing on the Prison Notebooks. The first that must be taken into account is—naturally—that from which Gramsci draws his special considerations of language and its history, of grammar, of linguistic problems, and of Italian culture and the literature connected to these problems. As is well known, as early as his initial research plan in prison—the one where Gramsci announces, with a certain irony, that he would like to create something für ewig—namely, in an disinterested way, appropriating Goethe’s conception recuperated from [Giovanni] Pascoli; he intended to reserve a specific section for these reflections. Not only was the second subject of his plan “nothing less” than a study of comparative linguistics, but also the other subjects (the study of the formation of a public spirit in nineteenth-century Italy, the transformation of the theatrical taste starting from the work of Pirandello and the elaboration of popular taste in literature) appear directly connected to interests of a philological nature.
格拉姆斯基一生对语言和言语的重视，可从不同领域探究。本章主要探讨三个领域，尤其关注《狱中札记》。首先，必须考虑格拉姆斯基从中汲取对语言及其历史、语法、语言问题以及意大利文化和相关文学的特殊见解的领域。众所周知，早在狱中最初的研究计划中——格拉姆斯基在其中以某种讽刺的语气宣布，他想要创造一些“永恒之物”——即，以一种无私的方式，借鉴从[乔瓦尼·]帕斯科利那里汲取的歌德的观念；他打算为这些思考保留一个专门的部分。 他的计划第二个主题不仅是“绝不亚于”比较语言学研究，其他主题（19 世纪意大利公共精神形成的研究、从皮兰德罗的作品开始的戏剧审美转变以及文学大众趣味的形成）也直接与文献学兴趣相关。

Although Gramsci modified his plan in subsequent years for different reasons and after a certain moment he even declared not to have a plan of systematic study anymore, his desire for “squeezing juice from a dried fig”4 undoubtedly allowed him to lay out at least one part of his “disinterested” project. His illness, the impossibility of having the appropriate scientific and academic materials available in prison, his political and sentimental problems and the constant effort of introspection of his later years convinced Gramsci that, given his situation, he could really only carryout a substantially polemical work. Through his introspective exercise Gramsci shored up the unity between the Socratic “know thyself” and making virtue out of a necessity, being conscious that this was the only thing he could really do under his conditions:
尽管葛兰西在后来的几年里出于不同的原因修改了他的计划，甚至在某个时刻宣称不再拥有系统的研究计划，但他“从干的无花果中榨取汁液”4 的愿望无疑使他能够至少阐述他“无私”计划的一部分。 他的疾病、狱中无法获得合适的科学和学术资料、他的政治和情感问题以及晚年持续的内省努力，使葛兰西确信，鉴于他的处境，他只能进行实质性的批判性工作。 通过他的内省练习，葛兰西巩固了苏格拉底的“认识你自己”与化必要为美德之间的统一，意识到这是他在当时条件下唯一真正能够做的事情。

Perhaps it is because my entire intellectual formation has been of a polemical order; even thinking “disinterestedly” is difficult for me, that is, studying for study’s sake. Only occasionally, but rarely, does it happen that I lose myself in a specific order of reflections and find, so to speak, in the things themselves enough interest to devote myself to their analysis. Ordinarily, I need to set out from a dialogical or dialectical standpoint, otherwise I don’t sense [senso] any intellectual stimulation. . . . I don’t like to cast stones in the darkness; I want to feel a concrete interlocutor or adversary; in my family relations too I wish to carry on dialogues.5
或许正因为我的整个知识形成过程都是论辩性的；即使“无私地”思考，对我来说也很困难，也就是说，为了学习而学习。只有偶尔，而且很少，我才会沉浸于一种特定的思考秩序，并在事物本身找到足够的兴趣来致力于它们的分析。通常，我需要从对话或辩证的立场出发，否则我感觉不到任何智力上的刺激……我不喜欢在黑暗中扔石头；我希望感受到一个具体的对话者或对手；在我的家庭关系中，我也希望进行对话。

Yet, from what can be seen in the Notebooks, Gramsci’s final realization of his project results in something more than a simple polemic. Certainly, it results in something more than a mosaic of fragmentary reflections—as it has been sometimes said, too hastily. Some examples of what is more than a simple polemic in Gramsci’s Notebooks are the notes on the following: the mobility and stratification of language; the tension between living grammar and normative grammar; the relationships existing between the expressive or stylistic choices and the forms of culture and social life; or those notes on the possibilities of the translatability of languages and cultural formations. In all this, there is a red thread that is tied to the question of the formation of a new culture—which is the culture of subaltern classes—and to the fight for hegemony, a red thread that goes beyond a polemic form and the fragmentation of the Gramsci’s notes. In a certain way, one can say that Gramsci’s project unfolds itself from a conjunction between his academic knowledge as a philologist and a historian of language [lingua], and the experience he acquired as a communist political leader vis-à-vis the study of the history of Italy and of the critique of culture. The result of this is, considering the Notebooks on the whole, a draft of political sociology of the present drawn from an explicit viewpoint and with great consciousness of what history is. Gramsci’s initial historical-critical considerations of the question of language [lingua] and intellectual classes or of the diverse types of grammar are connected back to his consideration of the politics of language,6 politics of culture and sociology of the present. These reflections focus substantially on the reorganization in the present of a cultural hegemony:
然而，从笔记中可以看出，葛兰西最终的项目实现并非简单的论战。当然，它超越了有时被过快地描述为零散反思的拼贴画。葛兰西笔记中超越简单论战的例子包括：语言的流动性和分层性；活语法的张力与规范语法；表达或风格选择与文化和社会生活形式之间的关系；以及关于语言和文化形态可译性的可能性等笔记。所有这些都与形成新文化（即被压迫阶级文化）以及争取领导权的斗争密切相关，这条红线超越了论战的形式和葛兰西笔记的零散性。 在某种程度上，可以说葛兰西的项目源于他作为语言学家和语言史[lingua]研究者的学术知识，以及作为共产主义政治领袖在意大利历史研究和文化批判中的经验。由此，综合考虑《狱中札记》的整体内容，形成了一个从明确视角出发，并深刻认识历史本质的当代政治社会学草稿。葛兰西最初对语言[lingua]问题、知识分子阶层或各种语法类型的历史批判性思考，与他对语言政治、文化政治和当代社会学的思考紧密相连。这些反思主要集中于当下文化霸权的重组

Every time the question of the language [lingua] surfaces, in one way or another, it means that a series of other problems are coming to the fore: the formation and enlargement of the governing class, the need to establish more intimate and secure relationships between the governing groups and the national-popular mass, in other words to reorganize the cultural hegemony. Today, we have witnessed various phenomena which indicate a rebirth of these questions.7
每当语言问题[lingua]以某种方式出现，就意味着一系列其他问题浮出水面：统治阶级的形成和扩大，统治集团与民族大众建立更密切和更安全的联系的需要，换句话说，是重组文化霸权。如今，我们已经目睹了各种迹象表明这些问题正在复苏。

Thus, besides ascertaining that Gramsci’s consideration of the [national] language [lingua], language usage [linguaggio] and literature in relation to hegemony can be found at the beginning (in the first notebook, begun February 8, 1929) and at the end of the Notebooks (in the “Notes for an Introduction to the Study of Grammar,” written in 1935), one must say that the kind of consideration he makes continues to be of great relevance, particularly in countries such as ours [Italy], where the question of language [lingua] (or, better, of languages [lingue], of the dialectal and of the cultures that encounter and clash) became, for some time, one of the main themes of public debate. Even with respect to this, Gramsci’s main lesson is a methodological one, considering methodology in a wide—philosophical— sense. Avoiding making such a pre-political question into an instrumental political theme (which is precisely what is happening in the controversies on languages and cultures in recent times), Gramsci was able to intuit very well the political and politico-cultural dimensions that are hidden—or that are not always declared—in each project of linguistic normalization (when the question of the language surfaces) starting from the variations of normative grammar. Today, in the epoch of multiculturalism, but also of globalization and of a new onset of nationalisms and of particularisms, we can confirm daily what is at stake in these polemics that seem, at first sight, to be only linguistic, philological, sociolinguistic or culture-anthropological, is, actually, at the same time, the struggle for (cultural, economical and political) hegemony between the distinct fractions of the national bourgeoisies, the distinct bourgeoisies of the multinational and multilinguistic states, and the bourgeoisies and the middle classes of states composed of important dialectal variants.
因此，除了确定葛兰西对[国家]语言[lingua]、语言运用[linguaggio]和文学与霸权关系的考察，出现在《狱中札记》之始（第一本札记，始于 1929 年 2 月 8 日）及终（“语法研究导论札记”，写于 1935 年），我们还必须指出，他所做的这种考察，尤其在像我们[意大利]这样的国家，其语言[lingua]（或更确切地说，是诸语言[lingue]，方言以及相互遭遇和冲突的文化）问题一度成为公众辩论的主要主题，其意义依然重大。即便就这一点而言，葛兰西的主要教诲也是一种方法论的教诲，方法论在广义——哲学的——层面上理解。 避免将这种先政治问题转化为工具性的政治议题（这正是近年来语言和文化争议的实况），葛兰西敏锐地把握了语言规范化（当语言问题出现时）的每一个项目中隐藏的——或并非总是宣示的——政治和政治文化维度，从规范语法变异开始。如今，在多元文化、全球化以及新兴民族主义和地方主义的时代，我们每天都能证实这些乍看之下仅是语言学、文献学、社会语言学或文化人类学的论争，实际上同时也是各民族资产阶级不同派系、跨国及多语种国家的不同资产阶级，以及由重要方言变体构成的国家资产阶级和中产阶级之间争夺（文化、经济和政治）霸权的斗争。

In this sense, it seems to me that bringing the keen notes of Gramsci on “Americanism” together with his considerations regarding the political-cultural background of the historical projects on linguistic normativity or with his observations on the national popular can greatly help the rational understanding of what is happening in our geographical context—which is not a good sign. It might also be said that the pendulum of history has changed direction: Gramsci evolved from the autonomism of his youth to progressively stressing the importance of the “national-popular” with internationalist intentions, though respecting differences. Whereas, today, partly as a reaction to the globalization and the cultural standardization that it implies, we move toward an identification of the “national-popular” with autonomism (in diverse political versions: the regionalist, nationalist, separatists and so on).
从这个意义上说，我认为将葛兰西对“美国主义”的敏锐观察与他对语言规范性历史项目之政治文化背景的思考，以及他对民族大众的观察结合起来，对于理解我们地理环境中正在发生的事情（情况不容乐观）大有裨益。 也许可以说，历史的钟摆已经改变了方向：葛兰西从青年时期的自治主义逐渐转向强调“民族-大众”的重要性，同时怀有国际主义的意图，并尊重差异。而如今，部分是作为对全球化及其所暗示的文化标准化的反应，我们正朝着将“民族-大众”与自治主义（以各种政治版本，如区域主义、民族主义、分离主义等）等同的方向发展。

3

The second sphere that is relevant to this chapter is the one concerning the considerations that Gramsci made in his correspondence with Julia and Tania on languages [lingue] as a means of communication. From this viewpoint, it can be said that the problem of language and of expressive possibilities becomes almost obsessive for Gramsci in his communication with Julia Schucht.
与本章相关的第二个领域是关于葛兰西在其与朱莉娅和塔尼娅的书信往来中，就语言[lingue]作为交流手段所作考虑的领域。从这个角度来看，可以认为，在与朱莉娅·舒赫特的通信中，语言问题以及表达可能性问题几乎成了葛兰西的执念。

Gramsci’s obsession has two dimensions: a private and sentimental dimension which is tied to the effort of keeping a “true correspondence”
葛兰西的执念具有两重维度：一种是私人的、感性的维度，与维持“真实书信往来”的努力相关联

and an “authentic dialogue” alive between persons that love each other but do not always understand each other, and a political one. We face the relationship between an Italian man who has difficulties in reading and understanding the Russian language and a Russian woman who expresses herself by writing in Italian with some difficulty. If the communication between two such persons also presents some difficulties in normal circumstances, the difficulties become acute because of the distance (Gramsci in Italy, Julia in Moscow), the mutual physical and psychological illnesses, and the prison (which does not allow open and frank discussions about anything, neither about sentiments nor about politics).
并且存在着“真实对话”——爱人之间，尽管并非总能理解彼此，但仍能保持的对话，以及政治对话。我们面临着一位意大利男人与一位俄罗斯女人的关系，这位意大利男人在阅读和理解俄语方面存在困难，而这位俄罗斯女人则以意大利语写作表达自己，也存在一些困难。如果两位如此人物之间的沟通在正常情况下也存在一些困难，那么由于距离（葛兰西在意大利，朱莉娅在莫斯科），相互的身体和心理疾病以及监狱（不允许公开坦诚地讨论任何事情，无论是情感还是政治），这些困难就变得更加尖锐。

One understands why, in such conditions, Gramsci had insisted many times on the importance of Julia expressing herself with clarity and precision. One also understands why, sometimes, Tania’s well-intended mediations would irritate him. And, at least partially, one can understand Gramsci’s specific obsession for reading the same letter more than once to grasp all the nuances contained in just one bit of information or one affirmation by Julca.8
在这种情况下，人们理解了为什么葛兰西多次强调朱莉亚必须清晰、精确地表达自己。人们也能理解，有时，塔尼娅的善意调解会令他感到恼火。至少部分地，人们可以理解葛兰西对阅读同一封信多次以把握朱莉亚信息或肯定中所有细微差别的特殊执着。

This obsession for the language [linguaggio] of interpersonal communication so evident in Gramsci’s correspondence would become, in some moments of his prison life, a true neurosis. It is not possible to maintain a sentimental long-distance relationship between two people who have children together through the philological and, at times, pedantic pickiness that appear in Gramsci’s letters. In any case, such pickiness must be considered one of the exemplary elements of the tragedy of the person, Gramsci, in prison and of Julca in Moscow.
葛兰西的通信中，对人际交流语言的这种痴迷，在他狱中某些时刻，会变成一种真正的神经症。两个有共同孩子的恋人，不可能通过葛兰西信件中体现出的那种语言学上的，有时甚至迂腐的吹毛求疵来维持一段感情长途。无论如何，这种吹毛求疵必须被视为葛兰西在狱中以及朱尔卡在莫斯科的悲剧性个体中，一个典型的要素。

Given that this issue is delicate and requires that one deals with it delicately, I will stop here. Not without quickly adding, however, that the banality of the tragedy of Gramsci, the man, in his relationship to Julia Schucht, that we witnessed, in these last years, especially in Italy, produces nausea and takes away the will to continue writing. Before this spectacle that now, as I can see, appears in the pages of the newspapers, there is nothing left to do but repeat the biting and slightly melancholic words written by Valentino Gerratana in 1992: “When only a simulacra of culture exists, as in this case, there can not be a true dialogue, neither with Gramsci, nor with anyone else.”
鉴于这个问题敏感且需要谨慎处理，我到此为止。不过，我迅速补充一点，关于葛兰西，这位人物，与其妻子朱莉娅·舒赫特之间的悲剧的平庸性，我们近年来，尤其是在意大利目睹的，令人作呕，并消磨了继续写作的意志。面对现在，正如我所见，出现在报纸上的这场闹剧，除了重复 1992 年瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳所写的那几句辛辣而略带忧郁的话之外，别无他法：“当文化只剩下模拟的影子，如同这种情况，就不可能与葛兰西，或者任何其他人进行真正的对话。”

Identity or locality in politics which overlap with the sentimental relationship complicate the communication between people who base the dignity of culture on its capability of transforming humans and their real relationships. In effect, in the years of the Third International, linguistic precision and an appropriate use of words would be doubly important between people who, though sharing the same objectives, were obliged to take immediate decisions with regard to the divisions between friends and acquaintances. In such conditions, even jokes and irony had to be measured.
政治中的身份认同或地域认同与情感关系的重叠，使那些将文化尊严建立在其改造人类及其真实关系能力之上的群体间的沟通变得复杂。实际上，在第三国际时期，在那些尽管目标相同，却不得不就朋友和熟人之间的分歧做出即时决定的群体之间，语言的精确性和词语的恰当运用将显得更加重要。在这种情况下，即使是玩笑和讽刺也要有所节制。

One of the negative consequences of the Russianization of the European communist parties—which Lenin already perceived in the Fourth Congress of the Third International and to which Gramsci opportunely refers—is that such a process obliges the understanding of themes and national questions that are sometimes difficult to translate through different categories and words. The division that, in this period, was coming to light between a “Russian Marxism” and a Marxism that was called “Western” has its prepolitical origin in a problem of translation. This problem concerned the translation of Marx’s view of history and of humanity, which he elaborated in relation to class struggle in Germany, France and England. But it had to be translated into Russian in a manner that the peasants could understand it. This division has its origin also in the fact that Marx’s view was later retranslated from Russian (in Leninist terms) into German, English or Italian.
俄罗斯化欧洲共产党所带来的负面后果之一——列宁在共产国际第四次代表大会上已有所预见，葛兰西也适时地提及——是，这一过程迫使人们去理解那些有时难以通过不同的范畴和词汇来转换的主题和民族问题。在此期间显露的“俄罗斯马克思主义”与“西方马克思主义”之间的分歧，其前政治根源在于一个翻译问题。这个问题关乎马克思关于历史和人类的观点的翻译，他是在德国、法国和英国的阶级斗争背景下阐述的。但它必须被翻译成俄语，以便农民能够理解。这种分歧的起源还在于，马克思的观点后来又从俄语（以列宁主义的术语）重新翻译成德语、英语或意大利语。

For an intellectual, who knew Marx’s work fairly well, even for an intellectual like Gramsci who greatly appreciated Lenin’s work, this double process of translations and retranslations from Russian and into Russian, of relatively known socioeconomic and cultural problems, could have been assessed as equivalent to a “betrayal'' [of the original]. Since, in a certain way, and even in this case, il traduttore è traditore [the translator is a traitor].
对于一位相当了解马克思著作的知识分子，甚至对于高度赞赏列宁著作的葛兰西这样一位知识分子来说，这种将相对已知的社会经济和文化问题从俄语翻译到俄语，再从俄语翻译出来的双重翻译和再翻译过程，可能被视为一次“背叛”[对原著的背叛]。因为，在某种程度上，甚至在这种情况下，译者都是叛徒[il traduttore è traditore]。

In effect, in analyzing the political controversies from 1924 to 1936, not enough attention has been given to the preliminary problem of the definition of the properly political: namely, could the interlocutors for Russian, German, Hungarian, Italian, French, Polish, Spanish and so forth really understand the key words of the discussion in the same sense and according to the same values? Not to mention, moreover, when, in this context, people start speaking of the Chinese Revolution with terms and concepts of French political language [linguaggio] translated from Russian.
实际上，在分析 1924 年至 1936 年的政治争议时，对“恰当的政治”定义的预备性问题关注不足：即，俄罗斯、德国、匈牙利、意大利、法国、波兰、西班牙等国的对话者是否真的以相同意义和价值观理解讨论中的关键词？更不用说，在此语境下，人们开始用从俄语翻译过来的法语政治语言[linguaggio]的术语和概念来谈论中国革命。

I propose that Gramsci—who devoted some very incisive paragraphs of the Notebooks to the problem of the translatability of languages,9 who wanted to devote himself to translation and who had serious problems of communication even with his prisonmates discussing the strategy of the Third International—was obviously sensitive to the question that might be entitled “Babel in the internationalism of the Third International,” namely, how to construct a common language [linguaggio] understandable by people speaking many languages [lingue] and belonging to different nationalities, knowing that while, theoretically, workers should not have a homeland, as a matter of fact they do have one (as World War I proved).
我建议葛兰西——他在《狱中札记》中专门用一些非常犀利的段落探讨语言的翻译问题，他渴望从事翻译工作，并且即使与狱友讨论第三国际的策略也存在严重的沟通问题——显然对“第三国际国际主义中的巴别塔”这一问题很敏感，即如何构建一种被讲多种语言、属于不同民族的人们都能理解的共同语言，知道虽然理论上工人不应该有祖国，但事实上他们确实有（正如第一次世界大战所证明的那样）。

There is no doubt that when Gramsci proposes to himself the problem of the translatability of scientific and philosophical languages [linguaggi], what he has in mind is precisely the problem of the national traditions in the frame of the International. Moreover, this reflection comes precisely from one of Gramsci’s citations of Lenin, according to whom they did not know how to “translate our language [lingua] into the European languages.”10
毫无疑问，当葛兰西提出科学和哲学语言（linguaggi）的翻译问题时，他所思考的正是国际框架内民族传统的问题。此外，这一思考恰恰源于葛兰西对列宁的引用，后者认为他们未能将“我们的语言（lingua）翻译成欧洲语言”。

The problem of translating an internationalist strategy shared by workers and intellectuals who speak different languages [lingue]—and who belong to different nationalities—into a common language [linguaggio] is already present in the first years of the First International. One cannot deal with this question only from the viewpoint of class (spontaneous or conscious) solidarity. Since then, part of the socialist and communist movement acted as if the affirmation that “workers do not have a homeland” were a judgment or a sociological proposition deduced from some inquiry conducted among representative segments of the world’s industrial proletariat. Yet, with even a little reflection, one will see that, in reality, this is a normative affirmation—the affirmation of a desire.
将工人和知识分子（他们使用不同的语言[lingue]，并属于不同的民族）所共享的国际主义战略翻译成一种共同语言[linguaggio]的问题，在第一国际成立的头几年就已经存在。仅仅从阶级（自发或自觉）团结的角度来处理这个问题是不够的。此后，社会主义和共产主义运动的一部分，仿佛“工人没有祖国”这一论断是根据对世界产业工人代表性部分进行的调查得出的判断或社会学命题。然而，稍加思考便会发现，实际上，这是一个规范性的断言——一种愿望的表达。

Marx himself became aware of the importance of this problem. In an interview he granted in 1871 to The World, a New York magazine, he said:
马克思本人也意识到了这个问题的重要性。他在 1871 年接受《世界报》（纽约杂志）采访时曾说过：

The [International Workers5] Association does not dictate the form of political movements; it only requires a pledge as to their end. It is a network of affiliated societies spreading all over the world of labor. In each part of the world some special aspect of the problem presents itself, and the workmen there address themselves to its consideration in their own way. Combinations among workmen cannot be absolutely identical in detail in Newcastle and Barcelona, in London and Berlin. The Association does not pretend to impose its will on them and does not pretend to give them advice: but to every movement it accords its sympathy and its aid within the limits assigned by its own laws.11
国际工人协会并不规定政治运动的形式；它只要求对其目标做出承诺。它是一个遍布全球劳工界的附属社团网络。世界各地的问题各有侧重，当地的工人以各自的方式进行考虑。纽卡斯尔和巴塞罗那、伦敦和柏林工人的联合行动不可能在细节上完全相同。该协会并不试图强加其意志，也不试图提供建议：但对于任何运动，它都在其自身章程规定的范围内给予同情和援助。

Yet Gramsci goes further. He shifts this reflection from the political-organizational level to an anterior one, that of the possibility of translating languages [linguaggi] and different cultures, by attempting to simultaneously overcome ethnocentric primitivism and absolute relativism. Criticizing “philosophical Esperantism” as well as the “utopia of fixed and universal languages [lingue]" or the “resistance to a development of a national common language [lingua] by the fanatics of the international languages,” Gramsci succeeds in instituting a relationship and in putting into question scientific pragmatism of positivistic origin as well as Bukharin's attempt in his Popular Manual, since they are both undermined by a kind of ethnocentrism that does not understand the historicity of languages [linguaggi] and of philosophies and that leads one to believe that everything which is not expressed in one's own language is delirium, prejudgement or superstition.12
然而，葛兰西更进一步。他将这种反思从政治组织层面转移到更前置的层面，即翻译语言[linguaggi]和不同文化可能性层面，试图同时克服民族中心主义的原始性和绝对相对主义。他批判“哲学世界语主义”以及“固定和普遍语言[lingue]的乌托邦”或“国际语言的狂热分子对民族共同语言[lingua]发展所持的抵抗”，从而建立起一种关系，并对具有实证主义起源的科学实用主义以及布哈林在其《大众手册》中的尝试提出质疑，因为两者都被一种不理解语言[linguaggi]和哲学的历史性的民族中心主义所削弱，这使得人们相信，凡不是用自己的语言表达的东西都是妄想、先有偏见或迷信。

In this context, Gramsci elaborates a couple of theoretical criteria which are very useful in founding the possibility, though imperfect, of a reciprocal translatability within the realm of the philosophy of praxis between national languages and cultures which belong to different traditions. These criteria are:
在此语境下，葛兰西阐述了几条理论标准，这些标准非常有助于建立不同传统国家语言和文化之间实践哲学领域内相互翻译的可能性，尽管这种可能性并不完美。这些标准是：

a) To clarify, in relationship to one's own language [linguaggio] and one's own worldview, “the doses of criticism and skepticism" that are necessary to maintain as an alternative to one's own culture without paralyzing (or demoralizing) oneself and without falling into sectarianism;
a) 为了阐明，相对于一个人的母语[语言]和世界观，“批判和怀疑论的剂量”是必要的，以作为对自身文化的一种替代，而不至于使自己麻痹（或丧失斗志），也不至于陷入教条主义；

b) To admit, not only as a possibility, but also as a reality, that there are cultures which are superior to others, even though一this is crucial一they are almost never superior for the reasons which their own fanatic defenders, primitivist or ethnocentric, believe they are and never, above all, are they considered in their entirety and totality.
b) 承认，不仅是可能，而且是现实，存在一些文化优于其他文化，尽管——这一点至关重要——它们几乎从未以其狂热拥护者（原始主义者或民族中心主义者）认为的理由而优越，而且最重要的是，它们从未被完整地、全面地考虑过。

The third sphere to study is that of the repercussion of such a preoccupation with language [linguaggio] and specific languages [lingue] within the evolution of the political thought of Gramsci. In this realm, one must say that, notwithstanding that the reflection on the nexus between language [linguaggio] and politics is not always explicit, the originality of Gramsci, and, in particular, of his Marxism, is due mainly to his will of expressing, in a new form, a new form of doing politics. Such a dimension of Gramsci’s work has always been recognized by people from other traditions and cultures: from Piero Gobetti to Camillo Berneri and from Joaquim Maruin to Bendetto Croce.
第三个需要研究的领域是这种对语言[linguaggio]和特定语言[lingue]的关注在其对格拉姆斯基政治思想演变中的反响。在这个领域，必须指出，尽管对语言[linguaggio]与政治之间联系的反思并非总是显而易见，但格拉姆斯基，特别是他的马克思主义的独创性，主要源于他以新的形式表达新的政治实践的意愿。格拉姆斯基的这一维度一直为其他传统和文化背景的人们所认可：从皮耶罗·戈贝蒂到卡米洛·贝内里，再到若阿金·马林到本德托·克罗齐。

Therefore, Gramsci followed the path opened by Marx with his proposal, making philosophy earthly, conceived as a form of realization-overcoming of philosophy itself, by developing Marx’s considerations about the problems of a humanity that suffers and that thinks. If already in the Marx of the 1840s, and even more in the Marx of the 1850s, we can find a documented journalism with historical-philosophical notions and viewpoints, we find a journalistic form as original as Marx’s in the Gramsci of L'Ordine Nuovo: informed, learned, polemical and simultaneously problematic and true. This is not an accident, but is due, instead, to Gramsci’s specific reflection on both the alternative culture of the subaltern classes (in a polemic with Tasca and Bordiga) and on the more adequate linguistic form of communication necessary to establish and maintain a living relationship between the intellectuals and the people.
因此，葛兰西沿着马克思开辟的道路，通过将哲学世俗化，将其视为哲学自身实现—超越的形式，发展了马克思关于受苦和思考的人类问题的思考。如果在 1840 年代的马克思，甚至更在 1850 年代的马克思中，我们都能找到带有历史哲学概念和观点的文献化新闻写作，那么在葛兰西的《新秩序》中，我们发现了一种与马克思一样原创的新闻形式：信息丰富、博学、具有争议性，同时又充满问题和真实。这并非偶然，而是源于葛兰西对被压迫阶级替代文化的特定反思（与塔斯卡和博尔迪加的论战），以及建立和维持知识分子与人民之间生动关系所需更合适的沟通语言形式。

This reflection is like a red thread that runs through Gramsci’s entire work from 1918 to 1935, which was elaborated by fundamentally taking into account two factors: on the one hand, the comparison between the new world view and the history of the institutionalization of Christianity and the Church and, on the other, the necessity of opposing the vulgarization of Marxist socialism, which tended to treat workers as “simple people” or “mere troops." Gramsci aims at building a link between leaders and led in the field of the same tradition (he says, “explicit and active worldview"), whose basis is one shared language [linguaggio] and not, as in the case of churches, two languages [linguaggi] where one is for the clergy, and another for the simple people.
这种反思如同一条红线，贯穿了葛兰西 1918 年至 1935 年间的全部著作，其阐述立足于两个根本因素：一方面，比较新世界观与基督教和教会体制化的历史；另一方面，反对马克思主义的庸俗化，这种庸俗化倾向于将工人视为“简单的人”或“单纯的士兵”。葛兰西旨在建立领导者与被领导者之间在同一传统领域（他称之为“明确而活跃的世界观”）的联系，其基础是共同的语言，而不是像教会那样存在两种语言，一种供神职人员使用，另一种供普通民众使用。

In the framework of this research, Gramsci’s proposal of the dialogical form goes together with the proposal of a new type of philosopher, whom he calls the “democratic philosopher,” and whose personality is not limited to cultivating individuality but aims, above all, at an “active social relationship which modifies the cultural environment." This is precisely how Gramsci translated Marx’s way of making philosophy worldly. Gramsci’s adaptation to the epoch of the “fist in the eye"一namely, to the years of fascism and Nazism一is expressed in his recognition of the necessity to shift, with humility, from feeling like a “plowman of history” to considering ourselves the “manure of history." Gramsci says, “Once everybody wanted to be a plowman of history. Nobody wanted to be the 'manure' of history. But is it possible to plow before feeding the soil? Something must have changed because there are people who 'philosophically' adapt themselves to being manure, who know they must be manure and that, therefore, adapt themselves."13 Politics, above all, in the bad moments, must be, first of all, pedagogy, and its language [linguaggio]一the language of politics一must be pedagogical, passionate and sincere, but without being vulgar or primitive.
在这项研究框架内，葛兰西的对话式形式提议与一种新型哲学家的提议相伴，他称之为“民主哲学家”，其个性不仅限于培养个人，更主要地致力于建立一种“改造文化环境的积极社会关系”。这正是葛兰西将马克思的哲学世俗化的方式。葛兰西对“拳头打在眼睛上”时代——即法西斯和纳粹主义年代——的适应体现在他认识到，必须谦逊地从“历史的耕耘者”转变为“历史的肥料”。葛兰西说：“过去每个人都想要成为历史的耕耘者，没有人想要成为‘历史的肥料’。但是，在施肥之前，你能耕耘吗？一定有什么变化，因为有些人‘哲学地’适应了做肥料，他们知道自己必须是肥料，因此而适应。13 政治，尤其是在困难时期，首先必须是教育，其语言——政治的语言——必须是教育性的、充满激情的、真诚的，但不能庸俗或原始。

This reflection leads Gramsci to a consideration on the state of the soul and style, which are more adequate to the new period, namely, to that historical phase in which the old was dying with difficulty, and the new was coming to life with difficulty.
这一反思促使葛兰西思考适合新时期——即旧事物艰难消亡、新事物艰难诞生的历史阶段——的灵魂状态和风格。

I would like to recall another two passages from the Notebooks which are interesting as well because of the consideration of the relationship between language [linguaggio] and politics.14 The first passage refers to the question of young people and to the importance reserved to the intergenerational dialogue in the fight for hegemony. The second, which is also a dialogue between Gramsci and his own tradition, refers to the style, namely, to the more appropriate form through which the “historical bloc" can be elaborated and to the creation of a “center of nexus" between the intellectuals and the people.
我想再从笔记中引述另外两段文字，它们同样因为对语言与政治关系的考察而引人入胜。14 第一段涉及青年问题，以及在争取霸权的斗争中代际对话的重要性。第二段，也是一次葛兰西与其自身传统的对话，涉及风格，即更合适的形式，通过这种形式可以阐述“历史块”，以及在知识分子与人民之间建立“联系中心”。

Several times, Gramsci has called attention to the importance of the ruptures and the generational crises in the fight for hegemony as well as to the responsibility of the somewhat older people in this fight. The generational crises are directly related to a cultural malaise. It is, therefore, essential to find a common language [linguaggio] thanks to which people of different ages, which aim at transforming the world, can understand and communicate their own different life experiences to each other. Gramsci is trying to propose, in positive terms, a delicate theme, to which Turgenev and Dostoevsky had already devoted excellent essays, entitled “Fathers and Sons” and “Liberalism and Nihilism,” respectively. Given that this continues to be one of the themes of our times, it will not be useless for this paper to devote a few words to extending Gramsci’s preoccupation to the present.
葛兰西多次强调断裂和代际危机在争取领导权斗争中的重要性，以及较年长一代在此斗争中的责任。代际危机与文化萎靡直接相关。因此，至关重要的是找到一种共同语言，使不同年龄、致力于改变世界的人们能够理解和交流各自不同的生活经历。葛兰西正试图以积极的方式探讨一个微妙的话题，陀思妥耶夫斯基和屠格涅夫先前已分别在其著作《父与子》和《自由主义与虚无主义》中对此作出了精彩的论述。鉴于这一主题依然是当今时代的重要议题，本文将不失为拓展葛兰西的关注点至当今时代的尝试。

One of the problems we must now cope with is the fact that the dialogue between generations is mediated by the trivialization and manipulation of the history of the twentieth century by historiographic “revisionism.” Revisionism is deeply penetrating and already appears as an ideology functioning decisively in the interests of the dominant classes in the epoch of cultural homogenization and standardization. What is called “postmodernism” is, on a cultural level, the latest step of capitalism and, as John Berger wrote, “the historical task of capitalism is to destroy history, to cut every tie with the past and to direct all efforts and the entire imagination toward what is currently happening.”
我们现在必须面对的一个问题是，代际对话正受到二十世纪历史被史学“修正主义”庸俗化和操纵的影响。“修正主义”深入人心，在文化同质化和标准化的时代，已成为服务于统治阶级利益的决定性意识形态。所谓的“后现代主义”，在文化层面，是资本主义的最新一步，正如约翰·伯格所写，“资本主义的历史任务是摧毁历史，割断与过去的任何联系，并将所有努力和全部想象力导向当前发生的事情。”

This is how it has been and how it is. Since it is so, we need to provide young people, who were formed in a culture of fragmentary images, with a new reading of history, different from the one given by the great traditional chronological narration of history, in order for them to become interested in who Marx and Gramsci were and what they did—namely, in the Marxist socialist tradition. We have to provide the younger generations with an interpretation of history which substantially restores, through fragmentary images, the continuing centrality of class struggle in our epoch—namely, in between the chiaroscuro of the tragedies of the twentieth century. Gramsci dealt with theater, popular literature, poetry and narrative. Moreover, he understood the importance of the (oral and written) word for the elaboration of worldviews and for the construction of a great historical narration. These reflections ought to be continued. It is probable that, today, the more adequate language [linguaggio] to restore the dialogue between generations, in the realm of liberating the tradition of socialist culture, would be an alternative use of the cinematographic and visual techniques—namely, a combination of historical documentation and reasoned passion.
这就是过去，也是现在。既然如此，我们就需要为成长于碎片化图像文化中的年轻人提供一种新的历史解读，不同于伟大的传统年代史叙事，以便他们对马克思和葛兰西以及他们的作为——即马克思主义社会主义传统——产生兴趣。我们必须为年轻一代提供一种历史诠释，通过碎片化图像实质性地恢复我们时代（即二十世纪悲剧的明暗交织之间）阶级斗争的持续核心地位。葛兰西研究过戏剧、通俗文学、诗歌和叙事。此外，他还理解了语言（口头和书面）对世界观构建和宏大历史叙事构建的重要性。这些思考应该继续下去。 今天，在解放社会主义文化传统领域恢复代际对话，更合适的语言[linguaggio]可能是电影和视觉技术的另类运用——即历史文献与理性激情相结合。

I would like to conclude with a consideration of the style of the new way of doing politics. There is a reflection, contained in a note from 1935, on the “contradictions of historicism and of their literary expressions” which summarizes well, in my opinion, the lesson of style that Gramsci wanted to leave us. Such a reflection deals with irony and sarcasm as stylistic forms and is of surprising relevancy.
最后，我想探讨一下新政治方式的风格。1935 年的一则笔记中，对“历史主义的矛盾及其文学表达”进行了反思，在我看来，它很好地总结了葛兰西想要传达的风格教诲。这种反思涉及讽刺和挖苦作为一种风格形式，其相关性令人惊讶。

Gramsci wrote: 葛兰西写道：

It is correct to use “irony” to describe the attitude of single intellectuals, individually, that is without immediate responsibility towards the construction of a cultural world or to point out the detachment of an artist from the sentimental content of her own creation (who either can "feel” but not "share,” or can share but in more intellectually refined form).
使用“反讽”来描述单体知识分子的态度，即他们个人无需对文化世界的建设承担直接责任，或者指出艺术家与其作品的情感内容之间的疏离（他们要么能“感受”却不能“分享”，要么能分享但以更具智识性的形式分享），是正确的。

“Irony” can be appropriate either for describing the attitude of single intellectuals, individually, that is, of those who have no immediate responsibility in the construction of a cultural world, or to point out the detachment of an artist from the sentimental content of his creation (which he can “feel,” but on which he cannot “agree,” or on which he can agree, but in a more refined intellectual form). Yet, in the case of historical action, the element of “irony” would only be literary or intellectualized and would indicate a form of detachment connected to a somewhat amateurish skepticism, caused by disillusion, fatigue, and a “superman” complex. Instead, in the case of historical-political action the adequate stylistic element, the characteristic attitude of the detachment-understanding, is “sarcasm； though understood in a specific way, that is, as “passionate sarcasm.” In the founders of the philosophy of praxis one can find the highest expression, ethically and aesthetically, of passionate sarcasm.... In
“反讽”既可以用来描述单个知识分子的态度，即那些在文化世界建设中没有直接责任的人，也可以用来指出艺术家与其创作的情感内容的疏离（他可以“感受”，但不能“认同”，或者可以认同，但以一种更精细的智性形式）。然而，在历史行动的情况下，“反讽”元素只会是文学或知识化的，并表明与某种业余的怀疑论相关的疏离形式，这种怀疑论是由幻灭、疲惫和“超人”情结造成的。相反，在历史政治行动中，合适的风格元素，即疏离理解的特征态度是“讽刺”；尽管以一种特定方式理解，即“充满激情的讽刺”。在实践哲学的奠基者身上，人们可以找到充满激情讽刺的最高伦理和审美表达……

the face of popular beliefs and illusions . . . there is a passionately “positive,” creative and progressive sarcasm: one can understand that what is mocked is not the most intimate feelings of those illusions and beliefs, but their immediate form—which is connected to a given “perishable” world—that is, the stench of a corpse that seeps out through the humanitarian face makeup of those professionals of “immortal principles.”15
流行信仰与幻觉的面孔……其中蕴含着一种充满激情、积极、进步的讽刺：人们可以理解，嘲讽的并非这些幻觉和信仰最私密的感受，而是它们与特定“易逝”世界相联的直接形式——即，那些“永恒原则”的专业人士，通过人道主义的面部化妆品掩盖的尸臭。

In this passage, Gramsci clearly distinguishes between “impassioned sarcasm” and a sarcasm of the anti-humanistic right that is rarely impassioned and that always presents itself as negative, skeptical, and, hence, destructive, not only of the contingent forms but also of the human content contained in the sentiments and beliefs mentioned above. And so he continues: “One tries to give new form to the live nucleus of the aspirations contained in these beliefs (hence to regenerate and better determine these aspirations) not to destroy them." But, as it always happens, the first and original manifestations of sarcasm often give birth to slavish imitations: even what initially was style risks deteriorating into rhetoric and jargon; but this must be avoided, and, especially, in our epoch.
在这段文字中，葛兰西明确区分了“充满激情讽刺”和反人道主义右翼的讽刺，后者鲜少充满激情，总是表现为消极、怀疑，因此具有破坏性，不仅破坏了偶然的形式，也破坏了上述情感和信念中包含的人性内容。他继续说道：“人们试图赋予这些信念中包含的渴望的活核以新的形式（因此使这些渴望得到再生和更好地确定），而不是摧毁它们。”但是，正如总是发生的那样，讽刺的最初和原始表现形式常常会产生奴性模仿：即使最初是风格的东西，也可能沦为修辞和行话；但在我们这个时代，尤其要避免这种情况。

Historicism cannot be conceived as a discourse that is expressible in an apodictic or sermonizing form. It has to create a new stylistic taste and a new language [linguaggio] as a means of intellectual struggle. Sarcasm appears, therefore, as the stylistic-literary component of a series of theoretical and practical exigencies, which can only superficially be presented as irreconcilably contradictory; its essential element is passion which becomes a criterion of the stylistic power of the individuals (of sincerity, of deep conviction as opposed to parroting and being mechanical).
历史主义不能被理解为一种可以用断言或说教形式表达的论述。它必须创造一种新的风格趣味和一种新的语言作为智力斗争的手段。因此，讽刺就作为一系列理论和实践要求的风格-文学组成部分出现，这些要求只能肤浅地被视为完全矛盾；其本质要素是激情，它成为个人（真诚、深刻的信念而非鹦鹉学舌和机械）的风格力量的标准。

Notes 笔记

1. Antonio Gramsci, Selections from the Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Quintin Hoare and Geoffrey Nowell Smith (New York: International Publishers, 1971), 450, hereafter cited as SPN. [There is a list of abbreviations on pages ix-x. Q11§28. To facilitate locating passages in various translations and anthologies, we use the standard method of providing the notebook (Quaderno) number一in this case 11一followed by the section number, §. See the introduction, page 12, for discussion. We will indicate the English translation, if used.]
1. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》选编，昆廷·霍尔和杰弗里·诺韦尔·史密斯译（纽约：国际出版公司，1971），第 450 页，以下简称《狱记》。[书内有缩写表，见第 ix-x 页。Q11§28。为方便在各种译本和选集中查找相关段落，我们采用标准方法，提供笔记本（Quaderno）编号——在本例中为 11——后跟章节编号，§。有关讨论，请见导言，第 12 页。我们将标明所使用的英文译文，如有的话。]

2. Q11§28, SPN, 450. 2. Q11§28，SPN，450。

3. [Gramsci uses the term i simplici, which has the meaning of “simpletons" but also an opposition like that in English between “the commoners" and the “intellectuals" which we think is best captured by “the simple people." It is in quotations because Gramsci is opposing the notion that they are not intellectuals to some degrees.]
3. [葛兰西使用“i simplici”一词，其含义既有“愚民”之意，也有如英语中“平民”与“知识分子”之间的对立，我们认为“普通民众”最能捕捉其精髓。之所以用引号，是因为葛兰西反对将他们完全视为非知识分子。]

4. [Buey is referring to Gramsci’s use of the Italian version of “squeezing water from a stone."]
4. [布伊指的是葛兰西使用意大利语“从石头中榨取水”的用法。]

5. Antonio Gramsci, Letters from Prison, two volumes, ed. Frank Rosengarten, trans. Raymond Rosenthal (New York: Columbia University Pres, 1994), volume 1, 369, hereafter cited as LP1 and LP2. This letter is from December 15, 1930.
5. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中书信》，两卷，弗兰克·罗森加特编，雷蒙德·罗森塔尔译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，1994），第一卷，369 页，以下简称 LP1 和 LP2。此信写于 1930 年 12 月 15 日。

6. Q29§2, Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Cultural Writings, ed. David Forgacs, trans. William Boelhower (Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1985), 180-82, hereafter cited as SCW.
6. Q29§2，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《文化著作选集》，戴维·福格卡斯编，威廉·博尔霍韦尔译（马萨诸塞州剑桥：哈佛大学出版社，1985），第 180-182 页，以下简称 SCW。

7. Q29§3, SCW, 183-84. 7. Q29§3，SCW，183-84。

8. [Buey is echoing Gramsci’s own alternation between the Italian and Russian diminutive, Gulia and Julca, his wife.]
8. [布伊在回响葛兰西本人在意大利和俄罗斯小名之间（朱利亚和尤尔卡）的交替使用，他的妻子。]

9. Q11§47-Q11§49, Antonio Gramsci, Further Selections from the Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Derek Boothman (Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1995), 307-13, hereafter cited as FSPN; and Q11§65, SPN, 403-4.
9. Q11§47-Q11§49，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》节选，德雷克·布思曼编著，译著（明尼苏达大学出版社，1995），307-13 页，以下简称 FSPN；以及 Q11§65，《狱中札记》，403-4 页。

10. Q11§46, FSPN, 306. 10. Q11§46，FSPN，306。

11. [Karl Marx, “Our Aims Should Be Comprehensive,” in Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, Collected Works, vol. 22 (New York: International Publishers, 1975), 600. No citation provided in original.]
11. [卡尔·马克思，“我们的目标应具有包容性”，载于卡尔·马克思和弗里德里希·恩格斯，全集，第 22 卷（纽约：国际出版公司，1975），600 页。原文未提供引文。]

12. Q11§45, FSPN, 303-4. 12. Q11§45，FSPN，303-4。

13. Q9§53, QC, 1128. 13. Q9§53，QC，1128。

14. Q1§27, PN1, 212-13, and Q14§58, QC, 1717-18.
14. Q1§27，PN1，212-13，以及 Q14§58，QC，1717-18。

15. Q26§5, QC, 2299-2300. Translation made with reference to the A-text, PN1, 117-18.
15. Q26§5，QC，2299-2300。参考 A 文本，PN1，117-18 页翻译。

* Translation from “Lingua, Linguaggio e Politica in Gramsci,” in Marx e Gramsci: Memoria e Attualità, ed. Giuseppe Petronio and Marina Paladini Musitelli (Rome: Manifesto Libri, 2001), 197211. The publication was supported by Istituto Gramsci del Friuli Venezia-Giulia, International Gramsci Society and Istituto Italiano per gli Studi Filosofici. Originally translated from Spanish to Italian by Antonino Firenze. Translated by Rocco Lacorte with assistance by Peter Ives. See introduction concerning the Italian words lingua and linguaggio, which are conflated in this translation of the title.
来自“葛兰西的语言、语言学与政治”，载于佩特罗尼奥（Giuseppe Petronio）和穆西特利（Marina Paladini Musitelli）编著的《马克思与葛兰西：记忆与现实》（罗马：宣言书出版社，2001），第 197-211 页。该出版物由弗留利-威尼斯朱利亚葛兰西研究所、国际葛兰西学会和意大利哲学研究所资助。最初由安东尼诺·菲伦泽将西班牙语翻译成意大利语。罗科·拉科尔特翻译，彼得·艾夫斯协助。请参阅导言，了解意大利语中的“lingua”和“linguaggio”这两个词在本文题目翻译中的合并情况。

13
Gramsci’s Subversion of the Language of Politics
Anne Showstack Sassoon*
13 格拉姆斯对政治语言的颠覆  安·肖斯塔克·萨松*

Over the years an extensive literature has built up on Gramsci and language. For the most part it has focused on Gramsci’s writings on language. This literature usually refers to his studies in linguistics in Turin, and connects his notes on language to his concept of national-popular, to his criticism of the cosmopolitanism of Italian intellectuals, and to his verification of the significance of popular culture both as a field of study and as a starting point for which, it is agreed, not only elucidates other important concepts such as hegemony or the intellectuals, but is a foundation stone for those concepts.1 In Italy, of course, where only a tiny minority of the population used Italian as its daily language as late as the beginning of the [twentieth] century, where the very study of cultural anthropology by, for example, Ernesto De Martino, had important political significance, where to this day written Italian is much more distant from the spoken language than is the case, for example, with English, and where “intellectual” and "political” Italian both as language and as discourse can often represent communication between a self-selected few, the political import of language goes without saying.
多年来，关于葛兰西和语言的文献积累甚丰。大部分文献都集中在葛兰西的语言著述上。这些文献通常提及他在都灵的语言研究，并将他的语言笔记与他的民族—大众概念联系起来，与他对意大利知识分子世界主义的批判联系起来，以及他对大众文化重要性的验证，既作为研究领域，又作为研究起点，人们普遍认为，这不仅阐明了其他重要概念，如霸权或知识分子，而且是这些概念的基础。当然，在意大利，直到 20 世纪初，只有极少数人口以意大利语作为日常语言；例如，恩内斯托·德·马蒂诺的文化人类学研究具有重要的政治意义；直到今天，书面意大利语与口语的差距都远大于英语；而且，“知识分子”和“政治”意大利语，无论是作为语言还是话语，往往代表着少数精英之间的交流。语言的政治意义不言而喻。

Beyond Italy, Gramsci’s writing on language is recognized as an important contribution to developing a sociology of language or a science of language.2 Interest has also grown in this aspect of his work, first because of debates about ideology and, more recently, because of the growth in what is rather generically referred to as discourse theory. For at least some writers who use concepts from discourse analysis, Gramsci is important,3 and his writing on language appears a natural object of analysis. What I want to do here is different. I have often been struck by how difficult it is to understand Gramsci. Moving beyond what had been the common explanation for this difficulty, which attributes it to the need to fool the prison censor, the harsh conditions of prison life, Gramsci’s precarious state of health and the problem of obtaining material, I recently arrived at the conclusion that much of the difficulty stems, in fact, from Gramsci’s complex view of the world. This is connected to the form of his work. That is, consciously or unconsciously, he made a choice to write in note form and not a book. Consequently, he produced an archetypal open text that the reader must recreate each time she or he reads it. This is not, by any means, to argue that it says anything or everything to everybody. Indeed, it is all too tempting to read Gramsci for instrumental political reasons while the very difficulty of his language and his discourse means that he tends to be absorbed in preexisting schema.4
意大利之外，葛兰西关于语言的著作被认为是对发展语言社会学或语言科学的重要贡献。2 对其工作的这一方面兴趣的增长，首先源于意识形态的争论，而最近则源于所谓的“话语理论”的兴起。对于至少一些使用话语分析概念的作家来说，葛兰西很重要，3 他的语言著作似乎是自然的研究对象。我在这里想要做的不同。我经常被葛兰西的难懂之处所震撼。超越以往将这种困难归因于欺骗狱中审查员的常见解释，以及狱中恶劣的生活条件、葛兰西的健康状况不佳以及获取资料的困难，我最近得出结论，这种困难实际上很大程度上源于葛兰西对世界的复杂看法。这与他的著作形式有关。也就是说，他有意或无意地选择以笔记的形式写作，而不是撰写书籍。 因此，他创作了一种原型开放文本，读者每次阅读时都必须重新构建。这绝非意味着它对每个人都言简意赅，或无所不包。事实上，用功利性的政治理由来解读葛兰西实在太容易了，而他语言和话语的晦涩性意味着他往往被先有的模式所吸收。4

Despite this difficulty, his work is widely read, or at least his concepts are a frequent reference point. Others may find him fascinating for different reasons. I would, however, suggest that the intrinsic interest lies in the way in which Gramsci, writing in an earlier period of crisis of Marxism and the working-class movement and of epochal change, speaks to us because of the questions he asks and because he seizes on the perplexing, the contradictory, the surprising, those features of society which escape ready classification as the most fertile and productive points to analyze.
尽管存在这种困难，他的著作广为阅读，或者至少他的概念经常被引用为参考。其他人可能出于不同的原因觉得他引人入胜。然而，我认为内在的兴趣在于，葛兰西在马克思主义和工人运动以及时代变革的早期危机时期写作的方式，因为他提出的问题以及他抓住那些令人困惑、矛盾、出人意料的社会特征——这些特征难以轻易地归类为最肥沃和富有成效的分析点——与我们对话。

The difficulty we face is, to some extent, rooted in his necessarily compacting several concepts into one note (as anyone who has ever tried to put together a sample of his writings will attest) because of the multifaceted, interconnected nature of reality. It is not surprising that he did not write a logical treatise, even though others did in fascist prisons. Further, it is not easy to follow the way in which his discussion grows out of the seeming minutiae of intellectual and political debate in the 1930s fascist Italy. While this provides the reader with a rich culture, his thinking often traces an intuitive path rich in results whose import, however, has to be rearticulated to furnish theoretical indications for a different context. But he is also fascinating precisely for those very aspects which make him difficult. On the one hand, our creative reading of Gramsci holds the danger that we stamp our schema—for example, populist, idealist, functionalist or post-Marxist—on him.5 But on the other, his intuitive, sensitive use of the confusion of the new, of the fractured interrelatedness of reality, of the historically and nationally specific to try to push forward a theoretical understanding of the trends and patterns and possibilities of the present as the basis for helping to create the future, escape many of the blind alleys of recent debates. More recently it has struck me that Gramsci is also difficult because of his use of language—not because the words are difficult, which they are not, and not only because the concepts they refer to are complex, which they often are, but precisely because he uses ordinary or traditional words to signify something new and, further, he often uses a word both in a traditional way and in a novel and sometimes an almost absurd manner. Pasolini has written a sensitive piece on Gramsci’s use of Italian, drawing on his (Pasolini’s) interest in dialect.6 And, of course, at a different level, some of Gramsci’s writings are notoriously difficult to translate, although I am not sure that this is not simply a question of Italian political language. Compared to other Italians writing in his time or ours, he is a paragon of lucidity.
我们面临的困难在一定程度上源于他必须将几个概念压缩到一个笔记中（正如任何尝试过整理他作品样本的人都会证明的那样），这是因为现实的多方面、相互关联的性质。他未能撰写一篇逻辑论著，即使其他人在法西斯监狱中也曾这样做，这并不令人意外。此外，要理解他如何从 20 世纪 30 年代法西斯意大利的知识和政治辩论的细枝末节中展开讨论并不容易。虽然这为读者提供了丰富的文化背景，但他的思维往往遵循一条富含成果的直觉路径，然而，这些成果的意义必须重新阐述，才能为不同的语境提供理论指引。但正因为这些使他难以理解的方面，他同样引人入胜。一方面，我们对葛兰西的创造性解读存在着将我们的模式——例如，民粹主义的、唯心主义的、功能主义的或后马克思主义的——强加于他的危险。5 但另一方面，他直觉地、敏感地运用新事物带来的混乱，现实的破碎关联性，以及历史和国家层面的特定因素，试图推进对当下趋势、模式和可能性的理论理解，以此作为创造未来的基础，从而避免了近期许多争论的误区。最近我发现，葛兰西的著作也因其语言运用而显得晦涩——并非因为词语本身难以理解，事实上它们并不难，也不是仅仅因为所指概念的复杂性，尽管它们通常确实很复杂，而是因为他在使用普通或传统词汇来表达新事物，更进一步，他常常在传统意义上和新颖甚至近乎荒谬的方式上使用一个词。帕索里尼就葛兰西的意大利语运用写过一篇敏感的文章，借鉴了他（帕索里尼）对方言的兴趣。6 当然，在不同的层面，葛兰西的一些著作翻译起来非常困难，尽管我不确定这是否仅仅是意大利政治语言的问题。 与他同时代或当代的其他意大利作家相比，他堪称清晰之典范。

What I detect is his difficulty with language. What comes through is a struggle with language both in terms of the significations carried by individual words, as he attempts to find a way to depict not just new but old phenomena which look different because of a leap in understanding, and above all, because he cannot see, or comprehend, if these phenomena are reduced to one aspect and yet he says, explicitly, that methodological distinctions are necessary.7 He ranges between these distinctions and the utility of connecting them, insisting that form cannot be divided from content,8 that theoretical generalization is only given meaning by the historically specific, that (and here he is both using and subverting the metaphor) structure is joined organically to superstructure,9 that while international trends are the context, national developments must be the point of departure. When he uses a word in two ways, one is normally its usual or commonsense meaning and the other is new, indicating an extended or advanced concept which bursts beyond the bounds of the old.
我观察到的是他语言上的困难。他挣扎于语言，不仅体现在个体词汇的意义上，还在于他试图描绘新现象和旧现象（由于理解的飞跃而呈现出不同的面貌），更重要的是，他无法理解或把握这些现象是否可以归结为一个方面，尽管他明确指出方法论上的区分是必要的。7 他在这些区分以及将它们联系起来的实用性之间徘徊，坚持形式与内容不可分割；8 理论概括只有在特定历史背景下才有意义；他（此处既使用又颠覆了隐喻）认为结构与上层建筑有机地结合在一起；9 虽然国际趋势是背景，但国家发展必须是出发点。当他一个词用两种方式时，一种通常是其惯常或常识性的含义，另一种是新的，表示一种超越旧有界限的扩展或高级概念。

He is highly aware of this problem of language. The language which is available does not easily accommodate the dual perspective which he insists is necessary in politics. His notes are full of explanation indicating when he is using a word in its “usual” way and when, on the contrary, it is “new.” Indeed, the notes are filled with words in inverted commas—a distancing and specifying device. Why is there this trouble with language? In part it is related to the increasing complexity of the phenomena in question and of Gramsci’s view of them. And naming complex sociopolitical and historical phenomena is not like naming a new mechanical discovery which can be labeled, perhaps, by going back to a Greek or Latin root. As Gramsci himself notes, language has historical and social roots and a word cannot be created out of the blue, abstractly. In that sense we are often stuck with the old words as developments grow beyond the old significations.
他非常清楚语言的问题。现有的语言并不容易容纳他坚持的政治双重视角。他的笔记充满了说明，标明他何时以“通常”意义使用某个词语，何时则相反，是“新的”意义。事实上，笔记中充满了引号——一种疏离和明确化的工具。为什么语言会有这种麻烦？部分原因与所讨论现象的日益复杂化以及葛兰西对其的观点有关。给复杂的社会政治和历史现象命名，不像给一项新的机械发明命名，后者或许可以通过追溯希腊语或拉丁语词根来命名。正如葛兰西本人所指出的，语言具有历史和社会根源，一个词语不能凭空、抽象地创造出来。从这个意义上说，随着发展超越了旧的意义，我们常常被旧词语困住。

Moreover, as he comments, ideas lag far behind “economic facts”10 and so does language. But Gramsci’s difficulty with language is also related to something else which is indicative of, dare I use the word, Gramsci’s very dialectic, that is, his view of the complex tendencies contained within the historical present, representing influence and continuities with the past, the reproduction of the old but in new forms and the problems and possibilities so radical, so revolutionary that their resolution, to the extent that we are able to conceive of it at all, lies in the superseding of a whole historical epoch which spans capitalism and socialism—that is, in a society with a new mode of production, in communism. In addition to the fact that I have put this in sweeping, general brush strokes,11 what I have painted is hard to visualize because it is much easier to see what has been lost, or what is being reproduced in new forms, than the seeds of the revolutionary contained (and I mean this word in two ways) within current developments.
此外，正如他所评论的那样，“经济事实”10 以及语言都落后于思想。但是，葛兰西对语言的困难也与另一件事有关，这表明，我敢用这个词，葛兰西的辩证法本身，也就是说，他对历史当下所包含的复杂趋势的看法，代表着与过去的联系和延续性，旧事物以新形式的再生产，以及那些如此激进、如此革命性的问题和可能性，其解决方法，只要我们能够设想的话，在于超越整个涵盖资本主义和社会主义的历史时代——也就是说，在一个拥有新生产方式的社会，在共产主义中。除了我用概括性的、笼统的笔触来表达这一点之外 11，我所描绘的难以想象，因为看到已经失去的东西，或者正在以新形式再生产的东西，比看到当前发展中所包含的革命的种子（我用这个词有两个含义）更容易。

Because I want to concentrate here on Gramsci’s subversion of the words or language of politics (a subversion dictated by historical development), and not undertake a general reading of his problematic, and because of constraints of time and space, what follows are some comments on some examples of what I have been referring to above. Although I will not tackle it here, it would be interesting to compare what Gramsci does with the language of politics with what he has to say about language. And to the extent that there is a difference between the way in which we understand certain words and what Gramsci means, we could well ask what this says to us about the dominant ways of viewing politics today, which influence our commonsense views as specialist intellectuals. The divergences between Gramsci’s use of language and ours may well indicate traditional ways of thinking which may prevent us from comprehending the possibilities on the historical agenda.
因为我想在此集中探讨葛兰西对政治词汇或语言的颠覆（这种颠覆是由历史发展决定的），而非进行他问题的总体解读，并且受时间和篇幅的限制，以下是一些关于我之前提及的例子的评论。虽然我不会在此探讨，但比较葛兰西对政治语言的运用和他对语言的论述，将很有趣。并且，在我们的理解与葛兰西的含义之间存在差异的程度上，我们可以询问这对于我们今天的主导政治观，以及作为专家知识分子影响我们常识的观点，意味着什么。葛兰西的语言运用与我们的差异，很可能表明传统思维方式，这些方式可能会阻止我们理解历史议程中的可能性。

The most obvious place to start might appear to be with hegemony. In political language, the traditional sense of hegemony is diametrically opposed (or appears to be—we shall return to this) to Gramsci’s meaning. In international relations it has traditionally indicated dominance or power over.12 In traditional Marxist language, hegemony indicated the leadership of a class over allies.13 Thanks to Gramsci, it is today used not only in these ways but also to indicate consent and moral and intellectual leadership.14 There is an enormous literature on the concept of hegemony. I do not want to rehearse it here, in part because I want to concentrate on Gramsci’s struggle with finding appropriate language, and in part because I would argue that passive revolution is equally or more important as an analytic concept in Gramsci.
最明显的入手点似乎是霸权。在政治语言中，霸权的传统意义与葛兰西的含义截然相反（或者似乎是——我们将回到这一点）。在国际关系中，它传统上指对……的支配或权力。12 在传统的马克思主义语言中，霸权指一个阶级对盟友的领导。13 由于葛兰西，如今它不仅以这些方式使用，还用来表示同意以及道德和智力上的领导。14 关于霸权概念的文献浩如烟海。我不想在这里重述，部分原因是想集中讨论葛兰西在寻找恰当语言方面的努力，部分原因是，我认为被动革命作为分析概念同样或更重要。

But more crucially, it is important to situate hegemony as belonging to a cluster of words (state, civil society, political society, political, intellectual, democratic, discipline, party, democratic centralism, crisis and historical), the reference points of which keep shifting and/or mean more than one thing, partly because of historical changes which have already taken place, and partly because processes are underway, according to Gramsci, which make possible the subversion and transformation of politics or the resolution of what Gramsci calls the fundamental question of political science, the division between leaders and led.15
但更关键的是，将霸权置于一组词语（国家、公民社会、政治社会、政治、知识分子、民主、纪律、党、民主集中制、危机和历史）之中至关重要，这些词语的参照点不断变化和/或具有多重含义，部分原因是已经发生的历史变化，部分原因是，正如葛兰西所言，正在进行的进程使得政治的颠覆和转型成为可能，或者解决葛兰西所谓的政治学基本问题，即领导者与被领导者之间的分歧。

The shifts, for example, in Gramsci’s definition of the state manifest the need, first, to connect to a historically and politically defined discourse which restricts its meaning to government, coercion, force; second, to push its meaning to encompass the transformation of political power in the modern period, which was de facto undermining the liberal “night watchman” state; and third, to take account of those questions posed, on the one hand, by the Russian Revolution, which put the construction of a workers’ state and a full expansion of democracy on the historical agenda, and on the other, by fascism’s challenge, both practical and theoretical, to the liberal concept of state and practice of politics. The state cannot be thought of in a restricted sense because of these historical changes.16 Thus, while Gramsci insists on the need to distinguish between civil and political society, he argues at the same time that these are methodological or analytical distinctions17 whose meaning in the real world lies in the form of the articulation between the different dimensions of political power, a form which is not natural or a necessity of a mode of production but historical. Here again we find a word used in two ways by Gramsci—to indicate what is made by human beings in specific circumstances, the parameters of which, above all, are national and determined by political intervention, and long-term trends of an epochal and international character which are “given.” Gramsci not only rereads Marx’s preface to A Contribution to a Critique of Political Economy,18 but he also reinterprets Marx’s famous statement in The Eighteenth Brumaire that men make history but not in conditions of their choosing.
例如，葛兰西对国家的定义的转变体现出以下需求：首先，需要联系到一个在历史上和政治上被界定的语境，该语境将国家的含义限定为政府、强制和武力；其次，需要将国家的含义扩展到涵盖现代时期政治权力的转型，这种转型实际上正在削弱自由主义的“夜警”国家；第三，需要考虑俄国革命提出的问题，一方面，它将工人阶级的国家建设和民主的充分扩展置于历史议程；另一方面，法西斯主义对自由主义的国家概念和政治实践的挑战，无论是在实践上还是理论上。由于这些历史变化，国家不能被狭隘地理解。16 因此，虽然葛兰西坚持区分公民社会和政治社会，但他同时认为，这些是方法论或分析上的区分 17，它们在现实世界中的意义在于政治权力不同维度之间的联系形式，这种形式并非自然或生产方式的必然，而是历史的产物。 格拉姆斯基在此再次使用了一个双重意义的词语——指人类在特定环境中创造的事物，这些环境首先是国家性的，并受政治干预以及具有“既定”性质的时代性和国际性长期趋势所决定。格拉姆斯基不仅重新解读了马克思《政治经济学批判大纲》导言，还在重新诠释马克思在《路易·波拿巴的雾月十八日》中那句名言：人们创造历史，但并非在他们选择的条件下。

Now I want to switch and consider another example: intellectual. It is well known how Gramsci uses this word to refer to an extended list of categories, to claim that everyone is an intellectual, and generally to confuse us as he breaks with both orthodox liberal and Marxist ideas. If we examine some of the associated words, such as “connective,” “organizational,” “skills,” “specialist/specialization,” “function,” “division of labor” and “technical,” the effect is both demystifying and confounding. We may well ask, why does he hold on to a word which he has extended and subverted in this way? Why, when he is convinced of the importance of ideas and ideology, does the example he gives of everyone’s being an intellectual come from daily, practical life? Why does it have nothing to do with ideas or rationality but everything to do with the skills which come from specialization and the division of labor: that while we may all fry an egg or sew on a button from time to time, this does not mean that we are all cooks or tailors?19 Is our being confounded a warning? That is, to the extent that we fill the word with an outmoded concept, be it the supposed inhabitants of an ivory tower or the science carriers of a class, or mere ideologues, we will not understand reality. We will not be aware that the debate has moved on.
现在我想转到另一个例子：知识分子。众所周知，葛兰西如何使用这个词来指代一系列广泛的类别，声称每个人都是知识分子，并且总而言之，在他打破正统自由主义和马克思主义思想时，使我们感到困惑。如果我们考察一些相关的词汇，例如“联系的”、“组织的”、“技能”、“专家/专业化”、“功能”、“分工”和“技术”，其效果既是去神秘化，又是令人困惑的。我们不禁要问，他为什么坚持使用一个被他如此扩展和颠覆的词？当他确信思想和意识形态的重要性时，他为什么以每个人都是知识分子的例子来自日常的、实际的生活？为什么它与思想或理性无关，却与来自专业化和分工的技能密切相关：尽管我们可能偶尔煎个鸡蛋或缝缝纽扣，但这并不意味着我们都是厨师或裁缝？19 我们被困惑，这是否是一种警告？ 也就是说，如果我们用过时的概念来填充这个词，无论是所谓的象牙塔居民，还是某个阶层的科学载体，抑或仅仅是意识形态家，我们就无法理解现实。我们也意识不到这场辩论已经向前发展了。

I have analyzed Gramsci’s discussion of the intellectuals as specialists elsewhere.20 Here I would simply reiterate the point that he is by no means a populist, that he is highly critical of much in popular ideas, that he states clearly that, given that the working class needs intellectuals as specialists and as leaders of the highest order, it faces unprecedented difficulties. And yet there is a very important reason that Gramsci insists that everyone is an intellectual: for isolated intellectuals cannot hope to understand reality by force of technique alone. Gramsci continues to use the word “intellectual,” rather than, say, “petit-bourgeois” or "declassé,” because a sociological or economic class term is not appropriate, while “specialist” is too limited. “Intellectual,” in its restricted and extended meanings, can indicate the full range of historical and, ultimately, political possibilities and necessities. This leads us to why Gramsci turns another expression on its head, “democratic centralism.” As so often in the Notebooks, Gramsci engages in a double-edged polemic, aimed both at Italian fascism and at the workingclass movement as he redefines democratic centralism. How distant it is from its usual connotation. In his notes, it concerns the need to understand change, movement, diversity, in order to understand ultimately the general or the universal. As with his discussion of the party, an organizational term relates to a theoretical task and a theoretical problem. Note how it is defined in terms of an exchange between different elements, which is echoed in his definition of democracy.21 How “flexibility,” “elasticity,” “practical” and “experimental” are contrasted with “mechanical,” “rigidity,” “rationalistic,” “abstract” and “bureaucratic,” and following from this consider what he does with “vanguard,” “leadership,” “discipline,” “spontaneity” or “democratic." They, too, are defined in terms of a function, a problem and a historical task.22
我已在其他地方分析了葛兰西对知识分子的讨论。20 在这里，我只想重申他绝非民粹主义者，他对许多流行思想持高度批判态度，他明确指出，鉴于工人阶级需要知识分子作为专家和最高领导，它面临着前所未有的困难。然而，葛兰西坚持认为每个人都是知识分子，这有一个非常重要的原因：孤立的知识分子不能仅仅依靠技术来理解现实。葛兰西继续使用“知识分子”这个词，而不是“小资产阶级”或“失业者”，因为社会学或经济学阶级术语不适用，“专家”则过于狭隘。“知识分子”，在其狭义和广义的含义中，可以指示全部的历史和最终的政治可能性和必要性。这引导我们理解葛兰西为何将“民主集中制”这个说法反过来理解。正如在《笔记》中经常出现的那样，葛兰西进行了一场双刃剑式的论战，其目标既包括意大利法西斯主义，也包括他重新定义的工人阶级运动中的民主集中制。 它与通常的含义相去甚远。在他的笔记中，它关乎理解变化、运动、多样性，最终理解一般或普遍。如同他对党的讨论，一个组织术语与一个理论任务和一个理论问题相关。请注意，它是如何根据不同要素之间的交流来定义的，这在他的民主定义中得到了体现。21 如何将“灵活”、“弹性”、“实用”和“实验”与“机械”、“僵化”、“理性主义”、“抽象”和“官僚”形成对比，并由此思考他对“先锋”、“领导”、“纪律”、“自发性”或“民主”的处理。它们也都根据功能、问题和历史任务来定义。22

Gramsci defines “vanguard” in its connection to a class and a society at large.23 We can also find this in Lenin, but Gramsci draws from it a different consequence. At the risk of reinforcing a reductive, Hegelian reading of Gramsci, he defines “vanguard” in its becoming, or, more precisely, its meaning cannot be separated from the transformation of the working class and society in the period in which not only the transition from socialism but the “need” for communism is on the historical agenda. From the more immediate perspective of the problem of politics in the here and now, when Gramsci considers the classical question of the relationship between “spontaneity" and “conscious leadership" or “discipline"24 he puts the terms between inverted commas. This signifies his difficulty with the available language and puts us on our guard.25 Moreover, while they are analytically distinct, the problem being considered is the nature of the link between them. Their unity becomes conceivable if posed in terms of creating the conditions for mass politics. Neither their meaning nor this unity can derive from the revolutionary claims of an isolated sect.
葛兰西将“先锋”定义与其所联系的阶级和整个社会相关联。23 我们可以从列宁那里找到类似概念，但葛兰西从中引申出不同的结论。冒着强化对葛兰西的还原性、黑格尔式解读的风险，他将“先锋”定义为其发展过程，或者更确切地说，其意义不能与工人阶级和社会在那个时期（不仅是社会主义过渡，而且共产主义的“需要”也列入历史议程）的转型分离。从当下政治问题的更直接视角来看，当葛兰西考察“自发性”与“有意识的领导”或“纪律”24 之间经典关系时，他使用了引号。这表明他对现有语言的困难，并提醒我们注意。25 此外，虽然它们在分析上是不同的，但所考察的问题是两者之间的联系性质。如果从创造大众政治的条件的角度来看，它们的统一就变得可理解。无论是其意义还是这种统一，都不能源于孤立的教派的革命主张。

This question was posed by Lenin, and in different ways, by, on the one hand, Bordiga and, on the other, the syndicalists. This is the political history which informs the reading of these words and which is one reason Gramsci is forced to distance himself from them as givens. But if he corrupts or subverts them or pushes them to their limits or argues that, as usually understood, they are meaningless (as with the case of spontaneity), it is not simply because of political polemic. It is because he is convinced that, in the era of mass politics, their traditional, historically constructed meanings are being superseded or tendentially so. Yet the old or reduced meaning often still has resonance and is still necessary in specific conditions. Thus, for example, Gramsci defines “discipline”26 in such a way as to render it almost unrecognizable. He defines it in terms of a historical possibility and therefore of a political task, of overcoming the traditional split between leaders and led. He counterposes it to its traditional meaning, a meaning the roots of which lie in institutions like the Church and the military, and which has to be extended to people’s commonsense understanding as the mere execution of orders. This traditional meaning, however, is still appropriate on certain occasions, and thus the word itself has multiple definitions.
这个问题由列宁提出，并且以不同的方式，一方面由博尔迪加，另一方面由工团主义者提出。 这段政治史为理解这些话语提供了背景，这也是葛兰西被迫与这些既定前提保持距离的原因之一。 但是，如果他歪曲或颠覆它们，或将它们推向极端，或者论证通常理解的它们毫无意义（如同自发性一例），那并非仅仅出于政治论战。 这是因为他确信，在大众政治时代，其传统的历史建构的意义正在被取代，或趋于被取代。 然而，旧的或简化的意义通常仍有共鸣，在特定条件下仍然必要。 例如，葛兰西定义“纪律”26 的方式几乎让人认不出来。 他将之定义为一种历史可能性，因此是一种政治任务，即克服领导者与被领导者之间的传统分裂。 他将其与传统的含义相对比，这种含义的根源在于教会和军队等机构，并且必须延伸到人们的常识理解，即仅仅执行命令。然而，这种传统的含义在某些场合仍然适用，因此该词本身具有多种定义。

When Gramsci discusses the significance of the source of discipline, we find still another, apparently absurd, redefinition. "Democratic” is related to specialization, division of labor and a process of creating the conditions whereby there is an organic exchange between leaders and led.27 That is, it is defined in terms of what Gramsci calls that central problem of political science, the relationship between rulers and ruled, no longer posed in terms of political obligation, going beyond questions of legitimation or consensus until it is posed in such a way that it encompasses the full possibilities of the current historical epoch一the creation of communism or regulated society.28 Once again words have no fixed meanings, not only because of the complexity of the past and present which construct their meanings today, whether in the heads of specialized intellectuals or in those of mass woman or man, but also because this present is part and parcel of a transition to an unprecedented historical future. The possibilities inscribed in the present, such as the redefinition of politics which is on the historical agenda not only because of the Russian Revolution but also because of the latest developments of capitalism, make us, according to Gramsci, confront unprecedented problems. Similarly, the awareness of the dialectic of the present and future undermines our traditional way of attempting to capture and ultimately control reality in fixed schema or, I should say, in a particular Enlightenment tradition of doing so which can be conceived as the culmination of a whole history of thought and reason.
当葛兰西讨论纪律来源的重要性时，我们发现了一种新的、看似荒谬的重新定义。“民主”与专业化、分工以及创造领导者与被领导者之间有机交流的条件有关。27 也就是说，它根据葛兰西称之为政治学核心问题的概念——统治者与被统治者之间的关系——来定义，不再以政治义务为前提，超越合法性或共识的问题，直到以涵盖当前历史时代全部可能性的方式提出——即共产主义或受调节社会的建立。28 一次又一次，词语并非一成不变，不仅因为构成其意义的过去和现在错综复杂，无论是在专业知识分子还是大众的头脑中，都如此，而且因为现在本身就是通往前所未有的历史未来的过渡阶段。 当下蕴含的可能性，例如政治的重新定义，不仅因为俄国革命，也因为资本主义的最新发展，而成为历史议程上的课题，这，根据葛兰西的观点，使我们面临前所未有的问题。同样地，对当下与未来的辩证法的认识，削弱了我们运用固定的模式，或者更确切地说，运用一种可以视为整个思想和理性发展史顶峰的特定启蒙传统来捕捉和最终控制现实的传统方式。

Gramsci makes us think of many of the questions posed more recently in debates about postmodernism. And perhaps the manifestation of the difficulties we face today in comprehending reality can be found in our use of language, our relation to traditional discourse, and our very thought processes. This has struck me in various ways as I have thought of my experiences as a practicing specialist intellectual. First, although these are in no particular order, when I lecture on political theory and come across references to universal man, I stumble, I stray, I go off on a tangent which is similar to those inverted commas, those multiple meanings and constant explanations, and redefinitions scattered through Gramsci’s notes as he, too, is troubled by language. How disturbing, disrupting, distracting to our traditional language is the moral and intellectual revolution constituted by feminism and the invasion of difference, of gender into our thought processes.
葛兰西让我们联想到后现代主义辩论中近来提出的许多问题。或许我们今天在理解现实方面遇到的困难，根源于我们对语言的使用、我们与传统话语的关系，以及我们思维过程本身。当我作为一名实践中的专家知识分子思考我的经验时，这一点以各种方式触动了我。首先，虽然这些没有特定的顺序，当我讲授政治理论，遇到“普世之人”的提及时，我会犹豫、偏离主题，陷入类似于葛兰西笔记中那些引号、多重含义以及不断解释和重新定义的思路，因为他同样为语言所困扰。女性主义和差异性、性别对我们思维过程的入侵，对我们传统的语言是多么的扰动、破坏和分散注意力。

Indeed, here I come to my second point: I have been struck by how difficult it is to write about Gramsci in the logical, rational order for which we have all been trained as part of our professional apprenticeships. His writing, his approach, his language keep escaping and leading us astray. This brings me to another point which I mentioned earlier. Although Gramsci himself was aware and wary of the unfinished nature of his work in prison, he gave himself permission to work on several notebooks at the same time, to consider a wide range of topics, to change and develop his categories and to write in note form.29
的确，我来到第二个论点：我发现用我们专业学徒期所训练的逻辑、理性顺序来写关于葛兰西的作品是多么困难。他的写作、他的方法、他的语言不断地游离，引领我们偏离正轨。这也让我回到了我之前提到的另一个论点。尽管葛兰西本人意识到并警惕自己狱中作品的未完成性质，但他允许自己同时处理多本笔记本，思考广泛的主题，改变和发展他的范畴，并以笔记的形式写作。

Whatever he might have done had he been freer, we are at liberty to appreciate the usefulness and not just the problems of his mode of discourse. His explicit critique of abstract, deductive, rationalistic projects unrelated to experience, to the passions, to the feelings of those unspecialized generalist intellectuals who are the mass of the population and who possess a wealth of skills, information and knowledge is, as I have argued elsewhere, not a form of populism.30 What Gramsci does do, of course, is validate the questions arising from daily life as providing the raw material for advanced, specialist, intellectual labor, and here he coincides with one of the lessons from feminism.31 And yet, he by no means abandons the attempt to generalize, to theorize, to develop the language of today in an effort to capture process, diversity, particularity. But the meaning, the content, the effective terrain of our knowledge and expertise is always ultimately in reference to the concrete and the historical. I want to finish by illustrating this with a discussion of Gramsci’s use of two terms —''passive revolution” and “historical bloc”一and by raising some questions about a third, regulated society. “Passive revolution' and “historical bloc” are both terms which have double but interrelated meanings. Gramsci uses them to refer to two levels of analysis: theoretical problems and historical phenomena. Gramsci himself is explicitly concerned about possible difficulties ensuing from this approach with regard to passive revolution, which, he argues, is useful as a theoretical tool —for example, describing the very dialectic of the reproduction of capitalism in the very period of its organic crisis, as he paraphrases Marx in the preface to A Contribution to the Critique of Political Economy.32 This long-term, general, international tendency is given meaning by a series of seemingly diverse, nationally specific, historically concrete political and economic developments. And yet, in explaining the capacity of capitalism to survive in the course of change, and thus the possibility both of developing a system of passive consent and the basis for a Crocean, historicist justification of past and present,33 it can lead to a fatalistic, passive acceptance which ignores the revolutionary implications of transformations. In the few notes in which Gramsci discusses historical bloc34 he uses it, first, to refer to the relationship between base and superstructure. Here he would have been advised to put these words within inverted commas, because the effect of both the term “historical bloc” and its second usage is to subvert the metaphor. For the second usage is to describe the complex way in which actual, historically and politically formed classes and groups articulate their relations and form the basis, or better, the weave of a society.
无论他若拥有更多自由会做出什么，我们有自由去欣赏其话语方式的实用性，而非仅仅局限于其问题。他明确批判那些与经验、激情、以及普通大众（即拥有丰富技能、信息和知识的非专业化知识分子群体）的感受无关的抽象的、演绎的、理性主义的项目，正如我在其他地方论证的那样，这并非一种民粹主义。30 当然，葛兰西所做的，是认可日常生活中产生的问题作为高级、专业知识劳动原材料的价值，在这里，他与女权主义的某些教训不谋而合。31 然而，他绝不放弃概括、理论化、发展当今语言以捕捉过程、多样性和个体性的尝试。但我们知识和专长的意义、内容和有效领域，最终总是以具体的和历史的为参照。 最后，我想通过讨论葛兰西的两个术语——“被动革命”和“历史块”——以及对第三个术语——“调节社会”——提出一些问题来结束。 “被动革命”和“历史块”都是具有双重且相互关联的含义的术语。葛兰西用它们来指代两个分析层次：理论问题和历史现象。葛兰西本人明确地关注这种方法可能带来的困难，特别是关于“被动革命”，他认为，“被动革命”作为一种理论工具很有用——例如，描述资本主义在有机危机时期自身再生产的辩证法，正如他在《政治经济学批判大纲》导言中引述马克思的那样。这种长期、普遍、国际性的趋势，是由一系列看似不同的、具有民族特质的、在历史上具体的政治和经济发展赋予意义的。 然而，在解释资本主义在变革过程中生存能力，以及由此产生的被动同意体系和对过去与现在进行黑格尔式历史主义辩护的可能性时，它可能导致一种忽视变革的革命意义的宿命论、被动接受。在葛兰西讨论历史块的少数笔记中，他首先将其用于指称基础与上层建筑之间的关系。在这里，他应该建议将这些词放在引号内，因为“历史块”一词及其第二次用法都会颠覆这种隐喻。因为第二次用法是用来描述实际的、在历史上和政治上形成的阶级和群体，如何阐明其关系，并构成社会的基石，或更确切地说，是社会的构成。

The use of the same terms to refer to theoretical and concrete historical phenomena has various implications and consequences. First, it is a manifestation of Gramsci’s insistence that theory acquires meaning from its usefulness in analyzing the concrete, a concrete in which he gives great weight to national specificities within the generality of the international, and local differences within the parameters of the national. Thus, there is a message about abstraction, generalization and rational discourse which Gramsci insists must not be confounded with or reduced to schemas or mathematical logic. But second, there is a message about politics which also has an echo for theory. For this double usage of “passive revolution” and “historical bloc” tells us the following: if long-term tendencies of the reproduction of capitalism and of problems—such as division between leaders and led and expressions of it such a bureaucracy, which overarch capitalism and socialism—provide the basis of a theoretical concept abstracted from its specific form, which enables us to comprehend the general and the long term, its meaning is articulated in concrete forms which are not natural, but are historically limited and are thus amenable to change, although nonetheless tenacious and enormously problematic. The terrain of intervention or, effectively, our very subjectivity, our identity is the particular. And one type of knowledge is limited to the fragmented, the immediate, the specific. But there are many different kinds of knowledge, and our effectivity and autonomy, a word much favored by Gramsci, is augmented by an understanding of the long term and the general, not least because it contains within it the seeds of the corruption of the traditional, of the supersession of the past, contained in the present.
使用相同的术语指称理论和具体的历史现象，具有多种含义和后果。首先，这体现了葛兰西的观点，即理论从其在分析具体事物中的效用中获得意义，而具体事物中，他非常重视国际一般性中的民族特殊性，以及国家参数中的地方差异。因此，关于抽象、概括和理性论述的信息是葛兰西坚持的，这些信息决不能与模式或数学逻辑混淆或简化。其次，这传递了一个关于政治的信息，该信息对理论也有影响。 对于“被动革命”和“历史块”的双重运用，告诉我们以下几点：如果资本主义再生产的长期趋势以及诸如领导与被领导之间的分歧以及官僚主义等问题——这些问题超越了资本主义和社会主义——为一个从其具体形式中抽象出来的理论概念提供了基础，这使得我们能够理解一般性和长期性，那么它的意义就体现在具体的、非自然的、但具有历史局限性、因此可以改变的形式中，尽管如此，它仍然顽固且极具问题性。干预的领域，或者说，我们的主观性、我们的认同感，都是具体的。而某种类型的知识局限于碎片化、直接性和特殊性。但是，知识种类繁多，我们有效性和自主性——葛兰西非常青睐的一个词——通过对长期性和一般性的理解而得到增强，尤其因为它包含着传统腐朽的种子，包含着当下对过去的超越。

Here we end with a puzzle and an invitation. In reference again to Gramsci’s language, I have been trying to think about why he uses “regulated society” instead of some other term to refer to communism. Is Gramsci once again engaging in a multiple polemic? After all, the overcoming of conflict is the professed aim of the Hegelian or neo-Hegelian rational state, of a utilitarian synthesis of conflicting interests, of fascist corporatism, of Soviet and other kinds of planning. All of these imply regulation by the state, whereas Gramsci uses it to indicate the expansion of civil society.35 More could be said. I have some ideas, but for the moment I will leave it here for us all to ponder.
我们以一个难题和邀请结束。再次参照葛兰西的语言，我一直在思考他为何使用“调节社会”而非其他术语来指代共产主义。葛兰西是否再次参与多重论战？毕竟，冲突的克服是黑格尔或新黑格尔理性国家的宣称目标，是冲突利益的功利主义综合，是法西斯企业家制度，是苏联和其他类型的计划。所有这些都暗示了国家调节，而葛兰西则用它来表示公民社会的扩张。35  还有很多可以探讨。我有一些想法，但目前我将把它留在这里供我们大家思考。

Notes 笔记

1. See, for example, Franco Lo Piparo. Lingua, Intellettuali, Egemonia in Gramsci (Rome: Laterza, 1979). Tullio De Mauro and Luigi Rosiello have also written widely in this area [see chapters 2, 3 and 15 in this volume].
例如，参见弗朗哥·洛皮帕罗的《葛兰西的语言、知识分子与霸权》（罗马：拉特萨出版社，1979）。图利奥·德毛罗和路易吉·罗西耶罗也在该领域撰写了大量文章（参见本书第 2、3 和 15 章）。

2. See Leonardo Salamini, “Gramsci and the Marxist Sociology of Language,” International Journal of Sociology of Language 32 (1981), or Utz Maas, “Der Sprachwissenschaftler Gramsci” [see this volume, chapter 5].
2. 见莱昂纳多·萨拉米尼的“葛兰西与马克思主义语言社会学”，《语言社会学国际杂志》第 32 期 (1981)，或乌茨·马斯的“语言学家葛兰西”[见本书第五章]。

3. See, for example, Ernesto Laclau and Chantal Mouffe, Hegemony and Socialist Strategy (London: Verso, 1985).
例如，参见恩内斯托·拉克兰和尚塔尔·莫菲的《霸权与社会主义战略》(伦敦：Verso，1985)。

4. See the preface to the second edition of Anne Showstack Sassoon, Gramsci's Politics (London: Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1987).
4. 见安妮·绍斯塔克·萨松《葛兰西的政治学》第二版前言 (伦敦：明尼苏达大学出版社，1987)。

5. See “Postscript, the People, Intellectuals and Specialised Knowledge,” in Sassoon, Gramsci's Politics.
5. 见 Sassoon 著《葛兰西的政治学》中的“附录：人民、知识分子与专门知识”。

6. Pier Paolo Pasolini, “Gramsci’s Language,” in Approaches to Gramsci, ed. Anne Showstack Sassoon (London: Writers and Readers Publishing Co-operatives, 1982).
6. 皮埃尔·保罗·帕索里尼，“葛兰西的语言”，载于安·绍斯塔克·萨松主编，《葛兰西研究方法》（伦敦：作家与读者出版社合作社，1982）。

7. Antonio Gramsci, Selections from the Prison Notebooks (London: Lawrence and Wishart, 1971), 12, for example, cited hereafter as SPN. [A list of abbreviations is on pages ix-x.]
7. 例如，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》选编 (伦敦：劳伦斯和威舍特，1971)，第 12 页，以下简称《狱札》。[缩写列表见第 ix-x 页]

8. Antonio Gramsci, Quaderni del Carcere (Turin: Einaudi, 1975), 1245. [To facilitate locating these passages in various translations and anthologies, we will give the notebook (Quaderno) number 一in this case 10, part II一followed by the section number, §7. We will indicate the English translation, where available一in this case, Antonio Gramsci, Further Selections from the Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Derek Boothman (Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1995), 439, hereafter cited as FSPN.]
8. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》(都灵：艾纳迪出版社，1975)，1245 页。[为方便在各种译本和文集中查找这些段落，我们将给出笔记本（Quaderno）编号——在本例中为 10，第二部分——以及章节编号，§7。我们将标注英文译本，如有——在本例中为安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记续选》，德雷克·布斯曼编著，译著（明尼阿波利斯：明尼苏达大学出版社，1995），第 439 页，以下简称 FSPN。]

9. SPN, 377 [Q7§21]. 9. SPN，377 [Q7§21]。

10. SPN, 168 [Q13§14]. 10. SPN，168 [Q13§14]。

11. The argument is more fully developed in my “postscript.”
11. 我的“附录”中对此论证作了更全面的阐述。

12. Stephen Gill and David Low, “Global Hegemony and the Structural Power of Capital,” International Studies Quarterly (Summer 1989), discuss the traditional use and argue that Gramsci’s concept has greater explanatory power, as does Robert W. Cox, “Gramsci, Hegemony and International Relations Theory: An Essay in Method,” Millenium 12 (1983). Edward Said has recently used “hegemony” to indicate American international dominance through cultural means. “Identity, Negation and Violence,” New Left R^^iew 171 (September-October 1988): 57.
12. 斯蒂芬·吉尔和戴维·洛，《全球霸权与资本的结构权力》，《国际研究季刊》（1989 年夏季），讨论了传统用法，并认为葛兰西的概念具有更大的解释力，正如罗伯特·W·考克斯在《葛兰西、霸权与国际关系理论：一种方法论随笔》中所言，《千年》第 12 期（1983 年）。爱德华·萨义德最近使用“霸权”来表示美国通过文化手段的国际支配，《新左评论》第 171 期（1988 年 9 月-10 月）：57。

13. See Perry Anderson, “The Antinomies of Antonio Gramsci,” New Left Review 100 (November 1976-January 1977); Christine Buci-Glucksmann, Gramsci and the State (London: Lawrence & Wishart, 1980), 7-8.
13.  参见佩里·安德森，“安东尼奥·葛兰西的矛盾”，《新左评论》第 100 期（1976 年 11 月-1977 年 1 月）；克里斯汀·布西-格鲁克斯曼，《葛兰西与国家》（伦敦：劳伦斯与维沙特，1980），第 7-8 页。

14. SPN, 144 [Q15§4]. 14. SPN，144 [Q15§4]

15. SPN, 275 or 12 [Q3§34 or Q12§1].
15. SPN、275 或 12 [Q3§34 或 Q12§1]

16. SPN, 12 [Q12§1], 258 [Q8§179], 262-63, 275 [Q6§88, Q3§46], and my Gramsci's Politics, 109-19.
16. SPN，12 [Q12§1]，258 [Q8§179]，262-63，275 [Q6§88，Q3§46]，以及我的《葛兰西的政治学》，109-19。

17. See my entry on civil society in Tom Bottomore, ed., A Dictionary of Marxist Thought (Oxford: Blackwell Reference, 1983).
17. 请参阅我关于公民社会的条目，载于汤姆·波特莫尔主编，《马克思主义思想词典》（牛津：布莱克韦尔参考，1983）。

18. In a paraphrase which recurs several times when he discusses passive revolution, Gramsci argues that the “fundamental principles of political science [are]:
18. 在他讨论被动革命时，葛兰西反复提到，政治学“基本原理”是：

(1) that no social formation disappears as long as the productive forces which have developed within it still find room for further forward movement; (2) that a society does not set itself tasks for whose solutions the necessary conditions have not already been incubated, etc.” SPN, 106 [Q15§17].
(1) 任何社会形态，只要其内部发展的生产力还有进一步发展的空间，就不会消失；(2) 社会不会给自己设定那些尚未具备必要条件的任务，等等。” SPN，106 [Q15§17]。

19. When Gramsci writes that “all men are intellectuals . . . but not all men have in society the function of intellectuals,” he illustrates his point with the following example: “(Thus, because it can happen that everyone at some time fries a couple of eggs or sews up a tear in a jacket, we do not necessarily say that everyone is a cook or a tailor).” SPN, 9 [Q12§1]. In the original this parenthetical comment follows directly.
19. 当葛兰西写道“所有的人都是知识分子……但并非所有的人在社会中都具有知识分子的职能”时，他用以下例子来说明这一点：“（因此，因为每个人有时都可能煎几个鸡蛋或缝补一件夹克上的破洞，我们并不一定说每个人都是厨师或裁缝。）”  SPN，9 [Q12§1]。在原文中，这个括号内的评论紧随其后。

20. See my “postscript.” 20. 见我的“附言”。

21. SPN, 188-90 [Q13§36].
21. SPN，188-90 [Q13§36]

22. For just some of the relevant passages, see QC, 236-37 [Antonio Gramsci, Prison Notebooks, vol. 1, ed. and trans. Joseph Buttigieg (New York: Columbia University Press, 1992), 323-24], 1706 [Q14§48]; SPN, 198 [Q3§48], 214 [Q13§23];
22. 参见部分相关段落，如 QC，236-37 [安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》，卷 1，乔瑟夫·巴蒂吉耶编辑及翻译 (纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，1992)，323-24]，1706 [Q14§48]；SPN，198 [Q3§48]，214 [Q13§23]。

and Sassoon, GramsciS Politics, 162-79 and 222-31.
和萨松，葛兰西的政治，162-79 页和 222-31 页。

23. QC, 236-37 [Gramsci, Prison Notebooks, vol. 1, 323-24].
23. 品质控制，236-37 页 [葛兰西，《狱中札记》，第一卷，323-24 页]

24. SPN, 214 [Q13§23]. 24. SPN，214 [Q13§23]

25. For example, SPN, 214 [Q13§23].
例如，SPN，214 [Q13§23]。

26. QC, 1706 [Q14§48]. 26. QC，1706 [Q14§48]

27. QC, 1706 [Q14§48]. 27. 质量控制，1706 [Q14§48]

28. SPN, 144 [Q15§4]. 28. SPN，144 [Q15§4]

29. Luisa Mangoni has an excellent discussion of how Gramsci developed his categories; “La genesi delle categorie storico-politiche nei Quaderni del carcere,” in Studi Storici 3 (1987). Gianni Francioni provides insights into the order in which the notebooks were written; see L'officina gramsciana (Naples: Bibliopolis, 1984).
29. 路易莎·曼戈尼在《狱中札记》中对葛兰西如何发展他的范畴进行了精彩的探讨，“狱中札记中的历史政治范畴的起源”，载于《历史研究》第 3 辑（1987）。贾尼·弗朗西奥尼则阐述了这些笔记本的写作顺序；参见《葛兰西的工作坊》（那不勒斯：比布利波利斯出版社，1984）。

30. See my “postscript.” 30. 请见我的“附言”。

31. See “Introduction: The Personal and the Intellectual, Fragments and Order, International Trends and National Specificities,” in Women and the State, ed. Anne Showstack Sassoon (London: Hutchinson, 1987).
31. 见 Anne Showstack Sassoon 主编《妇女与国家》（伦敦：Hutchinson，1987）中的“导论：个人与知识分子，片段与秩序，国际趋势与国家特性”一文。

32. See note 18. 32. 见注 18。

33. See Mangoni, “La genesi.” We could well apply this approach to patriarchy, for example.
33. 见 Mangoni，“La genesi”。我们可以将这种方法应用于父权制，例如。

34. SPN, 366 [Q10II§12], 377 [Q7§21], 418 [Q11§67].
34. SPN，366 [Q10II§12]，377 [Q7§21]，418 [Q11§67]。

35. In today’s language, of course, “regulated” still connotes state intervention, or it might make us think of regulation or the reproduction of a society in an expanded complex sense as in regulation theory. This last certainly has points of contact with Gramsci’s ideas, in some forms at least. We might well ask what the historical conditions are of this extension of the words “regulate,” “regulated” and “regulation.” An excellent recent discussion of changes occurring in the forms of power and control imbedded in the leading edges of post-Fordist development, which suggests forms of decentralized regulation necessitated by the increasing complexity of society, has strong parallels with Gramsci’s insights into the implications of long-term developments for concretely posing the question of the withering away of the state. See Geoff Mulgan, “The Power of the Weak,” in Marxism Today (December 1988).
35. 如今的语言中，“规范的”当然仍然暗示着国家干预，或者它可能会让我们联想到规范或以更广阔的复杂意义上的社会再生产，就像规范理论那样。至少在某些形式上，后者与葛兰西的思想确实存在联系。我们或许可以探讨“规范”、“规范的”和“规范”这些词语扩展的历史条件。最近一篇关于后福特主义发展前沿中权力和控制形式变化的优秀讨论，暗示了由社会日益复杂化所必需的分散化规范形式，与葛兰西关于长期发展对具体提出国家消亡问题的影响的洞察力有着密切的相似之处。参见杰夫·穆尔根，“弱者的力量”，载《马克思主义今日》（1988 年 12 月）。

* Originally published in Rethinking Marxism 3, no. 1 (1990): 14-25. [Material inside square brackets has been added by the editors including translations unavailable when first published and other citation information for consistency with the other chapters.]
最初发表于《重思马克思主义》第 3 卷，第 1 期（1990 年）：14-25 页。[方括号内的内容由编辑补充，包括在最初发表时无法获得的译文以及与其他章节保持一致的其他引文信息。]

14
Some Notes on Gramsci the Linguist
Tullio De Mauro*
14 关于葛兰西的语言学札记  图利奥·德·毛罗*

In this contribution I am going to deal only tangentially—or almost not at all—with two of the salient aspects regarding the theme “Gramsci and the question of the [Italian] language [lingua].” I will say very little about Gramsci as an actor within the Italian linguistic reality of the 1910s, 1920s and 1930s, and as a privileged user, reporter and essayist operating within the linguistic practices of Italian society. I will also say little about and discuss only tangentially Gramsci’s dealing with what in the nineteenth century would have been called the question of the language [lingua]. Perhaps today, instead of using the word “language” [lingua], we should say the “linguistic norm”一that is, that type of language which the various kinds of literary or informative writing conforms to or deviates from. Several of my colleagues—Lo Piparo, Gensini and Rosiello—and other younger scholars have dealt exhaustively with both of these aspects.
在这篇论述中，我将仅从略—或者几乎完全不涉及—关于“葛兰西与意大利语问题”这一主题的两个主要方面。我将很少谈论葛兰西作为一名 1910 年代、1920 年代和 1930 年代意大利语言现实中的行动者，以及作为一名在意大利社会语言实践中拥有特权的使用者、记者和随笔作家。我也将很少谈论，并且仅从略地探讨葛兰西处理的，在 19 世纪被称为“语言问题”的内容。或许今天，与其使用“语言”一词，不如说“语言规范”—即各种文学或信息性写作所遵循或偏离的语言类型。我的几位同事——洛皮帕罗、根西尼和罗西埃洛——以及其他年轻学者，已经详尽地论述了这两个方面。

I would rather like to take this opportunity to discuss some issues, particularly four that have been only partially treated before now, without pretending at all to be extraordinarily innovative.
我更愿意借此机会探讨一些问题，特别是之前仅部分讨论过的四个问题，而完全不声称有什么特别创新的想法。

The first issue concerns a concise weighing of the studies on Gramsci and language or Gramsci the linguist. If I may still use this playful title, I will try to deal with the question of why the studies on Gramsci the linguist are not popular in Italy, at least among scholars.
第一个问题涉及对葛兰西与语言研究或葛兰西作为语言学家的研究进行简要衡量。如果我可以继续使用这个饶有趣味的标题，我将尝试探讨为什么关于葛兰西作为语言学家的研究在意大利，至少在学者群体中，并不流行。

The second issue is to try to understand if and in what way language [linguaggio] and linguistic realities form the fundamental poles around which Gramsci’s reflection revolves. The third regards the innovative way that Gramsci deals with what I am calling the poles of aggregation of his reflection, not only in relation to language [linguaggio], but, at the same time, by using methodologies he learned at the school of “the good” Professor Bartoli. Finally, in the last paragraph, I will try to establish if Gramsci has made an original contribution to our current way of looking at language [linguaggio] from a theoretical and operative viewpoint with respect to the effective linguistic reality of our times, and, if so, what kind.
第二个问题是尝试理解语言及其语言现实是如何构成葛兰西思考的根本两极的。第三个问题关注葛兰西以何种创新方式处理其思考的聚合极点，不仅与语言相关，同时还运用他在“良师”巴尔托利教授门下学习的方法论。最后一段，我将尝试确定葛兰西是否对我们当前从理论和实践角度看待语言以及当下语言现实做出了原创性贡献，以及这种贡献是什么样的。

The Status of the Scholarship
学术界的现状

Not all Italian dictionaries include the adjective abarico. An area or abarico field is that zone where the attraction between two celestial bodies is balanced1—as the Garzanti dictionary says (I truly believe that not many other dictionaries have included this curious adjective, and rightly so). Therefore, objects that find themselves in that area float without knowing precisely where to go, or better, without going anywhere.
并非所有意大利词典都包含形容词 abarico。abarico 区域或 abarico 场是指两个天体引力相互平衡的区域——正如 Garzanti 词典所言（我确实相信，没有多少其他词典包含这个奇怪的形容词，而且这样做是正确的）。因此，处于该区域的物体漂浮不定，不知道该去哪里，或者更确切地说，没有去任何地方。

This is precisely the impression one gets looking at the studies on Gramsci and language [linguaggio]. It seems that they drift in a sort of abarico field: They get produced but they remain unnoticed, without getting much attention from anybody. Yet they are very exquisite studies and often accomplished by very authoritative scholars. It seems to me, without trying to offend anyone, that Natalino Sapegno began this line of inquiry in 1952 with “Manzoni fra De Sanctis e Gramsci” [Manzoni between De Sanctis and Gramsci],2 reflecting promptly on the extraordinary importance linguistic questions have within the entire Gramscian construction. In 1955, two studies by Soriano followed3 and the very precise volume by B. T. Sozzi on Gramsci in the context of the question of language [lingua] in Italy.4 Then there are three “classics” by Luigi Rosiello on the role of linguistics in the formation of Gramsci’s historicism (starting from the one that appeared in 1959 in the edited volume La Città Futura [The Future City]),5 and still a little-known but very exquisite study, often left out of bibliographies, by Amodio, on Gramsci as a reader of Pragmatism and of Vailati’s linguistic ideas, of Pareto and the Pragmatists from Piemonte at the beginning of the twentieth century. 6 Regarding the importance these readings have had on Gramsci, Amodio’s study has been supported further by Emilia Passaponti’s beautiful thesis at the University of Rome, which has come out in bits later on, here and there, including in party publications.7 Still, I would like to recall, at least, the works by Antonio Carannante and Stefano Gensini, whose contributions appeared in several rounds; and, finally, Franco Lo Piparo’s Lingua, Intellettuali e Egemonia in Gramsci [Language, intellectuals, and hegemony in Gramsci], which is fundamental, very broad, irate and punctilious but full of data and analyses.8
仔细审视关于葛兰西和语言的研究，便会产生这种印象。这些研究仿佛漂浮在一种朦胧的领域中：它们被生产出来，却无人注意，鲜少引起任何人的关注。然而，它们却是非常精妙的研究，通常由非常权威的学者完成。在我看来，无需冒犯任何人，纳塔利诺·萨佩格诺于 1952 年以“曼佐尼与德·桑克蒂斯和葛兰西”为题开启了这一研究方向，迅速地反思了语言问题在整个葛兰西思想体系中的非凡重要性。1955 年，索里亚诺发表了两篇研究论文，以及索齐（B. T.）的专著，对葛兰西在意大利语言问题中的地位进行了精确的论述。4.  然后是路易吉·罗西耶罗关于语言学在葛兰西历史主义形成中的作用的三篇“经典著作”（从 1959 年发表于《未来城市》一书开始）。5.  此外，阿莫迪奥关于葛兰西作为实用主义和维拉蒂语言思想的读者，以及帕累托和二十世纪初皮埃蒙特实用主义者的研究，虽然鲜为人知，但非常精妙，常被文献目录忽略。6.  关于这些阅读对葛兰西的影响，阿莫迪奥的研究得到了埃米莉亚·帕萨蓬蒂罗马大学的优秀论文的进一步支持，该论文后来以零散的形式发表，包括在党内刊物上。7.  尽管如此，我至少想提及安东尼奥·卡拉南特和斯特凡诺·根西尼的著作，他们的贡献多次出现；最后，弗兰科·洛皮帕罗的《葛兰西的语言、知识分子与霸权》一书至关重要，范围广泛，充满激情和严谨，但充满了数据和分析。8

I tend to think that some of the theses of these works have been generally accepted. The first is Rosiello’s thesis, much before Lo Piparo, that it is not possible to grasp the particular feature, the physiognomy of historicism, of Gramsci’s theory of history if, as Rosiello used to say, one does not take into account the linguistic component of his historicism. In other words, one cannot understand his theory of culture, his theory of hegemony or his theory of politics without considering the linguistic component.
我认为这些著作中的一些论点已被普遍接受。首先是罗西耶洛的论点，早于洛皮帕罗，即如果不考虑格拉姆斯基历史主义的语言成分，就无法理解格拉姆斯基历史理论的特殊特征、历史主义的面貌。换句话说，如果不考虑语言成分，就无法理解他的文化理论、他的霸权理论或他的政治理论。

The second strong point resulting from these studies is above all the fertility of Gramsci’s suggestions with regard to our country’s linguistic history. There is a history of Italian linguistics scattered in various parts of Gramsci’s work, particularly in the Notebooks, which is condensed at some points, mainly in Notebook 29. It is a very suggestive and important history, which anticipates themes that later on Italian linguistic history has succeeded in recovering for the most part, after having provided more documentation and through further effort.
这些研究带来的第二个有力论点，首先在于葛兰西的建议对我们国家语言史的丰沃性。葛兰西的著作，特别是《狱中札记》，散布着意大利语言学史的线索，在某些地方，特别是札记 29 中，这些线索被浓缩。这是一个极具启发性和重要性的历史，它预示了后来意大利语言史在提供更多文献和进一步努力后，大部分成功地汲取的主题。

Another interesting element, which also has an historical character, is the analyses and perspectives on the current linguistic situation in Italy and on the consequences it must have on the direction of the politics of culture (in a country like Italy shattered into many linguistic pieces) and of linguistic pedagogy, from the point of view of the organization of cultural centers and schools.
另一个有趣的，也具有历史意义的因素是，对意大利当前语言状况的分析和视角，以及它对文化政策（在一个像意大利这样分裂成许多语言碎片的国家）和语言教学方向的影响，从文化中心和学校的组织角度来看。

An additional series of important issues clearly relates to Gramsci’s theory of language [linguaggio]: the theory of translation and the theory of the radical sociality and culturality of every linguistic structure and order. These are not insignificant issues, given that I am talking about a great personality for the culture. Yet one gets the impression that the acknowledged weight of the analyses of these contributions by Gramsci continues to be a patrimony shared by only a few. It does not enter or it hardly enters the reference works on the subject. Gramsci’s name does not appear in the first edition of the Storia della Lingua Italiana, 1960 [History of Italian Language], by Migliorini; it does not appear in the second edition of the shorter, more accessible and ideologically more attentive Profilo di Storia Linguistica Italiana [Outline of History of Italian Linguistics] by Devoto, nor does it appear in the second edition of the Storia [History of Italian Language] by Migliorini subsequently re-edited by Baldelli-Migliorini. It is not included in a little-known incisive book by Zarko Mulja^cic, the Introduzione allo Studio della Lingua Italiana [Introduction to the Study of the Italian Language].9
格拉姆斯基的语言理论[linguaggio]还涉及一系列重要问题：翻译理论以及每种语言结构和秩序的激进社会性和文化性理论。鉴于我谈论的是一位对文化极具影响力的人物，这些问题并非无关紧要。然而，人们仍然感觉，格拉姆斯基对这些贡献的分析，其公认的重要性，仍然只为少数人所共享。它并未出现在或几乎未出现在该主题的参考著作中。格拉姆斯基的名字未出现在米格里奥里尼 1960 年版《意大利语史》（Storia della Lingua Italiana）中；未出现在德沃托的《意大利语言史概要》（Profilo di Storia Linguistica Italiana）的第二版中，后者更简明易懂，也更关注意识形态；也未出现在米格里奥里尼后由巴尔代利-米格里奥里尼再版的那本《意大利语史》（Storia）中。 它未包含在扎尔科·穆尔雅奇奇的《意大利语入门》一书中，这是一本鲜为人知的精辟著作。9

It is curious that Gramsci is not included in a very important book that came out in the mid-1970s by two young scholars, Renzi and Cortellazzo, entitled La Lingua Italiana, un Problema Politico e Scolastico [The Italian language: A political and scholastic problem]. It is a beautiful book, but it seems that Gramsci is omitted because he is too much of a genius, as if the authors do not want to group him with other scholars, which in a devious way prevents his contribution to the social and scholastic issues related to the Italian language. It is like when a professor tries to find fault with a student’s work because it is too good.
奇怪的是，格拉姆斯基并未被收录于两位年轻学者于上世纪 70 年代中期出版的极其重要的著作《意大利语：一个政治和学术问题》（La Lingua Italiana, un Problema Politico e Scolastico）中。此书甚佳，但格拉姆斯基的缺席似乎是因为他过于天才，仿佛作者不愿将他与其他学者归于一类，从而以一种曲折的方式阻止了他对意大利语的社会和学术问题的贡献。这就像一位教授试图挑剔学生的作品，因为作品过于优秀一样。

When Alfredo Stussi wrote his account of linguistic studies in Italy, he considered some of these and similar works linguists have done on Gramsci, to say, “Certainly they are exquisite, elegant; Gramsci, though, is altogether something else. Gramsci’s greatness resides in something completely different,” in having been something else: the secretary of the Communist Party.10 This is also the result in his other very important book on Italian literature and regional literatures where Alfredo Stussi discusses all these authors in his usual very detailed and penetrating fashion. But he never cites Gramsci.11 And this is a very curious fact because his book is deeply influenced by Contini, who does not talk much of Gramsci the linguist (according to the judgment of Pasolini). But Contini does deal with Italian linguistic and literary questions after having fully absorbed Gramsci’s problems and made them his own. Stussi follows Contini but, on one hand, he does not mention Gramsci. On the other hand, the official scholarship on Gramsci completely ignores all that has to do with grammar when looking for the framework, roots and genesis of Gramsci’s position. Franco Lo Piparo has recently made this point polemically, feeling a certain imbalance (including stylistic) and restraint.
当阿尔弗雷多·斯图西撰写其关于意大利语言学研究的著作时，他提及一些语言学家对葛兰西的研究，并说道：“当然，这些研究精妙优雅；然而，葛兰西则完全不同。葛兰西的伟大之处在于完全不同的方面，”即他曾担任过共产党书记。10 这也体现在他另一本关于意大利文学和区域文学的重要的著作中，书中斯图西以他一贯的详尽和深刻的方式讨论了所有这些作者。但他从未引用葛兰西。11 这是一个非常奇怪的事实，因为他的著作深受孔蒂的影响，而孔蒂（根据帕索里尼的评价）并没有过多谈及葛兰西的语言学家身份。但是，孔蒂在充分吸收了葛兰西的问题并将其内化之后，才处理意大利语言和文学问题。斯图西追随孔蒂，但一方面，他并未提及葛兰西。另一方面，关于葛兰西的官方学术研究完全忽略了所有与语法相关的方面，在寻找葛兰西立场的框架、根源和起源时。 弗朗哥·洛皮帕罗最近就此尖锐地指出，他感觉存在某种失衡（包括风格上的）和限制。

In sum, either one deals with language [linguaggio] and linguistics, and therefore not with Gramsci, or one deals with Gramsci the politician and, again, not with Gramsci the linguist.
总而言之，要么讨论语言[linguaggio]和语言学，因此并非关于葛兰西；要么讨论葛兰西的政治家身份，同样，也不是关于葛兰西的语言学家身份。

More recently, Gramsci’s name does appear in Durante’s book, in which, obviously, works by younger people and scholars like [Stefano] Gensini appear.12 I would also like to mention the recent book by Francesco Bruni.13 In these two works Gramsci enters triumphantly. This could be the sign of an ongoing change. Still, I believe that, on the whole, we have to register a sort of loss with respect to the work that I and other linguists have produced on Gramsci and language [linguaggio]. Some of us feel somewhat frustrated. We feel we are not taken seriously—and we don’t understand why—when we assert that Gramsci was seriously considering these problems. Consequently, some have become exasperated. Anyone who is more isolated becomes upset and ends up saying, “A Marxist? Gramsci was not a Marxist at all. Gramsci was not a politician at all. Gramsci was a linguist. Gramsci was an Ascolian. Only by chance has he become the Secretary of the Communist Party." This is an exasperated reaction; and since he who takes such a stance is a cautious and responsible person— even if it is true that not everybody always succeeds in being cautious and responsible—the fact that such an exasperated reaction has occurred is something on which one must reflect.14
最近，葛兰西的名字出现在杜兰特（Durante）的著作中，其中显然包含了年轻学者和像[斯特凡诺]根西尼（Stefano Gensini）这样的学者的作品。12 我还想提到弗朗切斯科·布鲁尼（Francesco Bruni）的最新著作。13 在这两部著作中，葛兰西以凯旋的姿态出现。这可能是持续变化的迹象。不过，我认为总体而言，我们必须记录一种损失，相对于我和其他语言学家关于葛兰西及其语言（linguaggio）的研究而言。我们中的一些人感到有些沮丧。当我们断言葛兰西认真考虑过这些问题时，我们感觉自己没有受到重视——我们不明白为什么——因此，一些人变得恼火。任何更加孤立的人都会变得烦躁，最终会说：“一个马克思主义者？葛兰西根本不是马克思主义者。葛兰西根本不是政治家。葛兰西是一位语言学家。葛兰西是一位阿斯科利人。他只是偶然地成为了共产党书记。这是种恼怒的反应；而且，采取这种立场的这个人是谨慎且负责任的人——即使并非每个人都能总是谨慎和负责任——这种恼怒的反应的出现，是值得我们思考的。14

My contribution is an attempt to let everyone who is not professionally a linguist or an historian of linguistic ideas engage, to a certain degree, with the question: why did Gramsci insistently talk about language?
我的贡献在于尝试让非专业语言学家或语言思想史学家也能一定程度上参与思考：为什么葛兰西坚持谈论语言？

2

It seems to me that the main part, not to say the totality, of Gramsci’s Notebooks focuses on four poles that are not there by chance. These four poles interest Gramsci because it is by means of them that he isolates those aspects of individual and collective experience. These aspects mark the detachment of human beings from what is purely natural and the emergence of human beings to history, that is, abstractly speaking, the emergence of historicity.
在我看来，葛兰西的《狱中札记》主要部分，甚至可以说全部，都集中于四个并非偶然出现的支点。这四个支点之所以引起葛兰西的兴趣，是因为他正是通过它们来隔离个人和集体经验的那些方面。这些方面标志着人类从纯粹的自然状态的脱离以及人类步入历史，也就是说，从抽象的角度来看，是历史性的兴起。

These schematically dominating and aggregating four poles can be divided as follows: (1) the economic-productive element pole; (2) what I would call following Gramsci, the cultural pole; (3) the pole of politics; and (4) the linguistic and communicative pole.
这些在图式上占主导地位并聚合的四个极点可以划分为以下几类：（1）经济生产要素极点；（2）我根据葛兰西的观点称之为文化极点；（3）政治极点；（4）语言和沟通极点。

Gramsci is interested in the connection between these four realities. One has to understand if and in what way these four realities can be and are connected. Gramsci’s best and most fundamental reflections revolve around them. It seems to me that this is what Gramsci is interested in on the theoretical, conceptual and philosophical level. He is interested in refining those theoretical and conceptual connections which may be able to link together productivity (in the economic sense), culture (in the anthropological sense), politics and linguistic-communicative realities.
葛兰西对这四种现实之间的联系感兴趣。人们必须理解这四种现实如何以及在何种程度上相互联系。葛兰西最优秀和最根本的思考都围绕着它们展开。在我看来，这正是葛兰西在理论、概念和哲学层面上所关注的。他感兴趣的是完善那些能够将生产力（在经济意义上）、文化（在人类学意义上）、政治和语言交流现实联系起来的理论和概念联系。

What I am claiming is banal for those who read Gramsci solely from the philosphical-ideological point of view. However, Gramsci is profoundly a “philosopher.” He is a philosopher not because he is an ideologue; he is a philosopher because his texts, the authors he engages with, and his references are primarily of European philosophy. One might enjoy doing the following: counting the references made in the Notebooks. You will see that certainly key Marxist authors are well represented according to a hierarchy that goes from Trotsky to Lenin, to Engels, and to Marx, the most quoted and represented in every sense, not only crudely quantitative.
我所声称的对于那些仅从哲学-意识形态角度阅读葛兰西的人来说是平淡的。然而，葛兰西是一个深刻的“哲学家”。他之所以是哲学家，并非因为他是一个意识形态家；他之所以是哲学家，是因为他的文本、他所参与的作者以及他的参考文献主要来自欧洲哲学。人们或许会乐于做以下事情：统计《狱中札记》中的参考文献。你会发现，关键的马克思主义作者无疑得到了充分的体现，其呈现的等级从托洛茨基到列宁，再到恩格斯，最后到马克思，在各个方面都是被引用和呈现得最多的，不仅是粗略的数量上的体现。

Nonetheless, it is interesting to see that each of those authors referenced has a triumphant rival from what used to be called “bourgeois philosophy” (what I tend to call “European philosophy”). Kant defeats Trotsky in the number of quotations. Giovanni Gentile largely defeats Lenin at several points. Hegel overwhelms Engels; Croce surmounts Marx, even if one takes out all the references to Croce strictly conceived as a man of letters. Philosophers who write academic books defeat Marxist political theorists.
然而，有趣的是，这些作者的每一个都引用了曾经被称为“资产阶级哲学”（我倾向于称之为“欧洲哲学”）的得意竞争对手。康德在引文数量上击败了托洛茨基。乔瓦尼·詹蒂莱在某些方面很大程度上击败了列宁。黑格尔压倒了恩格斯；克罗齐战胜了马克思，即使人们将所有严格意义上将克罗齐视为文人的引用都排除在外。撰写学术著作的哲学家击败了马克思主义政治理论家。

I believe that Gramsci is very careful about specific philosophical questions and about the fashion in which Kantian, Hegelian philosophy posits them and in which they are posited within the debate between Gentile and Croce. I see the connection among the four poles as interesting to the extent that it is a connection of purely conceptual possibilities. In my view, this constitutes his primary interest. Gramsci is then interested in the historical level, which constitutes the second level of the connections among these four realities. Gramsci continuously tries to understand in what way the following four moments—the economic-productive, the expressive-linguistic, the cultural and the political—interweave and behave in various ways, giving rise to the different national histories and identities diversely present and acting within history (I have adopted the Crocean term “expressive-linguistic” provocatively, but I don’t think I am betraying Gramsci’s text). This interweaving offers us the keys not only to understand Italian history, but also to do it in the context of the other national and European concrete histories that might still occur.
我认为葛兰西非常关注具体的哲学问题，以及康德、黑格尔哲学如何提出这些问题，以及这些问题如何在詹蒂莱和克罗齐的论战中被提出。我认为这四极之间的联系，就其纯粹概念可能性而言，是有趣的。在我看来，这构成了他主要的兴趣所在。葛兰西随后对历史层面感兴趣，这构成了这些四种现实之间联系的第二层面。葛兰西持续地试图理解以下四个层面——经济生产、表达-语言、文化和政治——是如何交织并以各种方式运作的，从而产生不同的民族历史和身份，这些身份在历史中以各种方式存在和行动。（我挑衅性地使用了克罗齐的术语“表达-语言”，但我认为我没有背叛葛兰西的文本。）这种交织不仅为我们理解意大利历史提供了关键，还在于其他可能发生的民族和欧洲具体历史的语境中理解它。

The third level is the one that, in order to avoid confusion, I would call “operative." Gramsci was the secretary of the Italian Communist Party, was a leader of the Communist International, and was responsible for the whole communist policy in Europe and in Italy. Gramsci’s research in fact was not only enriched by this experience: he was not a professor of linguistics who experiences how to rule in city hall. The outcome of the workers’ and democratic movements was the prevailing interest and the point toward which Gramsci’s reflection tended. He was interested in understanding how, on the historical and philosophical level, the four realities [poles] I mentioned above are related. He was, in fact, convinced that only control of these possible theoretical connections, and of how they had given rise to the concrete Italian and international historical reality, can orient the communist movement within the difficult choices related to the problem of the transition toward socialism. This relates to defeating fascism and the bourgeoisie that were in crisis though reaffirming their will to control the crisis.
第三个层次，为了避免混淆，我称之为“操作性”层次。葛兰西是意大利共产党书记，也是共产国际领导人，负责欧洲和意大利的整个共产主义政策。事实上，葛兰西的研究不仅受益于这些经验：他并非一位在市政厅体验如何治理的语言学教授。工人运动和民主运动的成果是葛兰西思考的主要兴趣所在，也是他思考的方向。他感兴趣的是，在历史和哲学层面，我之前提到的四种现实（两极）是如何相互关联的。事实上，他坚信，只有控制这些可能的理论联系，以及它们如何导致具体的意大利和国际历史现实，才能引导共产主义运动在通往社会主义的艰难选择中做出正确的方向。这与战胜正在危机中的法西斯主义和资产阶级有关，尽管他们仍在坚持控制危机的意愿。

What, in fact, interests Gramsci was complementing the philosophical and historical with the practical and operative dimension.
事实上，葛兰西感兴趣的是将哲学和历史维度与实践和操作维度相结合。

3

At this point, I will try to explain some original aspects in Gramsci一not only in Gramsci the linguist, but also in Gramsci the politician, the theoretician and the historian, a great, overwhelming intellectual figure within European and Italian culture in our century. A first original aspect is the materiality itself, in the narrow, reductive materiality of the four poles around which Gramsci organizes his reflection sometimes almost obsessively. There certainly have been great economists sensitive to “other” dimensions and great theoreticians in the field of economics, historians like Schumpeter. There have been some linguists, some psycholinguists, mainly Soviet, attentive to the economic-productive preludes of linguistic reality. In short, there have been many people who have worked to sew these four poles together. Yet, if one looks for anyone trying again and again to make and remake the path between those four poles from different directions, in one sense or another, I believe that one could find very few scholars like Gramsci within the horizon of contemporary culture. I have already mentioned one group of such scholars above: scholars of Soviet psychopedagogy forgotten in the Soviet Union, except by those pedagogues not forgotten in the West: Vygostky, Leont’ev and Luria. These are scholars who were interested in studying the moment in which creative capabilities emerge. These creative capabilities allow both making history according to diverse ways and inventing the diverse historical paths of the human beings in relation to the complex and articulated warp of productive techniques, of economic organization, communicative techniques, techniques and horizons of cultural comprehension of the world, political orders.
此时，我将尝试阐释葛兰西的一些独到之处——不仅是葛兰西作为语言学家，还在于他作为政治家、理论家和历史学家，这位二十世纪欧洲和意大利文化中杰出的、令人震撼的思想巨人。第一个独到之处在于其物质性本身，体现在葛兰西几乎痴迷地围绕其组织思想的四个支点上的狭义、还原性的物质性上。当然，也曾有许多关注“其他”维度的伟大经济学家，以及经济学领域的杰出理论家，如熊彼特等历史学家。也有一些语言学家、心理语言学家，主要来自苏联，他们关注语言现实的经济生产前奏。简而言之，许多人致力于将这四个支点联系起来。然而，如果寻找任何试图从不同方向，以某种方式反复构建这四个支点之间路径的人，我认为在当代文化视野中，能找到像葛兰西这样学者的寥寥无几。 我之前已提到过一类学者：苏联心理教育学家中，除了西方没有遗忘的教育家们（如维果茨基、莱昂捷夫和鲁利亚）之外，苏联国内已经遗忘的学者。这些学者对创造力出现的时刻感兴趣。这种创造力既能以多种方式创造历史，也能根据人类与复杂的、条理分明的生产技术、经济组织、沟通技术、世界文化理解技术和视野、政治秩序之间的关系，发明人类不同的历史道路。

I must also recall the contributions of German scholars belonging to the Frankfurt School, whether or not you agree with them on every point. I am afraid that not much can be added to this. Moreover, notwithstanding the very rich landscape of nineteenth-century Europe, I don’t believe there is anywhere else where these normally divergent interests that I have mentioned above (the interest in economic reality, linguistic reality, cultural reality considered in the anthropological sense and political reality) are brought together and made complementary.
我还必须提及法兰克福学派的德国学者们的贡献，无论你是否认同他们的每一点。恐怕在这方面，我们很难再补充什么。此外，尽管十九世纪欧洲的学术景观非常丰富，但我认为，在其他任何地方，我上面提到的那些通常相异的兴趣（对经济现实、语言现实、文化现实（以人类学意义理解）和政治现实的兴趣）都无法像那里那样汇聚并相互补充。

A second original element regarding Gramsci as a theoretician in general, and not only as a linguist, seems to lie within the proposal of considering and utilizing his philosophical, historical and operative reflections as complementary. There is no doubt that Gramsci took into account both Marx’s and Croce’s indications, which he was mainly deriving from Marx with respect to the complementary philosophical and historical analysis. It was from Marx that Gramsci derived the idea that the theoretical-historical dimension is fertile for the operative dimension. Still, in our century, nobody equals Gramsci with respect to this theoretical achievement. After all, it seems to me that Gramsci recalls another of his favorite authors, more often than Marx, when addressing the relationship among these three dimensions. The author I am referring to is Machiavelli, who, a long time ago, had elaborated the same viewpoint in the midst of a tormented century.
关于葛兰西作为一般理论家的第二个原创要素，而非仅仅作为语言学家，似乎在于建议将他的哲学、历史和实践反思视为互补。毫无疑问，葛兰西考虑了马克思和克罗齐的指示，他主要从马克思那里汲取了互补的哲学和历史分析。正是从马克思那里，葛兰西得出理论-历史维度对实践维度具有肥沃性的想法。然而，在本世纪，没有人能与葛兰西在这一理论成就上相提并论。毕竟，在我看来，葛兰西在论及这三个维度之间的关系时，比马克思更常想起他另一位最喜爱的作者。我指的是马基雅维利，他很久以前就在一个动荡的世纪中阐述了同样的观点。

Gramsci’s third original aspect consists in that he utilized the study of the relationships among the four poles mentioned above both on the philosophical level and on the historical level and, thanks to his operative experiences, in order to break the solidity of each of them. Recalling his pages on Fordism and Taylorism, the connections with respect to the economic-productive side with the work habits and with the present and previous economic orders, it seems to me, Gramsci analyzes each of those four poles proposing again and again a procedure exemplified by historians of literature and literati. That is, he compares the high moments—those that are very institutionalized, in which these four poles are incarnated—with the chaotic mixture of experiences dispersed at a basic level. These experiences are contradictory, often marginalized, and with which Gramsci himself often has little sympathy. These experiences contain within them segments of the high, institutionalized moments—for example, Taylorism or Manzoni’s language.15 I believe it is with respect to these issues that Gramsci uses the methodologies he learned at the school of the good professor Bartoli. These methodologies taught him to see, within the construction of the high linguistic styles, the moments of diverse and composite linguistic realities. Gramsci’s phrase “the good professor Bartoli” also means taking into account the quite extraordinary book by Antoine Meillet, which Gramsci knew extremely well: Esquisse d'une Histoire de la Langue Latine [A Sketch of the History of Latin Language].16 This book shows how classical Latin, Latinate characteristics, lasted for centuries, stemming from a procedure of selection, from a reduction of the broad potentialities of Latin, which were only partly saved and condensed in Cicero’s style of commentaries, orations and letters. His style was then transmitted as a purified and refined moment of the Latinate culture, which lives and can be understood only as rooted within a much more complex, spurious and heterogeneous Latinate culture. It is this purified moment of Latin that has then had the strength to stand for what is known as Latin in the subsequent centuries: in other words, this has been nothing but a procedure of selection and construction of a hegemony of a certain style.
葛兰西的第三个原创方面在于，他运用上述四个极点之间的关系研究，既在哲学层面，也在历史层面，并借由他的实践经验，以打破每个极点的坚固性。回溯他对福特主义和泰勒主义的论述，其与经济生产方面、工作习惯以及当前和先前经济秩序的联系，在我看来，葛兰西分析了这四个极点中的每一个，反复运用文学史家和文人所阐明的研究方法。也就是说，他将这些四个极点体现的高峰时刻——高度制度化的时刻——与基础层面的经验的混乱混合进行比较。这些经验是矛盾的，常常被边缘化，葛兰西本人也常常对其缺乏同情。这些经验包含着高峰时刻、制度化时刻的片段——例如，泰勒主义或曼佐尼的语言。15 我认为，葛兰西正是运用他在巴尔托利教授门下所习得的方法论来处理这些问题。 这些方法教他看到，在高雅语言风格的构建中，存在着多元复合的语言现实的瞬间。葛兰西的“好教授巴尔托利”这句话，也意味着要考虑到安托万·梅耶的极其精彩著作，葛兰西非常熟悉：拉丁语史纲要。16 这本书展示了古典拉丁语、拉丁语特征是如何持续几个世纪的，源于一种选择过程，源于对拉丁语广阔潜力的削减，这些潜力仅部分地保存在西塞罗的评论、演说和书信风格中，并被浓缩。他的风格随后被传承为拉丁文化的一种纯化和精炼的体现，它只有植根于更为复杂、杂乱和异质的拉丁文化中才能被理解和体会。正是这种纯化的拉丁语，后来拥有了在后几个世纪代表所谓拉丁语的力量：换句话说，这不过是一个选择和构建某种风格霸权的过程。

I believe that the dialectic between these high moments and low, chaotic mixtures of reality, discontinuity and continuity is, in fact, one of Gramsci’s
我相信现实中的这些高潮时刻与低潮、混乱的混合体之间的辩证关系，实际上是葛兰西的其中一个

contributions to the analysis of economic-productive and political realities, which he derives from the linguistic teachings and studies and that he transfers to the other poles, and in particular to the pole of culture. If one reanalyzes Gramsci’s texts, what can be inferred is that Gramsci’s notion of culture is a very broad anthropological notion, conceived as a vital capability of constructing systems which allow us to control interactions among us and between us and the environment. In other words, Gramsci does not deal only with “culture” conceived as an intellectual notion. Intellectual culture is nothing but a high moment of these cultural potentials. Literary culture, then, the only type of culture that Asor Rosa mentions in his Storia della Letteratura Italiana [History of Italian Literature],17 is only a moment, often a high moment, within the whole of intellectual culture, that is, it is a moment of a moment. This is not the broad conception of culture as a whole that Gramsci and Marx taught us to conceive.
他对经济生产和政治现实的分析贡献，源于他的语言教学和研究，并将其转移到其他领域，特别是文化领域。如果重新分析葛兰西的文本，可以推断葛兰西的文化概念是一个非常宽泛的人类学概念，被理解为一种构建系统、从而控制我们自身以及我们与环境之间互动能力。换句话说，葛兰西并非仅仅关注“文化”作为一种智识概念。智识文化不过是这些文化潜能的高峰时刻。因此，阿索罗·罗萨在他的《意大利文学史》中提到的文学文化，仅仅是整个智识文化中的一个时刻，通常是高潮时刻，也就是说，它是一个时刻的时刻。这并非葛兰西和马克思教导我们所理解的广阔的整体文化概念。

Therefore, what Gramsci is interested in is trying to see how processes of giving and receiving, fracture and continuity, discontinuity and continuity, are possible within the four related poles that I have been elaborating. There is a fourth point that seems important to me with regard to the questions put forward by Franco Lo Piparo, though from a less exasperated perspective. The four realities we have been talking about so far (the economic-productive, the political, the cultural and the linguistic) are four reciprocally autonomous realities, four moments autonomous with respect to each other. They are concretely connected and theoretically connectable. But none of them rules over the others. In other words, Gramsci’s analyses appear to tell us, it seems to me, time after time, in every situation one form can partially dominate the others, but it cannot be determined ahead of time which form will dominate. Gramsci’s view of these four realities is a very formal and “Kantian” one. They are forms according to which every possible human experience organizes itself, in which human beings detached themselves from purely mechanistic and biological consequentiality and come to history (i.e., to the possibility of tracing ways different from the ones already inscribed in the genetic code).
因此，葛兰西感兴趣的是，试图了解在以上我一直在阐述的四个相关极点中，给予与接受、断裂与连续、不连续与连续等过程是如何可能的。关于法兰克·洛·皮帕罗提出的问题，还有一个第四点对我来说似乎很重要，尽管视角没有那么激动。我们迄今为止讨论的四种现实（经济生产、政治、文化和语言）是四种相互独立的现实，四个彼此独立的环节。它们在具体上是相互关联的，在理论上也是可以联系起来的。但任何一种都不能支配其他。换句话说，葛兰西的分析似乎一次又一次地告诉我们，在我看来，在任何特定情境中，一种形式都可能部分地支配其他形式，但无法预先确定哪种形式将占主导地位。葛兰西对这四种现实的看法是非常形式化和“康德式”的。 它们是所有可能的人类经验组织自身的形式，人类从中脱离了纯粹的机械性和生物性必然性，而进入历史（即，有能力探寻与基因代码中已铭刻的路径不同的道路）。

Finally, therefore, these considerations, viewed from the perspective of the history of ideas, make a crucial point: "the” strong point of Gramsci’s thought is a theory of history in relation to natural reality. Thus, I fully agree with the fact that his theory is highly systematic, regardless of the form that the fascist prison forced Gramsci to present his reflections in. Gramsci’s Notebooks do not favor fragments nor advocate fragmentation.
最后，因此，从思想史的角度来看，这些考虑表明一个关键点：“葛兰西思想的”强项在于其将历史与自然现实联系起来的理论。因此，我完全同意他的理论具有高度的系统性，无论法西斯监狱强迫葛兰西以何种形式呈现他的思考。葛兰西的笔记并非偏爱片段，也并非倡导碎片化。

4

Does anything original and interesting result from all I have been saying so far which allows one to understand languages [linguaggi] and linguistic realities better and more thoroughly? I believe so. A Miscellanea [an edited collection of essays] celebrating the centenary of Isaia Ascoli’s birth was published while Gramsci was in prison. As Gramsci himself says, and as Lo Piparo demonstrated, Ascoli certainly is one of the sources of Gramsci’s theoretical elaborations, but, for me, not the only one. So this Miscellanea appears, but obviously Gramsci can not participate and contribute to it. He is absent from it. Leo Spitzer reviewed it in 1934 and delivered a speech that has had much influence on us (i.e., on the guild of linguists). He said: “There is something intriguing about the fact that, whereas all the nineteenth century’s great linguists”一or Gramscians?—“in all European countries (Michel Bréal, Ferdinand de Saussure, William D. Whitney in the United States) have been followed by an impressive blossoming of studies in our century, Ascoli, by contrast, had no successors.”18 This is so if one looks at the history of Italian academies in the early twentieth century. I find that Sebastiano Timpanaro’s attempt to demonstrate that Salvioni—or other skilled dialectology and glottology professors of the early twentieth century—is the real heir of a scholar as eminent as Ascoli to be generous but inane. In the 1930s, Spitzer could not have known the only real successor of Ascoli’s legacy—namely, Gramsci. He was not uniquely a follower, but a successor. The only successor of Ascoli is Gramsci. I would like to recall very briefly some strong points of Gramsci’s linguistic theory.
到目前为止，我所说的所有内容中，是否有什么新颖有趣的东西，能够让人们更好地、更透彻地理解语言[linguaggi]和语言现实？我相信是的。在葛兰西被监禁期间，出版了一本纪念伊萨亚·阿斯科利诞辰一百周年的文集[一篇论文集]。正如葛兰西本人所说，以及洛·皮帕罗所论证的那样，阿斯科利无疑是葛兰西理论阐述的来源之一，但对我来说，并非唯一。所以，这篇文集出版了，但显然葛兰西无法参与其中并做出贡献。他缺席了。莱奥·施皮策于 1934 年对其进行了评论，并发表了一篇对我们（即语言学家协会）影响深远的演讲。他说：“令人费解的是，尽管所有 19 世纪伟大的语言学家”——或者说是葛兰西主义者？——“在所有欧洲国家（米歇尔·布雷尔、费迪南·德·索绪尔、美国威廉·D·惠特尼）都得到了本世纪令人印象深刻的研究成果，而阿斯科利却无人继承。”18 如果从 20 世纪初意大利学术界的历史来看，情况就是这样。 我认为塞巴斯蒂亚诺·蒂姆帕纳罗试图证明萨尔维奥尼（或其他 20 世纪早期熟练的方言学和语言学教授）是像阿斯科利这样杰出学者的真正继承人，这种尝试慷慨却愚蠢。20 世纪 30 年代，施皮策不可能知道阿斯科利遗产的唯一真正继承者——即葛兰西。他并非仅仅是追随者，而是继承者。阿斯科利的唯一继承者是葛兰西。我想简要地回顾一下葛兰西语言理论的一些要点。

First, there is the very important tension within the semantic dimension of the organization of meanings within the languages [lingue]. By the way, it would be worth introducing, in the index of Gerratana’s edition of the Prison Notebooks, the term “semantics,” because the references to it are scattered and discontinuous. Gramsci’s sources include all the work of historical linguistics, in particular by that minority of historical linguistics that had shown how each language has its own way to semantically organize the same reality, according to ways that differ from one language to another; this posits a problem of translatability from one language to another, which is one of Gramsci’s issues. Gramsci maintains that it is always possible to translate from one language [lingua] to another thanks to an inner force of the language [lingua] itself, which is the expanding metaphorical force of meanings. It is through this force that meanings expand until they conquer a wider terrain and succeed in facing the requirements of saying and translating newer and newer things.
首先，语言[lingue]意义组织的语义维度内存在着非常重要的张力。顺便提一下，在格拉姆斯基《狱中札记》的格拉特纳版本索引中引入“语义学”一词将很有价值，因为对它的引用零散且不连续。格拉姆斯基的来源包括所有历史语言学著作，特别是那些少数历史语言学家所做的工作，他们展示了每种语言都有其自身组织相同现实的语义方式，这些方式在不同语言之间存在差异；这提出了语言之间可翻译性的问题，这是格拉姆斯基关注的一个问题。格拉姆斯基认为，从一种语言[lingua]翻译到另一种语言[lingua]始终是可能的，这归功于语言[lingua]本身的内在力量，即意义不断扩展的隐喻力量。正是通过这种力量，意义得以扩展，直至征服更广阔的领域，并成功地应对表达和翻译新事物的新要求。

Now, all these problems are completely atypical with respect to midnineteenth-century linguistics: they have been recovered only recently. So one could affirm: “Linguists are dumb!” Well, this is it. In other words, Gramsci is not a banal theoretician of language [linguaggio], one who is repetitive. He is a strong innovator.
现在，所有这些问题都与十九世纪中期语言学完全不同：它们只是最近才被发现的。因此，可以断言：“语言学家很愚蠢！” 好吧，这就是它。换句话说，葛兰西不是一个平庸的语言理论家，一个重复的人。他是一个强有力的革新者。

The last point of great interest: Gramsci does not agree with the restriction of what Humboldt had called “confrontation [and] comparison among different languages” in order to understand how each language is made and the peculiar historicity of each language. That comparison was reduced solely to phonetics and morphology, to the study and comparison among ending systems and phonetic systems: this was what linguistics and the good professor Bartoli had done. Gramsci, who did not seem to have read Humboldt much, recovers, probably by means of Ascoli and by reading the Zibaldone,19 the more complex dimension regarding comparison as a technique that allows the understanding of, not only on the linguistic terrain, how a particular historical situation is made.
最后一个引人注目的论点是：葛兰西不同意将洪堡所说的“不同语言间的对抗与比较”的范围限制在理解每种语言的构成及其独特历史性上。这种比较仅仅局限于语音学和形态学，即对词尾系统和语音系统的研究和比较：语言学以及巴尔托利教授所做的正是如此。葛兰西似乎没有仔细阅读洪堡的作品，但他很可能通过阿斯科利以及阅读《札记》获得了更复杂的维度，即比较作为一种理解不仅语言领域，而且特定历史情境是如何形成的技术。

One must really agree with and understand in depth the complex irony and the auto-irony with which Gramsci judges himself in one of his letters. It is the famous letter of 1927: in it Gramsci recalls how the good professor Bartoli assigned him the task to be “archangel destined to put to definitive rout the neogrammarians,” and to destroy them once and for all.20 Gramsci is ironic, here and elsewhere, about his own project because he is aware that the task is more complex. But the task he has given to himself and which he has carried out is more complex; not because it was not worth wiping out the neo-grammarians. It was only possible to carry out that task in a much more complex and broad framework, the one related to the entire liberation of intellectual and moral capabilities, which is the liberation Gramsci has given us as an assignment to carry out.
必须深入理解葛兰西在一封信中对自己所作的复杂讽刺和自我反讽。这封著名的信写于 1927 年：葛兰西在信中回忆了良师巴尔托利如何指派他为“注定要彻底击败新语法学派的天使”，并将其彻底摧毁。葛兰西在此以及其他地方对自己的计划持讽刺态度，因为他意识到这项任务更为复杂。但他给自己设定并完成的任务确实更为复杂；并非因为消灭新语法学派不值得。只有在一个更为复杂和广泛的框架内才能完成这项任务，即与知识和道德能力的全面解放相关的框架，而葛兰西正是将这项任务赋予了我们。

Notes 笔记

1. [While there is no English translation of abarico, the Italian term is sometimes used in English astronomy. It is the phenomenon of a body at the Lagrangian point, as described].
1. [虽然没有 abarico 的英文翻译，但意大利语术语有时在英文天文学中使用。它是指拉格朗日点上的天体现象，如描述的那样]

2. Natalino Sapegno, “Manzoni fra De Sanctis e Gramsci,” Società 1 (1952): 7-19.
2. 纳塔利诺·萨佩格诺，“曼佐尼与德·桑蒂斯和葛兰西”，《社会》杂志第 1 期（1952 年）：7-19。

3. Marc Soriano, “Problèmes de critique littéraire par Antonio Gramsci,” Les Lettres Nouvelles 23 (1955): 74-76; and especially “Problèmes scolaires,” Europe 111 (1955): 81-82.
3. 马克·索里亚诺，“安东尼奥·葛兰西的文学批评问题”，《新文学》23 期（1955）：74-76；以及尤其“学校问题”，《欧洲》111 期（1955）：81-82。

4. Bartolo Tommasso Sozzi, Aspetti e Momenti della Questione Linguistica (Padova: Liviana, 1955).
4. 巴尔托洛·托马索·索齐，《语言问题之方面与时刻》（帕多瓦：利维亚纳出版社，1955）。

5. Luigi Rosiello, “La componente linguistica dello storicismo gramsciano,” in La Città Futura. Saggi sulla figura e il pensiero di Antonio Gramsci, ed. Alberto Caracciolo and Gianni Scalia (Milan: Feltrinelli, 1959), 299-327; “Problemi linguistici negli scritti di Gramsci,” in Gramsci e la Cultura Contemporanea, ed. Pietro Rossi (Rome: Editori Riuniti-Istituto Gramsci, 1970), 347-67 [and chapter 2 of this volume].
5. 路易吉·罗西耶罗，“葛兰西历史主义的语言成分”，载于《未来城市。关于安东尼奥·葛兰西的形象和思想的论文集》，阿尔贝托·卡拉乔洛和贾尼·斯卡利亚编（米兰：费特林出版社，1959），第 299-327 页；“葛兰西著作中的语言问题”，载于《葛兰西与当代文化》，皮埃特罗·罗西编（罗马：联合出版社-葛兰西研究所，1970），第 347-367 页[以及本书的第二章]。

6. Luciano Amodio, “L’interpretazione gramsciana del linguaggio” [Gramsci’s Interpretation of Language], Il Corpo I, no. 2 (1965): 83-88.
6. 阿莫迪奥（Luciano Amodio），“葛兰西对语言的阐释”，《身体》（Il Corpo）第一卷，第二期（1965）：83-88 页。

7. Emilia Passaponti, Temi Linguistici nel Pensiero di A. Gramsci [Linguistic themes in Gramsci’s thought], unedited thesis (Rome, 1976-1977).
7.  埃米莉亚·帕萨蓬蒂，格拉姆斯基思想中的语言主题 [格拉姆斯基思想中的语言主题]，未发表论文（罗马，1976-1977）。

8. Franco Lo Piparo, Lingua, Intellettuali e Egemonia in Gramsci (Bari: Laterza, 1979).
8. 法兰克·洛皮帕罗，《语言、知识分子与葛兰西的霸权》（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1979）。

9. Giacomo Devoto, Profilo di Storia Linguistica Italiana (Florence: La Nuova Italia, 1953); Bruno Migliorini, Storia della Lingua Italiana (Bologna: Sansoni, 1960); Ignazio Baldelli, Bre^e Storia della Lingua Italiana (Florence: Sansoni, 1964); and Zarko Muljac^ic, Introduzione allo Studio della Lingua Italiana (Turin: Einaudi, 1970).
9.  贾科莫·德沃托，《意大利语言史概览》（佛罗伦萨：新意大利出版社，1953）；布鲁诺·米格里奥里尼，《意大利语史》（博洛尼亚：桑森出版社，1960）；伊格纳齐奥·巴尔德利，《意大利语简史》（佛罗伦萨：桑森出版社，1964）；以及扎尔科·穆尔雅奇，《意大利语研究导论》（都灵：艾纳迪出版社，1970）。

10. Alfredo Stussi, “Storia della Linguistica Italiana,” in Dieci Anni di Linguistica Italiana, 19651975, ed. Daniele Gambarara and Paolo Ramat (Rome: Bolzoni, 1977).
10. 阿尔弗雷多·斯图西，“意大利语言学史”，载于《意大利语言学十年回顾》（1965-1975），达尼埃莱·加姆巴拉和保罗·拉马特编（罗马：博尔佐尼社，1977）。

11. Alfredo Stussi, Studi e Documenti di Storia della Lingua e dei Dialetti Italiani [Studies and Documents of History of Language and of Dialects] (Bologna: Il Mulino, 1982).
11. 阿尔弗雷多·斯图西，《意大利语史及方言史研究与文献》（博洛尼亚：伊尔·穆利诺出版社，1982）。

12. Marcello Durante, Dal Latino all'Italiano Moderno: Saggio di storia linguistica italiana [From Latin to modern Italian: Essay on the History of Italian language] (Bologna: Zanichelli, 1981).
12. 马尔切洛·杜兰特，《从拉丁语到现代意大利语：意大利语语言史研究》（博洛尼亚：祖尼切利，1981）。

13. Francesco Bruni, L'italiano: Elementi di storia della lingua e della cultura. Testi e documenti [Italian: Elements for the History of Language and Culture. Texts and Documents] (Turin: Utet, 1984).
13.  弗朗切斯科·布鲁尼，《意大利语：语言和文化史要素。文本与文献》（都灵：UTET 出版社，1984）。

14. See Franco Lo Piparo, “Studio del linguaggio e teoria gramsciana,” Critica Marxista 2/3 (1987): 167-75 [chapter 1 of this volume].
14. 见法兰克·洛皮帕罗，“语言研究与葛兰西理论”，《马克思主义批判》第 2/3 期（1987）：167-175 [本书第一章]。

15. [For a summary of what De Mauro is indicating, see Green and Ives, chapter 16, pages 298-300, in this volume, concerning Manzoni.]
15. [关于德毛罗所指内容的概要，请参阅本书第 16 章，第 298-300 页，格林和伊夫斯关于曼佐尼的论述。]

16. Antoine Meillet, Esquisse d'une Histoire de la Langue Latine (Paris: Hachette, 1968).
16. 安托万·梅耶，拉丁语史概论 (巴黎：哈切特出版社，1968)。

17. Alberto Asor Rosa, Storia della Letteratura Italiana (Florence: La Nuova Italia, 1973).
17. 阿尔贝托·阿索罗·罗萨，《意大利文学史》（佛罗伦萨：新意大利出版社，1973）。

18. [No citation provided.]
18. [未提供引用]

19. [Giacomo Leopardi’s massive collection of notes; see chapter 6, note 3, in this volume.]
19. [莱奥帕尔迪的大量笔记；见本书第 6 章，注 3。]

20. Antonio Gramsci, Letters from Prison, vol. 1, ed. Frank Rosengarten, trans. Raymond Rosenthal (New York: Columbia University Press), 83.
20. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中书信》，第一卷，弗兰克·罗森加特编，雷蒙德·罗森塔尔译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社），第 83 页。

* Translated from “Alcuni Appunti su Gramsci Linguista,” in Gramsci la Modernità: Letteratura e Political tra Ottocento e Novecento, ed. Valerio Calzolaio (Naples: CUEN, 1991), 135-44. Translated by Rocco Lacorte with assistance by Peter Ives.
出自《葛兰西语言学家的一些札记》，收录于《葛兰西的现代性：19 世纪末至 20 世纪的文学与政治》，瓦莱里奥·卡佐莱奥编辑，（那不勒斯：CUEN，1991），第 135-144 页。由罗科·拉科尔特翻译，彼得·艾夫斯协助。

15
The Lexicon of Gramsci’s Philosophy of Praxis
André Tosel*
15 格拉姆斯基实践哲学词汇  安德烈·托塞尔*

In his important book, L'Officina Gramsciana: Ipotesi sulla Struttura dei “Quaderni del Carcere” [Gramsci’s workshop: Hypotheses on the Structure of the “Prison Notebooks”], Gianni Francioni verifies the fruitfulness of his methodological suggestions by applying them to the thematic concerning the philosophy of praxis.1 A diachronic-structural examination of the appearances and elaboration of the term “philosophy of praxis” reveals that Gramsci does not use it to be cautious—that is, to elude the vigilance of the prison censorship.
在《葛兰西的工作坊：关于《狱中札记》结构的假设》（L'Officina Gramsciana: Ipotesi sulla Struttura dei “Quaderni del Carcere”）一书中，吉安尼·弗朗乔尼通过将其方法论建议应用于实践哲学主题，验证了其方法的有效性。1 对“实践哲学”一词的历时-结构考察表明，葛兰西并非出于谨慎——即规避监狱审查——而使用该词。

Initially Gramsci takes the term “philosophy of praxis” as a linguistic equivalent of the expression “historical materialism”一which was common in the cultural-political environment of the Third International—and later in the course of the Notebooks he recuperates it as an identity card of a program capable of elaborating Marxism in response to the challenges of the times, and explicitly joined to the path delineated by Antonio Labriola that was later blurred by the different idealistic operations of Benedetto Croce and Giovanni Gentile.
最初，葛兰西将“实践哲学”一词作为“历史唯物主义”的语言等价物——这在第三国际的文化政治环境中很常见——后来在《狱中札记》中，他将其恢复为一个能够应对时代挑战，并明确与安东尼奥·拉布里奥拉所开辟的道路相结合的马克思主义发展纲领的“身份证”，而这条道路后来被贝内德托·克罗齐和乔瓦尼·詹蒂勒的不同唯心主义操作所模糊。

In the three series of “Notes on Philosophy” throughout Notebooks 4, 7 and 8, Gramsci most often uses the term “historical materialism” and even “Marxism." Notebook 8 constitutes the beginning of a change. Moreover, Notebooks 10 and 11 contain a sort of eruption of an autonomous problematic of the “philosophy of praxis.” Not only does Gramsci develop the necessity of retranslating the origins of the foundational debate of 18951900 into new terms, but he also produces new concepts through which the crisis of socialism and the workers’ movement could be thought on a double level: philosophical-conceptual and historical-analytical.
在《哲学笔记》的三个系列（札记 4、7 和 8）中，葛兰西最常使用“历史唯物主义”甚至“马克思主义”一词。札记 8 标志着转变的开始。此外，札记 10 和 11 则包含着“实践哲学”自主问题的某种爆发。葛兰西不仅发展了将 1895-1900 年基础性论争的起源重新翻译成新术语的必要性，而且还创造了新的概念，通过这些概念，社会主义危机和工人运动的危机可以从哲学-概念和历史-分析的双重层面进行思考。

Elements of Philology 训诂学要素

“Philosophy of Praxis” as a Nomenclature and as a
“实践哲学”作为一种命名和一种

Theoretical Question 理论问题

Valentino Gerratana’s subject index of his critical edition of the Prison Notebooks allows us to document the texts of the “Notes on philosophy,” series I, II, III, where the term “historical materialism” has been replaced by “philosophy of praxis." The comparison between A-texts and C-texts shows the systematic character of this substitution.2 The decisive point is that Gramsci himself has in some way theoretized this substitution under the rubric the “Question of Nomenclature" and “General Questions." We can start from the indications Gramsci gives us referring to the term “materialism" [materialismo] (the “Notes on Philosophy" are subtitled “Idealism and Materialism"). For Gramsci, pursuing the pure problematic of materialism is a sign of an old way of thinking that should be replaced by the thematic and concept of immanence. The disappearance of the use of “historical materialism" and “Marxism" coincides with the emergence of this question of nomenclature that is itself parallel to the generalization of the use of the term “philosophy of praxis." Therefore, the question of nomenclature is a conceptual and substantial one.
瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳在其批判性《狱中札记》的主题索引中，让我们得以记录“哲学笔记”系列 I、II、III 的文本，其中“历史唯物主义”一词已被“实践哲学”所取代。A 文本和 C 文本的比较显示了这种替换的系统性特征。2  关键在于，葛兰西本人在“命名问题”和“一般问题”的框架下，以某种方式论述了这种替换。我们可以从葛兰西关于“唯物主义” (《哲学笔记》的副标题为“唯心主义与唯物主义”)一词的指示出发。对葛兰西而言，追求纯粹的唯物主义问题是一种过时的思维方式，应被主题性和内在性概念所取代。  “历史唯物主义”和“马克思主义”的使用消失，正值“命名问题”的出现，而这一问题本身与“实践哲学”一词使用的普遍化平行。因此，命名问题是一个概念性和实质性的问题。

Gramsci presents the problem in Notebook 8§171. Marxist orthodoxy一 Plekhanov, Bukharin and others一confuses lexical and substantial questions. It lacks a historical sense and does not understand that materialism as a general philosophy goes back to a traditional way of positing the question of theory. Marxist orthodoxy remains imprisoned in the abstract schemes of formal logic: it is not capable of intuiting and developing the potential within the modern question of immanence. Notebook 11§16 is the corresponding C-text of Notebook 8§171. It continues this text and makes clear that the inability of finding the right term (nomenclature) is a form of the inability of dealing with the new task 一namely, the creation of a new superstructure or of a new intellectuality. “The new social group which organically represents the new historical situation" is not able to perform its function and identifies itself with a conservative residue of a social group that is historically overcome.3 Linguistic innovations demand conceptual innovations: an unprecedented historical situation demands its own concept and language. The formula “historical materialism” is tied to a historical situation that put on the agenda that the forces slated to become hegemonic had to reach compromises with the classes dominated by the ideology of transcendence, and which were tied to the economic-corporative moment of force relationships. On the contrary, the phrase “philosophy of praxis” is tied to a phase in which a more accomplished and perfect system is imposing itself and in which a new philosophy is necessary, one which is capable of “posing and resolving critically the problems that present themselves as an expression of historical development.”4 A contemporary note from the same Notebook 11—§28—is even more clear and specifies the connection between immanence and the philosophy of praxis: “The philosophy of praxis continues the philosophy of immanence but purifies it of all its metaphysical apparatus and brings it onto the concrete terrain of history.”5 An ultimate proof of Gramsci’s tendency to systematically replace the terms “historical materialism” and "Marxism” with “philosophy of praxis” is provided (still in the first half of 1932) by the emergence of his reference to Antonio Labriola under the banner “philosophy of praxis." There is no doubt that Notebook 3§31 referred to the general “philosophical views of Labriola,” but it did that in the frame of an analysis of the rupture of the so-called Marxism into two currents—that is, a materialist and an agnostic one (Austro-Marxism). Gramsci already posits this problem in relation to the necessity of constructing a “new type of state” and of elaborating a very refined and decisive worldview.6 Yet, in Notebook 11§70, which is a C-text, this theme erupts: Gramsci insists on the autonomy—namely, on the self-sufficiency—of the philosophy of praxis and makes a direct reference to hegemony: “from the moment in which a subaltern group becomes really autonomous and hegemonic, thus bringing into being a new form of State, we experience the concrete birth of a need to construct a new intellectual and moral order, that is, a new type of society, and hence the need to develop more universal concepts and more refined and decisive ideological weapons."7 Now the moment has come to deal systematically with the philosophy of praxis as theory and a live form of hegemony. Now it is necessary to go back to the interrupted link with “the only man who has attempted to build up the philosophy of praxis scientifically.”8
葛兰西在第八笔记本§171 中提出了这个问题。马克思主义正统派——例如普列汉诺夫、布哈林等人——混淆了词汇问题和实质问题。它缺乏历史感，也不理解作为一种普遍哲学的唯物主义溯源于一种传统的理论命题方式。马克思主义正统派仍然被困在形式逻辑的抽象模式中：它无法直觉并发展现代内在性问题中的潜力。第十一笔记本§16 是第八笔记本§171 的对应 C 文本。它延续了这一论述，并明确指出，找不到合适的术语（命名法）是无法应对新任务的一种形式——即创造新的上层建筑或新的知识分子。 “有机地代表新历史局面的新社会群体”无法履行其职能，并将其自身等同于一个历史上被克服的社会群体的保守残余。3 语言创新需要概念创新：前所未有的历史局面需要其自身的概念和语言。 “历史唯物主义”公式与一种历史情境相联系，在这种情境中，即将成为霸权力量的势力必须与受超越性意识形态支配的阶级达成妥协，并且与经济-企业力量关系的时刻相联系。相反，“实践哲学”一词与一个更完善、更完美的体系正在确立的阶段相联系，在这个阶段，需要一种新的哲学，一种能够“批判性地提出和解决作为历史发展表现形式的问题”的哲学。4 同一本笔记本（11）的同一段落（§28）的当代注释更加清晰，并具体说明了内在性和实践哲学之间的联系：“实践哲学延续了内在性哲学，但净化了其所有形而上学装置，并将其带入历史的具体领域。”5.  关于葛兰西系统性地用“实践哲学”取代“历史唯物主义”和“马克思主义”的最终证明（仍处于 1932 年上半年）在于他以“实践哲学”为旗帜提及安东尼奥·葛兰西。毫无疑问，笔记 3§31 提及了拉布里奥拉的“哲学观点”，但它是以分析所谓马克思主义分裂为两大流派——即唯物主义和不可知论（奥地利马克思主义）——为框架进行的。葛兰西已将此问题与构建“新型国家”和阐述一种非常精细和决定性的世界观联系起来。6 然而，在笔记本 11§70（一篇 C 文本）中，这一主题爆发：葛兰西坚持实践哲学的自主性——即自给自足——并直接提及霸权：“当一个被统治群体真正获得自主性和霸权地位，从而产生一种新的国家形式时，我们便体验到构建新的知识和道德秩序（即新的社会类型）的具体诞生，以及发展更普遍、更精细、更具决定性的意识形态武器的需要。”7 现在是时候系统地处理实践哲学作为理论和一种活生生的霸权形式了。现在有必要回到与“唯一试图科学地构建实践哲学的人”的断裂环节。8

“Philosophy of Praxis” as Genre and Species
“实践哲学”作为类型与物种

The parallel between the “Notes on philosophy” (I Notebook 4, II Notebook 7, III Notebook 8) and the more elaborated thematic Notebooks allows us to understand that the philosophy of praxis is at once genre and species of the genre. As genre, the philosophy of praxis refers to its “founder” Marx and indicates Marxism—namely, a general form of theoryconception of the world which continues and crowns the movement of intellectual and moral reformation begun in the Renaissance and the Reformation, which is then developed through the Enlightenment and the French Revolution, and finally refined as idealistic German philosophy. As a species of this genre—as worldview—the philosophy of praxis represents the actual phase in which what is at stake is the elaboration of the philosophy of praxis itself: the construction of hegemony demands that “Marxism” is determined as the philosophy of praxis in a strong sense, that is, capable of criticizing and integrating the idealist-revisionist critique of the Second International’s Marxisms—that is, the economistic orthodoxy and agnosticism.
“哲学笔记”（第一笔记本第四册，第二笔记本第七册，第三笔记本第八册）与更详尽的主题笔记本之间的平行之处，使我们理解实践哲学既是类型又是该类型的物种。作为类型，实践哲学指的是其“创始人”马克思，并指代马克思主义——即一种世界观理论的总体形式，它延续并完成了文艺复兴和宗教改革以来知识和道德改革运动，并通过启蒙运动和法国大革命发展，最终在德国理想主义哲学中得到完善。作为该类型的物种——作为世界观——实践哲学代表着实践哲学本身的具体阶段：建立领导权要求将“马克思主义”确定为强义上的实践哲学，即能够批判和整合第二国际马克思主义的唯心主义修正主义批判——也就是说，经济主义正统和不可知论。

We can follow the development of this issue by comparing an A-text and a C-text about the same nexus of problems. The first text, Notebook 4§3, entitled “Two Aspects of Marxism,” revives the analysis that Gramsci laid out in the already-quoted Notebook 3§3, but analyzes it at a further level of complexity: the two revisions of Marxism—economistic materialism and agnosticism—now form only one current that is assimilated and overcome by Italian idealism, which knew how to rejuvenate itself by integrating the vital elements of the so-called orthodox Marxism and of its impotent agnostic critique. Gramsci, at this point in the Notebooks, does not talk about “philosophy of praxis” but still of “Marxism” and of “historical materialism." He writes:
我们可以通过比较关于同一问题关联的 A 文本和 C 文本来追踪这一问题的演变。第一篇文本，笔记本 4§3，题为“马克思主义的两个方面”，复兴了葛兰西在之前引用的笔记本 3§3 中所阐述的分析，但将其分析到了更复杂的层面：对马克思主义的两种修正——经济决定论的唯物主义和不可知论——如今仅构成一股被意大利唯心主义同化和克服的思潮，意大利唯心主义知道如何通过整合所谓正统马克思主义及其无力不可知论批判的活力要素来使自身焕发生机。葛兰西在此阶段的笔记中并未谈论“实践哲学”，而仍谈论“马克思主义”和“历史唯物主义”。他写道：

Marxism had two tasks: to combat modern ideologies in their more refined form; and to enlighten the minds of the popular masses, whose culture was medieval. This second task, which was fundamental, has absorbed all its energies, not only “quantitatively" but also “qualitatively." For “didactic" reasons, Marxism became mixed with a form of culture that was somewhat superior to the popular mentality but inadequate to combat the other ideologies of the educated classes; yet, at its inception, Marxism actually superseded the highest cultural manifestation of the time, classical German philosophy.9
马克思主义有两个任务：批判现代意识形态的精致形式；以及启迪文化处于中世纪状态的民众。这个根本性的第二个任务，不仅在“数量”上，也在“质量”上，都吸收了马克思主义的所有精力。出于“教化”的目的，马克思主义与一种略高于大众思维方式的文化形式相混合，但却不足以对抗受过教育阶层的其他意识形态；然而，在最初，马克思主义实际上超越了当时最高的文化体现，即古典德国哲学。

Gramsci formulates the interrupted program as follows: “Historical materialism, in its dialectic of popular culture-high culture, is the crowning point of this entire movement of intellectual and moral reform. It corresponds to Reformation + French Revolution, universality + politics.”10
葛兰西将中断的方案表述如下：“历史唯物主义，在其民众文化与高雅文化之辩证法中，是这场知识与道德改革运动的顶峰。它对应于宗教改革+法国大革命，普世性+政治。”

The second passage (Q16§9) returns to this entire thematic, enriching it and putting it under the explicit title: “Some problems for a study of the philosophy of praxis.” This time Antonio Labriola is recognized as the only one who “distinguishes himself from both currents [the orthodox Marxists and the agnostics] by his affirmation (not always, admittedly, unequivocal) that the philosophy of praxis is an independent and original philosophy which contains in itself the elements of a further development, so as to become, from an interpretation of history, a general philosophy.”11 Now what is needed is to overcome Croce and to refuse “the reduction of the philosophy of praxis to an empirical canon of historical research.”12 Only in this way can the economic-corporative impasse of the Marxism of Bukharin—the best representative of the Third International—be overcome. This is a point of arrival that concludes a starting point based on a “general philosophy”一that is, “a philosophy which is also politics and a politics which is also a kind of philosophy.”13 Thus, Gramsci affirms the link between the formation of a new intellectual group, the transformation of the common sense of the subaltern masses and the emergence of the ethical-political state. The theoretical autonomy and independence of the philosophy of praxis as a hegemonic plan imply its dependence on the “historical-moral development”一dependence that characterizes immanent philosophies—and specifies its theoretical-critical tasks connecting them to a “total liberation from any form of abstract ‘ideologism,’ the real conquest of the historical world, the beginnings of a new civilization.”14
第二段（Q16§9）重回这一主题，使其更加丰富，并明确题为：“实践哲学研究中的一些问题”。这一次，安东尼奥·葛兰西承认，只有安东尼奥·拉布里奥拉“区别于两大流派（正统马克思主义者和不可知论者），他断言（诚然，并非总是明确）实践哲学是一门独立的、原创的哲学，它自身包含着进一步发展的要素，从而从对历史的解释发展成为一种普遍哲学。”11 现在需要克服的，是克罗齐，并拒绝“将实践哲学简化为历史研究的经验规范。”12 只有通过这种方式，才能克服布哈林（第三国际的最佳代表）的马克思主义的经济-企业困境。这是一个终点，它总结了一个基于“普遍哲学”——即“一种既是政治又是哲学，一种既是哲学又是政治”——的起点。13 因此，葛兰西肯定了新知识分子群体的形成、被统治阶级大众的常识转变以及伦理政治国家的兴起之间的联系。作为一种霸权计划的实践哲学的理论自主性和独立性，意味着它依赖于“历史—道德发展”——这种依赖性是内在哲学的特点——并明确了其理论批判任务，将它们与“彻底摆脱任何形式的抽象‘意识形态’，真正征服历史世界，开启新文明的开端”联系起来。14

Now we can legitimately argue that “the affirmation that the philosophy is a new, independent and original conception, even though it is also a moment of world historical development, is an affirmation of the independence and originality of a new culture in incubation, which will develop with the development of social relations.”15
现在我们可以合法地论证，“哲学被认为是新的、独立的和原创的概念，尽管它也是世界历史发展的一个阶段，这实际上是对一种正在孕育的、新的文化的独立性和原创性的肯定，这种文化将随着社会关系的发展而发展。”15

Moments of the Appearance and of the Consolidation of the “Philosophy of Praxis”： From “Notes on Philosophy” I, II, III to Notebooks 10 and 11
“实践哲学”的出现与巩固时刻：从《哲学札记》I、II、III 到笔记本 10 和 11

A rapid analysis of the three series of “Notes” shows that they center on the critique of the theoretical-practical form of Bukharin’s Essay. Yet almost immediately Gramsci makes recourse to Croce, the leader of international revisionism, who developed the capability of criticizing this “deviation” of the philosophy of praxis. The need to return to the philosophical dimension is required by his need to further elaborate the theme of the relationships between structure and superstructure: Notebook 8 marks out the decisive turning point toward the autonomization of the philosophy of praxis.
对“札记”三辑的快速分析表明，它们的核心是批判布哈林论文的理论-实践形式。然而，葛兰西几乎立刻诉诸国际修正主义领袖克罗齐，后者具备批判实践哲学这种“偏差”的能力。回到哲学维度，是由于他需要进一步阐述结构与上层建筑之间的关系；第八本札记标志着哲学实践走向自主化的决定性转折点。

A

Gramsci does not use the term “philosophy of praxis” in Notebook 4. If in its place, however, one finds the term “historical materialism,” the new thematic is present as a critique of the philosophical weakness of Bukharin’s historical materialism, divided between a positive sociology of classes and a vulgar materialism. Gramsci’s use of the term “philosophy of praxis” is marginal: it tangentially appears in §28 when he makes a reference to the book of Antonino Lovecchio, Philosophy of Praxis and Philosophy of the Spirit [Filosofia della praxis e Filosofia dello Spirito], regarding the Labriola-Croce-Gentile debate. The elaboration in Notebook 4 goes beyond problems of lexicon and nomenclature.
葛兰西在第四笔记本中未使用“实践哲学”一词。然而，如果用“历史唯物主义”来替代，新的主题就出现了，它批判了布哈林的历史唯物主义的哲学弱点，这种弱点夹杂着对阶级状况的积极社会学和庸俗唯物主义。葛兰西使用“实践哲学”一词较为边缘化：它在第 28 节中以一种间接的方式出现，他提及安东尼诺·洛韦奇奥的著作《实践哲学与精神哲学》（Filosofia della praxis e Filosofia dello Spirito），涉及拉布里奥拉-克罗齐-詹蒂莱的论争。第四笔记本中的阐述超越了词汇和名称的范畴。

In Notebook 4§37, the noun “praxis” appears to denote the integral activity of humanity as the object of so-called historical materialism. But Gramsci uses the language of the actualist philosophy of Giovanni Gentile, defining praxis as an “impure act.” Gramsci does not name Gentile, but his allusion is clear: the path toward Labriola is somewhat mediated by the memory of Gentile. Yet Gramsci amends this memory immediately, in the sense of a concrete determination of the economic and political contents of praxis. The problem concerning the value of the ideological superstructures and the objectivity of knowledge cannot be solved for him by resorting to “monism”:
在笔记本 4§37 中，“实践”一词似乎指称作为所谓历史唯物主义对象的完整的人类活动。但葛兰西使用了乔瓦尼·詹蒂莱的唯实际主义哲学的语言，将实践定义为“不纯粹的行为”。葛兰西并未点明詹蒂莱，但他的暗示却很明确：通往拉布里奥拉的道路多少受到了詹蒂莱记忆的影响。然而，葛兰西立刻修正了这种记忆，以具体确定实践的经济和政治内容。对于意识形态上层建筑的价值和知识客观性的问题，他无法通过诉诸“一元论”来解决。

It is obviously neither idealistic nor materialistic “monism,” neither “Matter” nor "Spirit,” but rather "historical materialism,,f that is to say, concrete human activity (history): namely, activity concerning a certain organized “matter” (material forces of production) and the transformed “nature” of man. Philosophy of the act (praxis), not of the "pure act” but rather the “impure”一that is, real一act, in the most secular sense of the word.16
显然，它既不是理想主义的“一元论”，也不是唯物主义的“一元论”，既不是“物质”，也不是“精神”，而是“历史唯物主义”，也就是说，具体的实践活动（历史）：即关于某种组织化的“物质”（生产力）以及人类自身被改造的“自然”的活动。行动（实践）的哲学，不是“纯粹行动”的哲学，而是“不纯粹的”——也就是说，真实的——行动，在该词最世俗的意义上。

Notebook 4 reaches the decisive idea, in terms of content [although not nomenclature], of "a systematic treatment of historical materialism” that implies that it should “deal with the general philosophical part in its entirety, and furthermore it should also be a theory of history, a theory of philosophy, a theory of economics.”17 This point is made within his critique of Bukharin's Popular Manual. In this way, however, Gramsci leaves open the question of the lexical adjustment that Notebook 4 itself is positing. In this notebook, we have at least two examples of Gramsci's position of the problem of nomenclature. The first one appears in §17, when Gramsci questions the relevance of the term “immanence” to define the true tradition in which Marx's theory is inserted—a theory that, at the same time, renews that tradition.18 The second one can be found in §34, which Gramsci entitles “Regarding the Name Historical Materialism." This note quotes the words of the scientist [Alessandro] Volta, who said, “‘I believe that, when something new is discovered in the sciences, one must adopt an entirely new term for it. . . .' and that those who specify terms that maintain ‘some resemblance or connection between the old idea and the new one [confuse] science and [this] leads to useless controversies.'"19
笔记 4 在内容上（尽管不是命名上）达到了“历史唯物主义的系统阐述”这一决定性观点，这意味着它应该“完整地处理一般哲学部分，并且还应该是一部历史理论、哲学理论和经济理论”。17  这一观点在他的对布哈林的《大众读本》的批判中提出。然而，通过这种方式，葛兰西留下了笔记 4 自身提出的词汇调整问题。在这本笔记中，我们至少有两个葛兰西对命名问题立场。第一个出现在§17，葛兰西质疑术语“内在性”定义马克思理论所处的真正传统——同时更新了该传统的理论。18 第二个出现在§34，葛兰西将其命名为“关于历史唯物主义名称”。该笔记引用了科学家[亚历山德罗·]伏特的话：“‘我认为，当科学中发现新事物时，必须为其采用一个全新的术语……’”并且那些规定术语，在旧观念和新观念之间保持“某种相似性或联系”的人[混淆]科学，并导致无益的争论。"19

B

Before examining Notebook 7, it is important to point out an isolated text: Notebook 5§127, dedicated to Machiavelli. Gramsci maintains that the author of The Prince did not write books about immediate political action or a utopia.20 On the contrary, Machiavelli “in his treatment, in his critique of the present, he articulated some general concepts that are presented in an aphoristic and nonsystematic form. He also articulated a conception of the world that could also be called"一I need to emphasize this一"‘philosophy of praxis' or ‘neohumanism,' in that it does not recognize transcendental or immanent (in the metaphysical sense) elements but is based entirely on the concrete action of man, who out of historical necessity works and transforms reality.”21 Machiavelli and Marx therefore had the same theoretical destiny: they are revolutionary theoreticians of practice, who revolutionized even philosophy, but who did not explicitly elaborate their philosophy. The problem of philosophy coincides, therefore, once again with the question of the conquest-foundation of a new type of state. Yet the specific philosophical problem posed by the work of Marx, unlike the one posed by Machiavelli, implies only “a system of principles asserting that the end of the state is its own end, its own disappearance: in other words, the reabsorption of political society into civil society.”22
在考察笔记本 7 之前，有必要指出一个独立文本：笔记本 5§127，专门论述马基雅维利。葛兰西认为，《君主论》的作者并非著书论及直接的政治行动或乌托邦。20 相反，马基雅维利“在其论述中，在其对当下的批判中，阐述了一些以格言体和非系统化形式呈现的总体概念。他还阐述了一种世界观，可以称之为——我需要强调这一点——‘实践哲学’或‘新人文主义’，因为它不承认形而上的或内在的（在形而上学意义上）因素，而是完全基于具体的人类行动，人类出于历史的必然性而工作并改造现实。”21 因此，马基雅维利和马克思具有相同的理论命运：他们是实践的革命理论家，他们甚至革新了哲学，但并没有明确地阐述他们的哲学。因此，哲学问题再次与建立新类型国家的征服-奠基问题相一致。 然而，马克思的作品所提出的哲学问题，与马基雅维利不同，只暗示着“一个主张国家目的在于自身消亡的原则体系：换言之，政治社会重新融入公民社会。22

C

The term “philosophy of praxis” recurs more often in Notebook 7. This happens above all when Gramsci discusses Croce, whom he acknowledges as a superior theoretician of history and politics than Bukharin, in his schematic Manual. Gramsci’s recourse to Labriola’s philosophy of praxis was mediated by his recollection of Gentile’s actualism, which itself was mediated by his engagement with Croce—the only one who was able to utilize the perspective of the methodology of history to determine and make concrete the content of praxis.
“实践哲学”一词在第七笔记本中出现频率更高。尤其是在葛兰西讨论克罗齐时，他认为克罗齐在历史和政治理论方面比布哈林在其《纲要》中更为优秀。葛兰西对拉布里奥拉实践哲学的援引，是通过他对詹蒂莱现实主义的回忆来实现的，而詹蒂莱现实主义本身又是通过他对克罗齐的参与而实现的——克罗齐是唯一能够利用历史方法论的视角来确定和具体化实践内容的人。

In this notebook, Gramsci uses the noun “praxis” more frequently than earlier, which he regards as a unitary concept that allows one to think of the dialectical development of the historical process, and to specify the relations of force between economy, politics, culture, philosophy without the unilinear mechanism of structure-superstructure. Note 18—also a B-text—considers "[t]he unity in the component parts of Marxism” and specifies that in the frame of the general theme of the “unity comes from the dialectical development of the contradictions between man and matter (nature-material forces of production)” is necessary to specify the unity within the domains of economy, philosophy and politics: “In economics, the center of unity is value, that is, the relation between the worker and the industrial forces of production.... In politics [it is] the relation between the
在本笔记本中，葛兰西使用名词“实践”的频率高于此前，他将其视为一个统一概念，可以思考历史进程的辩证发展，并明确经济、政治、文化、哲学之间的力量关系，而无需结构—上层建筑的单线性机制。注释 18（也是一个 B 文本）探讨了“马克思主义的构成部分的统一”，并指出，在“统一源于人与物质（自然—物质生产力）之间矛盾的辩证发展”这一总主题框架下，有必要明确经济、哲学和政治领域的统一性：“在经济学中，统一的核心是价值，即工人与工业生产力之间的关系……在政治领域中，则是

state and civil society, that is, the intervention of the state (centralized will) to educate the educator, the social milieu in general.” The equivalent of value in “philosophy” or in these relations in economics and politics is nothing but “praxis, that is, the relation between human will (superstructure) and the economic structure."23 Another note from the same notebook, devoted to the examination of the concept of human nature, explicitly identifies historical materialism “with a philosophy of praxis." Note 35 identifies the problem posited by “historical materialism" as philosophical, defining it as the “problem of what man is":
国家和公民社会，即国家（集中意志）干预教育者，以及一般社会环境。“在哲学或经济政治关系中，价值的等同物不过是‘实践’，即人的意志（上层建筑）与经济结构之间的关系。”23 同一笔记本的另一页，专门探讨人性概念，明确将历史唯物主义“与实践哲学”等同。注释 35 将“历史唯物主义”提出的问题定义为哲学问题，将其定义为“人是什么”的问题：

The problem of what man is, then, is always the so-called problem of “human nature," or of so-called man in general; in other words, it is the attempt to create a science of man (a philosophy) that has for its starting point a “unitary" concept, an abstraction capable of containing everything “human." . . . The correct framing of the problem demands defining “human nature" as “the whole ensemble of human relationships" ... because it includes the idea of becoming一 man becomes, he changes continuously with the changing of social relations一and because it negates “man in general."
那么，关于人是什么的问题，始终是所谓的“人性”问题，或者关于一般人的问题；换言之，这是试图建立一个人类科学（一种哲学），其出发点是一个“统一”的概念，一个能够包含所有“人类”特性的抽象概念……。正确地界定这个问题要求将“人性”定义为“人类关系的整体集合”……因为它包含了“成为”的概念——人会发展，会随着社会关系的变化而不断变化——并且排除了“一般人”的概念。

The term “philosophy of praxis" is more adequate, as Gramsci writes: “Thus one arrives also at the equality of, or the equation between, ‘philosophy and politics,5 thought and action, that is, at the philosophy of praxis. Everything is political, even philosophy or the philosophies ... and the only ‘philosophy5 is history in action, life itself."24
“实践哲学”一词更为恰当，正如葛兰西所写：“因此，人们最终也达到了‘哲学与政治、思想与行动’的平等或等式，即实践哲学。一切都是政治的，甚至哲学或各种哲学……而唯一的‘哲学’是行动中的历史，是生命本身。”

In Notebook 8, Gramsci regularizes in ways his tendency to substitute the phrase “the philosophy of praxis,” but does not eliminate the use of “historical materialism." This generates a situation of competition between “philosophy of praxis" and “historical materialism." Yet, in this notebook, the sense of Gramsci’s tendency to such a substitution becomes clearer because only the philosophy of praxis (and not a “philosophy of praxis") can think through and determine the revolutionary process of the “overturning of praxis." Likewise, §182 (a B-text) puts forth the revision of the concept of “historical bloc":
在笔记本 8 中，葛兰西以某种方式规范了他使用“实践哲学”一词的倾向，但并未完全摒弃“历史唯物主义”。这导致了“实践哲学”和“历史唯物主义”之间的竞争局面。然而，在这个笔记本中，葛兰西倾向于进行这种替换的意图变得更加清晰，因为只有“实践哲学”（而不是“实践哲学”的复数形式）才能思考并确定“实践颠覆”的革命进程。同样，§182（B 文本）提出了“历史块”概念的修正。

The structure and the superstructures form a “historical bloc." In other words, the complex and discordant ensemble of the superstructures reflects the ensemble of social relations of production. From this, one can conclude that only a comprehensive system of ideologies rationally reflects the contradiction of the structure and represents the existence of the objective conditions for revolutionizing praxis.25
结构与上层建筑构成一个“历史的整体”。换言之，上层建筑错综复杂且矛盾的集合反映了生产关系的集合。由此可得出结论，只有系统全面的意识形态才能合理地反映结构的矛盾，并体现客观条件存在，从而革命化实践。

But even more important is §198. It is maybe the first to be entitled “Philosophy of Praxis." In this note, criticizing Croce’s critique of Labriola’s proposal (“to construct a ‘philosophy of praxis’ on the basis of Marxism”)，Gramsci looks again at Marx’s fundamental argument concerning Feuerbach and refuses the absorption of the philosophical dimension inside practical activity alone.26 Since we cannot retrace the entire path of this truly pivotal notebook—where we must recall that Gramsci explicitly posits the problem of lexicon and nomenclature (§171) —it will be enough to notice three significant texts (§220, §232, and §235). The decisive step forward, which the Notebooks consolidate, is then constituted by the elaboration of the connections unifying philosophycommon sense-worldview under the point of view of hegemony.
但更重要的是§198。它或许是第一个被冠以“实践哲学”的章节。在这篇笔记中，批判了克罗齐对拉布里奥拉关于（“在马克思主义基础上构建‘实践哲学’ ”）的批评，葛兰西重新审视了马克思关于费尔巴哈的基本论点，并拒绝将哲学维度仅仅吸收进实践活动之中。26 由于我们无法追溯这篇真正关键的笔记本的全部路径——我们必须记住，葛兰西明确地提出了词汇和命名法的难题（§171）——只需注意到三个重要的文本（§220、§232 和§235）就足够了。随后，笔记汇编中取得的决定性进展在于，从霸权的角度阐述了统一哲学、常识和世界观的联系。

Notebook 8§220 (which was rewritten in Q11§12) affirms that “[a] philosophy of praxis must initially adopt a polemical stance, as superseding the existing mode of thinking. It must therefore present itself as a critique of ‘common sense’ . . . [and also] as a critique of the philosophy of intellectuals, out of which the history of philosophy arises.” The philosophy of praxis should thus be developed following two axes: on the one hand, as a reformation of common sense by employing the position that all humans are philosophers; on the other hand, as an exposition of the “‘problems5 that arose in the course of the history of philosophy, in order to criticize them, demonstrate their real value (if they still have any) or their importance as links in a chain, and define the new problems of the present time.”27
笔记本 8§220（在 Q11§12 中被重写）断言：“实践哲学必须首先采取一种批判立场，以超越现有的思维方式。因此，它必须表现为对‘常识’的批判……以及对知识分子哲学的批判，哲学史由此产生。” 因此，实践哲学应沿着两个轴线发展：一方面，通过运用所有人类都是哲学家的立场，对常识进行改革；另一方面，阐释哲学史中出现的“‘问题 5’，以便批判它们，展示它们真正的价值（如果它们仍然有任何价值）或它们作为链条环节的重要性，并界定当前时代的新问题。”27

Notebook 8§235 (which was rewritten in Q11§12) makes the plan for an Anti-Croce,28 a task for the new philosophy of praxis, which can constitute itself only as critical heir of the historical series “transcendence, immanence, and speculative historicism." This Anti-Croce proceeds on two fronts: the fight against speculative philosophy and the critique of the “deterioration of the philosophy of praxis” (positivism and mechanic theories). The philosophy of praxis still uses Croce’s speculative historicism in order to correct its own deviations and to form a new theoretical structure capable of historicizing itself by identifying the tasks of the epochal moment. Notebooks 10 and 11 will produce the outlines of this structure that, insofar as it is the philosophy of praxis, goes beyond the old plan called “historical materialism" that has become antiquated.29
笔记本 8§235（在 Q11§12 中重写）制定了反克罗齐（Anti-Croce）计划，这是实践新哲学的任务，它只能作为“超越、内在和思辨历史主义”这一历史系列的批判继承者而确立自身。这场反克罗齐运动有两条战线：反对思辨哲学和批判“实践哲学的堕落”（实证主义和机械论）。实践哲学仍然利用克罗齐的思辨历史主义来纠正自身偏差，并形成一个新的理论结构，能够通过识别时代时刻的任务来实现自身的历史化。笔记本 10 和 11 将勾勒出该结构的轮廓，就其作为实践哲学而言，超越了过时的旧计划“历史唯物主义”。

Elements of the Philosophy of Praxis: Nets, Poles, Diagonals
实践哲学的要素：网、杆、对角线

Notebooks 10 and 11 are explicitly devoted to the elaboration of the philosophy of praxis, but from different points of view. As Francioni has made clear it is above all Notebook 11 that constitutes the most organic effort of thematization: Gramsci’s critique of Bukharin’s crude historical materialism, which is the peak of the Third International’s Marxism, implies that the pernicious division between positivist sociology and transcendental metaphysical materialism must be overcome. The philosophy of praxis wins back its position and asserts itself by positing the general question of science, of scientific tools and of the relationships between common sense, worldview and language, opening in this way the perspective of dialectic beyond Engels’s speculativism. With specific regard to Notebook 10, one can say that it is not so much a special notebook, but rather a new series of “notes,” the plan of which is Gramsci’s critical recuperation of Croce’s philosophical elaboration to serve the purposes of the new perspective pursued by the philosophy of praxis. The Anti-Croce is the obligatory path to start a methodology and a theory of history. It furnishes the key of the “ethico-political” moment—namely, the question regarding both the “historical bloc” and hegemony.
第 10 和第 11 笔记本专门阐述实践哲学，但视角不同。正如弗朗西奥尼所阐明的那样，第 11 笔记本尤其体现了主题化的有机努力：葛兰西批判布哈林的粗糙历史唯物主义，这是第三国际马克思主义的顶峰，这意味着必须克服实证社会学与形而上超验唯物主义之间的有害分裂。实践哲学重新确立其地位，并通过提出科学、科学工具以及常识、世界观和语言之间关系的一般问题，从而开辟了超越恩格斯思辨主义的辩证法视角。至于第 10 笔记本，可以说它并非一个特殊的笔记本，而是一系列新的“笔记”，其计划是葛兰西批判性地吸收克罗齐的哲学阐释，以服务于实践哲学所追求的新视角。反克罗齐主义是开启历史方法论和历史理论的必由之路。 它提供了“伦理政治”时刻的关键——即关于“历史块”和霸权的问题。

All these themes are intertwined: the continuation of theory poses the question of what philosophy is, specifically concerning historical causality, science and the relationships among science, ideology and the worldview of the masses. Moreover, the problem of science is connected, in turn, to common sense, the historical function of the intellectuals and, therefore, of politics, and the joining of structure and superstructure. The articulation of the two notebooks that were written almost contemporaneously—Notebook 10 was finished after Notebook 11—can be better specified.
所有这些主题相互交织：理论的延续提出了哲学是什么的问题，特别是关于历史因果关系、科学以及科学、意识形态和大众世界观之间的关系。此外，科学问题又与常识、知识分子的历史作用，以及由此而来的政治，以及结构与上层建筑的结合联系在一起。这两本几乎同时撰写的笔记本——笔记本 10 在笔记本 11 之后完成——可以被更具体地阐述。

Notebook 10 continues by integrating the ethico-political moment into the theory of history; it reveals the place and the function of philosophy as a worldview, as politics and culture. This integration is made in the name of Anti-Croce (which means, at the same time, With-Croce). This integration also implies a historical-critical axis, to the extent that philosophy, insofar as it formulates itself as philosophy of praxis, thinks its own historicity and goes beyond the representation of itself as eternal opposition between materialism and idealism. Notebook 11 elaborates theoretically the general program of the philosophy of praxis: it starts from the politics-culture nexus, it clarifies the relationship of worldview-common sense and reveals the decisive function of language and its levels (the scientific constitutes the highest linguistic level). The question of philosophy as translatability of scientific languages becomes the nucleus of the general plan, which, instead of turning into an internal limit, closed to the outside, opens anew onto politics as intellectual and moral reform of the subaltern masses as a candidate for hegemony. The axis of Gramsci’s research is therefore rather historical-systematic: this is how the movement of Notebooks 10 and 11 can be explained一but one should not crystallize this historical-systematic proposal.
笔记本 10 继续将伦理政治时刻融入历史理论；它揭示了哲学作为世界观、政治和文化的地位和功能。这种整合以反克罗齐（同时意味着与克罗齐）的名义进行。这种整合也暗示了一个历史批判轴，因为哲学，在其形式化为实践哲学的意义上，思考自身的历史性，并超越了自身作为唯物主义和唯心主义永恒对立的表述。笔记本 11 从理论上阐述了实践哲学的总体纲领：它从政治-文化联系出发，阐明了世界观-常识的关系，并揭示了语言及其层次（科学构成最高的语言层次）的决定性作用。哲学作为科学语言的可翻译性问题成为总体计划的核心，它并非变成一个封闭于外的内在限制，而是重新向政治开放，作为对被统治群众的知识和道德改革以及潜在的领导权的追求。 因此，葛兰西研究的轴心是历史系统性的：这就是可以解释《笔记》10 和 11 的运动方式——但人们不应将这种历史系统性的提议凝固化。

The Philosophy of Praxis as a Methodology of History: Ethical-Political Moment and Worldview (on Notebook 10)
实践哲学作为历史方法论：伦理政治时刻与世界观（关于笔记本 10）

The Anti-Croce produces a re-elaboration of the concept of the theory of history by criticizing the economistic-deterministic view of historical causality. Gramsci’s retrieval of Croce’s ethical-political history allows doing away with a unilinear representation of the relationship of economy (structure)/politics (superstructure) and substituting it with a reticular conception of the “historical bloc." The theoretical center of Notebook 10 is philosophically constituted by the methodology of causality. Thus the philosophy of praxis transforms the strong reduction done by Croce (who had reduced historical materialism to an empirical canon, stressing the importance of the economic factor) and retranslates the methodology of the ethico-political moment, which Croce himself conceived as an anti-Marxist function, into a theory of history as strong (following the line of “catharsis" and of the “historical bloc" where the instances of praxis are thought according to a network with equal poles). It would be useful to reread part one of Notebook 10 (“Reference points for an essay on B. Croce"), and above all §7, §8, §11 and §12. This is what Gramsci writes in §7:
反克罗齐主义者批判了历史因果关系的经济决定论观点，从而对历史理论的概念进行了重新阐释。葛兰西对克罗齐的伦理政治史的汲取，使得摒弃了经济（结构）/政治（上层建筑）之间单线性的关系表述，代之以“历史块”的网络化概念。第 10 本笔记的理论中心在哲学上由因果论方法构成。因此，实践哲学改变了克罗齐（他将历史唯物主义简化为经验规范，强调经济因素的重要性）所做的强力简化，并将克罗齐自己视为反马克思主义功能的伦理政治时刻的方法论重新翻译成一种强历史观（沿着“净化”和“历史块”的思路，其中实践的实例以具有相等极点的网络方式思考）。重新阅读第 10 本笔记的第一部分（关于对 B.克罗齐的论文的参考点），尤其是第 7、8、11 和 12 节，将会有所裨益。葛兰西在第 7 节写道：

One can say that not only does the philosophy of praxis not exclude ethico-political history, but that, indeed, in its most recent stage of development it consists precisely in asserting the moment of hegemony as essential to its conception of the state and in attaching “full weight” to the cultural factor, to cultural activity, to the necessity for a cultural front alongside the merely economic and merely political ones.30
可以说，实践哲学不仅不排除伦理政治史，而且，在其最新发展阶段，恰恰在于确立霸权的时刻对其国家观念的根本性，并赋予文化因素、文化活动以及文化阵线与单纯的经济和政治阵线并存的必要性以“充分的重量”。

It is, therefore, important to learn Croce’s methodological lesson, but then to develop a theory of the “historical bloc.” This theory is no longer a simple empirical canon of research, but a conquest of concrete-historical reality. The passage mentioned above is completed by a passage in the second part of the same notebook, 10§41: “The concept of the concrete (historical) value of superstructures in the philosophy of praxis needs to be developed further, by juxtaposing it with Sorel’s concept of ‘historical bloc.’”31 Yet perhaps Gramsci had already forced, by means of an unwitting irony, the theme of the empirical canon toward the affirmative sense of a theory of integral history, when in the first part of Notebook 10§12, he specified:
因此，学习克罗齐的方法论教训至关重要，但随后需要发展“历史整体”理论。该理论不再是简单的经验研究规范，而是一种对具体历史现实的征服。上述段落由同一笔记本第二部分的 10§41 段落补充：“在实践哲学中，需要进一步发展关于上层建筑的具体（历史）价值的概念，通过将其与索雷尔的‘历史整体’概念并列。”31 然而，也许葛兰西在笔记本 10§12 的第一部分中，通过一种无意的反讽，已经将经验规范的主题强迫转向了整体历史理论的肯定意义：

For the philosophy of praxis the conception of ethico-political history, in that it is independent of any realist conception, may be adopted as an “empirical canon” of historical research which needs constantly to be borne in mind in examining and understanding historical development, if the aim is that of producing integral history and not partial and extrinsic history (history of economic forces as such, etc.).32
实践哲学中，伦理政治史观，由于其独立于任何现实主义观念，可以被采纳为历史研究的“经验规范”，在考察和理解历史发展时，必须时刻牢记，倘若目标是产生整体的历史而非局部或外在的历史（例如，经济力量史等）。

The answer to the question about a theory nonreductive of historical causality—culminating in a proposal regarding a reticular theory of the historical bloc—imposes, in turn, the retrieval of the problem concerning the link connecting the theoretical and the historical aspect of philosophy by affirming a radical immanence: “The philosophy of praxis certainly derives from the immanentist conception of reality, but only in so far as this latter is stripped of its speculative halo and reduced to pure history or historicity or to pure humanism.”33 Croce must, therefore, be criticized for excessive speculation, that is, for not having understood that the concept of structure indicates:
关于非还原论历史因果关系的理论问题，最终导致了关于历史整体网络理论的提议，反过来，要求重新探讨哲学理论与历史方面之间的联系问题，并肯定一种根本的内在性：“实践哲学当然源于现实的内在论观点，但只有在剥离了其思辨光环，将其还原为纯粹的历史或历史性或纯粹的人文主义的情况下。”33 克罗齐因此必须受到批评，因为他过分地进行思辨，即没有理解结构的概念意味着：

the ensemble of social relations in which real people move and act as an ensemble of objective conditions which can and must be studied with the methods of “philology” and not by means of “speculation." It must be studied as something “certain” that may also be “true,” but it must be studied first of all in its “certainty" in order for it to be studied as “truth.”34
现实人物行动所处的社会关系集合，作为客观条件的集合，必须运用“文献学”方法而非“思辨”方法进行研究。它必须被研究为一种“确定”且可能“真实”的存在，但首先必须在其“确定性”中研究，才能将其作为“真理”来研究。

This reference to Vico shows the anti-mechanistic value of the concept of cause, which includes human activity. Gramsci rectifies the speculative historicism of Croce and his reading of Vico. The reformulation of causality implies the dependency of theory and philosophy on historical reality and social relations. The independence of the philosophy of praxis establishes itself as independent from the concreteness of human practices and shows the place of philosophy as human activity which culminates in a series that includes common sense and various opposing worldviews.
此处的维科提及凸显了“原因”概念的反机械论价值，其中包含人类活动。葛兰西修正了克罗齐对维科的思辨历史主义及其解读。因果关系的重构意味着理论和哲学依赖于历史现实和社会关系。实践哲学的独立性确立自身独立于人类实践的具体性，并展现了哲学作为人类活动的定位，其最终体现在一个包含常识和各种对立世界观的序列中。

As has already been noted:
正如已经指出的：

The philosophy of praxis is bound up not only with immanentism but also with the subjective conception of reality in so far as it turns this latter upside down, explaining it as a historical fact, as the “historical subjectivity of a social group,” as a real fact which presents itself as a phenomenon of philosophical “speculation” while it is simply a practical act, the form assumed by a concrete social content and the way that the whole of society is led to fashion a moral unity for itself.35
实践哲学不仅与内在论相关，还在于它颠覆了现实的主观概念，将其解释为历史事实，即“社会群体的历史主体性”，作为一种呈现为哲学“思辨”现象的现实事实，而它仅仅是实践行为，是具体社会内容所呈现的形式，以及整个社会如何引导自身形成道德统一的方式。

The rediscovery by the philosophy of praxis of the ethico-political moment implies the historicization of the philosophy of praxis itself and the development of the subjective conception of the reality of a new historical group still entangled in a Ptolemaic and roughly objectivist common sense. Philosophy amends—does not negate—common sense, because it is not a pure and a priori theoretical activity, which is closed in itself and in its autonomized categories. If “catharsis,” as a shift from the economic-corporative to the ethico-political moment, coincides with “the superior elaboration of the structure into superstructure in humans consciousness,” if “the fixation of the ‘cathartic’ moment becomes, in this way, the starting point for the entire philosophy of praxis,”36 then philosophy must assign itself its historical-political place and mirror the continuity that connects it to common sense and determines it as religion—as Croce would say.
实践哲学对伦理政治时刻的重新发现，意味着实践哲学本身的历史化，以及对一个仍纠缠于托勒密式和粗略客观主义的常识的新历史群体的现实的主观理解的发展。哲学修正——而非否定——常识，因为它并非一种纯然先验的、自我封闭且在其自主化范畴中运作的理论活动。如果“净化”作为从经济—企业时刻到伦理—政治时刻的转变，与“人类意识中结构向上层建筑的更高层次的阐释”相符，如果“净化时刻的固定化，以这种方式成为整个实践哲学的出发点”，那么哲学就必须赋予自身的历史—政治地位，并反映其与常识的连续性，并将其确定为宗教——正如克罗齐所说。

Thus, philosophy is not something that is very difficult and specialized: certainly it determines new theoretical truths and above all popularizes those already discovered. Philosophy intervenes by leading masses of human beings to think in agreement, producing a new conformism, which is superior to the extent that it is tied to fundamental activities of the masses of workers. The philosophy of praxis presumes that acting and thinking can not, and must not, be separated. One can now understand the extraordinary thesis of Notebook 10, which synthesizes the logical-historical shift: politics-culture-philosophy: “Reduction of all speculative philosophies to ‘politics,’ to a moment of historico-political life; the philosophy of praxis conceives the reality of human relationships of knowledge as an element of political ‘hegemony.’”37 Croce knew how to formulate this problem, but could not avoid the impasse of liberal culture that crystallized the separation between intellectuals and masses. The philosophy of praxis is tied to daily productive activity and does not have the task of forming intellectuals who are isolated and who act “efficaciously” according to a preestablished theory. Rather, it holds the possibility of organic intellectuals emerging from the masses of workers who are capable of confronting the economic, political and cultural exigencies of the historical situation—that is, of conceiving the problem posited by the possible constitution of a new historical bloc and of searching for the “proper” ways of practical transformation. Knowing how to think concretely about situations is an essential element of the unity of praxis. Theory cannot be anything other than the development of the questions posited by praxis. The philosophy of praxis only has the possibility of continuing—criticizing it because of its narrowness—the work begun by the Renaissance, the Reformation, the Enlightenment and the French Revolution. This work consisted and consists of producing an intellectual and moral reformation of the masses that unifies the theory of historical process conceived as a formation of historic blocs and the common sense, which has become—since it has been amended and historicized—good sense, that is, a critical and effective worldview. The philosophy of praxis transforms the “religion of freedom” by Croce into “heresy” that tends to educate one with the other: namely, high theory and popular “religion.”38
因此，哲学并非极其困难且专业的学科：它当然会确定新的理论真理，并且尤其会推广那些已经发现的真理。哲学通过引导大众达成一致的思考，产生一种新的从众心理，这种从众心理之所以优越，在于它与工人群众的基本活动息息相关。实践哲学假定行动和思考不能也不应该分离。现在可以理解第 10 本笔记中非凡的论题，它综合了逻辑-历史的转变：政治-文化-哲学：“将所有思辨哲学‘还原’为‘政治’，还原为历史政治生活的时刻；实践哲学将人类知识关系的现实视为政治‘领导权’的因素。”37 克罗齐知道如何提出这个问题，但他无法避免自由主义文化的困境，这种困境使知识分子和大众之间产生了隔阂。实践哲学与日常的生产活动息息相关，它并非为了培养孤立的、根据预先确定的理论“有效”行动的知识分子。 与其说，它蕴含着从工人大众中涌现出有机知识分子的可能性，这些人能够应对历史局势的经济、政治和文化需求——也就是说，能够构思新历史集团可能形成所提出的问题，并寻找实践变革的“正确”途径。具体地思考情境的能力是实践统一性的一个基本要素。理论只能是实践提出的问题的展开。具有批判性，因为其狭隘性——实践哲学只有继续文艺复兴、宗教改革、启蒙运动和法国大革命所开创的先河的可能性。这项工作在于并在于，生产一种知识和道德的民众改造，将历史过程的理论，即作为历史集团形成的历史过程的理论，与已经经过修正和历史化的——变成了常识——即批判性和有效的世界观，统一起来。 实践哲学将克罗齐的“自由宗教”转化为一种“异端”，它倾向于以彼此教育：即高深的理论和大众的“宗教”。38

“The nature of the philosophy of praxis is in particular that of being a mass conception, a mass culture, that of a mass which operates in a unitary fashion, i.e., one that has norms of conduct that are not only universal in idea but ‘generalised5 in social reality.”39 Modern liberal culture is losing contact with the “simple people” because of how it produces and performs politics and how it is disassimilating the subaltern. The philosophy of praxis faces the following challenge: it must weave the threads of its engagement with scientific problems, above all those regarding political science, with the masses. Thus, weaving the connection with the masses becomes, for the philosophy of praxis, an eternally open problem because, to the extent that it is historical knowledge, it has the task of conceiving historical relationships, their transformations, and their hegemonic possibilities. It has to constitute itself as an organic worldview which is assimilated and criticized through the experience of the masses, since the educator must be educated by being in permanent contact with those being educated. The intellectual and moral reformation determines itself as an endless reformation of common sense (as a critique of economistic, mechanistic and vulgar materialistic elements through the phase in which the masses become a state). Philosophy conceived as knowledge is not separated from common sense conceived as pure illusion and prejudice, but rather penetrates the heart of common sense itself in order to give shape to the historical epoch to which it must ask the questions concerning its “proper” daily identity. The elaboration of the philosophy of praxis is established, therefore, as a simultaneous process of transformation of common sense and of itself conceived as a theory of history and political science. The (philological) interpretation and transformation of it as common sense and as technical philosophy go together. Citing a quite long text will make explicit the trajectory of Notebook 10 through politics-culture-philosophy-common sense-politics:
实践哲学的本质，特别是作为大众观念、大众文化，以统一方式运作的大众，即拥有不仅在理念上普世，还在社会现实中“普遍化”的行为规范。39 现代自由文化由于其政治生产和表演方式以及对弱势群体的同化方式，正在失去与“平民”的联系。实践哲学面临的挑战在于：它必须将自身与科学问题的联系，特别是政治科学问题，与大众联系起来。因此，对于实践哲学而言，与大众的联系成为一个永恒的开放性问题，因为作为历史知识，它有责任理解历史关系、其转变以及其霸权可能性。它必须构成一种有机的世界观，通过大众的经验来同化和批判，因为教育者必须通过与受教育者保持持续的接触来接受教育。 知识和道德的革新，自身决定为常识的无尽革新（通过群众成为国家的阶段，批判经济主义、机械论和庸俗唯物主义的因素）。哲学被理解为知识，并非与常识（被视为纯粹的幻觉和偏见）相分离，而是深入常识的核心，以塑造其必须追问自身“恰当”日常身份的历史时代。因此，实践哲学的阐述，确立为常识的同步转化过程，以及自身作为历史和政治科学理论的理解。作为常识和技术哲学的（语义学）诠释和转化，两者同时进行。引用一篇相当长的文本，将明确地展现笔记本 10 的政治-文化-哲学-常识-政治轨迹

for the philosophy of praxis the superstructures are an objective and operative reality. . . . It explicitly affirms that human beings become conscious of their social position and therefore of their tasks on the terrain of ideologies . . . the philosophy of praxis is itself a superstructure, the terrain on which specific social groups become conscious of their own social being, their own strength, their own tasks, their own becoming.
对于实践哲学而言，上层建筑是客观且有效的现实……它明确地肯定，人类意识到自身社会地位，进而意识到自身任务，都在意识形态领域……实践哲学本身就是上层建筑，是特定社会群体意识到自身社会存在、自身力量、自身任务、自身发展轨迹的领域。

But there is more, only the philosophy of praxis
但还有更多，只有实践的哲学

does not aim at the peaceful resolution of existing contradictions in history and society but is rather the very theory of these contradictions ... [i]t is the expression of the subaltern classes who want to educate themselves in the art of government and who have an interest in knowing all truths, even the unpleasant ones, and in avoiding the (impossible) deceptions of the upper class and——even more——their own.40
并非旨在和平解决历史和社会中已存在的矛盾，而是这些矛盾本身的理论……[它]是那些希望学习统治艺术、并有兴趣了解所有真相，包括不愉快的真相，以及避免上层阶级（甚至更甚者，自身）的（不可能的）欺骗的次等阶层的一种表达。40

The Philosophy of Praxis Conceived as Translatability of Scientific Languages and as Reformation of Common Sense (Concerning Notebook 11)
实践哲学，理解为科学语言的可翻译性及常识的革新（关于笔记本 11）

We know that Notebook 11 primarily criticizes Bukharin’s Popular Manual, taken as a symptom of the aporias of the superior Marxism of the Third International and as an expression of the Soviet state’s lack of hegemony. Yet, besides the critical part, this notebook contains a real constructive element that Leonardo Paggi has rightly called the general theory of the philosophy of praxis. However, this general theory is not limited to a reformation of the position of historical causality alone, nor does it consist only of the capability of elaborating a “political science.” The notebook has a higher ambition, even though it does not present a restoration of a “system,” but prefers the form of a work in progress. Thus, in speaking of the philosophy of praxis, Gramsci defines it as a “theory of the contradictions existing in history and society.” Notebook 11 specifies and generalizes Gramsci’s programmatic affirmation. Section 26 reads as follows:
我们知道，笔记 11 主要批判了布哈林的《大众指南》，将其视为第三国际高级马克思主义的困境以及苏联国家缺乏霸权的症状。然而，除了批判部分，该笔记还包含一个真正的建设性因素，莱昂纳多·帕吉恰如其分地称之为实践哲学的总理论。然而，这一总理论不仅限于对历史因果关系的重新阐释，也不仅仅在于构建“政治学”的能力。该笔记怀有更高的抱负，尽管它并未呈现出“体系”的重建，而是更倾向于一项正在进行的工作的形式。因此，在谈论实践哲学时，葛兰西将其定义为“对历史和社会中矛盾的理论”。笔记 11 具体化和概括了葛兰西的纲领性论断。第 26 节内容如下：

“Theory of the philosophy of praxis” ought to mean a logical and coherent systematic treatment of the philosophical concepts generically known under the title of the philosophy of praxis (many of which are spurious and come from other sources and as such require to be criticised and eliminated). The first chapters should treat the following questions: What is philosophy? In what sense can a conception of the world be called a philosophy? How has philosophy been conceived hitherto? Does the philosophy of praxis renew this conception? What is meant by a “speculative” philosophy? Would the philosophy of praxis ever be able to have a speculative form? What are the relationships between ideologies, conceptions of the world and philosophies? What is or should be the relationship between theory and practice? How do traditional philosophies conceive of this relationship? etc. The answer to these and other questions constitutes the “theory” of the philosophy of praxis.41
实践哲学理论应指对广义实践哲学（其中许多概念虚假，源于其他来源，因此需要批判和剔除）的哲学概念进行逻辑连贯的系统阐述。第一章应探讨以下问题：什么是哲学？何种意义上世界观可以称作哲学？以往哲学是如何被理解的？实践哲学是否革新了这种理解？“思辨”哲学指的是什么？实践哲学是否可能具有思辨形式？意识形态、世界观和哲学之间是什么关系？理论与实践之间应是什么关系？传统哲学如何理解这种关系？等等。对这些及其他问题的回答构成了实践哲学的“理论”。

The thematization of the cultural pole requires raising the problem of the theory of philosophy conceived as linguistic reality—that is, as specific theoretical language [linguaggio] tied, on the one hand, to the linguistic dimension of science in general and of particular sciences, and, on the other hand, simultaneously joined with the reality of the language [linguaggio] of common sense. Thus, the question of the theory of philosophy is the question of a theory of science and of language.
文化极点的主题化，需要提出将哲学理论视为语言现实的问题——即作为一种与一般科学及特定科学的语言维度，一方面相联系，另一方面又同时与常识语言的现实相结合的特定理论语言。因此，哲学理论的问题，是科学理论和语言理论的问题。

Notebook 11§33 illuminates the side of this question that concerns science and defines the philosophy of praxis as the “science of dialectics or the theory of knowledge, within the general concepts of history, politics and economics are interwoven in an organic unity.”42 This “systematic treatment of the philosophy of praxis” implies a relationship between the general (“to develop all the general concepts of a methodology of history and politics, and in addition, of art, economics, and ethics” and “to find a place within the overall construction for a theory of the natural sciences”) and the particular that would not be a relationship of metaphysical subsumption but, rather, a circular relationship like that of a web. Dialectics is not the science of sciences but, rather, a function of critical connectivity that is internal to the various kinds and levels of knowledge. Dialectics assumes the task of translating scientific languages [linguaggi] as “expressions of different stages of civilization, in so far as each of these stages is a moment of the development of another, each thus reciprocally integrating the other." In Notebook 11§47 this frames the question of sciences in linguistic terms as the “translatability of scientific and philosophical languages," one can again find: translatability is “a ‘critical5 element that belongs (in an organic way) just to the philosophy of praxis, being appropriable only in part by other philosophies."43 Marx’s explicit translation of the political economy of Ricardo is not the constitution of a meta-language [metalingua] but a critical operation that provides the critique of political economy itself an addition of life, enabling it to understand the dynamism and the repressed and hidden possibilities of the structure. It should be possible to say the same with respect to the translation of French politics (Jacobinism) and to German classical philosophy, but Marx didn’t accomplish the translation of these languages [linguaggi]. And perhaps it is the philosophy of praxis that realizes this act producing in the same historical moment the science of politics and the general theory of philosophy of praxis itself.44 The philosophy of praxis is not an absolute language [linguaggio], the language of languages; it remains only a language that is more capable of thinking the historical situation, of identifying new social agents and of adding potentials to the practices of economy and politics. The constitution of a new space of intertranslatability coincides with the constitution of a new social space (the historical bloc). The translating language remains language the same as the other ones and must deal with the challenges of the conjuncture, solving the open problem of new translations, showing in this way its capacity of assimilation and universalization一that is, its availability for the production of a superior culture, which should be richer and able to assimilate the human kind.
笔记本 11§33 阐明了与科学相关的这个问题的一方面，并将实践哲学定义为“辩证法科学或认识论，其中历史、政治和经济的一般概念有机统一”。42 这种“实践哲学的系统论述”暗示了一种普遍与特殊之间的关系，这种关系并非形而上学的归纳，而更像一张网的循环关系。辩证法不是科学之科学，而是一种内部存在于各种知识类型和层次之间的批判性联系功能。辩证法承担着翻译科学语言[linguaggi]的任务，正如“不同文明阶段的表达”，因为每一个阶段都是另一个发展阶段的时刻，因此相互融合。在笔记本 11§47 中，作者将科学问题用语言学术语表述为“科学和哲学语言的翻译性”，其中再次提到：翻译性是“一个‘关键性’要素，它（以有机的方式）只属于实践哲学，只能被其他哲学部分地吸收。”43 马克思对李嘉图政治经济学的明确翻译，并非构建一种元语言，而是一种批判性操作，它为政治经济学批判本身注入了活力，使其能够理解结构的活力以及被压抑和隐藏的可能性。同样的说法也适用于对法国政治（雅各宾派）和德国古典哲学的翻译，但马克思并未完成这些语言的翻译。或许正是实践哲学实现了这一行为，在同一历史时刻产生政治科学和实践哲学的总体理论。实践哲学并非绝对的语言，并非语言之语言；它仅仅是一种更能思考历史境况、识别新的社会主体并赋能经济和政治实践的语言。新的互译空间的构成，与新的社会空间（历史块）的构成相一致。这种翻译语言与其他语言一样，必须应对当前情境中的挑战，解决新的翻译难题，从而展现其同化的能力和普遍化能力——也就是说，它可用于生产一种更高级的文化，这种文化应更加丰富，能够包容全人类。

Turning to common sense, it is necessary to posit the problem of language in its breadth. Born from the need to communicate, which structures all the moments (the economic and the ethico-political), language is the framework, that is, the concrete medium, in which human historicity manifests itself as the activity of the production of the human world. Language, in particular, is always charged with passions, hopes, prejudices and judgments. We can quote a decisive passage from Notebook 10 part II, §44, that shows the importance of the ensemble “language, speech, and common sense” to the general theory of the philosophy of praxis:
转向常识，有必要从广义上探讨语言问题。语言源于交流的需求，它构筑了所有时刻（经济的和伦理政治的），是人类历史性以生产人类世界活动的形式表现出来的框架，即具体的媒介。特别是，语言总是充满激情、希望、偏见和判断。我们可以引用笔记本 10 第二部分，§44 的一段关键文字，它展现了“语言、言语和常识”整体对于实践哲学一般理论的重要性。

We have established that philosophy is a conception of the world and that philosophical activity ...above all as a cultural battle to transform the popular “mentality” and to diffuse the philosophical innovations which will demonstrate themselves to be “historically true” to the extent that they become concretely—i.e. historically and socially—universal. Given all this, the question of language in general and of languages in the technical sense must be put in the forefront of our enquiry.45
我们已经确定哲学是对世界的理解，以及哲学活动……首先是作为一种文化斗争，以转变大众的“思维方式”并传播那些最终在实践中——即在历史上和社会上——成为普遍真理的哲学创新。鉴于此，一般意义上的语言以及技术意义上的语言问题，必须成为我们研究的首要课题。

The philosophy of praxis cannot be an intellectual and moral reformation of the common sense of the masses if it does not acknowledge the plural reality of the linguistic strata of common sense and the unifying potentials of each linguistic stratum. The desired reformation is itself based on an approach of translating the strata of common sense into good sense, although without negating the ontological irreducibility of common sense. Translation is the life itself of language and of thought, because it makes new fields of human activity visible and appropriable and allows the creation of a supplement of (even common) sense, of experience, and of history. The function of the philosophy of praxis as ideology is not that of eliminating common sense, but that of transforming or amending it. The task of the philosophy of praxis is to help communication recover from illnesses—caused by the heterogeneity of the more or less retrograde linguistic strata and from socially determined distortions. This forms the language capable of unifying the “collective human” translating into good sense her fundamental experiences. Once again, translation produces a supplement of meaning, of subjectivity and of creativity—that is, a “plus” based on the critique of the disparate languages of common sense.
实践哲学若不承认大众常识语言层面的多元现实及其各自的统一潜力，就不能成为对大众常识的知识和道德改良。所期望的改良本身基于将常识层翻译为良识的方法，尽管不否定常识的本体论不可还原性。翻译是语言和思想的生命本身，因为它使新的领域的人类活动可见和可获得，并允许创造一种补充的（甚至普通的）意义、经验和历史。实践哲学作为意识形态的功能并非消除常识，而是改造或修正它。实践哲学的任务是帮助沟通摆脱疾病——由或多或少倒退的语言层面的异质性和社会决定的扭曲造成。这形成了能够将“集体人类”翻译成良识的语言，从而将她的基本经验统一起来。 翻译再次产生意义、主观性和创造力的补充——即，基于对常识不同语言的批判而产生的“加值”。

From this one can deduce the importance of the “cultural aspect,” even in practical (collective) activity. An historical act can only be performed by “collective man,” and this presupposes the attainment of a “cultural-social” unity through which a multiplicity of dispersed wills, with heterogeneous aims, are welded together with a single aim, on the basis of an equal and common conception of the world, both general and particular, operating in transitory bursts (in emotional ways) or permanently (where the intellectual base is so well rooted, assimilated and experienced that it becomes passion). Since this is the way things happen, great importance is assumed by the general question of language, that is, the question of collectivity attaining a single cultural “climate.”46
由此可以推导出“文化方面”即使在实践（集体）活动中也具有重要性。历史行动只能由“集体的人”来完成，这预设了通过“文化-社会”统一，将多种分散的、目标异质的意志，在对世界共同的、普遍和特殊的观念基础上，通过短暂的爆发（情绪化方式）或永久性（当知识基础扎根、同化和体验到成为激情时）融合到单一目标。既然事情是这样的，语言的一般问题，即集体达到单一文化“气候”的问题，就显得非常重要。

Since that is the way this happens, it appears that the importance of the general linguistic question is the collective reaching of the same “cultural climate.” If this text belongs to Notebook 10II§44, Gramsci develops its topic in Notebook 11, above all in §12, “Notes for an introduction and a commencement to the study of philosophy. 1. Some preliminary points of reference.”47 Gramsci deals here explicitly with the formation of a unified and critical worldview, linking it to the translatability of languages. A great culture implies both the capability of its national language to translate other languages and cultures and the formation of a collective will linguistically unified, capable of “speaking” the economic-corporative condition of the new producers and the possibilities of ethico-political catharsis.
既然事情是这样发生的，那么一般语言学问题的意义似乎在于集体达到相同的“文化氛围”。如果该文本属于笔记本 10II§44，那么葛兰西在笔记本 11 中，尤其是在§12，“研究哲学的导论和开端的一些初步参考点”中，发展了该主题。47 葛兰西在此明确地探讨了形成统一和批判的世界观，并将其与语言的可翻译性联系起来。伟大的文化既意味着其民族语言能够翻译其他语言和文化，也意味着形成一个在语言上统一的集体意志，能够“表达”新生产者经济-公司状况以及伦理-政治净化可能性的。

If it is true that every language contains elements of a conception of the world and of a culture, it could also be true that from anyone’s language one can assess the greater or lesser complexity of her conception of the world. Someone who only speaks dialect, or understands the standard language incompletely, necessarily has an intuition of the world which is more or less limited and provincial, which is fossilised and anachronistic in relation to the major currents of thought which dominate world history. . . . A great culture can be translated into the language of another great culture, that is to say a great national language with historic richness and complexity, and it can translate any other great culture and can be a world-wide means of expression. But a dialect cannot do this.48
如果每个语言都包含世界观和文化元素，那么从任何人的语言中，也可以评估其世界观的复杂程度。只说方言或对标准语言理解不充分的人，其世界观必然较为局限和地方化，相对于主导世界历史的主要思想潮流而言，是僵化和过时的。……伟大的文化可以被翻译成另一种伟大的文化的语言，也就是说，一种具有历史丰富性和复杂性的伟大民族语言，并且可以翻译任何其他伟大的文化，并成为全球表达手段。但方言却做不到这一点。

The philosophy of praxis implies, therefore, the shift from the cultural pole to the pole of [national] language [lingua] and language [linguaggio], which is connected to the thematic of the historical bloc—that is, to the economy and to politics. The philosophy of praxis does not substitute the knowledge of each of these four poles [the cultural, linguistic, economic and political] and does not confuse itself with the critique of political economy, with political science, with grammar and linguistic sciences or with the disciplines that deal with culture and hegemonic apparatuses, but intervenes between the various kinds and levels of knowledge in order to formulate theoretical problems at the level of the categories and in order to determine their place and practical orientation. The same goes for the category of historical causality of determinism or of collective will-subjectivity or for the concepts of historical bloc, common sense and worldview, linguistic-cultural conformism and translatability. This effort of critical-systematic conceptual elaboration facilitates the right formulation of the problems and the locating of new theoretical tools. The philosophy of praxis contributes to weaving the threads between the four poles—economics-politics-culture-language—and to specify the network and the diagonals of the so-constituted quadrangle. The philosophy of praxis is not autonomous from this work of permanent mediation, but must explicitly formulate the problem of its originality and its systematic elaboration that concretizes itself along a twofold line: (a) the categorical effort of being specific with concepts necessary for the analysis of the diverse moments of praxis (the poles of economics, politics, of culture and of language [linguaggio]); (b) the effort of determining philosophy considered with respect to its entire range of specialized theory, of technical language, of mass worldview, of common sense, and of an ensemble of different languages, which are different from one another. These two efforts are immanent within each other because they are immanent to praxis itself: they are the condition of each other and are immersed in the same historicity. Translation is the common means, and the practical form of this constitutive operation of translation is the transition—the infinite two-way transition from being passive to being active, from labor to politics, from politics to culture and from culture to communication. This is a transition that for the modern subaltern masses represents the shift from feeling to understanding. For the democratic state and its intellectuals this represents the shift from understanding to feeling. The philosophy of praxis always poses the same the question:
实践哲学因此意味着从文化极向[国家]语言[lingua]和语言[linguaggio]极的转变，这与历史块的概念相关——即与经济和政治相关。实践哲学并不取代对这四个极[文化、语言、经济和政治]的各自理解，也不将自身混淆于政治经济学批判、政治学、语法和语言学，或研究文化和霸权装置的学科，而是介入各种知识类型和层次之间，以便在范畴层面提出理论问题，并确定其位置和实践方向。同样的，对于历史决定论的因果关系范畴、集体意志-主体性范畴，或历史块、常识和世界观、语言文化顺应性和可翻译性等概念，亦是如此。这种批判性系统性概念构建的努力有助于正确地提出问题，并找到新的理论工具。 实践哲学有助于编织经济-政治-文化-语言四个极点之间的联系，并明确由此构成的四边形的网络和对角线。实践哲学并非独立于这种持续的调解工作，而必须明确地提出其独特性及其系统阐述的问题，该阐述沿着双重线路具体化：（a）在对实践不同阶段（经济、政治、文化和语言）的分析中，使用必要的概念进行范畴努力，使其具体化；（b）努力确定哲学与其整个专业理论、技术语言、大众世界观、常识以及彼此不同的各种语言之间的关系。这两个努力是内在相关的，因为它们内在于实践本身：它们是彼此的条件，并沉浸在相同的历史性中。 翻译是普遍手段，这种构成性翻译操作的实践形式是转换——从被动到主动、从劳动到政治、从政治到文化、再从文化到沟通的无限双向转换。对于现代次等大众而言，这是一个从感受转向理解的转变。对于民主国家及其知识分子而言，这代表着从理解转向感受的转变。实践哲学始终提出同样的问题：

Is it better to “think,” without having a critical awareness, in a disjointed and episodic way? In other words, is it better to take part in a conception of the world mechanically imposed by the external environment, i.e. by one of the many social groups in which everyone is automatically involved from the moment of her entry into the conscious world. . . ? Or, on the other hand, is it better to work out consciously and critically one’s own conception of the world and thus, in connection with the labours of one’s own brain, choose one’s sphere of activity, take an active part in the creation of the history of the world, be one’s own guide, refusing to accept passively and supinely from outside the moulding of one’s personality?49
以一种支离破碎、片段化的方式“思考”，却缺乏批判性意识，是否更好？换句话说，是否更好接受外部环境，即每个人从进入意识世界的那一刻起便自动参与其中的诸多社会群体之一，强加的机械世界观？或者，另一方面，是否更好有意识地、批判性地构建自己对世界的理解，从而与自身大脑的劳动相结合，选择自己的活动领域，积极参与世界历史的创造，成为自己的人生引路人，拒绝被动地、顺从地接受外部塑造自身性格的影响？

One can, therefore, talk about an internal troublesome problem of the Prison Notebooks directed toward a system of the philosophy of praxis for which Notebooks 10 and 11 are decisive. They draw the quadrangle where the reticular dialectic among the poles of practice is constituted and where the diagonals of the elaboration of categories are formed, categorization always being immanent to the question of the practices, including the theoretical practices, of the specialized philosophy for which Gramsci proposes the consecrated name of dialectics. One understands why Gramsci talks about a circle: not because he wants to repropose Hegel’s speculation, but to stress the nature of the philosophy of praxis as circulation that translates and that is productive of ideas and perspectives within the problems imposed by history under the irreducible viewpoint that consists of the subaltern masses’ hegemonic possibility. What is at stake here is in reality a new idea of theorizing itself and, even more, a new practice of such a theory. This is what the project of a philosophy of praxis demands.50
因此，可以谈论《狱中札记》内部一个与“实践哲学”体系相关的棘手问题，其中札记 10 和 11 具有决定性意义。它们勾勒出实践诸极之间网络辩证法的四边形，以及范畴构建的斜线，范畴化始终内在于实践问题之中，包括专门的、格拉姆斯基所赋予“辩证法”之名的理论实践。人们理解为什么格拉姆斯基谈论一个循环：并非因为他想重提黑格尔的思辨，而是为了强调实践哲学作为一种循环的性质，这种循环翻译并产生思想和视角，这些思想和视角存在于历史强加的问题之中，并以被压迫群众的潜在霸权地位为不可规避的观点。这里所涉及的实际上是一种新的理论化观念，甚至更甚，一种新的理论实践。这正是实践哲学的项目所要求的。

Notes 笔记

1. Gianni Francioni, L'Officia Gramsciana: Ipotesi sulla struttura dei “Quaderni del carcere” (Naples: Bibliopolis, 1984).
1. 吉安尼·弗朗西奥尼，《葛兰西官方文集：关于《狱中札记》结构的假设》（那不勒斯：比布利波利斯出版社，1984）。

2. [See the introduction for an explanation of the A-texts (original versions), B-texts (only versions) and C-texts (rewritten sections), page 5.]
2. [请参阅第 5 页的引言，了解 A 文本（原始版本）、B 文本（仅有版本）和 C 文本（重写部分）的说明。]

3. Antonio Gramsci, Quaderni del Carcere, ed. V. Gerratana (Einaudi: Turin, 1974), 1407, hereafter cited as QC. [A list of abbreviations is on pages ix-x. To facilitate locating these passages in various translations and anthologies, we will give the notebook (Quaderno) number—in this case 11一followed by the section number, §, here 16. For further discussion, see introduction, page 12. We will indicate the English translation, where used. In this case, Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Quintin Hoare and Geoffrey Nowell Smith (New York: International Publishers, 1971), 453, hereafter SPN. Here we altered the location of the quotation marks to be consistent with Gramsci’s text.]
3. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》，V. 格拉塔纳编 (埃纳迪出版社：都灵，1974)，1407 页，以下简称 QC。[缩写列表见第 ix-x 页。为方便在各种译本和文集中找到这些段落，我们将给出笔记本（Quaderno）编号——在本例中为 11 一，以及节号，§，此处为 16。 更多讨论，请见导言，第 12 页。我们将标注使用的英文译文。在本例中，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记选编》，昆廷·霍尔和杰弗里·诺韦尔·史密斯译 (纽约：国际出版公司，1971)，453 页，以下简称 SPN。此处我们修改了引号的位置，以与葛兰西的原文保持一致。]

4. Q11§16, SPN, 455. 4. Q11§16，SPN，455。

5. Q11§28, SPN, 450. 5. Q11§28，SPN，450。

6. Q3§31, Antonio Gramsci, Prison Notebooks, vol. 2, ed. and trans. Joseph Buttigieg (New York: Columbia University Press, 1996), 30-31, hereafter cited as PN2.
6. Q3§31，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》第二卷，乔瑟夫·巴蒂吉耶主编、翻译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，1996），30-31 页，以下简称 PN2。

7. Q11§70, SPN, 388. 7. Q11§70，SPN，388。

8. Q11§70, SPN, 387. 8. Q11§70，SPN，387。

9. Q4§3, PN2, 141. 9. Q4§3，PN2，141。

10. Q4§3, 424; PN2, 142.
Q4§3，424；PN2，142。

11. Q16§9, SPN, 390. 11. Q16§9，SPN，390。

12. Q16§9, SPN, 391. 12. Q16§9，SPN，391。

13. Q16§9, SPN, 395. 13. Q16§9，SPN，395。

14. Q16§9, SPN, 399. 14. Q16§9，SPN，399。

15. Q16§9, SPN, 398. 15. Q16§9，SPN，398。

16. Q4§37, 455; PN2, 177.
16. Q4§37，455；PN2，177。

17. Q4§39, 465; PN2, 188.
17. Q4§39、465；PN2，188。

18. Q4§17, PN2, 159; see also the considerations on the metaphorical nature of language.
18. Q4§17，PN2，159；另见关于语言隐喻性质的考虑。

19. Q4§34, 452-53; PN2, 174.
19. Q4§34，452-53；PN2，174。

20. [Gramsci actually stated that “Machiavelli wrote books of ‘immediate political action’； he did not write a utopia”一thus Tosel is presumably highlighting the implication of Gramsci placing the phrase in quotation marks.]
20. [葛兰西实际上指出：“马基雅维利写的是‘直接的政治行动’的著作；他并没有写乌托邦”——因此，托塞尔大概是在强调葛兰西将该短语用引号引起来所暗示的含义。]

21. Q5§127, PN2, 378. 21. Q5§127，PN2，378。

22. Q5§127, PN2, 382. This is a B-text—that is, Gramsci never rewrote it.
22. Q5§127，PN2，382。这是一篇 B 文本——也就是说，葛兰西从未修改过它。

23. Q7§18, Antonio Gramsci, Prison Notebooks, vol. 3, ed. and trans. Joseph Buttigieg (New York: Columbia University Press, 2007), 170, hereafter cited as PN3.
23. Q7§18，安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》卷 3，约瑟夫·巴蒂吉耶著译（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，2007），170 页，以下简称 PN3。

24. Q7§35, PN3, 186-87. 24. Q7§35，PN3，186-87。

25. Q8§182, PN3, 340. 25. Q8§182，PN3，340。

26. Q8§198, PN3, 348. 26. Q8§198，PN3，348。

27. Q8§220, PN3, 369. 27. Q8§220，PN3，369。

28. [Like Marx’s Anti-Duhring.]
28. [如同马克思的《反杜林论》]

29. Q8§235, 378. N.B. I had finished my analysis before seeing the fine work of Maria Rosaria Romagnuolo presented at the conference in Pavia. My reading is validated by Romagnuolo’s exhausting and very precise reconstruction; see Maria Rosaria Romagnuolo, “Quistioni di nomenclature: Materialismo storico e Filosofia della prassi nei Quaderni gramscini,” Studi filosofici 10-11 (1987-1988): 123-66.
29. Q8§235，378. 注：我在帕维亚会议上看到玛丽亚·罗萨里亚·罗马格努洛（Maria Rosaria Romagnuolo）的精彩工作之前，就已经完成了我的分析。我的研究结果得到了罗马格努洛详尽而精确的重建的验证；参见玛丽亚·罗萨里亚·罗马格努洛，“命名法问题：葛兰西文集中的历史唯物主义和实践哲学”，《哲学研究》10-11 期（1987-1988）：123-166。

30. Q10I§7; Antonio Gramsci, Further Selections from the Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Derek Boothman (Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1995), 345, hereafter cited as FSPN.
30. Q10I§7；安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》节选，德雷克·布斯曼编著、翻译（明尼苏达大学出版社，1995），第 345 页，以下简称《狱记》。

31. Q10II§41xii, FSPN, 396-97.
31. Q10II§41xii，FSPN，396-97。

32. Q10I§12, FSPN, 357-58.
32. Q10I§12，FSPN，357-58。

33. Q10I§8, FSPN, 347. 33. Q10I§8，FSPN，347。

34. Q10I§8, FSPN, 347. 34. Q10I§8, FSPN，347。

35. Q10I§8, FSPN, 347-48.
35. Q10I§8，FSPN，347-48。

36. Q10II§6, SPN, 366-67. Translation altered; see QC, 1244.
36. Q10II§6，SPN，366-67。译文已修改；见 QC，1244。

37. Q10II§6, FSPN, 306. 37. Q10II§6，FSPN，306。

38. Q10I§13, FSPN, 361. 38. Q10I§13，FSPN，361。

39. Q10II§31, FSPN, 385. 39. Q10II§31，FSPN，385。

40. Q10II§41, FSPN, 395-96.
40. Q10II§41，FSPN，395-96。

41. Q11§26, SPN, 425. Translation altered so that filosofia della praxis is translated as “philosophy of praxis” rather than “historical materialism”； see QC, 1431.
41. Q11§26，SPN，425。翻译已修改，将“filosofia della praxis”翻译为“实践哲学”，而非“历史唯物主义”；见 QC，1431。

42. Q11§33, SPN, 431. 42. Q11§33，SPN，431。

43. Q11§47, FSPN, 307. [Gramsci’s text has quotations around “critical,” which were left off by Tosel.]
43. Q11§47，FSPN，307。[葛兰西的原文中引号内的“批判的”一词，托塞尔未予保留]

44. See Q11§48, FSPN, 308.
见 Q11§48，FSPN，308 页。

45. Q10II§44, SPN, 348. 45. Q10II§44，SPN，348。

46. Q10II§44, SPN, 349. 46. Q10II§44，SPN，349。

47. Q11§12, SPN, 323-43. 47. Q11§12，SPN，323-43。

48. Q11§12, SPN, 325. Translation altered slightly; see QC, 1377.
48. Q11§12，SPN，325。翻译略有改动；见 QC，1377。

49. Q11§12, SPN, 323-24. Tranlsation altered slightly; see QC, 1375-76.
49. Q11§12，SPN，323-24。翻译略有改动；见 QC，1375-76。

50. The first who understood the systematic structure of Gramsci’s Notebooks is the great linguist Tullio De Mauro. I have simply attempted to augment this incisive point of De Mauro [see chapters 3 and 14, especially pages 259-63].
50. 最先理解葛兰西手稿系统结构的是伟大的语言学家图利奥·德·毛罗。我仅仅试图补充德·毛罗的这一精辟观点[见第 3 章和第 14 章，特别是第 259-263 页]。

* Translated from “Il Lessico ‘Filosofia della Prassi’ di Gramsci,” Marxismo Oggi 1 (1996): 4967. Translated from the Italian by Rocco Lacorte with assistance by Peter Ives.
格拉姆斯基的“实践哲学”词汇表，载《马克思主义今日》第一期（1996）：49-67。由罗科·拉科尔特翻译，彼得·艾夫斯协助。

16
Subalternity and Language: Overcoming the Fragmentation of Common Sense
Marcus E. Green and Peter Ives*
16 次要性与语言：克服常识的碎片化  马库斯·E·格林和彼得·艾夫斯*

Within Gramsci’s legacy, the concept of “subalternity” and his attention to language politics often take secondary and merely supportive roles to the more influential themes such as hegemony, passive revolution, organic intellectuals and war of position. Not only are “subalternity” and “language” cast as second fiddles, especially in the English-language literature, but also many meticulous scholars will note that Gramsci writes specifically about subaltern groups and language quite late in his prison notes. Indeed, when considering the chronological composition of the Prison Notebooks, the two thematically organized “special notebooks” that Gramsci devoted to subaltern groups and language appear toward the end. Notebook 25 ("On the Margins of History. History of Subaltern Groups”) dates to the period of 1934, and Notebook 29 ("Notes for an Introduction to the Study of Grammar”)，which is Gramsci’s last notebook, dates to the period of 1935. However, the themes of subalternity and language appear throughout the Prison Notebooks.1
在葛兰西的遗产中，“被统治阶级”的概念及其对语言政治的关注，往往在诸如霸权、被动革命、有机知识分子和阵地战等更有影响力的主题面前扮演次要和辅助角色。不仅在英语文献中，“被统治阶级”和“语言”被视为配角，而且许多细致的学者会注意到，葛兰西在狱中笔记中相当晚期才具体论述被统治群体和语言。事实上，如果考虑《狱中札记》的时间顺序，葛兰西专门为被统治群体和语言所撰写的两个主题组织的“特别笔记本”出现在末期。笔记本 25（“历史边缘：被统治群体的历史”）成书于 1934 年，笔记本 29（“语法研究导论札记”），即葛兰西的最后一本日记，成书于 1935 年。然而，“被统治阶级”和“语言”的主题贯穿于整个《狱中札记》。

Elsewhere, the individual authors of this chapter have tried to show the profound centrality subalternity and language, separately, to Gramsci’s overall project.2 In different ways, we have argued that the examination of subalternity and language in the Prison Notebooks illuminates Gramsci’s entire social and cultural theory. This chapter brings these two perspectives together and discusses the interrelationships between Gramsci’s lifelong concern with the themes of subalternity (if not the actual term) and language from childhood in Sardinia, through his university studies and preprison political activity to his prison writings.
本章的其他作者分别尝试论证次等地位与语言对葛兰西整体研究的深刻核心性。2 我们以不同的方式论证，对《狱中札记》中次等地位和语言的考察阐明了葛兰西的整个社会和文化理论。本章将这两个视角结合起来，探讨葛兰西毕生关注的次等地位主题（即使并非该术语本身）与语言之间的相互关系，从他在撒丁岛的童年，到他的大学学习和狱前政治活动，再到他的狱中著作。

Focusing on the relationships between Gramsci’s analysis of subalternity and his discussion of language reveals a central dynamic in his approach to politics, what might be called the differentia specifica of his Marxism, or at least one of the major themes within it. Where various strains of Marxism have seen it as an analytic or “scientific discovery” that needs to brought from the outside (whether by Marxist experts or party leaders) to enlighten the exploited, Gramsci emphasized the need of intellectual activity to be immersed in the lives and experiences of the masses. Much of Gramsci’s critiques of both positivism and idealism rest on the very general position that they both separate the lived experiences of capitalism from the analysis and understanding of it purported to be necessary to overcome it. Gramsci raises this point in his critique of Benedetto Croce’s liberal idealism, as well as that of Nikolai Bukharin’s positivistic Marxist materialism.3 Of course, Gramsci’s well-known and influential detailed analyses of the role of intellectuals not solely within socialism but also in maintaining bourgeois hegemony leads him to the focus on the role of “organic intellectuals” who do not bring political consciousness and organization from “without” but work through the experiences, worldviews, fragmented common sense, folklore and languages of subaltern social groups.
关注葛兰西对“次等阶层”的分析与其对语言的讨论之间的关系，揭示了他政治方法中的核心动力，这可以称之为他的马克思主义的特性，或者至少是其中一个主要主题。许多马克思主义流派将其视为一种需要从外部（无论是马克思主义专家还是党派领导人）引入，以启迪被剥削者的分析或“科学发现”。葛兰西则强调知识活动必须融入群众的生活和经验。葛兰西对实证主义和唯心主义的批判很大程度上基于这样一个普遍立场：两者都将资本主义的现实经验与被认为是克服资本主义所必需的分析和理解割裂开来。葛兰西在他的对贝内德托·克罗齐的自由主义唯心主义以及尼古拉·布哈林的实证主义马克思主义唯物主义的批判中都提出了这一点。当然，葛兰西关于知识分子作用的著名且有影响力的详细分析，不仅涵盖了社会主义内部，也包括了维护资产阶级霸权的作用，这引导他关注“有机知识分子”的角色。他们并非从“外部”带来政治意识和组织，而是通过被统治阶层社会群体的经验、世界观、支离破碎的常识、民间传说和语言来开展工作。

As Kate Crehan has explored, while Gramsci had respect for “peasant culture” and “subaltern common sense,” as she puts it, “he was never sentimental about it, seeing it both as narrow and parochial, and needing to be transcended.”4 Crehan elaborates that it is “the inability of subaltern people to produce coherent accounts of the world they live in that have the potential to challenge existing hegemonic accounts . . . in any effective way.”5 However, she correctly emphasizes that one of Gramsci’s major criticisms of Bukharin was that he did not start from an engagement with the fragmentary nature of subaltern common sense. He was thus unable to grasp what for Gramsci was essential, the distinction between what Crehan calls “explicit” and “implicit conceptions of the world,”6 what Gramsci discussed as the contrast between thought and action, between a conception of the world “borrowed from another group” that is affirmed verbally, and that of action, though it may only manifest itself “occasionally and in flashes” and is perhaps only “embryonic.”7
正如凯特·克雷汉所探讨的那样，虽然葛兰西尊重“农民文化”和“被压迫者的常识”，正如她所说，“他从未对其抱有感伤情绪，他认为它既狭隘又地方化，需要超越”。4 克雷汉进一步阐述，这是“被压迫群体无法产生能够有效挑战现有霸权叙述的、关于他们所处世界连贯的叙述”。5 然而，她正确地强调了葛兰西对布哈林的主要批评之一，即他未能从对被压迫者常识的碎片化性质的关注开始。因此，他无法理解葛兰西认为至关重要的东西，即克雷汉所说的“世界观的显性”和“隐性观念”之间的区别，6 葛兰西将其描述为思想与行动之间的对比，即一种“借用自其他群体”的世界观，在言语上得到肯定，而行动则可能只偶尔、一闪而现地表现出来，或许只是“胚胎状态”。7

Crehan goes a substantial way in showing how the “common sense” of subaltern groups becomes fragmented and incoherent, according to Gramsci, and why this is a political problem and a detriment to political organization and action.8 But she only begins to touch on the notion of how that incoherence and fragmentation can be overcome, that is, what it means to begin from the position of “common sense” and why it is that the process cannot, for Gramsci, be directed from a position outside of common sense or why order and coherence cannot just be imposed through rational analysis.
克雷汉在很大程度上展示了，根据葛兰西的观点，被统治群体“常识”是如何支离破碎且缺乏连贯性的，以及为什么这构成了一个政治问题，并损害了政治组织和行动。8 但是，她仅仅触及了如何克服这种不连贯和碎片化的问题，也就是说，从“常识”出发意味着什么，以及为什么葛兰西认为这个过程不能从常识之外的位置引导，或者为什么秩序和连贯性不能仅仅通过理性分析来强加。

Similarly, as Fabio Frosini has emphasized, Gramsci explicitly distinguished his own notion of “common sense” in relation to his philosophy of praxis from those of both Kant and Croce, both of whom sought an agreement between philosophy and “common sense." Thus, Frosini notes how Gramsci’s discussion of “common sense" is a critical response to the debates between Croce and Giovanni Gentile in the 1920s and 1930s.9 Although Croce maintained that he abandoned “the traditional distinction between plain thinking and philosophical thinking," he claimed that “the distinguishing feature of philosophy is consistency" and that “nonphilosophers are those who are not troubled by inconsistency or incoherence and do not trouble to escape it."10 Thus, for Croce, the distinction between philosophical and nonphilosophical thinking is not “a logical difference in the quality of the thought" but “a purely psychological difference of interest and attitude."11 Frosini makes an incredibly insightful argument about how Gramsci’s development of the concept of “translation" repositions the relationship between “common sense" and philosophy. We take a different, though not contradictory, path of highlighting and describing the process whereby “common sense" and language change are integral to the process of transforming the fragmented conditions of subalternity.12
类似地，正如法比奥·弗罗西尼所强调的那样，葛兰西明确地将自己关于“常识”的概念与其实践哲学区分开来，与康德和克罗齐的观点都不同，后者都寻求哲学与“常识”之间的契合。因此，弗罗西尼指出，葛兰西对“常识”的讨论是对 20 世纪 20 年代和 30 年代克罗齐和乔瓦尼·詹蒂莱之间争论的批判性回应。9 尽管克罗齐声称他放弃了“普通思维与哲学思维之间的传统区别”，但他认为“哲学的特征在于一致性”，并且“非哲学家是不受不一致或不连贯性困扰，也不费心摆脱它的人”。10 因此，对于克罗齐来说，哲学思维与非哲学思维的区别并非“思想质量上的逻辑差异”，而仅仅是“兴趣和态度上的纯粹心理学差异”。11 弗罗西尼对葛兰西如何发展“翻译”的概念，从而重新定位“常识”与哲学之间的关系，作出了极其深刻的论述。 我们采取一种不同的，但并非矛盾的路径，突出和描述“常识”和语言变迁如何融入将被压迫者的碎片化境况转化为整体的过程。12

As André Tosel has argued, for Gramsci, “The philosophy of praxis should thus be developed following two axes: On the one hand, as a reformation of common sense by employing the position that all humans are philosophers; on the other hand, as an exposition"一Tosel quotes Gramsci here一of the “‘problems5 that arose in the course of the history of philosophy, in order to criticize them, demonstrate their real value (if they still have any) or their importance as links in a chain, and define the new problems of the present time."13 Most of the scholarship, including Frosini and Tosel, follows the second of these axes focusing on Gramsci’s engagement with the traditional intellectual activity of various philosophers and philosophical systems. While these axes are obviously closely related and not separable projects precisely because of the complex relation
正如安德烈·托塞尔所论，对于葛兰西而言，“实践哲学应沿着两条轴线发展：一方面，通过承认所有人类都是哲学家这一立场，改造常识；另一方面，阐释”——托塞尔在此引用葛兰西——“哲学史中出现的‘问题’，以便批判它们，展现其现实价值（如果仍有价值）或其作为链条环节的重要性，并界定当代的新问题。”13  大多数研究，包括弗罗西尼和托塞尔，都遵循这两条轴线中的第二条，侧重于葛兰西与各种哲学家和哲学体系的传统知识活动之间的互动。虽然这两条轴线显然密切相关，并且由于复杂的关系而并非相互独立的项目。

between common sense and philosophy, our point here is to focus on the first axis, the reformation of common sense, the difficulties that “everyone” (i.e., those in subaltern social groups) faces in philosophizing and how Gramsci’s writings on language and subalternity together are the best indication of what Gramsci means by this.
在常识和哲学之间，我们在此关注第一条轴线，即常识的改革，“所有人”（即次等社会群体中的成员）在进行哲学思考时面临的困难，以及葛兰西关于语言和次等地位的著作如何共同最好地表明了葛兰西的含义。

Thus, we offer a very different interpretation than that of Andrew Robinson, who emphasizes Gramsci’s notion of transforming common sense, but focusing on Gramsci’s negative assessment of “common sense” as indicating the need to “break” with it and resist the “tendency to pander to existing beliefs.”14 We are proposing a different and more dialectical overcoming of the fragmentation of subaltern “common sense.” As Guido Liguori has shown, for Gramsci, common sense cannot be eliminated but is “what is at stake in the struggle for hegemony.”15 The transformation of the condition of subalternity requires not the elimination of common sense but the critique and transformation of it. Gramsci emphasizes this point in his critique of Bukharin, for Bukharin’s attempt at producing a “popular manual” failed because it did not begin from a critique of common sense, but rather it reinforced elements of common sense uncritically. In the struggle for hegemony, as Gramsci emphasizes, the formation of a homogenous social group must be accompanied by the formation of a systematic philosophy that provides a basis for the criticism of common sense.16 Thus, the critique of common sense functions as an elementary phase in the struggle for hegemony. In Liguori’s words: “Revolutionary theory is born against existing common sense.”17
因此，我们提供了一种与安德鲁·罗宾逊截然不同的解读，他强调葛兰西的改造常识概念，但重点在于葛兰西对“常识”的负面评价，即需要“打破”它并抵制“迎合现有信仰的倾向”。14 我们提出了一种不同且更辩证的克服被压迫者“常识”的碎片化方法。正如盖多·利古里所展示的那样，对于葛兰西而言，常识并非可以消除，而是“争取领导权的斗争中所涉及的焦点”。15  改造被压迫者的境况并非要消除常识，而是要批判和改造它。葛兰西在他的对布哈林的批判中强调了这一点，因为布哈林试图创作一本“通俗手册”的尝试失败了，因为它没有从批判常识开始，反而不加批判地强化了常识的某些要素。在争取领导权的斗争中，正如葛兰西强调的那样，必须形成一个同质化的社会群体，同时形成一套系统的哲学，为批判常识提供基础。16 因此，对常识的批判构成了争取霸权的初步阶段。用利古里的话来说：“革命理论产生于与既有常识的对抗。”17

Our point is not to reduce Gramsci’s political analysis to questions of unification or differing conceptions of the world, but to show how they are intimately tied to questions of political organization and struggle. As Tullio De Mauro has argued, “for Gramsci, the economic-productive element is interwoven with the element of invention and cultural elaboration, and both cannot subsist without being woven into the capability of linguistic elaboration and communication and with the construction of life in common in both the ethnic and national dimensions of life.”18
我们的重点并非将葛兰西的政治分析简化为统一问题或世界观差异，而是为了展示它们与政治组织和斗争问题是如何紧密联系的。正如图利奥·德·毛罗所论证的那样，“对于葛兰西而言，经济生产要素与发明和文化阐释要素交织在一起，两者都不能存在于脱离语言阐释和沟通能力的编织，以及在民族和国家层面的共同生活构建之中。”18

These questions become all the more important with the advent of debates around postmodernism, ideologies of multiculturalism, the “culture wars,” discussions of “the multitude” a la Hardt and Negri, and the complex of economic, social, political and cultural transformations unsatisfactorily described with the term “globalization.” Our current contexts provide particular resonances for questions of “common sense” and fragmentation. It is within these contexts that Gramsci’s ideas are so critical for us today and which focus our attention on how Gramsci understands the fragmentation of “common sense” as shown in his writings on the subaltern and language.
随着后现代主义、多元文化主义意识形态、“文化战争”、哈特和内格里笔下的“众体”以及“全球化”这一无法令人满意的经济、社会、政治和文化变革总称的出现，这些问题变得更加重要。我们当前的语境为“常识”与碎片化问题提供了特殊的共鸣。正是在这些语境中，葛兰西的思想对我们今天至关重要，并促使我们关注葛兰西在其关于被压迫者和语言的著作中，是如何理解“常识”的碎片化的。

The Subaltern Condition: “Common Sense” and Fragmentation
次等地位： “常识”与碎片化

In the Prison Notebooks, Gramsci develops a critical interpretation of the condition of subaltern groups, in which he surveys the factors that contribute to their subordination, in addition—but not unrelated—to their economic exploitation, such as their modes of thought, worldviews, levels of political organization and culture. In his analysis, Gramsci attempts to identify what prevents subaltern groups from acting as effective political agents and from overcoming their subordination. Subaltern groups in modern Italian history, in his view, are characterized by ineffectual political activity. Although the history of their spontaneous political activity, such as peasant revolts and insurgencies, illustrates their discontent and their will to generate political change, the political activity of subaltern groups rarely goes beyond certain limits, and the groups appear to be incapable of achieving permanent victory or maintaining a level of political power. In this sense, Gramsci is grappling with what Frantz Fanon describes as the positive and negative attributes of “spontaneity.”19 One of the major impediments preventing subaltern groups from overcoming their subordination—economic and cultural—is the lack of conscious leadership and organization to provide the groups with coherence and direction. Gramsci attributes this lack of coherence and direction to the composition of subaltern groups’ culture and consciousness. In Gramsci’s view, the common sense and worldview of subaltern groups in Italy tended to lack the critical elements required to provide conscious and organized leadership. In Notebook 3§48, Gramsci observes that within spontaneous political movements “there exist a ‘multiplicity5 of elements of ‘conscious leadership,5 but none of them predominates or goes beyond the level of the ‘popular science5一the ‘common sense,’ that is, the [traditional] conception of the world一of a given social stratum."20 Because of this, Gramsci contends that common sense provides inadequate foundations for establishing an effective political movement capable of producing political change. Thus, in Gramsci’s view, common sense is one of the factors that hinders the ability of subaltern groups to assert political autonomy and to overcome their subordination. However, his conclusion is not that “common sense” needs to be or can be rejected in its entirety or that there exists some “philosophy” outside of “common sense” by which “common sense” can be judged and corrected. Rather, Gramsci suggests common sense needs to become critical. As Liguori points out, common sense is constituted by a “Janus-faced” contra-position of fragmentary elements on the one hand and the potential to become critical on the other.21 We want to go further along the direction indicated by Liguori, Frosini and Crehan’s recognition of the nuances of Gramsci’s positive and negative assessments of “common sense” by showing how he relates it to the fragmented conditions of subalternity and subaltern languages and how he sees the movement from there to nonfragmented consciousness and truly popular common language.
在《狱中札记》中，葛兰西发展了对被压迫群体的批判性解读，他考察了导致其受压迫的因素，除经济剥削外，还包括其思维方式、世界观、政治组织水平和文化等——尽管这些因素并非与经济剥削毫无关联。在分析中，葛兰西试图找出阻碍被压迫群体有效地行动起来、克服其受压迫地位的原因。在他看来，现代意大利历史中的被压迫群体具有政治行动无效的特点。尽管其自发政治活动的历史，例如农民起义和反抗，体现了他们的不满和争取政治变革的意愿，但被压迫群体的政治活动很少超出一定限度，并且这些群体似乎无力取得永久胜利或维持政治权力水平。从这个意义上说，葛兰西正在探讨弗朗茨·法农所描述的“自发性”的积极和消极属性。19 阻碍次等群体克服其经济和文化从属地位的主要障碍之一，是缺乏有意识的领导和组织，以赋予这些群体凝聚力和方向。葛兰西将这种缺乏凝聚力和方向归因于次等群体的文化和意识结构。在他看来，意大利次等群体的常识和世界观往往缺乏提供有意识和组织化领导所需的批判性要素。在《笔记三》§48 中，葛兰西观察到，在自发的政治运动中，“存在着‘意识领导’的多种元素，但没有哪一种占主导地位或超越‘大众科学’的水平——即‘常识’，也就是特定社会阶层对世界的[传统]观念。”20 正因为如此，葛兰西认为，常识为建立能够产生政治变革的有效政治运动提供了不足的基础。因此，在他看来，常识是阻碍次等群体争取政治自主权并克服其从属地位的因素之一。 然而，他的结论并非要完全否定或排斥“常识”，或者存在某种“哲学”可以用来评判和修正“常识”。相反，葛兰西认为常识需要变得批判性。正如利古里所指出的，常识由一组碎片化的元素构成，同时又具有批判性的潜力，呈现出“双面神”的特征。21 我们希望沿着利古里、弗罗西尼和克里汉对葛兰西对“常识”的积极和消极评价的细微之处所指出的方向进一步探究，展示葛兰西如何将常识与被压迫者的碎片化境况和被压迫者语言联系起来，以及他如何看待从这种境况向非碎片化意识和真正大众共通语言的转变。

In other words, the Gramscian notion of “common sense” can be understood as popular social thought or as the common beliefs and opinions held by ordinary people. In some ways, common sense can be understood as the mentality or psychology of the masses.22 Gramsci uses language to develop his notion of “common sense” both metaphorically and literally. Gramsci also sees languages as an important element of “common sense.” At times he goes as far as stating that “language also means culture and philosophy (if only at the level of common sense).”23
换言之，葛兰西的“常识”概念可以理解为大众的社会思想，或者普通民众所持的共同信念和观点。在某些方面，常识可以理解为大众的心态或心理。22 葛兰西使用语言来发展他的“常识”概念，既有比喻意义，也有字面意义。葛兰西还认为语言是“常识”的重要组成部分。有时他甚至认为“语言也意味着文化和哲学（即使只是在常识的层面）”。23

In his attack on elitist notions of “philosophy,” he argues that it is “essential to destroy the widespread prejudice that philosophy is a strange and difficult thing just because it is the specific intellectual activity of a particular category of specialists or of professional and systematic philosophers.”24 He then defines “spontaneous philosophy”(i.e., the intellectual activity of “everybody”)as such:
他批判了“哲学”的精英主义观点，认为“必须摧毁普遍存在的偏见，即哲学之所以奇怪且困难，仅仅因为它是由特定类别专家或职业哲学家进行的特定知识活动。”24  随后，他将“自发哲学”（即“每个人”的知识活动）定义为：

This philosophy is contained in: 1. language itself, which is a totality of determined notions and concepts and not just words grammatically devoid of content; 2. “common sense” and “good sense”； 3. popular religion and therefore, also in the entire systems of beliefs, superstitions, opinions, ways of seeing things and of acting, which are collectively bundled together under the name “folklore.”25
这种哲学包含于：1. 语言本身，它是一个由确定概念和观念组成的整体，而不仅仅是语法上空洞的词语；2. “常识”和“良知”；3. 流行宗教，因此，也包含在所有信仰体系、迷信、观点、看待事物和行动的方式中，这些统称为“民间传说”。

He continues by referring to “language” again as an indication of intellectual activity, even if unconscious, in which “there is contained a specific conception of the world,” and then poses the question whether it is “better to take part in a conception of the world mechanically imposed by the external environment” or “to work out consciously and critically one’s own conception of the world and thus, in connection with the labours of one’s own brain, choose one’s sphere of activity, take an active part in the creation of the history of the world.”26 Thus, Gramsci’s analysis of the fragmentary nature of subaltern common sense is intimately tied to his notions of language and its role in conceiving the world. As Frosini argues, “Language [linguaggio] is not an instrument that can serve us arbitrarily, but it is a concrete real form that thought assumes; indeed, it is the specific historical structure of thought.”27
他继续提到“语言”作为一种智力活动的迹象，即使是无意识的，其中“包含着一种特定的世界观”，然后提出了这样一个问题：是“被动地接受外部环境强加的世界观”好，还是“有意识地、批判性地构建自己对世界的理解，从而与自身大脑的劳动相联系，选择自己的活动领域，积极参与世界历史的创造”好？26 因此，葛兰西对被压迫者共同意识的零散性质的分析，与他对语言及其在构建世界观中的作用的理解紧密相连。正如弗罗西尼所论证的那样，“语言[linguaggio]并非一种可以任意使用的工具，而是一种思想所采取的具体现实形式；事实上，它就是思想的特定历史结构。”27

In using language and linguistics in political and cultural analysis of subaltern common sense, Gramsci is drawing on his studies in linguistics at the University of Turin with Matteo Bartoli. Bartoli was engaged in debates with the neo-grammarian school from which Ferdinand de Saussure emerged and “structuralist” linguistics was created.28 In addition to, but not disconnected from, his more technical training in linguistics, the context of language politics in Italian society is very important. As a Sardinian born in 1891, Gramsci grew up in the midst of the Italian government’s attempt to “standardize” Italian—that is, create a national Italian language used by its citizens.
在使用语言学和语言研究进行对被压迫民众常识的政治和文化分析时，葛兰西借鉴了他于都灵大学与马特奥·巴尔托利进行的语言学研究。巴尔托利参与了与新语法学派（Ferdinand de Saussure 由此而生，并由此产生了“结构主义”语言学）的争论。28 除了，但并非与之脱节，他的语言学专业训练，意大利社会中的语言政治背景非常重要。作为 1891 年出生的撒丁岛人，葛兰西成长于意大利政府试图“标准化”意大利语——即创造由其公民使用的国家意大利语——的时代。

Language was a central feature in the process described by Massimo d’Azeglio’s famous proclamation shortly after the Risorgimento: “Italy is a fact, now we need to make Italians." Italian historical linguists estimate that at the time, somewhere between 2.5 and 12 percent of the population spoke anything that could be considered “standard” Italian.29 The many dialects were not mutually understandable from north to south. While literary Italian had existed for centuries as a written language, a truly common, national language for most Italians did not exist. Moreover, about 75 percent of Italians were illiterate, with regions like Sardinia having illiteracy rates as high as 90 percent.30
语言是马西莫·达泽利奥（Massimo d’Azeglio）在意大利统一之后发表著名宣言的核心内容：“意大利是一个事实，现在我们需要造就意大利人。”意大利历史语言学家估计，当时能使用可被视为“标准”意大利语的人口比例介于 2.5%至 12%之间。29 意大利北部和南部的众多方言之间无法相互理解。虽然书面意大利语作为一种书面语言存在了几个世纪，但对于大多数意大利人来说，一种真正的共同的民族语言并不存在。此外，大约 75%的意大利人文盲，撒丁岛等地区的文盲率甚至高达 90%。30

This lack of a “standard” language especially in comparison to the powerful nation-states of France and England, if not Germany, was of major political concern for the new nation. In 1868, one of Italy’s most renowned authors, Alessandro Manzoni, was appointed to head a government commission on linguistic unification. Having rewritten his classic novel, I promessi sposi (The Betrothed), in an Italian closely modelled on spoken, bourgeois Florentine “Italian,” Manzoni’s solution was to take Florentine as the “standard” Italian, fund dictionaries and grammar books based on Florentine, and recruit school teachers for all of Italy from the Tuscan region. Gramsci was very critical of Manzoni’s "solution” well before he was imprisoned. In 1918 in the pages Il Grido del Popolo he launched an attack on it, comparing it to Esperanto.31
缺乏统一的“标准”语言，尤其与强大的民族国家法国、英国，甚至德国相比，严重困扰着新兴的意大利。1868 年，意大利最著名的作家之一亚历山德罗·曼佐尼被任命为政府语言统一委员会主席。他曾将自己的经典小说《基督山恩仇记》（I promessi sposi）改写成以佛罗伦萨市井阶层口语为基础的意大利语，曼佐尼的解决方法是将佛罗伦萨语定为“标准”意大利语，并资助以佛罗伦萨语为基础的词典和语法书，以及从托斯卡纳地区招募全国教师。葛兰西在入狱前就强烈批评曼佐尼的“解决方法”。1918 年，他在《人民呼声报》上对其进行了抨击，将其与世界语相提并论。

With these linguistic realities and debates consistently in mind, in his prison writings, Gramsci considered common sense among Italian subaltern groups to be uncritical, unreflective, unsystematic, and operating with an incoherent conception of life and the world. In his view, these characteristics contributed to the subordination of subaltern groups and inhibited them from developing long-term political strategies. The point of his analysis is to understand the ways in which the masses think, conceive the world and perceive their activity, in order to ascertain what elements prevent them from effectively organizing and acting. Ultimately, Gramsci is interested in transforming common sense and developing a “new common sense” and by extension a truly transformed language founded upon a critical awareness that will provide the masses with a foundation to transform their conditions. Gramsci suggests that critical awareness develops through a process of critical self-reflection, in which one understands one’s history, position and activity in relation to dominant and prevailing structures of power. But this critical construction cannot take place without engaging with current “common sense” and its various and contradictory elements. Gramsci stresses that it is necessary for subaltern groups to understand the historical and political origins of their conditions, instead of assuming their circumstances are the result of some sort of natural or spiritual determination or inferiority, which the Catholic Church’s worldview tended to reinforce.
考虑到这些语言现实和争论，在狱中著作中，葛兰西认为意大利被统治阶层中的常识是不批判的、不反思的、无系统的，并持有对生活和世界混乱的概念。他认为，这些特征导致了被统治阶层的从属地位，并阻碍了他们制定长期政治策略。他的分析重点在于理解大众的思维方式、世界观以及他们对自身活动的感知，以便确定哪些因素阻碍了他们有效地组织和行动。最终，葛兰西致力于改造常识，并发展一种“新的常识”，进而发展一种建立在批判性意识基础上的真正转型了的语言，为大众提供变革自身境况的基础。葛兰西认为，批判性意识的发展，源于批判性的自我反思过程，即理解个人在与占主导地位和盛行的权力结构相关联的历史、地位和活动。 但这种关键的建构，如果没有与当前的“常识”及其各种矛盾的要素发生互动，就无法实现。葛兰西强调，被统治群体有必要理解自身境况的历史和政治起源，而不是将自身处境归因于某种自然或精神的决定论或劣等性，而天主教世界观往往会强化这种观点。

Gramsci describes common sense as a “fragmentary collection of ideas and opinions” drawn from differing philosophies, ideologies, religion, folklore, experience, superstition and from “scientific notions and philosophical opinions which have entered into common usage.”32 Common sense is composed of a variety of perspectives that often contain elements of truth but also tend to be disjointed, incoherent and contradictory. In the words of Marcia Landy, common sense assumes “pastiche-like qualities”;33 it contains “fragmentary ideas, a collage of opinions and beliefs, giving the illusion of a coherent world view and of acting which is not at all coherent and certainly not critical.”34 Gramsci’s discussions of common sense often appear alongside his discussions of folklore, and although the two categories often appear synonymous, folklore represents only one of the elements that comprise common sense. To understand common sense, in Gramsci’s view, it is also necessary to understand folklore and its influence in the composition of the masses’ worldview. Although both common sense and folklore contain heterogeneous and contradictory elements, Gramsci contends that they should be studied as one would study a coherent philosophical worldview, since they inform the worldview of the masses. "Folklore,” he writes, “must not be considered an eccentricity, an oddity or a picturesque element, but as something which is very serious and is to be taken seriously.”35 As Crehan emphasizes, for Gramsci folklore is not primordial or premodern, but is always in flux, always being modernized and is tied in some ways to the dominant classes, but “the instability of folklore and its readiness to absorb elements from the dominant culture are important in that they give folklore a potentially progressive quality.”36 In this sense, Gramsci analyzes common sense and its composition of multifarious elements as a sociohistorical phenomenon, as if common sense were a coherent ideology or philosophy, and he attempts to identify and isolate the elements of common sense in relation to their historical and cultural context. His purpose is to ascertain the content and meaning of common sense, to understand how the masses conceive life, the world and politics, with the point of radicalizing common sense and providing subaltern groups with the intellectual tools necessary to confront dominant hegemony, philosophy and power.
葛兰西将常识描述为一种“零散的思想和观点集合”，源于不同的哲学、意识形态、宗教、民间传说、经验、迷信，以及“已进入大众使用的科学概念和哲学观点”。32 常识由各种观点构成，这些观点通常包含真理的成分，但也往往支离破碎、前后矛盾。用玛西娅·兰迪的话来说，常识具有“拼贴般的特性”；33 它包含“零散的思想、观点和信仰的拼贴”，给人一种连贯的世界观和行动的错觉，而实际上并非如此，也肯定不是批判性的。34 葛兰西对常识的讨论经常与他对民间传说的讨论相伴，尽管这两个类别经常被视为同义词，但民间传说只是构成常识的元素之一。葛兰西认为，要理解常识，还需要理解民间传说及其对大众世界观的影响。 虽然常识和民间传说都包含异质且矛盾的元素，但葛兰西认为，由于它们塑造了大众的世界观，因此应该像研究一个连贯的哲学世界观那样来研究它们。“民间传说，”他写道，“不应被视为怪癖、奇异或风景元素，而应被视为严肃且值得认真对待的事物。”35 克莱汉强调，对于葛兰西而言，民间传说并非原始或前现代的，而总是处于变动之中，总是被现代化，并且在某些方面与统治阶级联系在一起，但“民间传说的不稳定性和其吸收统治文化元素的意愿，正因如此赋予了民间传说潜在的进步品质。”36 从这个意义上讲，葛兰西分析了常识及其由多种元素组成的构成，将其视为一个社会历史现象，如同常识是一个连贯的意识形态或哲学一样，他试图识别并分离常识的元素，并将其与历史和文化背景联系起来。 他的目的是确定常识的内容和意义，理解大众如何理解生活、世界和政治，并以此激进化常识，为弱势群体提供必要的知识工具以对抗统治的霸权、哲学和权力。

Gramsci often refers to common sense as the philosophy of the people, in that it represents the “philosophy of non-philosophers,”37 “the philosophy of the man in the street''38 or “spontaneous philosophy,”39 which implies that common sense represents the conceptions of the world and modes of thought practiced by nonprofessional philosophers, namely the masses. Gramsci defines “philosophy' as a coherent worldview, whereas “common sense' refers to the popular ways of thinking and speaking among the people.40 Gramsci compares common sense to philosophy, because common sense operates similarly to a coherent worldview in that it provides a point of reference for thought and action, even though it is incoherent.
葛兰西经常将常识称为人民的哲学，因为它代表着“非哲学家的哲学”37、“街头的哲学”38 或“自发的哲学”39，这意味着常识代表着非专业哲学家，即大众，对世界的观念和思维方式。葛兰西将“哲学”定义为一个连贯的世界观，而“常识”则指人民群众流行的思维和表达方式。40 葛兰西将常识与哲学进行比较，是因为尽管常识本身是不连贯的，但它却如同一个连贯的世界观一样，为思想和行动提供参照点。

However, Gramsci is not taking coherency of a philosophy or worldview as the gold standard or even the sole element of the analytic distinction between “common sense' and philosophy. Along with his critique of elitist notions of philosophy as a specialized and difficult activity, he argues: “Philosophy in general does not in fact exist. Various philosophies or conceptions of the world exist, and one always makes a choice between them. How is this choice made? . . . [I]s it not frequently the case that there is a contradiction between one’s intellectual choice and one’s mode of conduct?'41 This leads Gramsci to contrast “thought' and “action' as displaying “two conceptions of the world, one affirmed in words and the other displayed in effective action,' which is why “philosophy cannot be divorced from politics.'
然而，葛兰西并非将哲学或世界观的连贯性作为判断“常识”与哲学之间分析区别的黄金标准，甚至不是唯一要素。除了批判精英主义的哲学观，即将其视为一种专业且困难的活动外，他还论述道：“一般意义上的哲学实际上并不存在。各种哲学或世界观确实存在，人们总是需要在其中做出选择。如何做出这种选择？……难道思想选择与行为方式之间经常存在矛盾吗？”41  由此，葛兰西将“思想”与“行动”对立起来，认为它们体现着“两种世界观，一种以言语肯定，另一种以实际行动展现”，这就是为什么“哲学不能与政治脱离开来”的原因。

Whereas philosophy constitutes a coherent conception of the world and mode of thought, common sense actually represents “a chaotic aggregate of disparate conceptions, and one can find there anything that one likes.'42 Unlike philosophy, common sense does not follow a uniform conception of life and the world, and it does not exist in a homogenous form. 43 In Gramsci’s words: “Common sense is not a single unique conception, identical in time and space. It is the 'folklore' of philosophy, and, like folklore, it takes countless different forms. Its most fundamental characteristic is that it is a conception which, even in the brain of one individual, is fragmentary, incoherent and inconsequential, in conformity with the social and cultural position of those masses whose philosophy it is.'44
哲学构成对世界和思维方式的连贯理解，而常识实际上代表着“一团杂乱的、彼此分离的概念集合，其中可以找到任何想要的东西”。42 与哲学不同，常识并不遵循统一的生命观和世界观，也不以同质的形式存在。43 用葛兰西的话说：“常识并非单一、在时间和空间上相同的概念。它是哲学的‘民间传说’，并且，如同民间传说一样，它呈现出无数不同的形式。其最根本的特点在于，即使在一个人的大脑中，它也是零散的、不连贯的、无关紧要的，这符合那些拥有这种哲学的大众的社会和文化地位。”44

One might assume that Gramsci is accepting a general presumption of rationalism and the Enlightenment in favoring coherence and consistency in any worldview or philosophy, whether spontaneous or more systematic. Thus, fragmentation, incoherency and a sort of eclectic amassing of various ideas, values, morals and understandings of the world are problematic and unfavorable in and of themselves.45 But on closer examination, one of Gramsci’s most useful contributions to questions of ideology critique is precisely the notion of why and how such fragmentation is problematic. He does not merely assume that fragmentary common sense is detrimental and coherency and consistency are preferable. Rather, he tries to show how “common sense” and folklore together with incommunicable dialects are practical impediments to effective political organization, political action and the transformation of society. This is perhaps one place where Gramsci still has much to contribute to debates concerning postmodernism and multiculturalism. The key is to understand how, for Gramsci, fragmentation and incoherency should be addressed. This point is evident in Gramsci’s critique of Esperanto and Alessandro Manzoni’s strategy for creating a “standard” Italian language. It provides one example of how, for Gramsci, achieving a systematic and coherent language, or worldview, can be even more detrimental than holding a fragmented worldview.
人们可能会假设，葛兰西在青睐任何世界观或哲学（无论是自发的还是更系统的）的连贯性和一致性时，接受了理性主义和启蒙运动的普遍前提。因此，碎片化、不连贯性和各种想法、价值观、道德观以及世界观的某种折衷堆积本身就存在问题，并是不利的。45 但是，经过更仔细的考察，葛兰西对意识形态批判问题的最有用贡献之一，恰恰在于他对这种碎片化为何以及如何存在问题这一概念的阐释。他并非仅仅假设零碎的常识是有害的，而连贯性和一致性是可取的。相反，他试图展示“常识”以及与之相关的民间传说和难以沟通的方言，是如何构成有效政治组织、政治行动和社会变革的实际障碍。这或许是葛兰西对后现代主义和多元文化主义相关辩论仍有很大贡献的地方。关键在于理解葛兰西是如何看待并应对碎片化和不连贯性的。 这一点体现在葛兰西对世界语的批判以及亚历山德罗·曼宗尼创造“标准”意大利语的策略中。它提供了一个例子，说明对于葛兰西而言，构建一种系统且连贯的语言或世界观，甚至可能比持有支离破碎的世界观更具破坏性。

Esperantism and Manzoni— Imposing Language and Culture from Above
世界语与曼佐尼——自上而下的语言文化强加

As we have been describing, one of the crucial questions that runs through much of Gramsci’s wide-ranging prison research project is how to transform this fragmentary “common sense” that is debilitating for subaltern social groups. One of Gramsci’s major contributions that has made him so influential across a range of academic disciplines and diverse political struggles is his insistence that transforming “common sense” cannot take the form of the imposition of a superior worldview or understanding of the world originating outside of the previously accepted “common sense." Such responses characterize many so-called progressive attempts, Marxism and non-Marxism alike, to create a more just world by coming up with the “correct position” or a blueprint that oppressed people should follow. Such approaches exacerbate one of the key elements of the conditions of subalternity—the dissonance between the imposed worldview and the conditions and understandings of those who are supposed to accept it. This reinforces passivity and does not create critical engagement or, as Gramsci quotes Socrates, knowledge of oneself, but takes the meaning of this process for political organization and collective struggle far beyond anything implied in any of Plato’s dialogues.46
正如我们所述，贯穿葛兰西广泛的狱中研究项目的一个关键问题是如何改变对被压迫社会群体有害的这种零散的“常识”。葛兰西的一个主要贡献，使其在各个学术领域和不同的政治斗争中都如此具有影响力，在于他坚持认为，改变“常识”不能采取强加一种源于先前被接受的“常识”之外的更高层次的世界观或世界观的形式。许多所谓的进步尝试，无论马克思主义还是非马克思主义，都试图通过提出“正确立场”或被压迫者应该遵循的蓝图来创造一个更公正的世界，其回应方式正是如此。这种做法加剧了被压迫状态的关键因素之一——即强加的世界观与那些被期望接受它的人的境况和理解之间的不和谐。 这强化了被动性，并不会产生批判性参与或，正如葛兰西引述苏格拉底所说，自我认知，但却将这一过程在政治组织和集体斗争中的意义远远超越了柏拉图任何对话中所暗示的任何内容。46

But Gramsci is no anarchist and has little faith in the effectiveness of purely spontaneous uprisings specifically because the fragmentary and inadequate understanding made possible by subaltern “common sense.” He agrees to some degree with Lenin, that the mere conditions of capitalism do not automatically lead to political consciousness capable of effective and organized resistance. Given, as we have seen, that Gramsci connects “common sense” to language, it is possible to see him addressing this question of the fragmentation of subaltern common sense in his analysis of the so-called standardization of the Italian language.
但是葛兰西并非无政府主义者，他对纯粹的自发起义的有效性深表怀疑，正是因为被边缘化群体“常识”所限定的理解是零碎且不足的。他某种程度上同意列宁的观点，即资本主义的条件本身并不会自动导致能够有效组织抵抗的政治意识。鉴于我们已经看到，葛兰西将“常识”与语言联系起来，我们或许可以从他分析所谓的意大利语标准化中，来理解他对边缘化群体常识碎片化的论述。

Just as Gramsci argued that there is a choice, a political choice, to be made among different philosophies or ways of seeing the world (or the elements that make them up), so, too, he argued that the establishment of a “written normative grammar” connected to a common language is a “political act,” “an act of national-cultural politics." In this context, his argument about language, dialects and the question of a “standardized” national Italian language parallels his analysis of the effects of fragmentation of “common sense.” In the last notebook that he started in prison, Notebook 29, Gramsci writes:
正如葛兰西认为，在不同的哲学或世界观（或构成它们的要素）之间存在着选择，一种政治选择一样，他也认为建立与共同语言相关的“书面规范语法”是一个“政治行为”，是“一项民族文化政治行为”。 在这种语境下，他对语言、方言以及“标准化”的民族意大利语问题的论述，与他对“常识”碎片化影响的分析相平行。 在他狱中开始的最后一本笔记——笔记 29 中，葛兰西写道：

it is rational to collaborate practically and willingly to welcome everything that may serve to create a common national language, the non-existence of which creates friction particularly in the popular masses among whom local particularisms and phenomena of a narrow and provincial mentality are more tenacious than is believed.47
理性地说，为了迎接可能有助于创造共同民族语言的一切，主动并积极地进行实践合作是合理的，因为共同民族语言的缺失，尤其是在民众中，会造成摩擦，而地方特色和狭隘的省份心态现象在那里的顽固性，远超人们的想象。

On one hand, this statement in favor of a national Italian language might not seem surprising and could tend to reinforce the view that Gramsci posed a harsh critique of the “backwards” and particularistic parochial worlds of “common sense,” folklore and dialect—and that he simplistically wanted to replace them with a coherent Marxist worldview. On the other hand, this passage contains some enigmas that are productive in illuminating his more nuanced position that emphasizes the need to work through “common sense” and warns of the pitfalls of any imposition of a external worldview however coherent and logical. This passage implies that a common national Italian language, in 1935, does not exist and must be created. It seems anachronistic. This description of the nonexistence of an Italian common national language is perhaps accurate for 1861 as described above. But by 1931, the overall level of illiteracy in Italy had fallen to 21.6 percent and in the “south” was about 38.8 percent, with these gains from the previous levels of 75 percent and 90 percent, respectively, being made in some language that could be called a “standard” Italian.48 If we are to take Gramsci literally, then, this declaration of the “nonexistence” of a “common national language” must mean that he does not consider this “Italian” to be a truly “common national popular language." To explain what he must mean, we can look to his pre-prison writings mentioned above.
一方面，支持意大利民族语言的声明可能并不令人惊讶，并且可能会强化人们的观点，即葛兰西对“落后”的、地方性的“常识”、民间传说和方言世界进行了严厉批判，并且简单地想要用一个连贯的马克思主义世界观取而代之。另一方面，这段话包含一些谜团，这些谜团有助于阐明他更细致的立场，该立场强调需要通过“常识”来工作，并告诫人们不要对任何外来世界观（无论多么连贯和合乎逻辑）进行强加。这段话暗示，1935 年，一个共同的意大利民族语言并不存在，必须创造出来。这似乎是违反时代逻辑的。如上所述，这种关于意大利共同民族语言不存在的描述，或许对于 1861 年来说是准确的。但是到 1931 年，意大利的整体文盲率已降至 21.6%，而在“南部”约为 38.8%，这些从之前的 75%和 90%分别提升的成果，是在某种可以称之为“标准”意大利语的语言中取得的。如果我们严格按照葛兰西的表述，那么，“不存在共同的民族语言”的声明就意味着他并不认为这种“意大利语”是真正的“共同的民族大众语言”。为了解释他的意思，我们可以参考他上述的狱前著作。

In 1918, Gramsci published an article in II Grido del Popolo, “A Single Language and Esperanto," in which he criticizes the proposal that the Italian Socialist Party adopt Esperanto.49 In mounting his argument he equates the notion of adopting an artificial language with that of Manzoni in “standardizing” Italian. Manzoni would likely have been appalled by the comparison.50 Gramsci’s response to Manzoni was that
1918 年，葛兰西在《人民呼声报》上发表文章“一种语言与世界语”，批评意大利社会主义党采用世界语的提议。49 他将采用人工语言的观点与曼佐尼“标准化”意大利语的观点相提并论。曼佐尼很可能会对这种类比感到震惊。50 葛兰西对曼佐尼的回应是

not even a national language can be created artificially, by order of the state; that the Italian language was being formed by itself and would be formed only in so far as the shared life of the nation gave rise to numerous and stable contact between the various parts of the nation; that the spread of a particular language is due to the productive activity of the writings, trade and commerce of the people who speak that language. . . . If a single language [i.e., Manzoni’s “standard Italian" based on the dialect of Florence], one that is also spoken in an given region and has a living source to which it can refer, cannot be imposed on the limited field of the nation, how then could an international language [Esperanto] take root when it is completely artificial and mechanical, completely ahistorical, not fed by great writers, lacking expressive richness which comes from the variety of dialects, from the variety of forms assumed in different times?51
即使是民族语言，也不能以国家命令人为地创造；意大利语的形成是自发的，它只会在民族共同生活促使全国各地产生众多稳定联系的情况下形成；特定语言的传播源于使用该语言的人民的写作、贸易和商业活动……如果一种单一语言（即曼佐尼基于佛罗伦萨方言的“标准意大利语”），它在特定区域被使用，并拥有可供参考的活生生来源，都无法强加于一个有限的民族范围，那么一种完全人工、机械、完全非历史的国际语言（世界语）又如何能够扎根？它缺乏伟大作家的滋养，也缺乏源于方言多样性和不同时期各种形式的多样性所带来的表达丰富性。

At first blush, it seems that in 1918 Gramsci was against the formation of a “common national language,” or certainly any active strategy to create one. Whereas by 1935, so it seems, he welcomed it and argued, as quoted above, “it is rational to collaborate practically and willingly to welcome everything that may serve to create a common national language." However, this would be to miss the point of both arguments, which go to the heart of the issues of fragmentation of common sense under the conditions of subalternity.
乍一看，似乎 1918 年的葛兰西反对形成“共同的民族语言”，或者至少任何积极创造它的策略。然而，到 1935 年，似乎他欢迎它，并如上引述的那样论证：“在实践中自愿合作，欢迎一切可能有助于创造共同民族语言的事情是理性的。”然而，这将忽略这两个论点的要点，它们触及了在被统治地位条件下共同意识形态碎片化的问题的核心。

On one hand, Gramsci is utilizing the arguments of G. I. Ascoli, a prominent Italian linguist at the end of the nineteenth century and one of the main opponents of Manzoni, who argued that dialects and previous languages of speakers exert “pressure” on new languages being learned and, thus, there’s continual pressure that changes the “standard” language being imposed.52 On the other hand, Gramsci is not just making a technical linguistic point about the degree of success of this strategy. He points out that while, from Manzoni’s position, Florentine is a “living” language enabling its speakers to be creative, expressive and productive, for most of Italy it is more like an “artificial” language imposed from the outside that enables little more than mechanical repetition and acceptance of a foreign conception of the world, and ultimately the subordination to a culture and philosophy that is not understood as belonging to the speaker herself.
一方面，葛兰西借用了 19 世纪末著名意大利语言学家 G. I. 阿斯科利（Manzoni 的主要反对者之一）的论点。阿斯科利认为，方言和说话者的先前语言对正在学习的新语言施加“压力”，从而持续地改变着正在强加的“标准”语言。52 另一方面，葛兰西不仅仅是在技术层面上论述这种策略的成功程度。他指出，虽然从曼佐尼的角度来看，佛罗伦萨语是“活”的语言，使说话者能够创造、表达和生产，但对于意大利大部分地区来说，它更像是一种从外部强加的“人工”语言，只能促使机械的重复和接受一种异于自身世界观的观念，最终导致对一种不属于说话者自身的文化和哲学的服从。

This view is confirmed by what Gramsci wrote to his family members when in prison. On March 26, 1927, Gramsci sent a letter to his sister, Teresina, concerning her son, Franco:
此观点得到葛兰西在狱中给家人信件的证实。1927 年 3 月 26 日，葛兰西给他的妹妹特雷西娜写信，信中提到她儿子弗朗哥。

I hope that you will let [Franco] speak Sardinian and will not make any trouble for him on that score. It was a mistake, in my opinion, not to allow Edmea [Gramsci’s niece] to speak freely in Sardinian as a little girl. It harmed her intellectual development and put her imagination in a straitjacket. . . . I beg you, from my heart, not to make this mistake and to allow your children to absorb all the Sardinian spirit they wish and to develop spontaneously in the natural environment in which they were born.53
我希望你们允许[弗朗哥]说撒丁语，不要为此给他制造任何麻烦。我认为，不让他小的时候自由地说撒丁语，是错误的。这损害了埃德梅亚[葛兰西的侄女]的智力发展，束缚了她的想象力……我衷心请求你们，不要犯同样的错误，让孩子们尽情吸收撒丁岛的精神，并在他们出生的自然环境中自然地发展。

While Gramsci favors children speaking their local languages, he encourages them to learn other languages and is fully aware of the prestige and cultural politics involved in these questions of which languages children learn to speak. In a letter to his son, Giuliano, Gramsci reflects on his own childhood, noting how his classmates had great difficulty with speaking Italian, giving him a position of superiority over them.54 He writes that sometimes better knowledge of Italian makes a student “seem to be more intelligent and quick, whereas sometimes this is not so.”55
虽然葛兰西提倡儿童使用地方语言，但他鼓励他们学习其他语言，并且充分意识到这些儿童学习语言的问题中所涉及的声望和文化政治。在给儿子朱利安诺的信中，葛兰西反思了自己的童年，注意到他的同学在说意大利语方面有很大困难，这让他在他们面前显得优越。54 他写道，有时意大利语说得更好，会让学生“看起来更聪明、更敏捷，但有时并非如此”。55

It is in Notebook 29 that Gramsci begins to develop the clearest set of concepts that help him theorize the political elements of concern about vernacular languages or dialects and their relations to a common language. The central concepts that he employs are “spontaneous” or “immanent grammar” and “normative grammar.” Gramsci uses the phrase “subaltern classes” in a very telling sense when redefining the traditional concept of “normative grammar” as being made up of “reciprocal monitoring, reciprocal teaching and reciprocal ‘censorship5 expressed in such questions as ‘What did you mean to say?,’ ‘What do you mean?,’ ‘Make yourself clearer5 etc." Here Gramsci describes a key element in the condition of “subalternity” rather than a method for trying to overcome the power relations between the elite and the subaltern. He writes parenthetically:
格拉姆斯基在笔记本 29 中开始发展出一套最清晰的概念，帮助他理论化关于地方语言或方言以及它们与共同语言关系的政治因素。他使用的核心概念是“自发的”或“内在的语法”和“规范语法”。格拉姆斯基在重新定义“规范语法”的概念时，以一种非常具有指示性的方式使用了“次等阶级”这个词语，将其描述为由“相互监督、相互教导以及相互‘审查’5（例如‘你想要表达什么？’，‘你是什么意思？’，‘说得更清楚些’5 等）构成”。在这里，格拉姆斯基描述了“次等地位”状况的关键因素，而不是克服精英与次等阶层之间权力关系的方法。他括号中写道：

A peasant who moves to the city ends up conforming to urban speech through the pressure of the city environment. In the country, people try to imitate urban speech; the subaltern classes try to speak like the dominant classes and the intellectuals, etc.56
一个从农村搬到城市的农民，最终在城市环境的压力下，适应了城市口语。在农村，人们试图模仿城市口语；下层阶级试图像统治阶级和知识分子那样说话，等等。56

While only in its provisional and unfinished form, Gramsci is contrasting the “grammatical conformism" of those in a new situation一here the peasant who has moved to the city一with those whose situation has not changed一the peasant who is still in the country一but also tries to imitate the dominant classes and intellectuals under very different circumstances. Where the peasant who has immigrated to the city seems to succeed in “conforming” to the new environment and speakers, the subaltern classes are not said to “conform" but to “try" to conform and “imitate"一such attempts, he implies, are likely not to be successful, or if they are successful at an individual level, it will result in the creation of a “traditional intellectual" cut off from her “organic" roots.
虽然仅处于初步和未完成阶段，但葛兰西正将新境况下（此处指已迁往城市的农民）的“语法顺从”与那些境况未变（仍留在农村的农民）却试图在迥然不同的环境下模仿统治阶级和知识分子的人区分开来。当移民到城市的农民似乎成功地“顺应”了新的环境和说话方式时，被压迫阶级则被描述为“尝试”顺应和“模仿”——他暗示，这种尝试可能不会成功，或者即使在个人层面上成功，也会导致产生脱离其“有机”根基的“传统知识分子”。

While Gramsci is not simply advocating the “spontaneous" or “immanent" grammar of a dialect, which is akin to his notion of “common sense" in that it is fragmented, accepted uncritically and unconscious or seems “natural," he is also not advocating any sort of “normative grammar" where the rules are coherently set out, consistent and noncontradictory. Rather, he is making an argument for a specific method of transforming “spontaneous grammar" into “normative grammar" through a conscious and critical interaction among the existing “spontaneous grammars."
虽然葛兰西并非简单地倡导方言的“自发”或“内在”语法，这类似于他关于“常识”的概念，因为它支离破碎、未经批判地接受且不自觉或看似“自然”；他也并非倡导任何一种规则明确规定、一致且不自相矛盾的“规范语法”。相反，他主张通过现有“自发语法”之间的有意识和批判性互动，将“自发语法”转化为“规范语法”的一种特定方法。

As we saw above with Gramsci’s critique of the fragmentary nature of common sense, here too we have his assessment of how fragmentation in language impedes effective political action. But this cannot be rectified through the imposition of a logically coherent, unfragmented language. The result of such an external imposition actually reinforces parochialism and narrow thinking but also prevents various subaltern social groups一 specifically the southern peasantry and the northern working class—from communicating with each other, developing solidarity with their conditions which are different in many ways but ultimately tied to their mutual subordination by the dominant classes and the uneven development of capitalism. Gramsci’s solution for fragmentation and the incoherent and contradictory characteristics of language usage in Italy is not a simple adoption of Esperanto or some pragmatic language (such as the dialect of Florence) in which communication can occur. The creation of a truly common language requires the interaction and creative engagement among those who speak the diverse dialects, the elements of which will be transformed into a new language and worldview.
正如我们上面看到的，葛兰西批判了常识的碎片化，在这里，他也评价了语言的碎片化如何阻碍有效的政治行动。但这并非通过强加一种逻辑连贯、无碎片的语言就能解决的。这种外在强加的结果实际上会强化地方主义和狭隘的思维，还会阻止不同社会阶层，特别是南方农民和北方工人阶级，相互沟通，发展基于自身不同境况的团结——尽管这些境况各不相同，但最终都与他们共同受统治阶级和资本主义不平衡发展所支配有关。葛兰西对意大利语言使用碎片化、不连贯和矛盾特性的解决方案，并非简单地采用世界语或某种实用语言（例如佛罗伦萨方言）来实现沟通。真正的共同语言的形成，需要那些使用不同方言的人进行互动和创造性参与，这些方言的元素将转化为一种新的语言和世界观。

Transforming Subaltern Common Sense and Language from the Bottom Up
从底层改造被压迫阶层的常识和语言

Thus, in Gramsci’s writings specifically on Italian language, we find a clear example of his more general argument about fragmentation within common sense and the conditions of subalternity. He is critical of the lack of coherence and the historical process of sedimentation that renders both the common sense of various and diverse subaltern social groups and the vernacular languages they use an impediment to effective political organization. But this fragmentation cannot be dealt with through the imposition of a coherency based on purely technical logic, abstract reason or Esperanto. Rather, it must be actively grappled with, sifted through, understood and sorted out by the very users of language and holders of “common sense.” And these processes are not purely linguistic or in the realm of ideas and consciousness, but are always related to human labor and changing lived experiences. This is why it is so crucial that in Gramsci’s view, common sense, folklore and languages are not homogeneous or static, just as “the people themselves are not a homogeneous cultural collectivity but they present numerous and variously combined cultural layers.”57 “One must keep in mind,” as he writes, “that in every region, especially in Italy, given the very rich variety of local traditions, there exist groups or small groups characterized by their own ideological or psychological impulses:
因此，在葛兰西关于意大利语言的著作中，我们可以找到他关于常识碎片化以及被统治阶级地位的更一般论点的明确例证。他批评缺乏连贯性以及导致各种不同被统治社会群体和他们使用的方言的常识以及沉淀的历史过程，这阻碍了有效的政治组织。但是，这种碎片化不能通过建立于纯粹技术逻辑、抽象理性或世界语之上的连贯性来解决。相反，它必须由语言使用者和“常识”持有者主动地应对、筛选、理解和整理。这些过程不仅仅是语言或思想意识领域，而是始终与人类劳动和不断变化的生活经验相关。这就是为什么在葛兰西看来，常识、民间传说和语言并非同质或静态的，正如“人民本身并非一个同质的文化群体，而是呈现出多种多样的文化层次相互交织一样”。他写道：“必须记住，在每个地区，尤其是在意大利，由于当地传统极其丰富多样，存在着由自身意识形态或心理冲动所特征化的群体或小群体。”

‘every village has or has had its local saint, hence its own cult and its own chapel.’”58 In other words, in the Italian context, the heterogeneity of common sense is distinguished by the heterogeneity of Italian culture and the lack of national unity. Thus, common sense assumes specific qualities among various regions and social groups. In addition, common sense changes and adapts to new elements that are absorbed into common practice. As Gramsci writes in Notebook 1, §65, and later rewrites in Notebook 24, §4:
“每个村庄都有或曾经有过自己的地方圣人，因此也有其独特的崇拜和教堂。”58 换言之，在意大利语境中，常识的多样性体现在意大利文化的多样性和缺乏民族统一性。因此，常识在不同地区和社会群体中呈现出不同的特质。此外，常识会随着被吸收进日常实践的新元素而改变和适应。正如葛兰西在笔记一，§65，以及后来的笔记二十四，§4 中所写的那样：

Every social stratum has its own “common sense” which is ultimately the most widespread conception of life and morals. Every philosophical current leaves a sedimentation of “common sense”： this is the document of its historical reality. Common sense is not something rigid and static; rather, it changes continuously, enriched by scientific notions and philosophical opinions which have entered into common usage. “Common sense” is the folklore of “philosophy” and stands midway between real “folklore” (that is, as it is understood) and the philosophy, the science, the economics of the scholars. “Common sense” creates the folklore of the future, that is a more or less rigidified phase of a certain time and place.59
每个社会阶层都有其自身的“常识”，这最终是关于生活和道德最普遍的观念。每一种哲学思潮都留下“常识”的沉淀：这是其历史现实的记录。常识并非僵化和静止的，而是不断变化的，它被已进入大众视野的科学概念和哲学观点所丰富。“常识”是“哲学”的民间传说，介于真正的“民间传说”（即其被理解的方式）以及学者们的哲学、科学、经济学之间。“常识”创造着未来的民间传说，即特定时间和地点的或多或少僵化的阶段。

Here Gramsci conceptualizes what Tosel frames as two axes, mentioned above, the reformation of “common sense” and critique of traditional philosophy, as a continuum. But our point remains the same, where so much of Gramscian scholarship has detailed the relation between “common sense” (as the “folklore of philosophy”) and science, economics and philosophy of scholars, our focus is directed toward the other end of the spectrum, between “real folklore” and “common sense.” The crucial point here is that although common sense continually changes, it tends not to be progressive, because it uncritically absorbs new elements from the scholarly end of the spectrum. They enter into common practice, rather than consciously and selectively incorporating specific elements.60
此处葛兰西将托塞尔所概括的两个维度，即“常识”的改造和传统哲学的批判，概念化为一个连续体。但我们的论点依然不变，尽管大量的葛兰西研究都详述了“常识”（作为“哲学的民间传说”）与科学、经济学以及学者哲学之间的关系，我们的焦点却转向了光谱的另一端，即“真正的民间传说”与“常识”之间的关系。关键在于，虽然常识不断变化，但它往往并非进步的，因为它不加批判地吸收来自学术端的新元素。这些元素融入到日常实践中，而非有意识且选择性地吸收特定元素。

Agreeing in part with Marx and Engels’s famous argument that “the ideas of the ruling class are in every epoch the ruling ideas,”61 Gramsci emphasizes that languages and common sense often contain elements of truth but in seemingly contradictory forms with respect to the actual experiences and conditions of the masses. These “ruling ideas,” as Marx and Engels note, have “material force” but were formed from the perspective of the dominant groups, and often the dominant groups of previous periods in history.62 Where Marx and Engels do not specify any timeline for the “ideas of the ruling class,” Gramsci notes that, for example, “previous religions have also had an influence and remain components of common sense to this day, and the same is true of previous forms of present Catholicism.”63 Similarly, Gramsci suggests that elements of modern thought and science enter into folklore, but in this process they are “torn from their context, fall into the popular domain and ‘arranged5 within the mosaic of tradition."64 Thus, although the elements of folklore may change, new elements are incorporated within a traditional worldview.
部分同意马克思和恩格斯“统治阶级的思想在每一时代都是统治思想”的著名论断，61 格拉姆斯基强调，语言和常识往往包含真理的成分，但其形式在一定程度上与群众的实际经验和状况相矛盾。正如马克思和恩格斯所指出的，这些“统治思想”具有“物质力量”，但其形成源于统治集团的视角，往往是历史先前时期统治集团的视角。62 马克思和恩格斯并未对“统治阶级的思想”设定任何时间表，而格拉姆斯基则指出，例如，“以往的宗教也曾产生过影响，至今仍是常识的一部分，现存天主教亦然。”63 同样，格拉姆斯基认为现代思想和科学的成分融入民间传说，但在这一过程中，它们“被从其语境中剥离，进入大众领域，并‘排列’在传统的拼图中。”64 因此，虽然民间传说的成分可能发生变化，但新的成分被纳入传统的宇宙观之中。

Gramsci suggests that critical consciousness一established through the process of forming historical consciousness一should provide the foundation for a “new common sense” (or what he also calls “good sense”)，but the process of developing historical consciousness presents a difficult task for subaltern groups. Due to the contradictory nature of the ensemble of social relations and conditions of exploitation and poverty, subaltern groups are not only prohibited an active voice in dominant discourse; they are also excluded from actively participating in dominant institutions, culture and politics, and because of their exclusion they are placed in a difficult position to develop a critical understanding of the nature of the power relations that form their subalternity. Without participation in dominant institutions, culture, politics, and language, subaltern groups achieve a partial understanding of their position in relation to dominant social and political relations. The stress here is on active participation that not only enables subaltern groups to use the language and institutions and to consume or absorb culture, but also allows subaltern groups to use them creatively, to add to them, alter them in relation to their experiences. In this sense, Gramsci is worried about the outcome of institutions, culture, politics and language being “imposed” from “above” or “outside” in a manner that reinforces feelings of inferiority and passivity in subaltern groups.
葛兰西认为，批判性意识——通过形成历史意识的过程建立——应为“新的常识”（或他称之为“常识”）奠定基础，但发展历史意识的过程对被压迫群体而言是一项艰巨的任务。由于剥削和贫困的社会关系和条件的矛盾性质，被压迫群体不仅在主流话语中被剥夺了主动发言权，还在主流机构、文化和政治中被排除在外，正是由于这种排除，他们难以形成对塑造其被压迫地位的权力关系的批判性理解。缺乏参与主流机构、文化、政治和语言，被压迫群体对自身与主流社会和政治关系的定位只能获得部分理解。 这里的重点在于积极参与，这不仅使次等群体能够使用语言和机构，以及消费或吸收文化，而且还允许次等群体创造性地使用它们，为其增加内容，根据自身经验对其进行改变。从这个意义上讲，葛兰西担心机构、文化、政治和语言“从上”或“外部”强加的方式，会加剧次等群体的自卑感和被动感。

Gramsci understands this not as an overall condition in the sense of Theodor Adorno’s “administered society” but as a matter of degree depending on different conditions of various subaltern groups. The least “advanced” subaltern groups, who have been deprived of institutional political participation, face a more difficult task in developing critical consciousness than a more politically organized subaltern group. Thus, the contradictory nature of common sense is not the product of some sort of intellectual or psychological deficiency on the part of the masses. Rather, the contradictory nature of common sense is largely defined by the contradictory nature of the ensemble of social relations, economic exploitation and the various exclusions they produce and reproduce. But Gramsci does not draw the deterministic conclusion from this logic that common sense can only follow and become critical once economic exploitation has ended or social relations have been transformed. Quite the contrary, his point is that such changes require a critical perspective to be elaborated from within common sense. The development of critical consciousness requires the articulation of a “historical consciousness” that is developed autonomously from imposed principles and dominant cultural values. As Gramsci explains:
葛兰西并非将这种状况理解为阿多诺“管理社会”的那种普遍性，而是视之为不同被压迫群体在不同条件下的程度问题。那些政治参与途径最匮乏的“最落后”的被压迫群体，要发展批判意识的任务比政治组织程度更高的被压迫群体更加艰巨。因此，常识的矛盾性并非大众某种智力或心理缺陷的产物。相反，常识的矛盾性主要由社会关系的矛盾性、经济剥削以及由此产生的各种排除所定义。但葛兰西并未从这种逻辑得出决定论的结论，即常识只有在经济剥削结束或社会关系转型后才能跟随并变得批判性。恰恰相反，他的观点是，这种改变需要从常识内部去阐发批判视角。 批判性意识的形成需要一种“历史意识”的阐释，这种“历史意识”应独立于强加的原则和主流文化价值观而发展。正如葛兰西所解释的那样：

Since the ensemble of social relations is contradictory, human historical consciousness is contradictory; having said that, the question arises of how this contradictoriness manifests itself. It manifests itself all across the body of society through the existence of the different historical consciousness of various groups; and it manifests itself in individuals as a reflection of these group antinomies. Among subaltern groups, given the lack of historical initiative, the fragmentation is greater; they face a harder struggle to liberate themselves from imposed (rather than freely propounded) principles in order to arrive at an autonomous historical consciousness.65
由于社会关系的集合是矛盾的，人类的历史意识也是矛盾的；话虽如此，问题在于这种矛盾性是如何表现出来的。它通过各种群体的不同历史意识在整个社会中表现出来；它在个人身上表现为这些群体矛盾的对照。在次等群体中，由于缺乏历史主动性，分裂更大；他们面临更艰难的斗争，以摆脱强加（而非自由提出的）原则，从而获得自主的历史意识。

Gramsci suggests that in the Italian context the contradictory nature of common sense along with the lack of a truly popular national language is a reflection of the contradictory nature of the ensemble of social relations, which were largely produced by the incompleteness of the Risorgimento, the non-national popular aspects of Italian intellectuals, and the cultural influence of the Catholic Church. The nature of the Risorgimento, Catholicism, and the function of Italian intellectuals contributed to a passive culture and fragmented dialects that developed among the people, particularly peasants, who were encouraged to accept their subordinated position as natural. The hierarchical authority of the Church and state— through the mediation of intellectuals—politically and ideologically contributed to the subordination of workers and peasants.
葛兰西认为，在意大利语境中，常识的矛盾性和缺乏真正通俗的民族语言，反映了社会关系整体的矛盾性质。这种矛盾性质主要源于“复兴运动”的不完整性、意大利知识分子非民族的民众属性以及天主教会的文化影响。“复兴运动”的性质、天主教以及意大利知识分子的作用，促成了民众（特别是农民）的被动文化和支离破碎的方言，鼓励他们将自己的从属地位视为自然状态。教会和国家的等级权威——通过知识分子的中介——在政治和意识形态上促进了工人和农民的从属地位。

This is one of the central elements of Gramsci’s analysis of the Risorgimento as a “revolution without revolution” or a “passive revolution” in that the dominant classes consolidated their power and unified the state without a mass base, without exercising active hegemony among the masses, without promoting a national culture, and without fundamentally altering the previous social relations.66
这是葛兰西分析“不革命的革命”或“被动革命”的意大利统一运动（Risorgimento）的核心要素之一，即统治阶级在没有群众基础、没有在群众中行使积极的领导权、没有促进民族文化、以及没有根本改变先前社会关系的情况下，巩固了权力并统一了国家。66

Because the Risorgimento and “standard Italian” were not popular movements—but in the end actually the juridical suppression of a potential mass movement—they reinforced the non-national popular aspects of Italian culture that actively excluded subaltern social groups from participating in dominant political institutions. For this reason, Gramsci writes that “in Italy the liberal-bourgeois always neglected the popular masses.”67 Related to this issue, as Gramsci began to address in his final essay prior to his arrest, “Some Aspects of the Southern Question,” the peasantry lacked and continued to lack its own category of organic intellectuals to provide it with coherence and political direction. Ironically, however, as Gramsci points out in the Prison Notebooks, “it is from the peasantry that other social groups draw many of their intellectuals and a high proportion of traditional intellectuals are of peasant origin,” but such intellectuals do not remain organically linked with the peasantry, such as priests, lawyers, and state functionaries.68 The Italian peasantry not only lacked its own category of intellectuals to provide homogeneity and direction; the non-national popular character of Italian culture reinforced the separation of the intellectuals from the masses at large. As Gramsci points out in the “special notebook” on the “Problems of Italian National Culture”： “In Italy the term ‘national5 has an ideologically very restricted meaning, and does not in any case coincide with 'popular' because in Italy the intellectuals are distant from the people, i.e., from the 'nation.'"69 As we have seen in linguistic terms, “national Italian” was also restricted and was unsuccessful in becoming truly “national.” Gramsci recounts different phases in Italian history when “once again, Italian is a written not a spoken language, a language of scholars, not of the nation” and this is a central aspect of the increasing “split between the people and the intellectuals, between the people and culture.”70
由于民族复兴运动和“标准意大利语”并非大众运动——而最终实际上是对潜在大众运动的法律压制——它们强化了意大利文化的非民族大众方面，积极地排斥次等社会群体参与主导的政治机构。因此，葛兰西写道：“在意大利，自由资产阶级始终忽视大众。”67 与此相关，正如葛兰西在他被捕前最后一篇论文“南方问题的一些方面”中开始探讨的那样，农民缺乏并继续缺乏自身的有机知识分子群体，为其提供凝聚力和政治方向。然而，具有讽刺意味的是，正如葛兰西在《狱中札记》中指出的那样，“其他社会群体汲取了大量知识分子来自农民，传统知识分子中很大一部分也来自农民”，但这些知识分子并未与农民保持有机联系，例如牧师、律师和国家公务员。68 意大利农民不仅缺乏自身知识分子群体以提供同质性和方向；意大利文化的非民族性大众特征加剧了知识分子与广大民众的隔阂。正如葛兰西在“意大利民族文化问题”的“特别笔记本”中所指出的那样：“在意大利，‘民族’一词在意识形态上具有非常狭隘的含义，并且绝不与‘大众’相符，因为在意大利，知识分子远离人民，即远离‘民族’。”69 正如我们在语言层面上所看到的，“意大利民族语言”同样局限，未能真正成为“民族语言”。葛兰西叙述了意大利历史上不同阶段，“意大利语再次成为书面语言而非口语，是学者们的语言而非民族的语言”，这正是日益加剧的“人民与知识分子、人民与文化之间的分裂”的核心方面。七十

In turn, the popular masses function within a social and political environment they did not create, in a language that they may learn but one that is not their own and is “mastered” only through submission to the authority of the elite. Because of the cultural tradition of Italian intellectuals, the popular masses lack their own category of intellectuals and their own languages to provide coherence and political direction to their activity. Thus, because of the practical separation of intellectuals from the masses, common sense or the philosophy of the masses gravitates around folklore and traditional conceptions of the world.
反过来，大众在他们自身并未创造的社会和政治环境中运作，使用他们可能学习但并非他们自己的语言，这种语言只有通过服从精英阶层的权威才能“掌握”。由于意大利知识分子的文化传统，大众缺乏他们自己的知识分子群体和他们自己的语言，以提供行动的连贯性和政治方向。因此，由于知识分子与大众的实际分离，大众的常识或哲学围绕着民间传说和世界传统的观念而运转。

In Gramsci’s view, it is necessary for subaltern groups to produce their own category of organic intellectuals and linguistic innovations, as effectively as dominant social groups create their organic intellectuals, in that the intellectuals remain in contact with, or organic to, the social groups’ life experiences so as to provide organization, direction and leadership in the movement to achieve political power and hegemony. The necessity of the subaltern to develop their own category of organic intellectuals resolves one of the central issues contributing to the condition of subalternity—that is, that the non-national popular character of traditional Italian intellectuals creates a practical disconnect between intellectuals and the people. Gramsci’s well-known discussion of traditional intellectuals includes the crucial linguistic component of this disconnection. Gramsci describes his analysis of “the relation between the intellectuals and the people-nation” as being studied “in terms of the language written by the intellectuals and used among them." He notes parenthetically that “the use of Latin as a learned language is bound up with Catholic cosmopolitanism." Then in tracing the history of this relationship, he sets out one version of his famous distinction between organic intellectuals (of the fourteenth-century ruling class) and traditional intellectuals: “it is not a stratum of the population which creates its intellectuals on coming to power (this occurred in the fourteenth century), but a traditionally selected body which assimilates single individuals into its cadres."71
在葛兰西看来，被统治群体有必要像统治阶级那样，培育自身的有机知识分子和语言创新，因为知识分子必须与社会群体的生命体验保持联系，才能为争取政治权力和霸权的运动提供组织、方向和领导。被统治群体发展自身的有机知识分子，解决了导致被统治地位的中心问题之一——即传统意大利知识分子的非民族性大众特征造成了知识分子与人民之间的实际脱节。葛兰西关于传统知识分子的著名论述包含了这种脱节的关键语言因素。葛兰西将“知识分子与民族人民的关系”的分析描述为“通过知识分子之间使用的语言进行研究”。他括号中提到，“拉丁语作为一种学术语言的使用，与天主教世界主义密切相关。”然后，在追溯这种关系的历史时，他阐述了他著名的有机知识分子（十四世纪统治阶层）与传统知识分子区别的其中一种版本：“当一个阶层掌握权力（如十四世纪）时，并非该阶层自身创造了其知识分子，而是传统上被遴选的群体将个体吸收进其队伍。”71

It is largely due to this lack of intellectual connection for subaltern social groups that the level of conscious leadership with the subaltern’s spontaneous political activity does not move beyond common sense.72 In Gramsci’s words:
这主要是因为被统治社会群体缺乏知识联系，使得下层自发的政治活动在意识型领导方面停留在常识层面。72  用葛兰西的话说：

creating a group of independent intellectuals is not an easy thing; it requires a long process, with actions and reactions, coming together and drifting apart and the growth of very numerous and complex new formations. It is the conception of a subaltern social group, deprived of historical initiative, in continuous but disorganic expansion, unable to go beyond a certain qualitative level, which still remains below the level of the possession of the State and of the real exercise of hegemony over the whole of society which alone permits a certain organic equilibrium in the development of the intellectual group.73
创建一群独立的知识分子并非易事；它需要一个漫长的过程，包含行动与反作用、聚合与分离，以及大量复杂的新型结构的成长。这是对一个处于从属地位的社会群体——缺乏历史主动性，持续但无组织地扩张，无法超越特定质变水平——的构想，其水平仍低于掌握国家权力和真正行使对整个社会的领导权，而只有后者才能允许知识分子群体发展中达到某种有机平衡。

Here Gramsci’s suggestion that the “disorganic expansion” of subaltern groups permits “a certain organic equilibrium in the development of the intellectual group” directly connects to his view of the political party as the “collective intellectual” or “modern prince” that facilitates the rearticulation and unification of subaltern worldviews in a “common language.”74 For Gramsci, the party is not a tool to impose an external or transcendental worldview but functions as a practical link between social multiplicity and political unity in which the articulation of a “collective consciousness” is created that has the potential to challenge dominant hegemony. As Gramsci metaphorically explains:
此处葛兰西关于“次等群体”的“非有机扩张”能够促成“知识群体发展中某种有机平衡”的建议，直接与他将政党视为“集体知识分子”或“现代君主”的观点相联，后者促使“次等群体”的世界观在“共同语言”中得以重构和统一。74 对葛兰西而言，政党并非强加外部或超越性世界观的工具，而是社会多元与政治统一之间的实践联系，在这个联系中，“集体意识”的形成具有挑战主导霸权的潜力。正如葛兰西的隐喻所阐释的那样：

A collective consciousness, that is a living organism, cannot be formed until after the multiplicity is unified through the friction of individuals: neither can one say that “silence” is not multiplicity. When an orchestra is preparing for a performance, with each instrument tuning up individually, it gives the impression of the most horrible cacophony; yet, it is such preparations that bring the orchestra to life as a single “instrument.”75
一种集体意识，即一个活的有机体，只有在个体通过摩擦而统一之后才能形成：也不能说“沉默”不是多元。当乐队准备演出时，每种乐器单独调音，给人一种最可怕的嘈杂感；然而，正是这种准备工作使乐队作为一个单一的“乐器”活起来。75

In Gramsci’s methodological criteria of subaltern analysis, the development of the political party signifies an initial first step in political transformation.76 The party provides a vehicle for subaltern groups to represent their views and aspirations, yet the crucial moment in the political activity of subaltern groups occurs when they become aware of the fact that their political goals cannot be fulfilled within the present state and that the state must be transformed.77 Posing the question of the state in turn brings the issue of hegemony to the forefront of political struggle.
在葛兰西的次等群体分析方法论中，政治党的形成标志着政治变革的初步阶段。76 党派为次等群体表达其观点和愿望提供了一个载体，然而，次等群体政治活动的至关重要时刻发生在他们意识到自身政治目标无法在现有国家体制内实现，并且国家必须被改造的时候。77  进而提出国家问题，则将霸权问题置于政治斗争的核心。

When the subaltern emerge from their subordinate position and achieve a level of political power, they move from a position of resistance to effective agency. This stage marks the pivotal point in the development of the subaltern in achieving “integral autonomy." In Gramsci’s words, “if yesterday the subaltern element was a thing, today it is no longer a thing but an historical person, a protagonist; if yesterday it was not responsible, because ‘resisting5 a will external to itself, now it feels itself to be responsible because it is no longer resisting but an agent, necessarily active and taking the initiative."78 In other words, at this point the subaltern has achieved “integral autonomy” and is no longer subordinate, adopting the language of its rulers, but is active, speaking and leading.
当被压迫者从从属地位中崛起，获得一定政治权力时，他们便从抵抗转变为有效的行动主体。这一阶段标志着被压迫者走向“整体自主”的关键时刻。正如葛兰西所说，“如果昨天被压迫者还是物，那么今天它就不再是物，而是一个历史人物，一个主角；如果昨天它不负责任，因为‘抵抗’着自身之外的意志，那么现在它感到自己负有责任，因为它不再抵抗，而是行动者，必然地积极主动。”78 换句话说，此时被压迫者已获得“整体自主”，不再是下属，不再采用统治者的语言，而是积极地发言和领导。

Conclusion 结论

We have attempted to bring into relief the direct connections between subalternity and language by showing how the concepts overlap with respect to Gramsci’s analyses of common sense, intellectuals, philosophy, folklore and hegemony. Moreover, we have argued that for Gramsci fragmentation of any social group’s “common sense,” worldview and language is a political detriment. However, it cannot be overcome by the imposition of a “rational” or "logical” worldview. Instead, what is required is a deep engagement with the fragments that make up subaltern historical, social, economic and political conditions. We have thus attempted to show how Gramsci provides an alternative to both the celebration of fragmentation fashionable in liberal multiculturalism and uncritical postmodernism as well as other attempts of overcoming it through recourse to some external, transcendental or imposed worldview. In this sense we hope to have enriched the understanding of Gramsci’s analysis of the Italian situation and the complex process required in contemporary contexts for subaltern groups to overcome their subordination.
我们试图突出次等地位与语言之间的直接联系，方法是展示这些概念如何在葛兰西对常识、知识分子、哲学、民间传说和霸权的分析中相互重叠。此外，我们认为，对于任何社会群体的“常识”、世界观和语言的碎片化，葛兰西认为这是政治上的损害。然而，它不能通过强加一种“理性”或“逻辑”的世界观来克服。相反，所需要的是深入参与构成次等群体历史、社会、经济和政治状况的碎片。因此，我们试图展示葛兰西如何为同时流行于自由多元文化主义和非批判后现代主义的碎片化庆祝，以及通过诉诸某些外部、超越或强加的世界观来克服碎片化的其他尝试，提供了一种替代方案。从这个意义上说，我们希望能够丰富对葛兰西对意大利局势分析的理解，以及在当代语境下次等群体克服其从属地位所需要的复杂过程。

Notes 笔记

1. We will cite Gramsci’s Prison Notebooks by giving the notebook number preceded by a Q (Quaderno—notebook), and then an § prior to the note (or section) number, following the definitive source; Antonio Gramsci, Quaderni del Carcere, four vols., ed. Valentino Gerratana (Turin: Einaudi, 1975), hereafter cited as QC. There is a list of abbreviations on pages ix-x. The English translation of this critical edition is under way; Antonio Gramsci, Prison Notebooks, vols. 1, 2, 3 (New York: Columbia University Press, 1992, 1996 and 2007), hereafter cited as PN1, PN2 and PN3, respectively. We will cite the English translations used.
1. 我们将引用葛兰西的《狱中札记》时，将使用“Q”（笔记本编号）加“§”（笔记或章节编号）的格式，遵循权威版本：安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》，四卷，瓦伦蒂诺·杰拉塔纳编（都灵：埃纳迪出版社，1975），以下简称 QC。第九至十页有缩写列表。该批判性版本英文翻译正在进行中；安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》，第 1、2、3 卷（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社，1992、1996 和 2007），分别以下简称 PN1、PN2 和 PN3。我们将引用使用的英文翻译版本。

2. See Marcus E. Green, “Gramsci Cannot Speak: Representations and Interpretations of Gramsci’s Concept of the Subaltern,” Rethinking Marxism, 14, no. 3 (2002): 1-24, and “Gramsci’s Concept of Subaltern Social Groups,” PhD dissertation, political science, York University, Toronto, 2006; and Peter Ives, Gramsci's Politics of Language: Engaging the Bakhtin Circle and the Frankfurt School (Toronto: University of Toronto Press, 2004), and Language and Hegemony in Gramsci (London: Pluto Press, 2004).
2. 见 Marcus E. Green，“葛兰西无法说话：对葛兰西“被统治阶级”概念的表征与诠释”，《马克思主义再思考》，第 14 卷，第 3 期（2002）：1-24，以及“葛兰西的被统治阶级概念”，政治学博士论文，多伦多大学约克分校，2006；以及 Peter Ives，《葛兰西的语言政治：与巴赫金学派和法兰克福学派的对话》（多伦多：多伦多大学出版社，2004），和《葛兰西的语言与霸权》（伦敦：普鲁托出版社，2004）。

3. The first two “special notebooks” in Gramsci’s prison opus deal directly with idealism and materialism. Notebook 10 ("The Philosophy of Benedetto Croce”)contains Gramsci’s critique of Croce’s idealism, and in Notebook 11 ("Introduction to the Study of Philosophy”)，Gramsci critiques Nikolai Bukharin’s positivist conception of Marxism.
3. 格拉姆斯基的狱中著作中，前两本“特殊笔记本”直接探讨唯心主义和唯物主义。笔记本 10（“贝内德托·克罗齐的哲学”）包含了格拉姆斯基对克罗齐唯心主义的批判；笔记本 11（“哲学研究导论”）则批判了尼古拉·布哈林的马克思主义实证主义观点。

4. Kate Crehan, Culture and Anthropology (London: Pluto Press, 2002), 98.
4. 克雷汉（Kate Crehan），《文化与人类学》（伦敦：普鲁托出版社，2002），第 98 页。

5. Crehan, 104. 5. 克里汉，104。

6. Crehan, 115-19. 6. 克雷汉，115-119。

7. Q11§12; Antonio Gramcsi, Selections from the Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Quintin Hoare and Geoffrey Nowell-Smith (New York: International Publishers 1971), 326-27, hereafter cited as SPN.
7. Q11§12；安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》选集，霍尔和诺韦尔-史密斯译，纽约：国际出版公司，1971 年，第 326-27 页，以下简称《狱记》。

8. In contrast to the familiar notion of “common sense” in contemporary Anglo-American usage, as sound and uncomplicated judgment, the Gramscian notion of “common sense” draws on the Italian spectrum going from senso comune (common sense) to buon senso (good sense). In this context, “common sense” refers more literally to beliefs that are common, modes of thought, opinions and conceptions of the world held by the masses, and “good sense” has more of the English resonance of “common sense” as good practical judgment. See editor’s note in SPN, 323n1.
8. 与当代英美用法中“常识”的熟悉概念（即清晰而简单的判断）不同，葛兰西的“常识”概念借鉴了意大利语谱系，涵盖了从“senso comune”（常识）到“buon senso”（良知）的范围。在此语境中，“常识”更直接地指大众普遍持有的信念、思维方式、观点和世界观；而“良知”则更接近英语“常识”的含义，即良好的实践判断力。参阅 SPN，323n1 页编者注。

9. Fabio Frosini, Gramsci e la filosofia: Saggio sui Quaderni del Carcere (Rome: Carocci, 2003), 170-76, and chapter 10 of this volume. See also Q3§48, PN2, 51; Q4§18, PN2, 159-60; Q8§173 and §175, PN3, 333-34 and 335-36.
9. 法比奥·弗罗西尼，《葛兰西与哲学：狱中札记研究》（罗马：卡罗奇出版社，2003），第 170-76 页，以及本书第 10 章。另见 Q3§48，PN2，51；Q4§18，PN2，159-160；Q8§173 和§175，PN3，333-334 和 335-336。

10. Benedetto Croce, “The Identity of Philosophy and the Moral Life,” in My Philosophy and Other Essays on the Moral and Political Problems of Our Time, trans.
10. 贝内代托·克罗齐，“哲学与道德生活的同一性”，载于《我的哲学及关于我们时代道德与政治问题的其他随笔》，译者：

E. F. Carritt (London: George Allen & Unwin, 1949 [1928]), 226.
卡里特（伦敦：乔治·艾伦和恩文，1949 [1928]），226 页。

11. Croce, 226. 11. 克罗齐，226。

12. Frosini, chapter 9 of this volume, pages 171-86. Frosini explores Gramsci’s concept of “translatability” in this context, which is obviously related to Gramsci’s approach to language. Here we wish to add to Frosini’s focus (also in Frosini, Gramsci e la filosofia) on Gramsci’s engagement with philosophy一what he astutely sees as the translatability between theory and practice一with our focus on the fragmentation of common sense from the perspective not of philosophers like Croce or Gentile, but the subaltern classes. Derek Boothman's discussison of translation is also important here, but well beyond the scope of this essay. See chapter 8 in this volume and Derek Boothman, Traducibilità e Processi Traduttivi (Perugia: Guerra Edizioni, 2004).
12.  弗罗西尼，本书第 9 章，第 171-186 页。弗罗西尼在此探讨了葛兰西的“可译性”概念，这显然与葛兰西的语言观相关。 我们在此希望补充弗罗西尼（也在弗罗西尼的《葛兰西与哲学》中）对葛兰西与哲学的互动——他敏锐地看到了理论与实践之间的可译性——并侧重于从非克罗齐或詹蒂莱等哲学家，而是从被统治阶级视角出发探讨常识的碎片化。德雷克·布斯曼的翻译讨论在此也很重要，但超出了本文的范围。 请参阅本书第 8 章以及德雷克·布斯曼的《可译性与翻译过程》（佩鲁贾：格拉战争出版社，2004）。

13. See André Tosel, chapter 16 of this volume, page 275; Q8§220, PN3, 369.
13. 见本卷第 16 章，安德烈·托塞尔，第 275 页；Q8§220，PN3，369。

14. Andrew Robinson, “Towards an Intellectual Reformation: The Critique of Common Sense and the Forgotten Revolutionary Project of Gramscian Theory,” in Images of Gramsci: Connections and Contentions in Political Theory and International Relations, ed. Andreas Bieler and Adam David Morton (New York: Routledge, 2006), 76, 83.
14. 安德鲁·罗宾逊，“走向一场知识改革：对常识的批判与葛兰西理论中被遗忘的革命项目”，载于《葛兰西的形象：政治理论和国际关系中的联系与争议》，安德烈斯·比勒和亚当·戴维·莫顿主编 (纽约：罗特列奇出版社，2006)，第 76、83 页。

15. Guido Liguori, Sentieri Gramsciani (Rome: Carocci, 2006), 79.
15. 利古里（Guido Liguori），《葛兰西之路》（罗马：卡罗奇出版社，2006），第 79 页。

16. Q8§175, PN3, 333-34. 16. Q8§175，PN3，333-34。

17. Liguori, 78. While it is well beyond the scope of this chapter, our position is to insist on the importance of Gramsci’s discussion of “immanence” in the process of transforming common sense to good sense and the philosophy of praxis; see, for example, Peter Thomas, “Immanence,” Historical Materialism 16 (2008): 239项3; Ives, Language and Hegemony, 84-90; Frosini, Gramsci e la Filosofia, 143-49. This theme is also connected to Gramsci's use of “immanent grammar” as synonymous with “spontaneous grammar” discussed below.
17. 利古里，78. 虽然本书的范围已远远超出本章，但我们坚持认为，葛兰西在将常识转化为良知和实践哲学的过程中，对“内在性”的讨论至关重要；例如，参见彼得·托马斯，“内在性”，《历史唯物主义》第 16 期（2008 年）：239 项 3；伊夫斯，《语言与霸权》，84-90 页；弗罗西尼，《葛兰西与哲学》，143-49 页。这一主题也与葛兰西将“内在语法”等同于下文讨论的“自发语法”的使用相关。

18. De Mauro, chapter 3 of this volume, page 59. See also Frosini, Gramsci e la Filosofia, especially 30-33 and 168-82.
18. 德毛罗，本卷第 3 章，第 59 页。另见弗罗西尼，《葛兰西与哲学》，特别是第 30-33 页和第 168-182 页。

19. Frantz Fanon, The Wretched of the Earth, trans. Richard Philcox (New York: Grove Press 2004), 63-96.
19.  弗朗茨·法农，《被剥夺者在地球上》，理查德·菲尔考克斯译 (纽约：格罗夫出版社，2004)，第 63-96 页。

20. Q3§48, PN2, 48. The bracketed insertions are Gramsci’s.
20. Q3§48，PN2，48. 括号内的插入语出自葛兰西。

21. Liguori, 74-75. 21. 利古里，74-75。

22. Francesco Paolo Colucci, “The Relevance to Psychology of Antonio Gramsci’s Ideas on Activity and Common Sense,” in Perspectives on Activity Theory, ed. Yrjö Engeström, Reijo Miettinen and Raija-Leena Punamäki-Gitai (New York: Cambridge University Press, 1999).
22. 法兰西斯科·保罗·科卢奇，“安东尼奥·葛兰西关于活动和常识的思想对心理学之相关性”，载于《活动理论的视角》，由 Yrjö Engeström、Reijo Miettinen 和 Raija-Leena Punamäki-Gitai 编著（纽约：剑桥大学出版社，1999）。

23. Q10II§44, SPN, 349. 23. Q10II§44，SPN，349。

24. Q11§12, SPN, 323. 24. Q11§12，SPN，323。

25. Q11§12, SPN, 323. 25. Q11§12，SPN，323。

26. Q11§12, SPN, 323. 26. Q11§12，SPN，323。

27. Frosini, Gramsci e la Filosofia, 99.
27.弗罗西尼、葛兰西与哲学，99。

28. See Boothman, Traducibilità, 27-50; Ives, Gramsci's Politics of Language, 20-37; Ives, Language and Hegemony, 43-53; and Frosini, Gramsci e la Filosofia, 38H.
见 Boothman，《可翻译性》，27-50 页；Ives，《葛兰西的语言政治》，20-37 页；Ives，《语言与霸权》，43-53 页；以及 Frosini，《葛兰西与哲学》，38H 页。

29. Tullio De Mauro, Storia Linguistica Dell'Italia Unità (Bari: Editori Laterza 1986), 43; and Howard Moss, “Language and Italian National Identity,” in Politics of Italian National Identity, ed. Bruce Haddock and Gino Bedani (Cardiff: University of Wales Press, 2000), 98-123, 200.
29. 图利奥·德·毛罗，《统一意大利的语言史》（巴里：拉特萨出版社，1986），43 页；以及霍华德·莫斯，“语言与意大利民族认同”，载于布鲁斯·哈多克和吉诺·贝达尼编，《意大利民族认同的政治》（卡迪夫：威尔士大学出版社，2000），第 98-123、200 页。

30. De Mauro, Storia Linguistica, 95.
30. 德马罗，语言史，95。

31. Antonio Gramsci, “La Lingua Unica e l’Esperanto,” Il Grido del Popolo (February 16, 1918), translation in Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Cultural Writings, ed. David Forgacs, trans. William Boelhower (Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1985), 26-31, hereafter cited as SCW.
31. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，“唯一语言与世界语”，《人民呼声报》（1918 年 2 月 16 日），载于《葛兰西文化著作选》，戴维·福格卡斯编，威廉·博伊霍沃尔译（马萨诸塞州剑桥：哈佛大学出版社，1985），第 26-31 页，以下简称《文选》。

32. Q11§12, SPN, 328; Q1§65, PN1, 173. Also see Q1§89; Q4§3; and Q24§4.
32. Q11§12，SPN，328；Q1§65，PN1，173。另见 Q1§89；Q4§3；及 Q24§4。

33. Marcia Landy, The Folklore of Consensus: Theatricality in the Italian Cinema, 1930-1943 (Albany: State University of New York Press, 1998), 4.
33. Marcia Landy，《共识的民间传说：1930-1943 年意大利电影中的戏剧性》（纽约州立大学出版社，1998），第 4 页。

34. Marcia Landy, “Culture and Politics in the Work of Antonio Gramsci,” Boundary 2, 14, 3 (1986): 49-70, 57.
34. Marcia Landy，“安东尼奥·葛兰西的著作中的文化与政治”，《边界 2》，第 14 卷，第 3 期（1986 年）：49-70，57。

35. Q27§1, SCW, 191. 35. Q27§1，SCW，191。

36. Crehan, 108, and Q9§15, SCW, 194.
36. 克里汉，108 页，以及 Q9§15，SCW，194 页。

37. Q8§173, PN3, 333; Q11§13, SPN, 419.
37. Q8§173，PN3，333；Q11§13，SPN，419。

38. Q4§18, PN2, 160; Q11§44; Antonio Gramsci, Further Selections from the Prison Notebooks, ed. and trans. Derek Boothman (Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1995), 301.
38. Q4§18，PN2，160；Q11§44；安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中札记》节选，德雷克·布斯曼编、译（明尼苏达大学出版社，1995），301 页。

39. Q8§204, PN3, 351-52; Q1§12 and §13, SPN, 323, 421.
39. Q8§204，PN3，351-52；Q1§12 和§13，SPN，323，421。

40. Q8§213III, PN3, 360. 40. Q8§213III，PN3，360。

41. Q11§12, SPN, 326. 41. Q11§12，SPN，326。

42. Q11§13, SPN, 422. See also Q8§173 and Robert Dombroski, Antonio Gramsci (Boston: Twayne Publishers, 1989), 12-13.
42. Q11§13，SPN，422。另见 Q8§173 和罗伯特·多布罗斯基著，《安东尼奥·葛兰西》（波士顿：Twayne 出版社，1989），第 12-13 页。

43. Frosini argues, as do we, that Gramsci’s redefinition of “common sense” highlights that it is not unitary and static but continually being transformed and redefined, that its role in unifying a social group depends on the way that the common sense comes about and that it must be actively utilized so that it becomes “ours.” Frosini, Gramsci e la Filosofia, 170-76.
43. 弗罗西尼与我们一样认为，葛兰西对“常识”的重新定义突显出它并非统一且静态的，而是在不断地被转化和重新定义；其在统一社会群体中的作用取决于常识的形成方式，并且必须积极地加以利用，使其成为“我们”的常识。弗罗西尼，葛兰西与哲学，170-76。

44. Q11§13, SPN, 419. 44. Q11§13，SPN，419。

45. This argument can be taken as a defense of Gramsci in the face of José Nun’s critique that he is overly critical of common sense in contrast to philosophy and postulates a “radical asepsis of common sense, defined as the opposite of philosophy.” José Nun, “Elements for a Theory of Democracy: Gramsci and Common Sense,” Boundary 2, 14, 3 (1986): 197-229, 222.
45.  这一论点可以被视为对葛兰西的辩护，回应何塞·努恩的批评，即葛兰西过分批判常识，与其相对立的是哲学，并假设“常识的激进无菌性”，定义为哲学的反面。何塞·努恩，“论民主理论的要素：葛兰西与常识”，《边界 2》，第 14 卷，第 3 期（1986 年）：197-229，222 页。

46. On Gramsci’s Socratic conception of culture, see Gramsci, “Socialism and Culture”(January 29, 1916), in Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Political Writings, 1910-1920, trans. John Mathews, ed. Quintin Hoare (Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1977), 10-13; “Philanthropy, Good Will and Organization” (December 24, 1917), in SCW, 23-26; and Q11§12.
46. 关于葛兰西的苏格拉底式文化观，参见葛兰西，“社会主义与文化”（1916 年 1 月 29 日），载于《葛兰西政治著作选集 1910-1920》，约翰·马修斯译，昆廷·霍尔编辑（明尼苏达大学出版社，1977），第 10-13 页；“慈善、善意与组织”（1917 年 12 月 24 日），载于《葛兰西文集》（SCW），第 23-26 页；以及 Q11§12。

47. Q29§2, SCW, 182. 47. Q29§2，SCW，182。

48. De Mauro, Storia Linguistica, 58-59.
48. 德马罗，《语言史》，第 58-59 页。

49. The entire exchange is available online at www.andreamontagner.it/?p=43.
49. 整个交流可在 www.andreamontagner.it/?p=43 在线获取。

50. Manzoni was a Romanticist who rejected the classicists5 attraction to the “purity” of literary Italian. Instead, very influenced by German Romanticism, Manzoni upheld actual spoken languages as being “living” languages, as expressive, beautiful, creative and productive. As Bruce Haddock notes, Italian Romanticism was not associated with conservative and reactionary views as it was in Germany; Bruce Haddock, “State, Nation and Rigorgimento,” in Politics of Italian National Identity, ed. Bruce Haddock and Gino Bedani (Cardiff: University of Wales Press, 2000), 23.
50. 马焦尼是一位浪漫主义者，他拒绝了古典主义者对“纯洁”的意大利文学的偏爱。相反，他深受德国浪漫主义的影响，认为实际的口语是“活的”语言，具有表达性、美感、创造性和生产力。正如布鲁斯·哈多克所指出的，意大利浪漫主义不像德国浪漫主义那样与保守和反动观点联系在一起；布鲁斯·哈多克，“国家、民族与复兴”，载于《意大利民族认同的政治》，布鲁斯·哈多克和吉诺·贝达尼编（卡迪夫：威尔士大学出版社，2000），23 页。

51. SCW, 28-29. 51. SCW，28-29。

52. See Ives, Gramsci's Politics of Language, 24-30; Franco Lo Piparo, Lingua, intellettuali, egemonia in Gramsci (Rome: Laterza, 1979), 67-102; and Sebastiano Timpanaro, “Graziadio Ascoli” Belfagor 27, no. 2 (1972): 149-76. This argument has interesting parallels with much of the work being done by sociolinguists concerning “varieties of English,” such as Braj Kachru and others. See Braj B. Kachru, Asian Englishes Beyond the Canon (Hong Kong: Hong Kong University Press, 2005).
52. 见 Ives，《葛兰西的语言政治学》，第 24-30 页；弗朗哥·洛皮帕罗，《语言、知识分子和葛兰西的霸权》（罗马：拉特萨出版社，1979），第 67-102 页；以及塞巴斯蒂亚诺·蒂潘纳罗，“格拉齐亚迪奥·阿斯科利”《贝尔法戈》27 卷第 2 期（1972）：149-176 页。这一论点与社会语言学家关于“英语的各种形式”的研究，例如布拉杰·卡秋以及其他学者，有着有趣的相似之处。参见布拉杰·B·卡秋，《规范之外的亚洲英语》（香港：香港大学出版社，2005）。

53. Antonio Gramsci, Letters from Prison, two volumes, trans. Ray Rosenthal, ed. Frank Rosengarten (New York: Columbia University Press), volume 1, 89, hereafter cited as LP1 and LP2. While we may want to reject his distinction here between “dialect” and "language”(e.g., Jonathan Steinberg, “The Historian and the Questione della Lingua；' in The Social History of Language, ed. Peter Burke and Roy Porter [Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1987], 199; Robert Phillipson, Linguistic Imperialism [Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1992], 38-40), Gramsci may also be thinking of the argument made by his professor, Bartoli, that the role of the Sardinian language had been underappreciated in the history of Italian vernaculars. Moreover, Franco Lo Piparo contends persuasively that Gramsci posits an isomorphic relation between national language and dialect and those of city/country and official culture/folklore (Lo Piparo, 179-89).
53. 安东尼奥·葛兰西，《狱中书信》，两卷，雷·罗森塔尔译，弗兰克·罗森加滕编（纽约：哥伦比亚大学出版社），第一卷，89 页，以下简称 LP1 和 LP2。尽管我们可能想拒绝他在这里“方言”和“语言”之间的区分（例如，乔纳森·斯坦伯格，“历史学家与语言问题”；载于彼得·伯克和罗伊·波特编，《语言的社会史》，[剑桥：剑桥大学出版社，1987]，199；罗伯特·菲利普森，《语言帝国主义》[牛津：牛津大学出版社，1992]，38-40），葛兰西也可能正在思考他教授巴尔托利提出的论点，即撒丁语在意大利土语史中的作用长期被低估。此外，弗朗哥·洛皮帕罗有力地论证葛兰西假设了民族语言与方言、城市/乡村和官方文化/民间文化之间存在同构关系（洛皮帕罗，179-89 页）。

54. LP2, 356. 54. LP2，356。

55. LP1, 240. LP1，240。

56. Q29§2, SCW, 180-81, emphasis added.
56. Q29§2，SCW，180-81 页，重点标出。

57. Q5§156, SCW, 195. 57. Q5§156，SCW，195。

58. Q1§43, PN1, 128. 58. Q1§43，PN1，128。

59. Q1§65, PN1, 173. Gramsci rewrites this section in Q24§4—the “special notebook” on
59. Q1§65，PN1，173. 格拉姆斯基在 Q24§4 中重写了这一部分——“特殊笔记本”上的

“Journalism”——adding “good sense” to "common sense” in the first line. This has clear resonances with his 1918 critique of Esperanto, which concludes: "Each new social stratum that emerges in history, that organizes itself for the good fight, introduces new currents and new uses into the language and explodes the fixed schemes established by the grammarians for the fortuitous convenience of teaching.... New moral and intellectual curiosities goad the spirit and compel it to
“新闻业”——在第一行将“常识”改为“良好常识”。这与他 1918 年对世界语的批判有着明显的共鸣，批判的结论是：“历史上出现的每一个新的社会阶层，为了争取进步而组织起来，都会将新的潮流和新的用法引入语言，并炸毁语法学家为教学的偶然便利而制定的固定模式……新的道德和智力上的好奇心驱使精神，迫使它

renew itself, to improve itself, to change the linguistic forms of expression by taking them from foreign languages, by reviving dead forms and by changing meanings and grammatical functions.” SCW, 31.
自我更新，自我完善，通过借鉴外语、复兴过时的形式以及改变意义和语法功能来改变语言表达形式。”  SCW，31。

60. Q8, §173, PN3, 333-34.
60. Q8，§173，PN3，333-34。

61. Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, The German Ideology (New York: International Publishers, 1970), 64.
61. 卡尔·马克思和弗里德里希·恩格斯，《德意志意识形态》(纽约：国际出版公司，1970 年)，第 64 页。

62. Q11§13, SPN, 419-25. See also Crehan, 108-10.
62. Q11§13，SPN，419-25。另见 Crehan，108-10。

63. Q11§13, SPN, 420. 63. Q11§13，SPN，420。

64. Q1§89, PN1, 186; Q27§1, SCW, 188-91.
64. Q1§89，PN1，186；Q27§1，SCW，188-91。

65. Q8§153, PN3, 321. 65. Q8§153，PN3，321。

66. Q1§44, PN2 1992, 136-37; Q19§24, SPN, 59.
66. Q1§44，PN2 1992，136-37；Q19§24，SPN，59。

67. Q19§3, QC, 1973. 67. Q19§3，QC，1973。

68. Q12§1, SPN, 6. 68. Q12§1，SPN，6。

69. Q21§5, SCW, 208. 69. Q21§5，SCW，208。

70. Q3§76, SCW, 169, 168.
70. Q3§76，SCW，169，168。

71. Q3§76, SCW, 167-68, 169.
71. Q3§76，SCW，167-168，169。

72. Q3§48, PN2, 48-52. 72. Q3§48，PN2，48-52。

73. Q16§9, SPN, 395-96. 73. Q16§9, SPN，395-96。

74. Q11§55, QC, 1482-83; Q13§1, SPN, 125-33.
74. Q11§55，QC，1482-83；Q13§1，SPN，125-33。

75. Q15§13, QC, 1771. 75. Q15§13，QC，1771。

76. Q25§5, SPN, 52. See Green, “Gramsci Cannot Speak,” 9-10.
76. Q25§5，SPN，52。见 Green，“葛兰西不会说话”，9-10 页。

77. Q13§17, SPN, 177-85. 77. Q13§17，SPN，177-85。

78. Q11§12, SPN, 337. 78. Q11§12，SPN，337。

* A slightly longer version of this chapter was originally published in Historical Materialism 17, no. 1 (2009): 3-30. We would like to thank Brill for allowing us to republish it here.
本章节的较长版本最初发表于《历史唯物主义》杂志第 17 卷第 1 期（2009 年），页码为 3-30。感谢布里尔出版社允许我们在此重新发表。

About the Contributors
Giorgio Baratta taught moral philosophy at the University of Urbino (Carlo Bo) before his untimely death just as this volume was going to press. He was one of the founders of the International Gramsci Society (IGS) and the president of the IGS-Italia. He published several books on Gramsci, including Le Rose e i Quaderni: Il Pensiero Dialogico di Antonio Gramsci (2003) and Antonio Gramsci in Contrappunto (2007). He made two films about Gramsci一Gramsci l}ho visto così, with Gianni Amico, and New York e il mistero di Napoli: Viaggio nel mondo di Gramsci raccontato da Dario Fo一and a theatrical piece, Dialogo di Gramsci con la sua ombra. He is also the author of a book on Husserl and essays on Hölderlin, Marx and Sartre.
乔治·巴拉塔教授生前在乌尔比诺大学（卡洛·博分校）讲授伦理学，不幸于此书即将付印之际逝世。他是国际葛兰西协会（IGS）的创始成员之一，以及 IGS-意大利分会的会长。他出版了多本关于葛兰西的著作，包括《玫瑰与札记：安东尼奥·葛兰西的对话思想》（2003）和《葛兰西的反调》（2007）。他还制作了两部关于葛兰西的电影——《我眼中的葛兰西》，与贾尼·阿米科合作；以及《纽约与那不勒斯的迷雾：葛兰西的世界之旅》，由达里奥·福讲述——以及一部话剧《葛兰西与其阴影的对话》。他还著有关于胡塞尔的一本书，以及关于荷尔德林、马克思和萨特的文章。

Derek Boothman teaches translation at the University of Bologna’s faculty for interpreters and translators (SSLMIT). He edited and translated the anthology of Gramsci’s writings Further Selections from the Prison Notebooks (1995). He has written extensively on Gramsci, including Traducibilità e Processi Traduttivi: Un Caso: A. Gramsci Linguista (2004). He is a member of Rome’s Seminario gramsciano.
德里克·布斯曼在博洛尼亚大学口译和笔译学院（SSLMIT）教授翻译。他编辑并翻译了葛兰西著作选集《狱中札记续编》（1995）。他撰写了大量关于葛兰西的文章，包括《可译性与翻译过程：一个案例：葛兰西——语言学家》（2004）。他是罗马葛兰西研讨会的成员。

Lucia Borghese teaches German philology in the Depertment of Comparative Languages, Literatures, and Culture at the University of Florence. She has written several essays on Gramsci, edited Italian translations of Kafka and a volume on Heinrich Böll. She also coordinates the international doctorate course in German Philology Florence-Bonn.
卢西亚·博尔格塞教授在佛罗伦萨大学比较语言学、文学和文化系教授德语语言学。她撰写了多篇关于葛兰西的论文，编辑了卡夫卡的意大利语译本和一本关于海因里希·贝尔的专著。她还在协调佛罗伦萨-波恩德语语言学国际博士课程。

Francisco F. Buey is professor of political philosophy at the University Pompeu Fabra, Barcelona, Spain, and Coordinator of the Center for the Study of Social Movements (CEMS). He was one of the founders of the Sindicato Democratico de la Universidad de Barcelona in 1966, and has been active in creating the Comisiones Obreras de la Ensenanza and the Consejo de Coordinación Universitaria. He has written many books and articles on Lenin, Gramsci, Marx and Einstein, including Leyendo a Gramsci (2001), Ideas para una globalización alternativa (2004) and Utopias e ilusiones naturales (2007).
弗朗西斯科·F·布伊是西班牙巴塞罗那庞培法布拉大学政治哲学教授，也是社会运动研究中心（CEMS）协调员。他于 1966 年是巴塞罗那大学民主工会（Sindicato Democratico de la Universidad de Barcelona）的创始人之一，并积极参与创建了教师工会委员会（Comisiones Obreras de la Ensenanza）和大学协调委员会（Consejo de Coordinación Universitaria）。他撰写了大量关于列宁、葛兰西、马克思和爱因斯坦的书籍和文章，包括《读葛兰西》（2001）、《另类的全球化构想》（2004）和《乌托邦与自然幻象》（2007）。

Tullio De Mauro is one of Italy’s most prominent linguists, the author of many books and essays, including Storia linguistica dell'Italia unita (originally 1963, with ten editions), Introduzione alla semantica (1965), an introduction, translation and commentary to Ferdinand de Saussure’s Corso di linguistica generale (1967) and, more recently, La fabbrica delle parole (2005). He has written extensively on Wittgenstein, semiotics and the philosophy of language and is the general editor of a major eight-volume Italian dictionary. He is also the director of the Department of Linguistic Science at the University of Rome La Sapienza. He has also been an active public intellectual and an elected politician, including as the minister of public education (2000-2001). He wrote the preface to Franco Lo Piparo’s 1979 book, Lingua, intellettuali, egemonia in Gramsci.
图利奥·德·毛罗是意大利最杰出的语言学家之一，著有多部书籍和文章，包括《意大利统一的语言史》(最初出版于 1963 年，已出版十版)、《语义学导论》(1965)、对费迪南·德·索绪尔《普通语言学教程》的导读、翻译及评注(1967)以及近期的《词语的制造》(2005)。他广泛研究维特根斯坦、符号学和语言哲学，并担任大型八卷本意大利语词典的主编。他还担任罗马拉萨皮恩扎大学语言科学系的主任。他同时是一位活跃的公共知识分子和民选政治家，曾任公共教育部长(2000-2001)。他还为弗朗科·洛·皮帕罗 1979 年的著作《语言、知识分子和葛兰西的霸权》撰写了序言。

Fabio Frosini is a research fellow in the Department of Philosophy, University of Urbino (Carlo Bo), Italy. He is author of many articles and books, including Contingenza e verità della politica: Due studi su Machiavelli (2001), Gramsci e la filosofia: Saggio sui “Quaderni del carcere^ (2003) and, most recently, Da Gramsci a Marx: Ideologia, Verità, Politica (2009). With Guido Liguori, from 2000 to 2006 Frosini coordinated the International Gramsci Society-Italy seminar on the vocabulary of Gramsci’s Prison Notebooks.
法比奥·弗罗西尼是意大利乌尔比诺大学（卡洛·博）哲学系的研究员。他是多篇文章和书籍的作者，包括《政治的偶然性和真理：关于马基雅维利的两篇研究》(2001)、《葛兰西与哲学：关于“狱中札记”的论文》(2003)以及最近的《从葛兰西到马克思：意识形态、真理、政治》(2009)。弗罗西尼与圭多·利古里合作，从 2000 年到 2006 年协调了国际葛兰西学会-意大利分会关于葛兰西狱中札记词汇的研讨会。

Stefano Gensini teaches philosophy of language at the University of Rome “La Sapienza." He has written several essays and books on the history of the philosophy of language, linguistics and semiotics, including works on Condillac, Leibniz, Vico, Leopardi and Gramsci.
斯蒂法诺·根西尼教授在罗马“拉萨皮恩扎”大学教授语言哲学。他撰写了多篇论文和著作，研究语言哲学、语言学和符号学史，包括关于孔狄亚克、莱布尼茨、维科、莱奥帕迪和葛兰西的著作。

Marcus E. Green is assistant professor of political science at Otterbein College. He is secretary of the International Gramsci Society and author of “Gramsci Cannot Speak: Representations and Interpretations of Gramsci’s Concept of the Subaltern" in Rethinking Marxism (2002).
马库斯·E·格林是奥特贝恩学院政治学助理教授。他是国际葛兰西协会秘书长，著有《葛兰西无法说话：对葛兰西“被统治阶级”概念的表述和诠释》（载于《重思马克思主义》，2002 年）。

Peter Ives teaches political theory in the politics department at the University of Winnipeg, Canada. He is author of Gramsci's Politics of Language: Engaging the Bakhtin Circle and the Frankfurt School (2004) and Language and Hegemony in Gramsci (2004), and numerous articles on Gramsci, language politics, “global English,” cosmopolitanism and global capitalism.
彼得·艾夫斯在加拿大温尼伯大学政治系教授政治理论。他是《葛兰西的语言政治：参与巴赫金学派和法兰克福学派》（2004）和《葛兰西的语言与霸权》（2004）的作者，以及关于葛兰西、语言政治、“全球英语”、世界主义和全球资本主义的众多文章的作者。

Rocco Lacorte is a PhD candidate at the University of Chicago completing a dissertation on Gramsci and Pasolini. He participates in the activities of the International Gramsci Society, Rome’s Seminario gramsciano, and has written ten entries in the Dizionario Gramsciano, edited by G. Liguori and P. Voza (2009).
罗科·拉科尔特是芝加哥大学的博士候选人，正在撰写一篇关于葛兰西和帕索里尼的博士论文。他参与了国际葛兰西协会、罗马葛兰西研讨会的活动，并为利古里（G. Liguori）和沃扎（P. Voza）编辑的《葛兰西词典》（2009 年）撰写了十篇文章。

Maurizio Lichtner teaches general pedagogy at the University of Rome “La Sapienza." He studies learning processes and social and pedagogical research methodologies. He has published extensively on these topics, particularly on adult education and lifelong learning, including Soggetti, percorsi, complessità sociale (1990), La qualità delle azioni formative (1999), Valutare L'apprendimento: Teorie e Metodi (2004), Esperienze vissute e costruzione del sapere (2008) and Le prime parole: Diario di una bambina (1999).
马尔科·利希特纳教授在罗马“拉萨皮恩扎”大学教授普通教育学。他的研究领域包括学习过程以及社会和教育研究方法。他在这些主题上发表了大量著作，尤其是在成人教育和终身学习方面，包括《主体、途径、社会复杂性》(1990)、《形成行动的质量》(1999)、《评估学习：理论与方法》(2004)、《体验与知识构建》(2008)和《第一个词：一个女孩的日记》(1999)。

Franco Lo Piparo is a full professor in the philosophy of language at the University of Palermo where he directs the Institute of the Theory and History of Ideas. He is author of one of the most important books on Gramsci and language, Lingua, intellettuali, egemonia in Gramsci (1979), and many other works, including Linguaggi macchine formalizzazione (1974), Aristotele e il linguaggio: Cosa fa di una lingua una lingua (2003), Filosofia, Lingua, Politica (2004) and, most recently, Comunista? La chiave linguistica dell'originalità di Gramsci (2008).
法兰克·洛皮帕罗是巴勒莫大学语言哲学的正教授，同时也是思想理论与历史研究所所长。他是关于葛兰西与语言的一系列重要著作的作者，其中包括《葛兰西的语言、知识分子与霸权》(1979)；此外，他还著有《语言、机器与形式化》(1974)、《亚里士多德与语言：何为语言》(2003)、《哲学、语言与政治》(2004)以及最新出版的《共产主义者？葛兰西的语言原创性解读》(2008)等著作。

Utz Maas is professor of general and German linguistics at the University of Osnabrück, Germany. His work ranges from German phonetics and grammar to sociolinguistics, including Arabic and issues of migration and politics. He is author of Sprachpolitik und politische Sprachwissenschaft: Sieben Studien (1989), Sprache und Sprachen in der Migrationsgesellschaft: Die schriftkulturelle Dimension (2008) and Phonologie: Einführung in die funktionale Phonetik des Deutschen (2006).
乌兹·马斯是德国奥斯纳布吕克大学普通语言学和德语语言学教授。他的研究领域涵盖德语语音学和语法，以及社会语言学，包括阿拉伯语以及移民和政治问题。他是《语言政策与政治语言学：七个研究》（1989）、《移民社会中的语言与方言：书面文化维度》（2008）和《音系学：德语功能语音学导论》（2006）的作者。

Luigi Rosiello taught linguistics at the University of Bologna before his death in 1993. He studied the philosophy of language and history of linguistic ideas, particularly those of the French philosophers of the Enlightenment, and wrote extensively on linguistics and structuralism and on linguistics and Marxism. Some of his most famous books include Struttura, uso e funzioni della lingua (1965), Linguistica e marxismo (1974) and Letteratura e strutturalismo (1983).
路易吉·罗西耶罗在 1993 年去世前曾在博洛尼亚大学教授语言学。他研究语言哲学和语言思想史，尤其关注法国启蒙思想家，并撰写了大量关于语言学与结构主义以及语言学与马克思主义的著作。他最著名的著作包括《语言的结构、用途和功能》(1965)、《语言学与马克思主义》(1974)和《文学与结构主义》(1983)。

Edoardo Sanguineti is a well-known Italian writer, poet, artist, translator and founder of the avant-garde movement Gruppo 63. From 1979 to 1983, he was a member of the Italian Parliament for the Partito Communista Italiano. He has translated Shakespeare, Joyce, Goethe and many others into Italian.
埃多阿尔多·桑吉内蒂是一位著名的意大利作家、诗人、艺术家、翻译家，也是先锋派团体“63 小组”的创始人。1979 年至 1983 年，他曾是意大利共产党议员。他将莎士比亚、乔伊斯、歌德等人的作品翻译成意大利语。

Anne Showstack Sassoon is emeritus professor in politics at Kingston University and visiting professor at Birkbeck, University of London. She has published many books and articles on the work of Antonio Gramsci, on civil society, citizenship and globalization, on the changing socioeconomic roles of women and the welfare state and on the politics of New Labor.
安·肖斯塔克·萨松是金史密斯大学政治学名誉教授，伦敦大学伯贝克学院访问教授。她出版了许多关于安东尼奥·葛兰西著作、公民社会、公民权和全球化、女性社会经济角色变化和福利国家以及新工党政治的书籍和文章。

André Tosel is professor of philosophy at the University of Nice, France. He is the author of many volumes on Marxism, Spinoza and the political philosophy of liberalism and democracy. These include Kant Révolutionnaire: Droit et Politique (1988); Marx et sa critique de la politique, in collaboration with Cesare Luporini and Etienne Balibar (1979); L'esprit de scission: études sur Marx, Gramsci, Lukacs (1991) and Etudes sur Marx (et Engels) (1998).
安德烈·托塞尔是法国尼斯大学的哲学教授。他是许多关于马克思主义、斯宾诺莎以及自由主义和民主政治哲学的著作的作者。其中包括《革命的康德：法与政治》(1988)；与切萨雷·卢波里尼和埃蒂安·巴里巴共同撰写的《马克思及其对政治的批判》(1979)；《分裂的精神：关于马克思、葛兰西、卢卡奇的研究》(1991) 和《马克思（及恩格斯）研究》(1998)。

This file was downloaded from Z-Library project
此文件是从 Z-Library 项目下载的


Your gateway to knowledge and culture. Accessible for everyone.
知识和文化的入口。人人皆可访问。

WWW 万维网

z-library.se singlelogin.re go-to-zlibrary.se single-login.ru
z-library.se 单点登录.re  访问 zlibrary.se 单点登录.ru


Official Telegram channel
官方电报频道


Z-Access Z-通路


https://wikipedia.org/wiki/Z-Library
